Test cases.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System, Integration, smoke
and Regression Testing and review  of deliverables
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
Meeting with Clients
Project Summary
EHR is web portal that stores the each and every health information of a patient from cradle to
grave. Users of this portal are patient,  doctor, Insurance provider, pharmacies, and laboratories.
Through this portal, a  fresh patient signs up for his user id and password. With his user id and
password he logs in to the portal and enters his personal details, medical history, family history,
medication (current/past), therapies, etc. The same process follows for doctor for signing up.
When doctor logs in, he searches for a patient. After the completion of search the all the details
entered by patient are available to the doctor (if allowed by patient).  Doctor can create an
Episode for this patient, under that episode;  he has got a  provision of creating Visits and events.
This portal also gives facility of order management where in doctor can place order for patient
and laboratories after doing the order, enters result through the same portal.
For its globalization, application was kept compliant with global health standards like HL7
(for interoperability), HIPAA (for data  security).
Project 2:  DB Independent Framework
Platform:  Windows XP
Language:  C#
Technology:  .NET
Role:  Tester
Front End:  ASP.NET
Back End:  SQL Server 2005
Clients:  Emergency Management and Research Institute, Hyderabad.
Health Management and Research  Institute, Hyderabad.
Write and execute SQL queries.
Creating Test case scenarios, creating setups, writing Test cases, review and execution of
Test cases.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System, Integration, smoke
and Regression Testing and review  of deliverables
Meeting with Clients
Project Summary
DB Independent Framework provides an abstraction to interact with databases without specifying
specific   Data  Source in application code. Data  Provider specific   methods are decoupled from
application code.
6.1 years of experience in the field of software testing, currently working as a  Test Engineer  with
WMS Gaming solutions India  pvt. Ltd., Pune.
Graduate in Electronics and communications engineering from ICFAI University in year of 2007.
Solid expertise in manual testing for projects during all phases, familiar with the life cycle and different
phases, requirements in a project and performing end to end Testing responsibility.
Working extensively on Functional, System, Integration and Regression Testing assignments.
Having 4.5 years of working experience with Healthcare Industry/US Healthcare industry.
Well versed with Healthcare Industry/EHR Standards such as HIPAA for data  security, HL7 for
interoperability and ICD10.
Having good knowledge of PBM  and Healthcare insurance Industry esp. claim processing and plan
creations in AS400 environment.
Currently working and having good knowledge of Casino Gaming Industry, spec. testing Slot machines/
EGM/VLT for Class II specific environment.
Skilled in good team work,  independent functioning, taking up new  challenges & profitable for the
company, planning and execution of ideas.
An excellent communicator with exceptional team building and interpersonal skills.
WORK  EXPERIENCE (73 Months)
Designation Organization Duration Work Field
Test Engineer WMS Gaming solutions 20th Jun'12   Till date IT-Software
Test Specialist IBM  India Pvt. Ltd. 3rd Dec'09   8th Jun'12 IT-Software
Software Engineer Satyam Computer
Services Pvt.  Ltd
29 Oct'07   2nd Dec'09 IT-Software
1) WMS Gaming solution  India  Pvt. Ltd.
Duration:  20th Jun'12   Till date
As a Team member,  Major responsibilities during this tenure are:
Understanding requirement, writing Test cases, review  and execution of Test cases.
To  test all major functionalities of game
Starting from loading it to  the EGM, running and
testing it using Slot Accounting System (SAS), OPTOS and GSL Monitor tool.
Verify accounting and game play features.
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
Project Summary
WMS Gaming is a manufacturer of slot machines,  video lottery terminals and software to  help
casinos manage their gaming operations. The company is based in Waukegan, Illinois.
Project's requirement is to test all the functionalities of Class II based themes.
1) IBM India  Pvt. Ltd.
Duration:  3rd Dec'09   8th Jun'12
RxClaim project had several modules, releases in every 2 months. Worked on more than 8 releases as a
Module Lead/Team  member, Major responsibilities during this tenure were:
Understanding requirement, estimation, task allocation,  status reporting.
Creating Test case scenarios, creating setups, writing Test cases, review and execution of
Test cases.
Responsible for the accurate processing and completion of medical claims,  includes
creating/processing claims and plan setups.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System Integration, smoke,
Regression Testing  and review  of deliverables
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
Project Summary
Healthcare industry products (drugs) are subsidized by insurance companies and services
companies like CVS CAREMARK, etc  through different schemes (plans) which provide benefits.
Health card is provided by the Health Insurance Company to  each member. A member goes to a
prescriber, to get prescription for drugs. Member then goes to a pharmacy and purchases the
drugs and then claims for the drugs purchased.  Pharmacy submits a claim to Caremark for the
member purchased drugs. The claim process begins when a  member goes to  a  pharmacy and
purchases the prescribed drugs. The pharmacy submits a  claim using the member's information
and BIN/Process or Control/Group Number (BPG) information. The claim is routed to  the switching
company or \u0022Switch\u0022 via  the BPG. The switch then determines which PROCESSOR should process
the claim. RxCLAIM  application uses the BPG  to  identify the claim  and begins eligibility validations
and the benefit plan for coverage. Once all the information has been verified, RxCLAIM
application will send a  message back to the pharmacy that communicates a paid or rejected
claim.
For its globalization, application was kept compliant with global health standards like HIPPA (for
data  security).
Project 2:  WGS Transition and Transformation    Process Renovation
Platform:  Windows XP
Technology:  Mainframes
Role:  Team Member
Front End:  Mainframes
Client:  Wellpoint, USA.
Duration:  3rd Mar'12   8th Jun'12
WGS- Process Renovation project had several modules, releases in every month. Worked on 2 releases as
a  Team member, Major responsibilities during this tenure were:
Understanding requirement, Creating Test case scenarios,  creating setups, writing Test
cases, review and execution of Test cases.
Responsible for the accurate processing and completion of medical claims,  includes
creating/processing claims and setups.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System Integration,
Regression Testing  and review  of deliverables
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
2) Satyam Computer Services Pvt. Ltd
Duration:  29 Oct'07   2nd Dec'09
Project 1:  Electronic Health  Record
Platform:  Windows XP
Language:  C#
Technology:  .NET
Role:  Tester
Front End:  ASP.NET
Back End:  SQL Server 2005
Client:  Emergency Management and Research  Institute, Hyderabad
Creating Test case scenarios, creating setups, writing Test cases, review and execution of
Test cases.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System, Integration, smoke
and Regression Testing and review  of deliverables
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
Meeting with Clients
Project Summary
EHR is web portal that stores the each and every health information of a patient from cradle to
grave. Users of this portal are patient,  doctor, Insurance provider, pharmacies, and laboratories.
Through this portal, a  fresh patient signs up for his user id and password. With his user id and
password he logs in to the portal and enters his personal details, medical history, family history,
medication (current/past), therapies, etc. The same process follows for doctor for signing up.
When doctor logs in, he searches for a patient. After the completion of search the all the details
entered by patient are available to the doctor (if allowed by patient).  Doctor can create an
Episode for this patient, under that episode;  he has got a  provision of creating Visits and events.
This portal also gives facility of order management where in doctor can place order for patient
and laboratories after doing the order, enters result through the same portal.
For its globalization, application was kept compliant with global health standards like HL7
(for interoperability), HIPAA (for data  security).
Project 2:  DB Independent Framework
Platform:  Windows XP
Language:  C#
Technology:  .NET
Role:  Tester
Front End:  ASP.NET
Back End:  SQL Server 2005
Clients:  Emergency Management and Research Institute, Hyderabad.
Health Management and Research  Institute, Hyderabad.
Write and execute SQL queries.
Creating Test case scenarios, creating setups, writing Test cases, review and execution of
Test cases.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System, Integration, smoke
and Regression Testing and review  of deliverables
Meeting with Clients
Project Summary
DB Independent Framework provides an abstraction to interact with databases without specifying
specific   Data  Source in application code. Data  Provider specific   methods are decoupled from
application code.
Company  Name :  Tata  Technologies Ltd
Duration  Since : 21st Oct 2010  to  till  date
Working  as \u0022Software Developer\u0022.
Company  Name :  Cognosys Technologies Pvt Ltd (16th July  2010  to  6th Oct 2010)
Company  Name :  Vtelebyte ( 4th July  2009  to  5th July  2010  )
Fujitsu Consulting  India,  Pune,  India
Enterprise Operation Service
12-Jan-2011    till date
I am working  as a Business Enabler and  primarily  responsible for Demand  Generation  and
Market Research.
Prepare prospective database and  establish  contact with  identified  decision  makers in  new  target
accounts.
Identify  new  business opportunities through  cold  calling  or email conversations.
Understand  customer requirements and  share relevant  Fliers/Deck/Collaterals with  them  to
handle initial RFIs
Follow-up  and  ensuring  closure of leads.
Update all  the records in  Salesforce CRM
Achieve quarterly  & yearly  business & revenue targets
Prepare Pursuit Plan,  Opportunity  Overview  / Summary  Document of an  RFP/RFI/RFQ  to  spread
awareness among  different business units within  Fujitsu  e.g.  Solution  Architects,  Technical
Writers,  Portfolio  Management,  Bid  Management,  WFM etc
Understand  Client needs and  support  the bid  manager for preparing  response to  RFP's with
credentials,  references,  documents,  presentations and  business proposals
Forge relationship  with  clients for repeat & continued  business
Worked at Astric Soft Solutions Pvt Ltd Pune as  a Software Engineer (October 2010 to
September 2011)
7+ years of experience in IT industry, involved in Software Testing.
Experience in Healthcare (HIS, EMR, PACS, RIS, LIS, Teleradiology, Image Processing, Medical  Imaging,
and Algorithm Testing), Life science, Capital Market (Equity and Derivatives, Commodity) Forex
market, Retail, ERP  Domain.
NTT  Data Global  technology services Pvt.Ltd, as Senior Test Engineer, 28 March  2011 Till  Date.
Optra systems Pvt.Ltd, as Sr. Software Test Engineer, 22 Oct 200717 March 2011.
Med synaptic  Pvt.Ltd, as Software Test Engineer, April  2007-  Oct 2007.
Neha Software Technology, as Software Test Engineer, Sep 2006-March  2007.
Excellent problem solving skills with good interpersonal skills, Quick learner  and excellent team player,
ability to meet tight deadlines and work under  pressure, team Building approach.
Test Process Assessment | Test Process Management | Test Planning, Estimation, Risk Analysis, Review,
Test Reporting & Closure| Strong leadership and communication  | Manual  Functional  Testing, Integration,
System, User  Acceptance Testing.
Experience in handling team and resolving issues, extensively involved in  testing activity of Project.
Escalate project issues to Project Manager/Test Manager, Provide technical  help to  test engineers.
Client Interaction  and Prepared Daily and weekly Status report, Organize Weekly Team meeting.
Analyze requirements during the requirements analysis phase of projects.
Preparation of the Test Plan, Define the Test Strategy and Preparation of Test Estimation.
Identify the Test Scenarios, Preparation  of Test Data and Test cases, Execution  of Test Cases and Analyze
Test results, and preparation of Test matrix and defect matrix.
Review of Test Cases prepared by team members, Participate in Bug resolution  meeting.
Bug Verification, Bug Tracking and Reporting, Participate in  Bug Review meeting.
Preparation of Test Summary Report, Traceability matrix and keep track of traceability matrix.
Arrange the Hardware and software requirement for  the Test Setup.
Analyzing bugs & interacting with development team to resolution of defects.
Leading testing team and managing all  testing activities, Active interaction with Onsite co-
ordinator  and Client.
Analyzed the requirement and Identified Test scenario.
Preparation of Test plan, Test Estimation, Define Test strategy and Test Environment set up.
Involved in GUI, Functional, Integration, System Testing, Regression,  exploratory Testing.
Preparation of Test Cases and peer  review, executing test cases and analyzed the test results.
Bug Verification, Bug Tracking and Reporting, Participated in Bug
resolution
and review
meetings.
,
Preparation of traceability matrix and keep tracking of traceability matrix.
Technologies: Front-end: >.NET, Java.
CAFX (Cyber Agent Forex Trade):-
Description: CNX for  data exchange between two systems. Backyard application  is helpful  for  Cyber
Agent Customer  Support Team and Front end application is helpful  for  customer  to login  to Currenex
System, deposit and withdrawal  online money, view and download statutory reports etc. Develop
Application including Customer  Frontend, BackOffice Operations System for  Cyber  Agent Customer
support, and interface with  critical  data exchange with the Trading system of CURRNEX.
Significant role played in  requirements analysis.
Involved in GUI, Functional, Integration, System Testing, Regression  Testing.
Preparation of Test Cases and peer  review, Review of Test Cases prepared by team members,
executing test cases and analyzed the test results.
Bug Verification, Bug Tracking and Reporting, Participated in Bug resolution and review
meetings.
Preparation of traceability matrix and keep tracking of traceability matrix.
Technologies: Front-end: > Java.
Optra systems Pvt.Ltd 22 Oct 200717 March 2011
CS&T
Description: Application used to  collect and analyze flow cytometric  data. Application supports data
collection  and analysis on the cytometers. This is used by research scientists and technicians from
universities, hospitals, reference labs and biotech  and pharmaceutical  companies.
Leading testing team and managing all  testing activities, closely interaction  with client.
Significant role played in  requirements analysis.
Preparation of Test plan  and Define the Test Strategy and Preparation of Test Estimation.
Involved in GUI, Functional, Integration, System Testing, Regression  Testing.
Responsible for  daily Test Reports generation and tracking.
Developed test plan, test designs, test procedures, test log and test summary report.
Defect tracking and maintaining using ClearQuest.
Test Cases peer  review and Executing test cases and analyzed the test results.
Preparation of traceability matrix and keep tracking of traceability matrix.
Technologies: Front-end: > Java, Swing.
HER2Neu/ER/PR/Ki67 Algorithm  Development & Image Viewer
Description: In  this system image will  be subjected to  Image Quality Assessment module for
acceptance or  rejection of the image. Image processing Algorithm identifies tumor cells based on
expression  of HER2Neu/ER/PR/Ki67 marker  on membrane and nucleus of cell. The system classifies the
cell  into Positive or  Negative type based on  agreed threshold values of classification.
Leading testing team and managing all  testing activities.
Involved in Development of Test Plan.
Analyzed the requirement and Identified Test scenario.
Developing test cases and Test Cases peer  review.
Involved in GUI, Functional, Integration, System Testing, Regression  Testing.
Executing test cases and analyzed the test results.
Keeping track of tested requirement in the traceability matrix.
Bug Verification, Bug Tracking and Reporting.
Technologies: Front-end: > C# and Java.
Patientstick
Description:  This application  helps to manage the patient information. The software will  be
implemented as a Client server  based application for  hospitals which will  have a rich user  interface.
Patient will  get their  report in a \u0022Patientstick\u0022 instead of file folder  so patient can  carry their  report
anywhere easily. Patient can  upload data on web server  so they can see their  report from any place.
Involved in Development of Test Plan.
Developing test cases and Test Cases peer  review.
Involved in Functional, Regression and System and Compatibility Testing.
Executing test cases and analyzed the test results.
Keeping track of tested requirement in the traceability matrix.
Bug Verification, Bug Tracking and Reporting.
Technologies: Front-end: > .Net, Back-end: MS SQL 2005.
Single cell analysis
Description:  The software will  be implemented as a window based application.
Align Cell  image as well  as RT  image with  GAL file data after that select the particular  probe and
analysis the selected images as per  imaging algorithm and store all  the three files in  the image storage
folder  then export analyzed data into .CSV, excel  and tab delimited format, re-analysis of image data
facility also  available in  this application.
Prepared Test Cases for  User  Interface, Functional  and Integration  Testing.
Involved in GUI, Functional, Integration, System Testing, Regression  Testing.
Executing test cases and analyzed the test results.
Keeping track of tested requirement in the traceability matrix.
Bug Verification, Bug Tracking and Reporting.
Technologies: Front-end: C#.Net, Back-end: MS SQL Express 2005.
Drivers Development
Description:  Our Driver  plays the intermediate role in  between  application and other  proprietary
image format. Driver  basic  role is to  make image data readable to the application. With help of driver
user  should able to  view the images in application  viewer  and should analyze them on  application Grid,
apart from this user should able to use all  other  tools on the image successfully.
Following are the driver  which  we successfully delivered to the client -
1. SVS Driver: SVS images are basically 2D images, a proprietary file format of Aperio  Inc. Aperio
SVS files contain  multiple images, use a tiled organization, and are compressed with JPEG or  JPEG2000
lossy compression.
2. ZVI  Driver:  ZVI images are basically 3D and 4D images, a proprietary file format of Zeiss. The ZVI
Format is a Standard OLE Compound file containing storage and stream.
A compound file may be considered as a file system within  a file.
Requirement Analysis -  Understanding of Image format and the file structure.
IHC_Nuclear Application
Description:  This application  help to identify cancer cells with the help of Image processing and helps
pathologists to  report the percentage of infection  and Virtual Image Analysis system which provides
the pathologist with a computer  aided decision making tool  for  prognostic  or  predictive samples, Image
analysis with the help of entire metadata which  is generated by Algorithm and reporting.
Technologies: Front-end: C++ and .Net.
Med synaptic Pvt.Ltd April 2007 - 20 Oct 2007
PACS (Picture Archiving and communication system)
Description:  This Web based application  can  be used to connect medical  Multimodality (CT, MRI, and
CR).Teleradiology connectivity for  remote viewing can be a part of the system and will  require a
broadband connection. Multiple viewing station  with feature like View selected patient, process on the
image in image viewer, create and view Reports, DICOM print, burn  CDs etc. Processing features like
W/L, Brightness, contrast, Pan, Zoom, Inverse, Reverse, Angular  Rotation, various measurements
feature are available, Online reporting facility available.
Technologies: Front-end: Java and VB.Net.
ScanDoc (Multimodality DICOM / Non DICOM Workstation)
Description:  Most efficient workstation  software for  Multimodality Imaging. This desktop based
application  Connected to medical  imaging modalities like CT, MRI, CR.The main  feature is to retrieve
images through server location  and send dicom images to other  workstation, In ScanDoc  application
various Image processing and viewing features are available on  import images in  image viewer.
Utilities provide Backup and Restore, Convert Dicom images to JPEG images, other  features are Patient
Management, Flim printing, Reporting, CD/DVD writing.
Technologies: Front-end: VB.Net.
Neha Software Technology Sep 2006 - March 2007
Office Work Flow Management System
Description: This Web based application is developed to  manage the sales operations by the
marketing team. Sales person loads all  the sales related information and company can easily track
down the overall  sales. This Software provides easy accessibility and usability through  features like
new client Registration/edit client Demonstration, Quotation, Quotation for  AMC, Installation, service,
7 years of fulltime  experience in field o f software  Industry.
Currently working  for Maxis  Communication (largest telecom  company in
Malaysia) as Test Automation Specialist from August 2013 up to date.
BMC Software  Pune as Staff SQA Engineer from May 2010 to July 2013.
The Digital Group InfoTech Pune from May 2008 to April 2010 Senior Q.A.
Engineer
Sigma  Software Pune from Oct. 2007 to May 2008 as Senior Q.A.
Engineer
OmniTech Infosolution Pvt.  Ltd.  Mumbai from Feb. 2007 to Sep-2007 as
Software Test Engineer.
Saba  Software Pvt.  Ltd.  Mumbai from June 2006 to Jan. 2007 as Jr.  QA
Engineer.
Project #1 Maxis  CMSS (Customer Request Management)
Period August 2013 to up date
Testing  Tool SilkTest Workbench
Role Test Automation Specialist
Description:
Clarify is an Amdocs Customer Relationship  Management S/W product. It is based  on
client server technology which may range  from 2 to n tiers. Though for adopting
greater than 2 tier middleware are  required. Clarify is supported in two modes via
thick client and  thin client.
My Responsibilities:
Currently working  as a  Test Automation Specialist and  performing following
roles:
Handling  automation team for CMSS  in Maxis.
Maintaining  Automation framework for CMSS.
Solving  queries of team related  automation issue.
Running  regression test on subsequent release  for CMSS  in Maxis.
Creating  and  maintaining automation test cases.
Defect reporting, Defect verification and  Defect automation.
Project #2 Maxis  i-Sell (Mobile retail site)
Period August 2013 to Nov 2013
Testing  Tool SilkTest Workbench
Role Test Automation Specialist
Description:
I-sell is mobile  and  home  service  retail site. Isell is developed  for android  and  I  pad.
Application work on both Google  Chrome  and  Safari browser. We  are  testing  this
application on Google Chrome.
My Responsibilities:
Currently working  as a Test Automation Specialist and  performing  following
roles:
Handling  automation team for i-Sell in Maxis.
Maintaining  Automation framework for i-Sell.
Solving  queries of team related  automation issue.
Running  regression test on subsequent release  for i-Sell in Maxis.
Creating  and  maintaining automation test cases.
Defect reporting, Defect verification and  Defect automation.
Project #3 BMC Remedy SRM  (Service Request Management)
Period May 2010 to July 2013
Testing  Tool In house  Automation Tool and  framework develop in
Selenium (Web Driver), C#, JavaScript,  Java  and TestNG.
Role Staff S QA Engineer
Description:
Deliver a comprehensive  and  easy to use  IT self-service  portal with access to key
services, knowledge  and more. Deploy the solution rapidly and  configure service
request workflows and  entitlements without coding  or scripting.
My Responsibilities:
Currently working as a  Staff SQA Engineer and performing  following roles:
Handling  automation team for SRM (Service  Request Management)  Module in
BMC Remedy.
Solving  queries of team related  to Product and  other automation issue.
Maintaining  Automation framework for SRM.
Setting  up test machine for Automation testing.
Running  BVT, Integration and  Full run on subsequent build.
Creating  and  maintaining automation test cases including  English and  other
locale.
Defect reporting, Defect verification and  Defect automation.
Project #2 IFPI (Ilien Filing Performance Improvement)
Client Name CT Lien Services USA
Period Apr 2009 up  to date.
Environment Microsoft.NET 2.0 Framework using  C#, ASP.NET and
AJAX, with Web  Servers as Win2003 Server and  IIS  6.0
Testing  Tool Quality Centre
Role Senior QA Engineer
Description:
ILien comprises of mainly of three  main applications viz. filing, document ordering
and public record search. The  filing application lets users prepare and  file U CC filings,
both original (UCC1) and  subsequent filings (UCC3)  for different state/Province of
United  States of America and Canada. It also allows users to manage  their filing
portfolio online  with timely alerts for any rejections or pending  expirations. Currently
ILien provides the  functionality to let the user prepare  filing for states of United
States of America as well as Canada.
ILien Filing Performance  project for the enhancements needed  to Core  ILien
components as described in the  following  requirements:
Replace Microsoft  Commerce Server preference  handling  with custom
solution.
Integrate shared  filing editor in iLien.
Retire iLien's legacy form preview application.
Improve  desktop  count retrieval performance.
My Responsibilities:
Currently working  as a Senior QA Engineer and  performing  following  roles:
Creation of Manual test cases.
Executing  Manual test case.
Defect reporting  and  Defect verification.
Project #4 BEM(Biz filing a nd Entity Monitoring).
Client Name CT  lien Services USA
Period Feb 2009 to Mar 2009
Environment C#.net, Asp.net and  Oracle  9i
Testing  Tool Quality Centre
Role Senior QA Engineer.
Description:
ILien comprises of mainly of three  main applications viz. filing, document ordering
and public record search. The  filing application lets users prepare and  file U CC filings,
both original (UCC1) and  subsequent filings (UCC3)  for different state/Province of
United  States of America and Canada. It also allows users to manage  their filing
portfolio online  with timely alerts for any rejections or pending  expirations. Currently
ILien provides the  functionality to let the user prepare  filing for states of United
States of America as well as Canada.
BEM is having  three  requirements for this release  they are:
Create  Business Entity web  service  will return formatted  Entity ID as one  of the
output parameters.
Ability to send business entity monitoring  alerts to customers who are  set up  as
web  service  customers in the monitoring  system.
Use  xml gateway for DE business entity event creation for eligible web  service
customers.
In previous DM 3 release  have  not ability to show formatted Entity Id, not able  send
alert to multiple  customer and  for DE have  only one  option to create  event through
Free  site  (CWA  Framework )
Now in this release  customer would  not face  any for change  in Entity Id, now one  or
more  customer get alert for any change in debtor profile   and for DE state now
customer have  option to create event free site  or paid  site, separate billings and
remittance arrangements and  different reporting requirements, master lists, and  so
forth). We  are testing  report that generated by ESI.
My Responsibilities:
Currently working  as a Senior QA Engineer and  performing  following  roles:
Creation of Manual test cases.
Executing  Manual test case.
Defect reporting  and  Defect verification.
Project #5 Small Business  Banking Solution
Customer Name First Citizen Bank and  many banks in China, North
America, Middle East Asia etc.
Client Work Sybase Software Pvt. Ltd.
Period May 2008 to Jan 2009.
Environment J2ee, Windows XP, IBM AIX, Oracle10g, DB2
Testing  Tool SilkTest 2006 R2 and  QTS
Role Senior QA Engineer
Description:
Sybase Financial Fusion Small Business Banking  Solution: The  only e-Finance  solution
created specifically for micro business customers.
Managers at small- and medium-sized  businesses face  a complex set of issues in
managing  their business finances. Day-to-day cash flow, processing invoice and  tax
payments, managing  payroll and  other disbursements requires real-time access to
account information and  powerful cash forecasting  and reporting  tools.
The  Sybase Financial Fusion Small Business Banking  Solution enables a full range  of
business banking  and  bill payment capabilities from a single point of access on the
financial institution's website. It offers fully featured  Web  banking, business content,
bill payment, bill presentment and  cash management services. From a single point of
access, your micro business customers can receive  account information and  pay bills
as well as communicate  with the  financial institution and  receive tax information and
business news.
My Responsibilities:
Currently working  as a Senior QA Engineer and  performing  following  roles:
Automation Creation of test cases.
Creation of Automation Framework.
Running  Silk Harness for New build.
Project #6 THBM.
Customer Name ESI  Canada
Period Nov. 2007 to May 2008
Environment J2ee, Windows XP, Oracle  9i
Testing  Tool Silk Test 7.6, 2006 R2 and Heat.
Role Senior QA Engineer.
Description:
THBM deal with all type health benefit plan. ESI  Canada Customer Administrators can
manage a customer's corporate hierarchy and
the  relationships between the  corporate  entities that constitute  that hierarchy.
Related  customer functionality links customers to their subsidiaries. This functionality
enables ESI  Canada and  customers to manage  and  report on business relationships,
separately or as an integrated  entity. Related  customer functionality enables
customers to maintain separate  books of business from their subsidiaries (including
separate  billings and  remittance  arrangements and  different reporting  requirements,
master lists, and  so forth). We  are  testing report that generated  by ESI.
My Responsibilities:
Work as a Senior QA  Engineer and  performing  following  roles:
Automation Creation of test cases.
Creation of Automation Framework.
Regression Testing.
Project #7 Axapta  4.0 and 3.0 for Mobile Insurance.
Customer Name Asurion Mobile Insurance  Company.
Period Feb. 2007 to Sep  2007.
Environment Microsoft Axpata X++, Windows XP, SQL Server 2000.
Testing  Tool Silk Test 7.5 and  2006 R2
Role Software Tester.
Description:
The  Mobile  Insurance  Industry has always had  complex value  chain with a number
players involved  in selling  mobile to customer. The  industry works on the franchisee
model with a main company/ mobile  store  and  large  number of franchisee outlets.
Now this makes this industry ideal for Dynamics Axapta's Hub  and  spoke  model.
My Responsibilities:
Work as a Software Tester and  performing  following  roles:
Automation Creation of test cases.
Regression Testing
Project #8 Human Capital and Development Management
Customer Name Cisco Systems, PTC, Ford  Motor Company
Period Jun 2006 to Jan.2007
Environment Java, Windows 2000, SQL Server 2000, Oracle9i, Silk
Test 6.0.3
Testing  Tool SilkTest 6.0.3, CVS, Clarify
Role Jr.  Quality Assurance Engineer
Description:
Product:  Saba  HCDM  (Human Capital and Development Management)
Software, which provide a comprehensive  solution for managing human capital
across the  extended  enterprise  on 18 locales , namely English , German , Mexican ,
Brazilian , Japanese  , French , Portuguese  etc. These  are implemented  both as a Web
Application as well as a standalone product. They are
Saba Enterprise Learning  (SEL)
Saba Enterprise Performance  (SEP)
Saba Enterprise Analytics (SEA)
My Responsibilities:
Work as a Jr. Quality Assurance  Engineer and  performing following  roles:
Automation creation of Test Cases.
Regression Testing.
Staging  machines for Automation.
Smoke  Testing.
Awards  and Membership
Won silver Medal in GK  Competition.
Third  Position in District Level Essay Competition.
Experience : 1  year (from  30'Th  December to  till  date)
Company  : Globe  IT Solution
Designation : Software developer
About My  Company
Globe IT Solution  is The World's Unique Online Market,  enabling
trade of
Projects on  a local,  national  and
international  basis.  Our Client includes small  scale industries from  UK,  US,  Australia,  Japan,  Germany,  India
and  so  on.  We are Marjory  involved  into  development  of IEEE research  paper projects.
Project Done
Privacy  preserving  updates in  anonymous and  confidential  database
This application  is window based  application  .with  the help  of this application  the privacy  of anonymous and
confidential database can  preserve after updation.  The basic idea of this application  is based  on  the following
assumption-
Suppose server owns a k-anonymous database and  needs to  determine whether her database,  when
inserted  with  a tuple owned  by  data provider,  is still k-anonymous.  Also,  suppose that  access to  the database is
strictly  controlled,  because for example data are used  for certain  experiments that  need  to  be maintained
condential.   Clearly,  allowing  server to  directly  read  the contents of the tuple breaks the privacy  of data
provider (e.g.,  a patient's medical  record);  on  the other hand,  the condentiality of the database managed  by
server is violated  once data provider has access to  the contents of the database.  Thus,  the problem  is to  check
whether the database inserted  with  the tuple is still  k-anonymous,  without  letting  server and  data provider
know  the contents of the tuple and  the database respectively.  This application,  propose two  protocols solving
this problem on  suppression-based  and  generalization-based  k-anonymous and  condential databases.  The
protocols rely  on  well-known  cryptographic assumptions.
HBA:  Distributed  Metadata Management for Large Cluster-Based  Storage Systems
An  efficient and  distributed  scheme for file mapping  or file lookup  is critical in  decentralizing  metadata
management within  a group  of metadata servers.  By  this application  a novel  technique called  Hierarchical
Bloom Filter Arrays (HBA) is used  to  map  file names to  the metadata servers holding  their metadata .Two
levels of probabilistic arrays,  namely,  the Bloom  filter arrays with  different  levels of accuracies,  are used  on
each  metadata server.
One big  array,  with  lower accuracy  which  is representing  the distribution  of the entire Metadata,  and  second
small  array,  with  higher accuracy  to  reduced  memory  overhead.
Technosoft Information (I) Ltd
Technosoft is a group  company of Technocraft Ltd, which is worlds largest manufacturing
company of Drum Closer and  Engineering & IT services company with operations in US, UK
and a center of excellence in India. Technosoft has experience  in evolving  solutions based  on
customer objectives and  drive  the whole  design process up  to final detailing  for the
manufacturing  drawings. Similarly in the  IT segment Technosoft begins with a concept from the
customer, supply, generates, customizes software  and  takes it right down to the successful
implementation. This span of capabilities has enabled  us to offer end  to end  solutions for
customers all over the  globe. Customers in turn realize  a high value  for such services as they can
then concentrate  on their core  strengths.
Designation:  Business  Development executive ( September 2011 to Till Date)
Execute  direct partner for Enterprise Level Solutions. Responsible  for generating  leads/ orders in
USA and  UK. Interface  directly with top-level executives and  co-ordinate  implementations.
Manage  accounts and  to arrange  post sale  professional services.
Responsible for generating sales from US, UK, Germany, Netherlands and other region.
To held direct communication with Key People  of The organization
Application of Business Intelligence  and  in-depth Market-Analysis of different territories.
Personal creation of marketing  tools and  devising strategies so as to increase  sales-
generation and closing of corporate  business-deals.
Client-Handling  in After-Sales-Service.
Zenith InfoTech ltd (DECEMBER  '09   September 2011)
Zenith InfoTech is an international company serving  IT Service  Providers worldwide. Zenith's US-
based  headquarters is in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. Zenith provides FOUR  separate  and  distinct
services-a Managed Service  Infrastructure, Virtual Help Desk, Business Continuity Solution and
Cloud  Computing  Solution. Simply put Zenith's mission is to help  IT Service  Providers grow their
business without increasing  their overhead.
Designation:  Business  Development   Inside Sales
Execute  Direct and  channel partner sales models for Enterprise Level Solutions. Responsible for
generating  business / orders in South Africa and  East Africa Market. Interface  directly with top-
level executives and  co-ordinate  implementations. Manage  accounts and to arrange  post sale
professional services.
A techno-commercial profile w ith core  responsibilities of Business Development, Client
Initiation & Acco unt Management in South Africa and East Africa Market
Ownership  of complete  sales cycle including  identify opportunity -need  analysis, presales,
sales, delivery, implementation and  ensuring  long  term customer relations.
Managing  Business Development activities, Market Identification, Lead Generation,
Initiating  contacts, Presentations
Managing  target market database  and  target client account plans, including  market
analysis activities for the  identification, prospect, and pre-qualifying  of prospective  clients
and Management.
Team Management, Handling  team of 2 cold callers and  1 Market research resource
Fix quality meeting through cold  calling, rigorous follow-ups, emails, seminar visits,
conferences & wr ite-ups.
Responsible for handling  Web-Participation, Net-Meeting, Videoconferencing  and  Voice
Conferencing  with the  technical Manager
Proposal presentations to key decision makers, effectively sell the  capabilities and
credentials of organization
Account Management & Rela tionship  Management: Build, develop  and  maintain
relationship with Channel partner & cu stomers
Cheers  Interactive
Cheers Interactive  is knowledge services, Solution and Product Company offering customized
research and  analytics services, market intelligence.Reserch And  Development and intellectual
property insight and  knowledge management solutions. Company headquarter located  in UK
Designation:  Customer Relation Officer
Responsible for generating sales from US, Canada and  UK and  other region
To held direct communication with Key People  of The organization
Application of Business Intelligence  and  in-depth Market-Analysis of different territories.
Personal creation of marketing  tools and  devising strategies so as to increase  sales-
generation and closing of corporate  business-deals.
Client-Handling  in After-Sales-Service.
Trans  World International BPO
Generating  sales and  achieving individual targets.
Delivering  good  revenue from overseas customer by selling  Insurance  Policy.
Coordinating  with US  customer.
Drafting  and  designing Business Proposals.
Nominated  as for the  Award  of Excellence  for the exemplary sales in the  Quarter
September, 2010   Till Date
Job  Title : Business Analyst
Customer : SFR, France
Location : Onsite  (France)
CRM Modules  : Clear Support, Policies and  Customers
SYSTEM  DESCRIPTION
Clarify Trouble Ticketing    is an Incident Management system based  on Amdocs Clarify CRM
12.1 used  as the  back bone  for service  assurance  by all business units of the French Telecom
major.
Effective h andling  team of 5 TLs/30 FTEs
Managing  80+ clients payrolls and  generating volume  of 40,000 payslips on monthly basis
Ensure  that TAT and  SLA's are adhered
Compile  reports & re view project performance with client on daily/weekly/fortnightly basis
Process mapping and  documentation
Performance management, Project Managements, Resource Management
Transitioning  new payrolls
Team Management-Ensure  adequate and  appropriate training  on product, process and data collection
skills aimed  at development and  growth of entire  team. Lead  by example; motivate  the team to imbibe
healthy competitive spirit, focused  at customer satisfaction
Team building, monitoring  service  levels, initiating  process, quality & pr oductivity improvements
Reporting  -  MIS  Report, Productivity report and  Incentive  Report, Metrics tracker
Adherence  to SAS70 and  ISO-27001 compliance
Conducting  interviews for new staffs
Implementation of LEAN six  sigma in the  current process by Leading and  managing  continuous
process improvement projects
Drive  and  implement automation projects
Project 1-  USMF Cash & stock  reconciliation,  Cash Availability
Vertical   Internal Reconciliation
Activities  involved:
1. Cash and stock Reconciliation (Custody V/s Accounting)
2.
Reporting  of cash availability to Investment manager
Project 2 -  BFDS    Defined C ontribution Services  Payroll and Administration
Vertical   Transfer Agency
Activities  involved:
1. Payroll -Salary deductions towards retirement plans. We  process payroll deductions and  allocation
to the  funds of various retirement plans as per the  employee's contribution and employer's
contribution.
2.
Admin   Creation of New 401 K Account and  it's maintenance
Achievements at Syntel:
Topped the SAIL Leadership program with 82%
Extra Miller award  for Quarter 3 (July-Sep 2010)    Best Team Leader   Internal Reconciliation vertical
Awarded  Best Team Leader   Transfer Agency vertical for Qtr July08 to Sept08 for improving  quality
from 97%  to 99.90%
Working as Senior QA Engineer in NESS  Technologies  India  Pvt Ltd, Mumbai from
September 2010 till date.
Working as Test Engineer in Barclays Technology Center India LTD,  Pune from
August 2008 to April 2010.
Worked  as Test Engineer in Hexaware Technologies  LTD,  Pune From July 2006 to
July 2008.
STRENGTHS  (IT):
6.5+ Years  of  experience in IT industry in Manual and Automation Testing
Experience in product development using Agile Methodology (Scrum).
Involved in Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) Requirement Analysis,
Designing,  QA and Maintenance
Hands  on
Experience in System Integration Testing,  Functional Testing,  Regression
Testing, Browser Compatibility Testing, Multi Lingual Testing.
Experience in writing  Test cases,  Test Scenarios from functional
specification documents  and user stories.
Experience in writing  Test Plan and Test Report.
Experience in Defect logging,  Maintenance and Test data  creation.
Hands  on experience in Mercury Quality Center,  Rational Clear Quest,
JIRA.
Experience in web/rest service testing using SOAP UI.
Good work  ethics with excellent communication and interpersonal skills.
Capable to delivering by learning  new technologies  as  per requirement.
Good in working in team as  well as  Individual contributor for the project
assigns.
Experience in developing automation scripts  using ECLIPSE IDE.
Feb'05   Dec'12 Tata Elxsi Ltd., Bangalore
Feb'05   Apr'08 Software Engineer
May'08   Dec'12 Sr. Engineer
Aug'01   Aug'03 Pacetelesoft  Pvt. Ltd., Bangalore Software Engineer
Key Areas Delivered
FUNCTIONAL
Application Development
Participating in  Software Applications; mapping requirements; participating in  the finalization of
product specifications and selection of techniques.
Supervising smooth  implementation  of the project and extending post-implementation, application
maintenance and technical  support.
Software Testing
Managing the Software Testing activities and developing test plans and test strategy. Preparing test
status report and test effort estimation.
Handling black box testing. Executing regression  test, functionality test, validation  check, user
acceptance test and performance test.
Reviewing system test cases, SRS documents and supporting test process implementation. Ensuring
Test Readiness, carrying out final v erification of application and performing bug trend analysis.
Quality Assurance
Providing scope, resource and time estimates for  projects presented to QA for  testing and analysis.
Designing & coordinating implementation and availability of QA test environments. Ensuring
compatibility of testing with  the product specifications.
Providing QA test status and progress reports as appropriate to top management. Working with
various Managers to ensure traceability from requirements gathering to QA  Test Cases.
3  yrs.  of experience working  in  Software quality  assurance in  a wide variety  of
environments-functionality,  compatibility,  reliability,  usability,  regression,  security
and  related  test methodologies
Working  closely  with  client for  new enhancements,  requirements and  bugs related  to
applications.
Working  closely  with  development team and  coordinating  with  them efficiently  for
resolution  of issues.
Experience with  software development life cycle methodologies (Agile/Scrum,
Waterfall,  V model),  quality  control,  and  quality  assurance.
Experience with  issue tracking  and  bug  tracking  systems,  identifying  and  recording
bugs through  systematic test case execution,  driving  the quality  and  stability  of the
system throughout the project
Experience creating  detailed  test cases/scripts for  technical and/or  business clients by
translating  user  requirements and  product features into  testing  requirements.
Experience working  with  industry  standard  testing  tools Testing  Tools-QC,QTP
Expertise in  carrying  out functional and  regression  testing.
Responsible for  creating  testing  deliverables (i.e.  test cases,  scripts,  results,  metrics,
bug  report)
Ability  to  resolve complex  issues in  a timely  and  efficient manner.
Ability  to  understand  and  adapt to  new environments and  domains.
Excellent interpersonal and  business skills.
Experience in  conducting  knowledge transfer  sessions to  new employees.
Technical  Summary
Operating  Systems: Windows XP/Windows 7
Languages: HTML/XML,  C/C++
Database: Oracle 9i/10g,  MS SharePoint 2013
Software Packages: MS Office Suite,  Open  Office Suite
Tools and  Utilities
Quality  Centre
QTP
TFS
Project / Client Name / Location - Envision-Ecolab(NALCO) / Pune, India
Domain- Energy Services
Duration: October 2013- Till Date
Technologies  Manual Functional Testing
Project profile :-
Ecolab, Inc is  a global provider of water, hygiene and energy  technologies  and services  to the food,
energy, healthcare, industrial and hospitality  markets.It makes  the use of different technologies  like
Boilers, Membranes, Thermal Desal, heat exchangers  to carry  out its  varied operations  of filtration and
other chemical processes. Ecolab delivers  comprehensive programs  and services  that provide and
protect clean water, safe food, abundant energy  and healthy  environments. The Project follows  Agile
Methodology  wherein Testing is  incorporated onto different web-based applications  based on User
Acceptance Criteria.
Role: Software Test Engineer
Contribution / Highlights :
Test case Development for critical enhancements.
Functional and regression testing for different outbound applications.
Review Test cases, executing the test manually.
Logging & tracking of all the defects  related to the project
Project / Client Name / Location Collaboration and  Intranet/ Pune, India
Domain-Retail
Duration: 1 year from July 2012- July 2013
Technologies  Microsoft SharePoint 2013
Project profile :-
This  Project involves  Designing and building the SharePoint 2013 based intranet solution as  per the
Function points  and components  outlined in the agreed proposal. It took  into account the Validation of
user interface designs  and Information architecture supplied by  Dymocks  and carrying out Driving user
acceptance testing, governance, training and adoption of the Intranet. It also involved enabling Out-of-
the-box  SharePoint Web analytics  features  and took  into consideration that new intranet site on
SharePoint is  equally  compatible on mobile device platforms.
Role: Software Test Engineer
Contribution / Highlights :
Involvement in scenario identification and scenario Authoring.
Test case Development for critical enhancements.
Functional and regression testing for multiple legacy  tools  and outbound applications.
Review Test cases, executing the test manually.
Logging & tracking of all the defects  related to the project
Project / Client Name / Location  Zebra QA Zebra Technologies / Pune, India
Domain-Manufacturing
Duration: 9 months from Aug 2011 to  May 2012
Technologies  VB script, QTP
Project profile :-
The Project involves  providing Testing and support to the Zebra ERP applications. The project involves
Regression Testing of the major modules  of Zebra ERP Application both manually  as  well as  through QTP
Driven Automated scripts.
Also as  Zebra transformed from oracle 11i to 12 so this  project is  providing support to its  Legacy  as  well as
new builds. In this  phase of transformation Zebra has  released three cycles  and in all of them this  project has
contributed in the support activities  such as  Data transformation, Data Upload activities  like setting user
credentials, assigning User responsibilities  for each user etc. through QTP driven automated scripts.
Role: Automation Tester
Contribution / Highlights :
As  a team member I was  actively  involved in the below phases  of project :
Involved in the Regression Testing of the project
Analysis  of Test cases  and functionality  of application.
Involved in the development and debugging of QTP scripts
S.  No. University Institute Class/Degree Year Percentage
1. U.P.T.U. United  College
of  Engineering
and
Research,Allah
abad
B.Tech. 2010 64.0  %
2. C.B.S.E. Aklank  Public
School,Kota
12th 2006 74.4%
3. C.B.S.E. Sainik  School
Tilaiya,Koderm
a
10th 2004 84.2  %
Training  Exposure
Organization:
BSNL,  Katihar
Team Size: 5
Tenure: 200 hrs / 45 Days
Duration-4  weeks(15  June'09-13  July'09)
On \u0022DIGITAL SWITCHING EXCHANGE SYSTEM-OCB-283\u0022
Learned the phases of establishment of a call in an exchange
Analyzed the functional architecture, salient features and subscriber  facilities provided  by
exchange.
Organization:
Zensar Technologies LIMITED,  Pune
Description: Soft-Skills and Presentation  Skills, Trainings on Defect Cycle Management,
Automation Testing, Effective Communication, Performance Testing, Delivery Excellence,
Information Security
Organization:
Zensar Technologies LIMITED,  Pune
Description: QTP,QC, Basics of Manual Testing,SQL and Oracle 9i.
Achievements/Extra-Curricular:
Awarded for my active contribution after the go-live of the project.
Won Men's Doubles Badminton  Tournament at Zensar.
Successfully underwent InfoSec Security Awareness training at Zensar  and  passed
with 100%.
Awarded as the Man  of the match in a recently held cricket competition at Zensar.
Took part in NCC camp  held in school and got `A' certificate.
Participated in National Talent Search  Examination  (NTSE) at School Level.
Participated in various Debate and Elocution events in School.
Took part in college tech fest ENIGMA and got 3rd position in the event PIRATES OF
ENIGMA.
Organized and participated in  the BAY GAMES in  the office bay at Zensar
Personal  Profile
Name :
ANISH PRIYAE
Father's Name :
Mr.Anil Kumar  Singh
Date of Birth :
11th October,  1988
Gender :
Male
Marital Status :
Single
Nationality  :
Indian
Having  8 Years of experience in Software  Testing  and  Quality Assurance  with
diversified   experience  in Web  based, Client-Server and  other Enterprise
applications testing  in different domains, technology and environments.
Extensive  experience  in working  on domains like Finance, Telecom and  Health
Care Industry.
Insightful experience in Project Management activities including  project scoping,
estimation, planning, finalization of technical / functional specifications, resource
administration and  quality management of the  product / software application.
Well conversant with software testing  methodologies including  developing  Test
plans, Test strategy, Test scenarios, Test cases, and  Test reports.
Worked  as primary liaison with Business, QA, Development teams and Vendors for
major releases, recreation of customer issues, subsequent Hot fix, patch testing
and releases.
Experience  in reviewing  requirements and  design documentation to ensure
traceability and  testability, review deliverables for adequacy and  completeness
prior to systems implementation into production.
Prepared  Test Metrics and generated  weekly/monthly status reports for upper
management review and  conducted  weekly meetings with development team
discussing  bug fix status and  build  releases.
Good Knowledge  of Change  management Process, impact analysis and  effort
estimation.
Worked  with Test management Tools like  QC/ALM, Rational Requite  Pro, Clear
Quest, Clear Case  and  Rational Manual Tester.
Expertise  in the  Agile, V-Model, and  Waterfall SDLC methodologies to perform
System Design, Develop, Execution, Maintenance, and  Deliverables.
Extensive  knowledge  on Linux, Solaris & Ba ckend  Systems.
Experience  in Configuration management tools like VSS, Clear Case  and  CVS.
Experience  in working  with Databases like  Oracle, MySQL, skilled  in data
manipulation and  backend  testing  using  SQL queries.
Having  considerable ONSITE work experience with various US  Clients.
From Aug  2007 till Oct 2013 worked  as QA Team Lead with Infinite C omputer
Solutions, Bangalore.
From May 2005 to July 2007 worked  as Test Engineer with Stadvolks Technology,
Bangalore.
Currently  working as  Programmer Analyst at Cognizant Technologies  solution, Pune from June 29th 2011 to
till date.
1
Page
1
Since Oct'06 TechMahindra,  Pune as  Senior Technical Associate/  Test
Lead
Key Result Areas:
Testing  Operations
Conducting  Manual, E2E testing, CIT testing, Functional, Regression and  Component Testing and
implementing  Agile/Scrum Methodologies including  the  reporting  & do cumentation
Carrying  out test planning, test cycle  estimation &   devising  test strategy document; defining
processes & im plementing  daily tasks for team; preparing/reviewing  different test case  documents
like  system / regression / functional test cases of the  system
1. Website Engineer
Harbinger Knowledge Products Pvt.  Ltd., Pune,  India Oct 2010
Till Date
I am currently  working as Website Engineer with  Harbinger Knowledge Products
Pvt. Ltd. I  am working on  CMS development  of existing websites, data  migration,
SEO, web based utilities, etc. using PHP, Joomla1.5, Wordpress, AJAX, JQuery  and
MYSQL.
2. Software Engineer
Diligent Techonologies , Pune,  India Oct 2009    Oct
2010
I was  working at  Diligent, Pune as  Software Engineer. I worked on  websites
developed in PHP, Joomla1.5, AJAX, JQuery  and MYSQL.
Involved in  development of a  simple CMS to suite client requirements  to avoid
complexity  of handling the front end and backend.
Diligent offers e -business  development and support  around diverse client
needs;  web sites, corporate intranets, online marketplaces  and communities, and
revenue-generating private labeling Internet  technologies.
Project: NCE
Joomla  based site for online shopping cart, online catalog management  and content
management.
Project: La  Mixteca
Joomla  based site for content management  for client's products.
Project: CasaFinders
This  site is  related to real estate comapny  in USA. Developed in Joomla  1.5, PHP,
Mysql, AJAX, HTML and JQuery.
Project: WKP
This  site has  Virtue Mart  (Online shopping cart), Photo Gallery, articles developed in
Joomla  1.5.
Project: WMDNYC
This  is  a  CMS developed in Joomla  1.5 for website hosting company  with  online
package offers a nd shopping system.
Project: Carlance.com
This  is  a  social networking site, includes  user community, shopping cart, blogs,
articles, polls, etc. Developed in Joomla  1.5, PHP, Mysql, AJAX, HTML and JQuery.
Project: Lexagent
This  is  a  content  management system includes  articles, gallery  etc. Developed in
Joomla  1.5, PHP, Mysql, HTML
Project: StinkyThings
This  is  shopping cart  using OS-Commerce.
3. Software Engineer
IMC  Global Services, Pune, India Oct 2008    Oct
2009
At IMCGS I  worked on below listed projects:
Project: American  Heritage (www.heritagesites.com)
This  is  CMS website developed using Joomla1.0. It manages data  of various  historic
sites  of America. I  was  involved as  development  team member in this  project. It
contains  events, Google Maps,
Project: Extras  Now (www.extrasnow.com and
www.carlyndavis.com
This  website uses  LAMP. It's a  job portal for actors/actresses and related people. I
was  working as developer on this maintenance website and another website related
to  this  site
www.carlyndavis.com
Used ImageMagick  to create dynamic  GIF  images.
Project: CEIP
This  website is  developed using Joomla1.5. It's  a  social awareness  website. It
manages various  types  of content, events, news  and control frontend publishing.
I have also  worked on other PHP projects  like PERI,  AIS, OOD, etc.
4. Software Developer
CSSAGlobal, Pune, India Jan  2008    Oct 2008
I was  previously  working at CSSAGlobal, Pune as  Software Developer in PHP. I
joined CSSAGlobal in  January  2008. At CSSAGlobal I worked on website development
projects  using LAMP technology.
I have worked on the following websites:
Project: Buttas
The Buttas  system is  a  fun  game where members  score points, through  Rate Me
scores, Head 2 Head Battle victories, Friendship requests, challenge requests,
Friendships  and friend Invites.
It also has shop module, from  where user can  buy  items  online. User can  watch
videos  and listen  audios. This  site also has  news  and blog section.
Project: HireMyCoder
This  site is  related to buying and posting projects  for bidding. It  is  related to buyer
and service provider related activities.
Project: Unishepherd
This  site is  related to online bidding on products and related processes.
Project: WriteInYourVote
Social networking website.
5. Application  Programmer
National Informatics  Centre,  Pune, India Jan  2006
Jan  2008
At National Informatics Centre, Pune I was  working as Programmer on  a
Website developed in PHP, HTML, JavaScript, AJAX and DB2.
National Informatics  Centre (NIC) is  a premier Science and Technology
Organization  under the Department of Information  Technology  of the Government  of
India  actively  working for the past  three decades  in  the area  of Information  and
Communication Technology  (ICT) Applications in the Government Sector.
Project: Rojgarwahini - Website Development
I have worked on the official Web Site for Department  of Employment  and Self-
Employment  of Government  of Maharashtra. It centralizes all Maharashtra  State's
data. It includes  Online Candidate Registration, Employer Registration, and
Candidate Renewal, Modifications in Registration, and Candidate Search  Facility  to
Employers.
8.5+ years of work  experience in  Manual/Functional/System/Regression/E2E testing.
Active Facilitator & Interview panellist in Capgemini Learning  & Culture testing  practice.
6  weeks onsite experience at client  location  at UK.
Knowledge in  Scrum Methodology.
Experience in  test management  tool and  defect  tracking  tool HP QC  9.0/9.2/10/11.
Experience in  setting  up  the testing  process.
Experience in  leading  team  of 3-4  resources.
Involved  in  mentoring  junior resources and  review  test cases.
Experience using  SharePoint 07/10  for Knowledge Sharing  & Project Dashboard.
Onsite Experience of 4  weeks at Amdocs ISRAEL.
Quick  understanding  of business rules and  functional requirements.
Good  team player and  ability  to  take initiatives.
Company  Name Designation Duration
Capgemini  India Pvt.  Ltd.,  Pune Senior Consultant Aug  2010    Till Date
Amdocs,  Pune SSME Apr 2007    Aug  2010
Emerson  Export Engg.  Centre,
Pune
System Engineer Mar 2005    Apr 2007
Total  Experience: 4.3  Years
Presently  associated  with  Syncada/from visa ( now  becomes Wipro  Technologies) as Test
Engineer.
Duration: October 2012  to  present.
Worked  with  iGATE computer systems as Senior Software Engineer.
Duration: October 2009  to  September 2012.
1)  Requirement Analysis   To  find  and  check  the feasibility  of requirement.
2)  Coding  and  designing  of automation  scenarios/flows.
3)  Debugging  issues and  provides alternate solutions.
4)
Testing  Unit Testing,  Integration  Testing,  System  Testing.
5)  Communication  with  Onsite on  daily  basis.
personel SKILLS:
Ability  for multitasking  and  to  work  in  team  as well  as individually.
Fast learner,  develop  new skills quickly  with  enthusiasm.
Good  communication  skills.
personel details:
Date of Birth: 19-Jun-1987
Passport Number:  G6379975
Known  Languages: English,  Hindi,  Marathi,  Kannada
Hobbies:  Listening  Music,  Dancing,  Yoga
Nationality: Indian
Marital Status: Married
Gender: Female
Permanent address: Ms.Asmita Abhaykumar Ulagadde.
Kalpataru  Serenity,  Flat No.  6C-502,
Manjari road,  Hadapsar,  Pune- 411028.
Date: /  / 2014 Signature.
Have 2  Years 3  Months of experience in the field of Software Testing and 6
months in Development field.
Quick learner and excellent team player,  Ability  to meet tight deadlines and
work under pressure
Sound knowledge of Core Java & Selenium
Experience in writing effective Xpath using Xpath function (text (), contains
Experience in writing Test Scripts & Test Cases
Good Knowledge on SDLC and STLC.
Well versed in the studying of Functional  Requirements,  Identifying
scenarios,  preparation of Test Cases,  Execution of Test cases,  Reporting
Defects & Cross Browser Design Testing.
Expertise in Defect tracking and reporting defects to improve
communications & reduce delay.
Proficient in analyzing client requirements & conducting Black Box  & GUI
Testing.
Involved in Peer review  of Test cases.
Core Competencies in
Requirement Analysis
System Testing
Regression Testing
Defect tracking
Test case management
Status Reporting
Wipro Technologies  Pvt  Ltd. (www.wipro.com) from 10 October 2011  till
date, as a Project Engineer
Project #1
Project title :  Mobile Store
Client : Best Buy
Role : Test engineer - Automation
Environment : Core Java
Duration :  From JUNE  2013  to till  date
Tools  Used : Selenium 2.0
IDE :  Eclipse
Description:
The Best Buy Company,  Inc. is an American multinational  consumer
electronics corporation headquartered in Richfield, Minnesota.  Best Buy is fastest-
growing specialty retailer and e-tailer of consumer electronics,  personal computers
and entertainment software.
Best Buy store website is a central  repository for all  the Products, Featured Brand,
Services and Deals & Shop,  that Best Buy is advertising and selling.  It is a
complete solution for end-users and retail  sellers for purchasing the company's
product online.
Understanding functionality of manual  test cases
Check the re-usable library  for existing test cases
Writing test classes to test business classes and generic  methods
Contributed in framework improvement
Participate in test script review
Writing and executing test scripts
Modify  executed test scripts
Project #2
Project Title:  OSS-RC WRAN  CM  Feature Test (Present).
Client:  Ericsson
Role:  - Analyzing the new features to be tested for the monthly release.
Creation of Test cases using Test Link.
Execution of the Test cases using Test Link.
Adhoc testing is done in the new  feature implemented.
Function testing on UNIX platform.
Reporting and tracking issues using MH-WEB & JIRA.
- Performance and Scalability Testing
Environment:  UNIX
Duration from November 2011  to JUNE 2013
Detail: Ericsson's Operation Support System for Radio & Core ( OSS-RC) is designed to
manage,  configure, m onitor,  troubleshoot and upgrade all  the various networks
elements i.e.  Radio, Core,  2G ,  3G and 4G (i.e.  LTE).
MOM  (Managed Object Model)   A managed object model  is similar to those found
in many popular programming languages but it has a number of features that reflect
the special requirements of network management.
PCA (Planned Configuration Administration) - Planned configurations are
models of proposed changes to the active network radio and/or transport
resources.
Techior Pvt Ltd. (www.techior.com) from September 2009 to  February
2010 as  a Software Trainee
Title:  Optical Mark Recognition
Environment: C#,  SQL
Detail:  It is based on determining the presence or absence of marks from the paper
through optical reading.  As the exams are becoming more objective rather than
subjective nowadays,  so institutions are using bubble sheets for objective type of
paper. We answer the question by filling the bubbles,  these bubbles are then scanned
by the scanner and a.bmp file is created.  This file is then matched with the master file.
Master file is the file in which we have all  the correct answer by doing this we get the
result.  It can calculate approx.  50  bubble sheets per minute which reduces a lot of
time and also reduces manpower and labour.
Role: - Involved in the core coding of the project.
Responsible for persisting correct data into database through standard
application.
Responsible for testing the whole product at the user end.
Was responsible for user acceptance testing.
Was responsible to lead a team of 3  heads.
Responsible for report generation.
Preparation of Weekly Status Reports and sharing it with Lead and
Client.
External Technical Certification
Did Diploma in JAVA & Oracle Technology (NIIT Institute)  From Hyderabad for a
period of 6  months.
Software  Analyst Developer /  Team  Leader
Webworx,  Pune  ,India.
Senior Software  Developer  -
Grey  Matter  India,  Pune,  India.
Specific  Skills  and Strengths:
Extensive  experience  in  following  technologies:
..1
PHP/MySQL  ,  LAMP ,  Zend  Framework  ,  Symfony  Framework
..2
ASP,SQL,MS-Access
..3
JSP,  Core  JAVA
..4
HTML  / DHTML,  JAVASCRIPT,  AJAX,  JQUERY
..5
Macromedia  Dreamweaver,  Adobe  Photoshop,  Zend  Dev.
..6
ASP.NET,  C#.NET
Problem-solving  skills    ability  to  approach  a  problem  from  dirrerent
angles to  find  solution.
Friendly,  outgoing,  honest,  trustworthy  and  hard  working
Team  worker,  good  communication  skills.
Highly organized   ability to  see  projects  right  through  to
completion.
Keen  learner    continually expanding knowledge  of  various subjects.
Aug  2008  - Present Software  Analyst/Developer ,  Senior  Developer.
Grey  Matter  India,  Pune,  India.
Achievements/Responsibilities
Learn  & Worked on Symfony Framework for  http://
www.freecita.com/
Started  with  Jquery and  working  on  http://
www.emuscle.com/
And  many  more.
Jan  2006   Aug  2008
Software  Analyst/Developer ,  Team  Leader.  (LAMP)
Webworx  India,  Pune,  India.
Achievements/Responsibilities
Working  as  a  DSDT (  Dedicated  Source Development
Team  ) for  UK  company.  (  April  2006    Aug  2008  )
Developed  lots  of  web  applications  and  systems  in
PHP  & ASP  with  MySQL  and  SQL  as  a  backend.
Many  of  them  are ranking  in  top  5  on google.
1st on  google  www.21stcenturydiva.co.uk/ for
\u0022Laptop  Bag  Collection\u0022  and  all  its  products.
And  many  more  like  this.
On  site  visit in the  UK  for  gather  project
requirements  from  NHS  (National  Health
Service  ,England).
(  Oct-2007    Nov 2007)
Used  efficient  programming techniques  to  optimise
backend  performance  lots  of  website.
Managing  8  people  team.
Acted  as  mentor  for  intern students  working  on
their  Masters  level  project  at  the  organization.
And  many  more.
Project  Undertaken:
URL  :  www.21stcenturydiva.co.uk/
Front  End  : PHP,  AJAX,  HTML/DHTML,  CSS,  FLASH.  (LAMP)
Back  End  : MySQL.
Payment  Gateway  :  Protex.
Online opnion  poll  community
URL  :  www.mostpeoplethink.com/
Front  End  : PHP  ,  AJAX  ,  HTML/DHTML,  CSS,  FLASH.(LAMP)
Back  End  :  MySQL.
URL  :  www.mobilemessages.com/
Front  End: PHP  ,  AJAX,  HTML/DHTML,  CSS.(LAMP)
Back  End:  MySQL.
Payment  Gateway  :  PayPal  (  IPN method  )
URL  :  www.elliesanderson.co.uk
Front  End: PHP  ,  AJAX,  HTML/DHTML  ,  CSS.(LAMP)
Back  End  : MySQL.
Other  (LAMP)
www.toysandplaythings.co.uk/
www.westcoastpavilion.com/ (  hp  invent  )
www.cetl.org.uk/ (  Queen  Mary  University  of  London  )
www.fsracingltd.com/
www.graphicimpressions.co.uk/
www.metrocleaning.co.uk/
www.shiptoncomms.co.uk
www.westcoastdriverschampionship.com/  (  hp  invent  )
Business  Development Professional with 4 years  of progressive experience under various  capacities  of
International Business  Development primarily  involving Sales, Planning & Strategy, Team Building, Reporting
and Delivering Analytics.
Proven track  record of Sales, Marketing, Account Management & Sales  Support. A strong team player with
ability  to work  independently. Self motivated and focused towards  organizational and personal goals. Strong
professional networking, interpersonal and relationship building skills
Visa:
B1 (USA)
Symphony Teleca Corporation Feb 2009- Till Date
Business  Development Manager accountable for generating new business
Details:
Team Management - Managing team of Business  Development Executives
Demand Generation  Market Research, Account Mapping, Cold Calling, Lead Qualification, Lead Nurturing,
Coordinating Conference Calls, Personal Meetings
Sales Operations  Preparation of Presentations, Brochures  and Collateral Content Management, Training
Material, One pagers  for cold calling, Capabilities  Matrix, Case Studies
Training and Development - Responsible to train new recruits  and existing team members  regarding
Company's  Business  Offerings/Services, Existing Customers, Cold Calling, Upcoming Trends  and Business
Jargons
Corporate Marketing - Involved in Branding, Email Campaign Planning & Webinars, Social Media
Since Jun'11 Deloitte,  Hyderabad as  Analyst -,  Global Technology Services
and Office of  CEO
Conducting  requirement analysis, system study and  finalisation of technical &
functional specifications for the  application to be developed while  working  as a
Business aAnalyst in the  Agile  Methadology
Plan, design, and  author effective test cases
Develop  automated  tests for your test cases and integrate automations into test
suites
Handling  product release  and configuration of the  application
Providing  post-implementation, technical, system maintenance  / enhancement
supportsolving  skills.
Company:  Xento system. Dec 2010   Present
Design and implement php based web application  .Client Communication and feedback to Team Lead/
Project Manager.
Define valid product designs that meet client and corporate requirements and specifications.
Work with  team leads and project managers to determine system objectives, constraints and solve design
problems.
Analysis, design and vision of the solution  to ensure it adhere to  overall  end-to-end web development.
Resolve design/technology issues.
Ensure that the architecture / design cater  to the non functional  requirements specified.
Resolve design/technology issues.
Provide technical  leadership on  a variety of projects.
Project:  ClientAdmin/Resident Works
Project Role:  Senior Software Eng.
Description: This is the Online Product related Real  Estate. Mainly Concern with the Home Owner  and Resident.
www.propertysolutions.com For  this product, I am managing the support section  of the resident works and employee
internal  network systems (ClientAdmin). ClientAdmin  contain the user  information, Leave records details, Policies, User
authorizations, Support system, Marketing system, Online Exam records of employee. Resident works contain the
details of the residents. Properties, Management Company, Lease details.
Company:  Work Methods system. July2010   Dec 2010
Project:  TMED
Project Role:  Lead
Description:
This is the online patient and doctor  videoconferencing. Development is going through  Cakephp1.3
Version  .Patient and doctor can  communicate through  the chat and video. Doctor appointment for  the patient is
carrying out as per  the suitable timing seen  using doctor  portfolio  or  available time for  the appointment shows for  the
doctor. Patient can upload the Blood Pressure using the Microsoft Health Vault, attach the blood pressure instrument to
machine , already detect blood pressure can  be upload in  Microsoft database using the Microsoft health  vault site and
call  soap services in Cakephp. We fetch blood pressure, and related result will  see on TMED pages. Currently we are
supporting the 6 instruments. The energy consumption  of our  body also we calculate and result seen  on the TMED
pages. Patient family history, alergy's, physical  problems also  we add in the patient profile. Doctor appointment
schedule, available dates is managed from Manage schedule. Graphs for  the doctor  rating, Blood pressure also seen  on
as comparing the date selection criteria for  patient. Video  conferencing is managed by the third party tool
oovoo.search doctors for specific   skills. State wise search  for  doctor. My appointment section for  both  doctor  and
patient shows the coming appointments .Email  goes for  the each  appointments schedule. Cancel  the appointment.
Database is managing using mysql  and creates the stored procedure and call  from the cakephp.
Environment: Windows XP, Cakephp, Mysql.
Company:  Manik system. April 2009   July2010
Project:  Business Networking
Site URL :
http://www.servicelist.com.au
Project  Role:  Lead
Description:
This is the Business Networking Site. This is mainly for  the Plumbers, electricians, Contractors People. The Job is
post by the user  on the site and Bid is given by the Business Owner  on  the Jobs. Job is allocated to  Business Owner and
Work is carrying out and on  the basis of their  work user  is allowed to rating on them.
User  and Business Owner both  have ability to Search Jobs using location wise, km wise. Contact them Using Messages.
Public  Message Board is Maintain  to communicate and solve the Queries and Problem on  the jobs. Here business owner
is plumber, electricians, contractors and have paid account. PayPal  integration  is manage for  them annual  subscription.
Environment: Windows XP, Ubuntu
Company:  Maniks
Project:  Falcon Game
Site  URL :
www.alqnasgame.com
Project  Role:  Lead
Description:
-  It is Virtual  Game Site. User  has ability to  select the hunting tools and Catch  the appropriate Resources. Pick the
Country and Select the Area in  that Country and Shows the Area types of Resources, Loss in  Percentage occur  in that
area, who are your  enemies and How much points you  get for  each  Resources. You  enter  the Level  of User  page where
On the Basis of Level  you  allow for  the hunting on the specific country, if not allow then you  have to choose different
country. After  select the level, enter  the number  of pieces of hunting tool  you  used for  each  hunting submit tools and
reach to page shows the total  points and total  award Money you  Have got until and Remaining time for  hunting, After
completing time reach  to welcome page shows the total  points you achieve and money from this game. The Resource
Points, Enemy for  the area and Loss per  Area is managed by Admin
Environment:  Windows XP, Ubuntu
Company:  IBM (WDC) Sep 2008 - Jan 2009
Project:  Softek.
Site  URL: http://www-950.ibm.com/services/dms/index.php
Project  Role:  Developer
Description:
http://d25lhttp002.con.can.ibm.com/index.php
This is the IBM-Softek Data Migration  Facility website.Worked on the Adodb driver  connections Using PHP With  the
Database.Work on  the Customer  Support Pages and Email  Functionality that Admin  Maintain for  each  Request
Generated By Client.Working on  the pages of the Support  Section and Literature  Section where links are not
working proper and page forms are not submit.Worked on the code optimization.
Environment:  Windows XP,  My SQL, Apache
Company:  EcotechITSolution PVT LTD. Nov 2006 - July 2008
Project:  The  Ifg  Asia Mortgages
Site  URL:  www.ifgasiamortgages.com
www.cosmopr.co.jp/index.php
Project  Role:  Developer
Team Size : 1
Description:
This is multilingual  site. Display the information regarding the mortgages in the Japanese and English languages. From
admin-side, Data is inserted, Manage it .This data is manage in the both languages and it is display in  the
Userside .Participation  in  requirement study and designing .Database Creation and Designing.
Environment:  Windows XP,  Smarty Templates, My SQL, Linux, Apache
Company:  EcotechITSolution PVT LTD
Project:  Diluca Japan
Site  URL:  www.dilucajapan.com
Project  Role:  Developer
Team Size  : 2
Description:
This is multilingual  site. Display the diamond information in  the both English and Japanese language. This is diamond
Advertisement site. Option of the selling of diamonds also. Display news, diamond provider  whole information  .Search
of the diamonds. Artist section.
Environment:  Windows XP,  Smarty Templates, My SQL, Linux, Apache
EcotechITSolution PVT LTD
Project:  The  dealbanger.com
Site  URL:  http://www.dealbanger.com/new
Project  Role:  Developer
Team Size : 2
Description:
0  0  1  E 0  0  1  F
This site manage the deals, that is given  for  the client products. Admin  module manage the whole site. In  this site.
Admin  has different privileges here .There is Add deal  coupon system.
Two  type of deals here, using deal and coupon.Discount on the coupon deals only.On  each  deals client given the there
product information, url.category and subcategory in which there product is look. It is all  managed through the admin
side and getting display in public site upto expire date.
Environment:  Windows XP,  Smarty Templates, My SQL, Linux, Apache
EcotechITSolution PVT LTD
Project:  Bareback
Site  URL:  www.bareback.com
www.houseboy.com
www.drag.com
Project  Role:  Developer
Team Size : 3
Description:
0  0  1  E 0  0  1  F
This site manage the deals, that is given  for  the client products. Admin  module manage the whole site. In  this site.
Admin  has different privileges here .There is Add deal  coupon system.
Two  type of deals here, using deal and coupon.Discount on the coupon deals only.On  each  deals client given the there
product information, url.category and subcategory in which there product is look. It is all  managed through the admin
side and getting display in public site upto expire date.
Environment:  Windows XP,  Smarty Templates, My SQL, Linux, Apache
Panacea InfoTech Pvt  Ltd Feb. 2006 - Nov 2006:
Project  Name:  The travel bee
Site  URL  : www.travelbee.org
Project  Role:  Developer
Team Size : 2
Description:
Build up a site www.travelbee.org for  traveler  who want to enjoy his holidays in  any part of world. If traveller  has to go
switcherland, then website give detail  list of Provider  of this Country, this provider  then  give some discount him, if he
has come twice to same provider. If traveller  has to  go Bangkok for  tracking competition  site give event idea to  them
each country wise, on which  day which  country has, which event. If traveler  can give rating on there experience .and
other  traveller  to give intimation of which  restaurant is good in specified place. On the basis of traveller  experience
other  traveller  can  visit the same provider  for  booking the hotel, hire a car  etc.
Project  Name  :  BlindSolutions
Site  URL :  www.blindsolutions.co.za
Project  Role:  Developer
Team Size : 2
Description:
This Website Is use for  the intranet purpose use the concept of fast template.
This is the curtain  selling online site. User  enter  there curtain  size and online give the payment for  the curtains that he
buy's.
Project  Name: Whatsupguide
Site  URL : http://www.onlinecommunitysite.com/whatsupguide/
Project  Role:  Developer
Team Size : 2
Description:
Work on http://www.onlinecommunitysite.com/whatsupguide/ news and directory section, advance search on  the
event, forum, weblink and news section. Create news with  adding news image, directory section  only for  the
advertisement adding header-footer  banner  with  client website who want to display his banner  on the header, add this
website on the directory section.
Honeywell Automation INDIA LTD, PUNE Dec. 2004 - June 2005:
Project  Name: OPC Interface
Client : Tata steal  Plant, Jameshdpur
Role : Developer
Team size : 2
Description:
Create client in Visual  basic  and send the information  to the server  and take response from it. If server  sends response
it analyzes it. Use the concept of VC++ and COM for  request from client and response from server. Maintain the plant
temperature, pressure and other  tags using server per  millisecond.
Environment:  Windows, VC++: ActivexDLL, ActivexDCOM Concept Use in  Project.
Master of Computer  Application [MCA] (57.17%)
College : IMRD (Institute of Management, Research, and Development)
University: North Maharshtra University, Jalgaon..[Maharashtra]
Duration  : 3 years. [2002-2005]
B.Sc [PCM](58%)
College : S.P.D.M.College, Shirpur  [Maharashtra.]
University: North  Maharshtra University, Jalgaon.[Maharashtra]
Duration  : 3 years. [1999-2002]
December 2010 to Present Date with
CandorWorks
Enterprises Pune as  BDE.
CandorWorks is a Solution  Provider  in  Sales,  Marketing  and  Technology  Outsourcing  Company.  It
Provides customized  and  tailored  outsourced  offshore sales and  marketing  services.
www.candorworks.com
Key  Deliverables:
In-depth  Market  Research  and  Analysis.
Creating  & Furnishing  Huge Database at SalesForce.
E-mail Campaign.
Whitespacing  Database (Jigsaw,ZoomInfo,Linkedin).
Cold  Calling  US Market.
Identifying  potential clients.
Organization UNIT TRUST OF INDIA
Project Title \u0022Tapping  and  mapping  of IFA's in  Pune region  and  industry  analysis of UTI.\u0022
Duration 8  Weeks
Description
During  the period  of two  months,  I conducted  an  awareness drive wherein,  I prepared  a questionnaire.
The main  purpose of  this project was to  conduct a market mapping  and  to  identify  the potential
agents for  UTI Mutual Fund.
I  visited  various IFA's (Independent Financial Advisor) to  understand  the details of the business
and  also  the response they  get from investors whether they  are interested  in  investing  in  UTI
Mutual fund.
Also,  I  analyzed  mutual fund  industry  in  India,  the AUM of  the various mutual fund  companies
and  the preference of  the investors.
Working with Our Web Studio Software Solutions (P) Ltd., as  Project
Manager  / Senior Testing Engineer since March 2013.
Worked as  Senior Testing Engineer in Our Web Studio Software Solutions (P)
Ltd., from January  2006 to April 2013.
Worked as  Testing Engineer in Our Web Studio Software Solutions (P) Ltd.,
from September 2005 to December 2006.
Analyzed the System Requirement Specification and involved in gathering the complete
information of the Project by  communicating with Clients.
Worked on the System Requirement Specification (SRS).
Developed the Test Strategy, Test Plan, Test Cases  from Business, Functional and
Technical Specifications.
Reviewed the design links  and the htmls  pages  required for the website.
Explained the project to the team members.
Allocated the tasks  to team.
Reviewed the test cases  written by  team.
Updating the Regression Test cases  with the new functionality.
Querying the database for checking the Data Transactions.
Involved in Unit, Integration, System and Regression Testing.
Reported the Bugs  using the bug tracking tool. Reviewed the bugs  mentioned by  the team.
Prepared the documents  for the enhancements.
Populated the Data provided by  the client.
Provided the ETA's  (Estimated Time Around) to client on various  tasks.
Discussed with the Development and Testing Team members  for better understanding of
the requirement for the entire team
Involved in transferring the data from one server to other server.
Updating the Daily  Development and QA Status  report to the Managing Director.
Projects (Testing Engineer):
1) Cannon Automotive: http://www.cannoncarmats.co.uk/
2) Jemca: http://www.ukwturboserver.com/
3) Angela Kilmartin: http://www.angelakilmartin.com/
4) Supa Studs: http://www.supastuds.com/
5) Funky  Shop: http://www.juliannebalai.com/
6) The Definite Article: http://www.thedefinitearticle.co.uk/
7) Car Markets  Australia: http://www.carmarketsonline.com.au/
Written Test Cases and Executed the Test Cases for all modules in the Admin and
Client Side.
Reported  the Bugs by using the Bug Tracking Tool (PMS).
Involved in  different types of Testing  like Functional, Regression Testing,
Compatibility Testing etc.,
Tested the project in different environment that is on Internet Explorer, Mozilla
ROYAL ZINC,  Pune (Aug'11   Present)
Senior Business  Development Executive (Reporting  to Director)
Key Deliverables:
Responsible for new market development in US  and  UK
Performing  Consulting  and  direct selling  calls for major offshore m arket
Preparing  Proposals
Accountable  for Requirement Elicitation, Project management and  developing  relationship with
customer for repeat business
Generating  leads and  identifying Potential Market
Performing  sales and  marketing  calls to fix meeting with the  prospective  clients
Preparing  Official business proposals
Doing follow-up sales movement
Carry out marketing promotional activities- posting press release, blogs on all popular business
directories and  blogging sites
ACE INFOWAY,  Ahmedabad (Dec'10   May'11)
Business  Development Executive (offshore market) (Reporting to Business  Development
Head)
Key Deliverables:
Provided  sales support for geographically spread  sales team
Coordinated  between client and the project manager
Efficiently managed  account of existing Clients
INFOSTRETCH SOLUTIONS,  Ahmedabad (Nov'09    Nov'10)
Business  Development Executive (Reporting to Business  Development Manager)
Key Deliverables:
Developed  strategies, assessed  marketing opportunities and targeted  markets for SaaS  service
Created  and  enforced sales policies and  processes
Implemented  best practices in newly developed  Presales team
Created  Marketing  buzz  through Social media like LinkedIn, twitter, etc.
Currently Working on  C#, Asp.Net. MS SQL Server, VB.Net and Crystal  Reports.
Extensively worked on technologies such as VB. Net, MS SQL Server, Crystal  Report 8.0
Working with  K System Leading Time -  Attendance and Security Systems S/W  Developer.
Skilled in  client interaction during conceptual, specification and effort estimation  stages.
Gained experience in the end-to-end development & implementation of software products from
requirement analysis to  system study, designing, coding, testing & documentation.
Exceptional  communication  and presentation  skills with  demonstrated abilities in  accomplishing projects
with in  time.
Strong Knowledge of Asp.Net with  C#, Sql  Server  and Crystal  Reports.
Key Deliverables:
Coordinating for smooth implementation of the project; extending post-implementation and application
maintenance support to  the client.
Requirement Analysis, Application Maintenance, Functional  Studies, Quality Reviews and Testing.
Performing various phases of software testing.
Reviewing the functional  requirement documents.
Conducting functional  tests and analysis of reported defects.
Handling testing, debugging and troubleshooting of the application.
Identifying key / institutional  accounts and strategically secure profitable business.
Relationship building with decision  makers and key buyers in pre-sales negotiation stages.
Company: K SYSTEM,  Pune.
Designation:  Jr.  Software Engineer.
Project:  Krusti Management System (Mini ERP)
Environment: C#.Net  4.0, SQL Server 2005, RDLC Report.
Team size: 5.
Coding & designing of user  interface.
Database Design.
Bug Fixing and Maintenance.
Enhancement in the existing module if applicable.
Project:  Quick  Attendance:
Environment:  C#.Net3.5, SQL Server 2005, Crystal Report 9.0.
Team size: 5.
Coding & designing of user  interface.
Database Design.
Bug Fixing and Maintenance.
Enhancement in the existing module if applicable.
Project:  Web
Time  Track :( Digital Time Tracking)
Environment:  Asp.Net with C# 4.0, SQL Server 2005, Sap Crystal Report.
Team size: 5.
Coding & designing of user  interface.
Bug Fixing and Maintenance.
Enhancement in the existing module if applicable.
Coding & designing of user  interface.
Bug Fixing and Maintenance.
Enhancement in the existing module if applicable.
Company: Sandhi Software,  Pune.
Duration:  Dec' 2009 to Aug 10
Designation:  Jr.  Software Engineer.
Coding & designing of user  interface.
Bug Fixing and Maintenance.
Enhancement in the existing module if applicable.
Sahir Projects Pvt Ltd, Pune Sr. Software  Test Engineer September 2010   Till Date
(www.sahirprojects.com)
Project Name:  CIRCOR  Select (Version- 1.1.0, 2.3.0, 3.2.1, 4.2.0)
Duration : September 2010 to till date
Team Size :  18
Environment:  C# .Net with SQL server 2008.
Role: Sr.Software  Test Engineer
Description:  This is a Client-Server application, The Circor Select   a sizing & selection tool
will be created  to cater to the  needs of Leslie  Controls Inc., Mallard  Control
Inc., RTK Control Inc., and  Hydroseal Inc. of CIRCOR  International Inc.
The  tool will enable the  sales team & cu stomers, to size  & select control
valves, actuators. The  tool will be  smart to prevent users from selecting
wrong  product selection based  on the  service conditions. This application
allows uploading  the  quotation to Central Repository. The  tool will also support
Pricing, Quotations and many other features.
Testing  Module  wise  Functionality Like
Registration Process, Sizing  and  Selection Rules, Actuators, Project Up-
gradation, Import and  Export, Pricing  , Upload  Quotation to Central
Repository, Report Testing  regarding  module  wise.
Participated  in analysing  of Business Requirement Document, Functional Specification
document and  getting  clarification on the requirements if required.
Participated  in preparing  Test scenario. Writing  and reviewing  of test cases based  on the
given Requirement, Execution of Test cases.
Performed  Smoke  Test on each new Environment/Build.
Conducting  Functional Testing, Integration Testing, Regression Testing, Retesting,
Compatibility Testing, Installation Testing, Database Testing, Up-gradation Testing  and
Report Generation
Reporting  the defects Using  Mantis (Defect Tracking Tool).
Tracking  of bugs till the  problem gets closed.
Attending  conference  calls ,WebEx sessions with client
Sending  Build  Wise Status Report & WSR  (Weekly Status Report)  to PM.
Helped  team members in complex issue  resolutions & guided  them with proper solution
of the  issue  related  to various functionality
Project Name:  CIRCOR  Select Admin & QMTR We bsite
Duration : October 2011 to April 2013
Team Size :  18
Environment:  ASP.net with SQL server 2008
Role: Software  Test Engineer
Description: This is a Web  Application for administration of registered  users. The  purpose
is to grant Privileges to registered  users. Create  and  manage  users. Create
Admin and  Super Admin User.
Objective  of QMTR  is Gather all quotations to Central Repository for racking,
Reporting, Follow-ups.
Testing  Module  wise  Functionality like
Give  Pricing  Privileges to registered  users of their Respected Brands, Search
User, Edit the  Privileges of registered  users, Download registered user
Information.
Participated  in analysing  of Business Requirement Document, Functional Specification
document and  getting  clarification on the requirements if required.
Participated  in preparing  Test scenario. Writing  and reviewing  of test cases based  on the
given Requirement, Execution of Test cases.
Performed  Smoke  Test on each new Environment/Build.
Reporting  the defects Using  Mantis (  Defect Tracking  Tool )
Attending  conference  calls with client.
Conducting  GUI  Testing, Functional Testing, Regression Testing, Database  testing.
Tracking  of bugs till the  problem gets closed.
Produced  daily, weekly progress and  completion reports.
Part of  network  team,  Analyzing  Logs file,  Optimization  of  RF GSM network  and  tuning
with  TEMS 8.0.1.
Handle of  interference issues by  change of  frequency  parameter  of site & neighboring
sites,  antenna orientation.
Call Performance Testing.
Responsible for  taking  care of customer complains Regarding  Network  coverage and
Quality.
Coverage and  Quality  Optimization  to  ensure Satisfaction  of  Customer.
Preparing  CRF for  any  change.
Analysis of  Drive Test Files for  taking  care of external and  internal interference in  the
Network  involving  Rx  Quality  and  Rx  level Etc.
Re planning  of RF parameters in  Problematic Areas Accordingly.
Analysis of  Statistics and  Drive tests Data for monitoring  the performance of  the network
and  generate report of the findings.
Interpretation  of  drive test data and  making  necessary  recommendations of  RF parameter
changes.
Deciding  Antenna positioning  by  checking  coverage prediction.
Interference detection  & rectification,  Hand  over,  Sector  Swapping  & frequency  scanning.
Preparation  of  final Site Handover Certificate for Customer.
Analyze weak  coverage areas and  resolving  customer  complaints on  time.
Prepared  Pre and  Post Drive test reports with  KPI,  Problem cause and  recommendation
solutions.
Cluster  optimization  Parametric and  Physical changes for  optimal results.
Analysis of  Location  Area Code (LAC),  Cell Global Identity  (CGI),  Mobile Allocation
Index  Offset (MAIO),  Hopping  Sequence Number (HSN) & MA List.
RF Neighbor  Optimization  by  Addition  & Deletion  of neighbors in  a particular  Network.
Checking  the ZEEI  and  ZEOL reports coming  from OMC  to  check  the Status of  sites .
Verify  the frequency  plan  and  BSIC  plan  coming  from the Tool.
Location :  JAMMU & KASHMIR
Client :  NOKIA SIEMENS NETWORK
Operator : VODAFONE
Ludhiana  Airtel project:
On  Behalf of Ericsson  Handling  Customer Complain  and  Site Optimization  in  Ludhiana for AIRTEL.
1.  Responsible for  taking  care of  customer  complains Regarding  Network  coverage.
2.  Carried  out Repeaters survey  and  proposing  solution  for  coverage Improvement.
3.  Freeze the number of  sites in  new cities Based  on  coverage area and  projected  subscriber
Base.
4.  Analysis of Drive Test Files for  taking  care of external and  internal interference in  the
Network  involving  Rx  Quality  and  Rx  level Etc.
5.  Re planning  of  RF parameters in  Problematic Areas Accordingly.
6.  Frequency  Planning  and  Handover  Definition.
Location :  LUDHIANA
Client :  ERICSSON
Operator : AIRTEL
Management  graduate an IT professional with 5.7 years' experience
handling portfolio of Software Testing role.
Exposure on Oracle  Application  ERP, Healthcare,  IFE  Software (Web
Application).
Expertise in design, review and validating manual test scripts on the
diversified software applications.
Expertise in preparing Test Strategy, Test Plan, Test Matrix and reporting the
defect.
Well  versed with
SDLC,
Software Testing Lifecycle and QA Methodologies.
Experience in System, Retest, Regression, GUI, Configuration and UAT
Testing.
Having strong Functional experience in analyzing business  requirements,
Functional configurations, and Functional specifications.
Preparing and maintaining Requirement Traceability Matrix (RTM).
Experience in  analyzing the defect and suggesting the Corrective and
Preventive Action  to Management  Team.
Advanced analytical, in-depth knowledge of various  phases and
methodologies  of software development  including SDLC and RUP project
management  methodology.
Assisted senior management team in the analysis, design, development,
testing & im plementation  of various  applications.
Adept  at  systems  analysis, feasibility study, requirements study,
designing GUI & entailing analyzing of information  system needs,
evaluating end-user requirements, troubleshooting for complex
information  systems  management.
Prepare Test  Strategy  for Temenos  EBS R12 Upgrade Project
Prepare and finalized template document
Present  whole Test Strategy to  R12 Upgrade team to get  team involved in  Testing
Mentored juniors  for efficiently  completing the tasks.
Prepare Defect  summary  and Test  release after every  Test cycle
Responsibility  of analyzing different issues/Defects and prepared software matrices.
Ensure that development  projects meet business  requirements  and goals, fulfill end
User requirements, and identify  and resolve issues
Efficiently  work  with  worldwide cross  functional team
Sanity Check  Test case review
BRD review
Duration:  February 2013  to  June 2013
Client:  American  Redcross  Corp.
Role :  SCM  Tester
Understand, analyze & validate business  requirements.
Mentored juniors  for efficiently  completing the tasks.
Design & review the Test Scripts  for Oracle R12 Supply  Chain  modules  like PO, INV &
OR.
Responsibility  of analyzing different issues/Defects and prepared software matrices.
Ensure that development  projects meet business  requirements  and goals, fulfill end
User requirements, and identify  and resolve issues
Identify and logging the defect in  Quality  Center.
Attend Daily  status meeting with  client (American Redcross  Corporation & Zr eyas)
Contributed in solution assessment  and validation of software application.
Employer :  Syntel Inc. Pune
Duration  :  September 2010  to  June 2011
Understand, analyze & validate business  requirements  with  development team.
Given functional cross  training to  Junior Team Member on Healthcare domain.
Mentored juniors  for efficiently  completing the tasks.
Responsibility  of analyzing different issues/Defects and prepared Software matrices
Ensure that development  projects meet business  requirements  and goals, fulfill end
User requirements, and identify  and resolve issues
Designed and execution of test  case. Prepared Bug Reports.
Contributed in solution assessment  and validation of software application.
Employer : Western  Outdoor Interactive Pvt. Ltd
Duration  :  October 2007  to  Aug 2010
Gathered, analyzed & id entified business  needs  of IFE software system
(Media  and Entertainment) through client meeting and interview
session to  insure requirement are complete, clear and testable.
Co-ordinate in preparing requirement documentation  (assumptions).
Participated in  design  review meeting to check  design traceability  with
requirement and provided valuable input  on  design  flow and usability
of IFE application.
Developed test  plan  and test  cases  based on the business requirement
and design  and use cases
Worked with  QA on  UA Test  requirements.
Performed System  Testing, functional, Retest, Regression, Usability,
Configuration testing and defect  reporting.
Analyzed and prepared test  result  in the form  test report.
Analyzed issues  and created test matrix  and participated in improving
organization performance through recommending area  and approaches
for improvement activity  by  collecting data  and providing input to team
discussion.
Organized and coordinated review sessions  with  various project
stakeholders to  resolve open  issues.
Co-ordination  with  technical and international clients
Mentored juniors  for efficiently  completing the task.
Prepare and updated Requirement  Traceability  Matrix  (RTM) for
managing the requirement  changes.
Trained junior team member on  functional domain and System  Test
Environment.
Prepared checklists  for launching and troubleshooting applications  on
different I FE DevStations.
Employer: E-Max solutions, Pune
Duration:  March 2006  to  September 2007
Understanding the business  requirements.
Design and Execution  of Test  Cases  manually
Checking data transaction  and database integrity.
Performed Functional, System, and User Interface, retesting /regression
testing.
Analyze test  results, reported bugs and provided detailed status  report
to
Management.
4 years, Total Experience.
4 years, Experience  in Quality Assurance  Analyst (Software  tester), specializing  in Quality Assurance,
Manual testing  and  process management throughout key phases of SDLC and  STLC.
Extensive  expertise with Web-based  Application includes industries such as Banking  &   Financial
Services: Corporate/Retail Banking  and  Payments sector. (US,  EUR, CHINA & Hong-Kong Payments)
Presently working  with ACI PAYMENT Systems  formerly known as S1  Services  India  Pvt.  Ltd,
Pune as a Software Testing  (QA)  Engineer, since  Jan 2012 to till date
Preparing  / reviewing the functional requirement document, as well proficiency in Defining and
Executing  Test Cases, Defining   Test Case  Structure, Writing  queries in SQL, Analyzing Bugs and  Bugs
Reporting.
Conducting  Installation, Functional, Compatibility & Re gression testing  as part of System Testing  and
analyzing  reported  defects
Proficient in mapping  client's requirements and  providing customized  software  solutions involving
system  design & Test outline  document for modules
Sound  knowledge  on the working  of RSA-Token Management System Works
Defining t he best practices for project support and  documentation
Conducting  the  software audits & revi ews and  maintaining relevant documentation for the  same
Exposure in Software Development Life Cycle and Software Testing  Life Cycle.
Effective defect tracking  and reporting  to improve  communications and reduce delay.
Among  my strength are  Good root cause  analysis, Highly Proactive, Critical Thinking, Logical
Interpretation, Analytical, Technical skills, Adaptable, Zeal to learn new technologies.
Expertise  in handling  the XSS Issues & Testing  overall impact flows due  to Security fixes
Multilingual with proficiency in English, Hindi, Marathi, Gujrati and Telugu.
Passed  B.E (Electronics  and Telecommunication) From Amravati University in Year 2007
Certified T esting  course in Software  Testing  from Mind Scripts  Pvt Ltd.,Pune.(Jan'2011-  March'2011)
Organization: ACI  Payment Systems India Pvt Ltd., Pune.
Project no # 1 From Oct 2012 to till date
UniCredit Bank;  run subsidiaries in the  US, Hong  Kong  and  China
Designation: Associate  QA engineer
Description:
UniCredit Bank who run subsidiaries in the  US, Hong  Kong  and  China mainland  have functions
[Corporate Investment Banking  (CIB)/  Global Banking Services (GBS)] which allow the
Group  to maintain and  increase  a competitive advantage  in terms of costs and  competencies. Also,
offer a wide  range  of corporate products focusing  on Trade Finance   from documentary business
to financing t he  complete  supply chain. They, look  into Cross  Border Business stands for growth
without borders where  your company or group  of companies conducts business in at least two
countries served  by their banking  group.
Looking  further into the  product, it handles the China  (Domestic Payroll,  Cross  Border,  Bulk
Domestic), Hong-Kong  Cross  Border,  ACH (CCD  and PPD) and US  (Wire and International
Wire) payments; they also equally provide the Swift Message MT940 /  Customer Statement
Message: Statement of the  transactions for the  previous day. Shows opening  and  closing  balance
with itemized  cash movement statement (= daily extract). Swift Message MT942 /  Interim
Transaction Report: Intra-day transaction report, which is used  to transmit detailed  information
about entries debited  or credited  to the  account at the  identified   time. Itemized  statement of
transactions carried out during a specific t ime  (current extract). MT 101: The  MT101 message  type
(Request for Transfer)  allows our corporate  customers to access their accounts held with third  party
banks worldwide.
In addition, MT940, MT942 and  MT101 is available  to customers participating in SWIFT Net
connectivity with UniCredit (SWIFT= Society for Worldwide Interbank Financial Telecommunication).
Modules  Covered:
Payments, International Recipients, Import/Export, User-Payment Reports, Information Reporting, File
Services, User Preferences and Admin
As  a  Team member,  My Responsibilities  involved:
Utilizing
my analytical and problem-solving skills to help validate,  verify,  communicate,
and resolve systems/software application as  well as issues uncovered during informal and
formal testing processes.
Identified
areas  of  potential impact as  well as associated risks in order to maximize the
quality of final products  and initiatives.
Well
versed with  generating precise and concise test plan/scenarios  and test cases
Actively
participated in full life-cycle of  a development project interacting with teams  of
developers and testers
Ensuring
that testing activities  will allow applications  to meet business  requirements  to
create test plans/cases  and systems  goals,  fulfilling end-user requirements,  and working
closely with members  of  project team on identification and resolution of systems issues
and uncovered defects.
for planning  process  evaluation,  design,  development and maintenance of
test scripts  using  a framework  for new applications and  enhancements,  existing
applications  throughout SDLC.
E2E
knowledge transfer to the new project joiners  and business  users.
Liaise
with the Application Development team in defect fixes v ia  WebEx  sessions.
Represent
project audit activities  internal to the organization.
Root
Cause Analysis of  defects rose during UAT.
Help
project management with extensive user manuals.
Defect
management and meeting the committed deadlines,  SLAs and the agreed  quality
standards
Develop
/ maintain Regression test scripts throughout project life cycle.
Create
and Run Batch files o n Winscp  and Putty.
Estimation
of  effort and Peer reviews.
Domain : Online Banking (Corporate Banking with Trade Finance)
Team Size : 14
Environment : Adv Java, DB 2, Windows 7, IE 8/9, Firefox 10/19/20, Chrome
Tools
JIRA, Quality Center,
Cisco WebEx, Sales Logix,
WinSCP and  Putty
Project no # 2
Organization:  ACI PAYMENT Systems  formerly known as S1 Services India Pvt. Ltd, Pune
The  Company:
Payment systems are what we do at ACI. They're  what we  have been doing  for more  than
35 years. Our employees have  an unrivaled  understanding  of payment processes and  how to improve
them. ACI  Worldwide  powers electronic  payments for financial institutions, retailers and  processors around
the  world  with its broad  and integrated  suite of electronic  payment software.
ACI  Worldwide powers electronic  payments and  banking  for more  than 1,650 financial institutions, retailers
and processors around  the  world. ACI  software  enables $12 trillion in payments each day, processing
transactions for 14 of the  leading  global retailers, and  24 of the  world's 25 largest banks. Through our
integrated  suite  of software products and hosted services, we  deliver a broad  range  of solutions for
payments processing, card  and  merchant management, online banking, mobile, branch and  voice  banking,
fraud  detection, and  trade  finance. www.aciworldwide.com
Title : Wells  Fargo Bank,  US
Designation : Associate QA engineer
Domain : Online Banking
Team Size : 10
Environment : Java, DB 2, Windows 7, IE 7/8/9, Firefox 3.5/3.6/9/10
Tools
JIRA, Quality Center,
Sales Logix,
WinSCP and  Putty
Period : Since Jan 2012 to Sept 2012
Description:
It is Agile Payments solution provider to the  customers which includes 10 types of ACH payments,
6 types of Wire  payments which supports almost 50 Currency conversions and  Third  Party
payments(Beneficiary); they also equally provide the  various User and  Payment reports, Check
Services(Check Inquiry, Stop Payment), Fraud  Control (Positive  and  Reverse  Positive  Payment).
Completely works on 3 tier web  based  architecture. It is a Corporate  Banking  Solution provider
which uses the two applications named  as SAM and CB. SAM is used by the  Internal Bank
employees to generate  different company &   creates different users for the  company. Moreover,
create different Class of Service for the particular company. Assign Different functions from class of
service  to the  particular users &   Check out where  these users are  performing  according  to their
class of service of not through CB. Whereas, CB is used  by the  Customers where  they can do Login
and perform the  various Transactions based on their interest. Basically its functions are  to create
numerous Payments like  (Wire payments, ACH Payments, Third party payments), Payment Reports
(Detail, Summary, Current Day, Prior Day), User Reports (Activity, Audit and  Setup)
This Application facilitates in Cash management and  Payment revenues through which Customers
can manage  the  daily liquidity of their business and  move money in any Currency around  the  globe.
Also, includes comprehensive  global payments capabilities, this reduces operational costs,
simplifies deployment, and  shortens time to market for new payment types.
Modules  Covered:
Payments, Beneficiaries, User-Payment Reports, Check Services, Information Reporting, Fraud  Control, File
Services, User Preferences and Admin
As  a  Team member,  My Responsibilities  involved:
Analyzed
Requirements  documents  and Use Cases  to prepare the detailed Test Cases.
Writing
Test Scenarios form requirements and converting them into Test cases  reviews
ensuring coverage.
Test
and Defect metrics,  Test case Execution.
Root
causes  Analysis  and Test Outline Document preparation.
Worked
with developers  to resolve and fix   the faults found in testing the structure and
functionality of  the application.
Defect
validation,  triaging,  logging and tracking to its  closure,  ensuring  all high and
urgent priority defects  are resolved prior to Project implementation.
Good
Exposure on Logs,  which helps to understand the reason in reported defects.
Used
Excel to report the defects  found  during  Regression and Smoke testing,  followed
up until it resolves
Defect
management and meeting the committed deadlines,  SLAs and the agreed  quality
standards
Develop
/ maintain Regression test scripts throughout project life cycle.
Communicating
effectively with technical and non-technical colleagues.
Create
and Run Batch files o n Winscp  and Putty.
Project no # 3
Organization:  Quexst Solutions (Worked  on Client Site with S1 Services India Pvt. Ltd, Pune).
The  Company:
Quexst Solutions Pvt. Ltd is a house  dedicated to Software QA with a view to enforcing
Quality Assurance  and  Quality Control processes to software  work products. Quexst was established  in
November 1998 & off ers world-class services in software  product certification, process consultation, quality
education and  play a pivotal role  in customer's profitability by delivering  capable resources in time. Quexst
family includes young  energetic Project Managers, team members from diverse areas such as Banking,
Finance, Share Trading  Systems and ERPs'.
Quexst is concurred  in Testing  services (Associating  in a client testing  project, by way of ;Professional
Services;   or ;Staff Augmentation;, Conducting  a testing  project at client site  wherein the  entire project
team comes from  Quexst, Executing  a Testing project within internal Testing  Centre  at Quexst offices)
Quality Engineering  and Training Services. www.quexst.com
Title : Bank  of  Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ, Ltd.  Japan
Designation : Software Testing Engineer
Domain : Online Banking
Team Size : 12
Environment : Java, DB 2, Windows 7, IE 7/8, Firefox 3.5/3.6
Tools
JIRA,  Quality Center ,  WinSCP and Putty
Period : Since April 2011 to Dec 2011
Description:
The  BTMU (Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ, Ltd.)  is a web  based  Application. It is a Corporate  Banking
Solution provider which uses the  two applications named  as SAM and CB. SAM is used  by the
Internal Bank employees which generates different company &   creates different users for the
company. Moreover, create different Class of Service  for the  particular company. Assign Different
functions from class of service  to the  particular users &   Check out where these  users are
performing  according  to their class of service  of not through CB. Whereas, CB is used  by the
Customers where  they can do Login and  perform  the various Transactions based  on their interest.
Basically its functions are  to create numerous Payments like (US  payments, Third  party payments,
ACH Payments), Transfers (Single, One to Many and  Many to One), Reports (Current Day and  Prior
Day),
This Application facilitates in Cash management and  Payment revenues through which Customers
can manage  the  daily liquidity of their business and  move money in any Currency around  the  globe.
Also, includes comprehensive  global payments capabilities, this reduces operational costs,
simplifies deployment, and  shortens time to market for new payment types
Modules  Covered:
Payments, Transfers, Information Reporting, Fraud  Control, File  Services, Check Services, Operations and
Admin
As  a  Team member,  My Responsibilities  involved:
Analyzed
Requirements  documents  and Use Cases  to prepare the detailed Test Cases.
Involved
in writing Test Scenarios  and Test cases ensuring coverage.
Test
case Execution.
Test
Outline Document preparation.
Worked
with developers  to resolve and fix   the faults found in testing the structure and
functionality of  the application.
Defect
logging and tracking,  ensuring all high and  urgent priority defects  are resolved
prior to Project implementation.
Used
Excel to report the defects  found  during  Regression and Smoke testing,  followed
up until it resolves
Develop
/ maintain Regression test scripts throughout project life cycle.
Communicating
effectively with technical and non-technical colleagues.
Create
and Run Batch files o n Putty.
Project no # 4
Organization : Maram software  India Pvt. Ltd, Hyderabad. From July -2009 to Jan-2011
The Company:  Maram  Software Private  Limited  is Customized  Software  Provider keeping  main focus on
Indian Trading Community. Since 1999 they are  in service  of traders from different business segment like
FMCG  Distributors, Garment Show Rooms etc. The aim of the  organization behind  creation of the  business
solutions is to provide  a remedy to the  daily hassles of business maintenance through user-friendly
package. It gives 24x7x365 support to the clients. www.maramsoft.com
Title : Apparel
Designation : Software Tester
Domain : Finance
Team Size : 6
Environment : Visual Basic  6.0, Ms-Access, Data Reports, Windows XP, IE 6/7.
Tools
Bugzilla and Ms-Excel
Period : From May 2010 to Jan 2011
Description:
Apparel is  the barcode-based software for garments and footwear showrooms  to help
accounting,  in various  versions  covering every need of the showroom,  it stands  unique for
its  exclusive features  like piece wise inventory with age analysis,  barcodes  on laser printer,
sales  analysis  and a  lot of  features  listed below.  Apparel is  Dealing with five types of
versions namely Standard,  Standard LAN,  Billing,  Billing LAN and Warehouse.  Each version
is  accomplished with their own Specifications and functions.
Modules  Covered:
Firms, Purchase,  Sales,  Inventory,  Tailoring and Finance
My Responsibilities:
Analyzed
requirements  documents  and Use Cases to prepare the detailed Test Cases
Test
case designed
Test
case Execution.
Worked
with developers  to resolve and fix   the faults found in testing the structure and
functionality of  the application.
Involved
in preparing Test Plan and Test case Suite.
Prepared
Test Cases  covering Functional,  UI and Module Integration.
Used
Excel to report the defects  found during Regression testing and followed up until it
resolves.
Defect
logging.
Defect
tracking.
Communicating
and coordinating with the Onsite Team.
Estimation of effort and Peer reviews.
Project no # 5
Title : Chatralay
Designation : Software Tester
Domain : Online Payment Gateway
Team Size : 8
Environment : Visual Basics 6.0, Ms-SQL Server, Data Reports, Windows XP, IE 7/8.
Tools
Bugzilla and Quality Center
Period : Since  July 2009 to April 2010
Description:
Chatralay is complete integrated  solution for educational institutions maintains the  online  fees In and  out
payment gateway, with a bundle  of modules like management, admissions, academics, exams, staff, fees,
accounts, transport, library, hostel, health management, head  officebranches, group  of institutions which
includes SMS, Emails alerts for attendance, fees, results and  Schedules. Chatralay is Dealing  with three
types of versions namely Standard,  Standard LAN and Web Based Solution. Each version is
accomplished  with their own Specifications and  functions.
Modules  Covered:
Inventory Management, Fee, Student, Library, Class, Transport, Exams, Staff, Accounts and  PTR
(Performance Track  Report)
My Responsibilities:
Analyzed requirements  documents  and Use Cases to prepare the detailed Test Cases
Test case designed
Test case Execution.
Managing  Test cases, Test data, defects, and  reports.
Test data preparation by querying  database.
Performed  Functional, Regression testing  as part of System Testing.
Defect logging.
Defect tracking.
Used  Excel to report the defects  found during Regression testing and followed up until it
resolves
Communicating and coordinating with the Onsite Team.
Software Test Engineer at BioAnalytical Technologies, Pune
Aug 2011-Present
Analyst at Eaton Corporation, Pune
Feb 2011-Aug2011
Quality Assurance Tester at ActivSoft, Pune
May 2008-Feb 2011
Software Developer  and Tester at Dana India Technical Center, Pune
April 2005- May 2008

1.
Completed .Net course from Naresh Technology(Hyderabad) with C#, ASP.Net, SqlServer, WCF,
LINQ, Silverlight.
2.
Working in Delmon Solutions  as  DotNet Developer from last 8 months.
3.
Project Experience with Real Time.
WNS  Global Service PVT.  LTD.    Pune (Maharashtra-India)
Position Associate  operations   (9 months)
Sector Accounts Payables/ Payment runs/ Vendor reconciliation/ Payment exception
Duration (Dec'12 till date)
Operating for Universal Music Group Accounts  Payable (US):
General Responsibilities
Managing  all responsibilities pertaining  to payment runs.
Managing  payment parameters and  preparing  pre-proposals.
Work on payment exceptions and other payment requests.
Finalize the  payment proposal before  payment run.
Work on 3rd party, Royalties and  Publishing payment runs.
Vendor account reconciliation and adjustment.
Resolving  vendor queries in verbal as well as written form.
Managing  on-site and  updating  them with all updates relating  to payments.
Recurring  payments-accounting  and reconciliation.
Maintain payment tracker and  daily reporting  of exception.
Training  to new recruits pertaining  to process and  payments.
Core Strength:
Account Analysis
Customer Service
Problem Solver
Reconciliation
Reporting
Routine duties  & re sponsibilities:
Work on potential as well as duplicate  payments.
Manage  vendor calls and  emails relating  to invoicing, approvals, invoice post, payments
and post payment queries.
Work on payment exception and get vendors cleared from the  exception list.
Reporting  all exception to the  client with resolution on daily basis.
Work on RUSH payments and make  sure  that no rush payments get captured in
exceptions.
Make  sure all payment runs are  done on time and  the  payment file i s shared  with the
client on time.
Work allocation and  share  daily reports of work allocated  vs. work completed  with the
team and  the  management
Special Activities:
Payment Return Tracker- Designed  a payment return tracker just to be  posted  about
when we  received the return, who passed the adjustment entry in the system, why was
the  payment returned  and  what has been done  till date  on the  vendor to rectify the
issue.
Void/  Void re-issue Tracker- This was designed  to keep once  posted  about any check
that needs to be  voided  in the  system or any check payment that needs to be  voided  in
the  system and  also needs to be  re-issued. This tracker helped  in understanding  why the
payments needs to be  voided  and  when was the  payment re-issued.
Project Rewards:
\u0022Shooting Star\u0022 was awarded to me in appreciation for my work during the go
live of the process continuously for three months (Jan/Feb/March).
WNS  Global PVT.  LTD.    Pune (Maharashtra-India)
Position Associate  operation - (5 months)
Sector Accounts Receivables/ Credit Analyst/ Collection (B2B)
Duration (June  '12 - Nov'12)
Operating for
Liz Claiborne
process:
General Responsibilities
Collection of past due  invoices and  pre-payments.
Managing  vendor credit and  account statement.
Preparing  weekly batches in JDE for payments received  to the  client.
Work on chargebacks and get them cleared  from the  account statement.
Vendor reconciliation and  account statement R&D.
Work on aging  and  daily collection.
A total of 5.10  years with  4.10  years of  IT experience in  Planning,  Executing,
Monitoring  and  Reporting  Software Manual Testing  activities.
ISTQB Foundation  Level & FLMI  Level 1  Certified  (LOMA 280  & 290)
Participates in  business and  functional requirements walkthroughs to  ensure their
testability.
IBM Certified  in  Software Testing  with  Rational tools & technologies   Rational
Functional Tester and  Rational Quality  Management along  with  Automation
Testing  course completion  with  Grade A+ from MindScripts Technologies,  Pune
Accountable and  Responsible for  Task  allocation,  Resourcing,  Queries resolving,
knowledge transfer,  Reviews and  Estimations for QA tasks.
Accountable and  Responsible for  Metrics Capturing,  Test status Reporting,  Defect
Management,  Impact Analysis,  Risk  and  Issue Analysis.
Ensures pertinent documentation  or  required  standard  project deliverables are kept
current throughout the project and  maintained  on  shared  location.
Functional experience includes Telecommunications and  Insurance Applications.
Experience of  work  allocation  and  coordination  between  onsite and  offshore.
Strong  Communication,  Technical and  Judgment  skills.
Experience of  working  in  Agile,  Waterfall & Iterative models.
Duration Organization Designation
Aug  2010-Sep  2013 Principal Global Services Pvt.  Ltd,
Pune
Associate Consultant
Quality  Analyst
Nov  2009-Aug  2010 Tech  Mahindra Ltd,  Pune (Contractual)  Technical Associate
Feb  2008-Dec 2008 Motorola Ltd,  Basingstoke,  UK Field  & Interoperability  Test
(FIT) Engineer
Aug  2005-July  2006 Fountain  Pixels,  Pune Trainee
Achievements,  Certifications
ISTQB Foundation  Level Certified  (77.5%)
IBM Certified  in  Software Testing  with  Rational technologies (RFT & RQM)
itesh Oswal Mobile: +919823734021
Automation  Testing  certificate (course completion  with  Grade A+) from MindScripts
Technologies,  Pune.
Fellow,  Life Management Institute - Level 1  Certified  (LOMA 280  -  95%  & LOMA
290  -  100%)  (US Insurance Products & Operations)
Best Project Delivery  Award  Received  at Organizational Level.
Work Experience Details
Principal Global Services  Pvt.  Ltd.
Project  Name:  Enterprise System    DVCN
Team  Size: 6
From Nov 2011 To Till Date   Working as a  Test Specialist in MINDTREE Ltd,
Bangalore
From July 2010  To Oct 2011   Worked as a Staff Engineer  in  SLING MEDIA PVT
LTD,  Bangalore
From July 2008  to June 2010   Worked as a Senior  QA engineer in SLING MEDIA Pvt
Ltd, Bangalore
From July 2006  To June 2008   Worked as QA engineer in SLING MEDIA Pvt Ltd,
Bangalore
Assistant manager\u005CTeam Leader   26 Months
SME   34 Months
Maximum team size reported   30 representatives.
Health  care Insurance (claims/benefits), IT  helpdesk, sales, customer  service, ISP and airline reservation.
Migrated and reengineered process.
Experience in Avaya and Nice system.
Convergys India : August 2011 - Present
August 2011- Present.
Position : Team leader- Health Care Insurance(US-Voice)
Duties :
1.
Attaining daily, weekly and monthly targets specified by the process.
2.
Motivating the team members and ensuring minimum attrition.
3.
Engage in  improving processes through reengineering, system checks and
process automation.
4.
Review daily key operational  variables.
5.
Update Manager  on  process performance and critical  people issue
6.
Identify potential  people issues amongst the team & resolve the same on a proactive basis.
7.
Provide coaching and feedback to team members.
8.
Hold regular  team meetings with Team Members to ensure that there is constant flow of infor
mation and knowledge dissemination  query logs, issue resolution
9.
Assist new hires such  that they are productive on  the floor i n  the shortest possible
Time frame.
10. Complete monthly one on one's with all  team members to identify areas of improvement.
IBM DAKSH: February 2007   June 2011
February 2007   April  2008
Position: Customer  care representative. (Customer  service/ISP/Telecom process/voice)
Duties:
1. Adhering to the schedule as prescribed by the TL.
2. Assist customers issue via calls and emails.
3. Attaining monthly targets(Csat, quality, aht, etc.) set by the TL
April 2008   January 2011
Position: Lead Operations. (Customer  service/ IT  help desk/ISP/Email/Telecom /Semi-tech process)
Duties:
1. Conveying the client's requirements to the team with  regards to the process.
2. Ensuring team's performance and minimum attrition.
3. Motivating team members and provide regular  feedback to improve performance.
4. Assist new hires such  that they are productive on the floor in the shortest possible
Time frame.
5. Identify potential people issues amongst the team & resolve the same.
6. Attaining daily, weekly and monthly targets specified by the process.
7. Ensure quality and TAT is met while processing emails.
8. Scheduling breaks to ensure TAT is not missed on  high  priority emails.
9. Responding to client and customer  escalations within the specified ETA.
10. Supporting a team to troubleshoot VPN, access and passwords issue.
January 2011   June 2011.
Position: Assistant Manager. (IT-  helpdesk/Sales/Technical/Customer  service/voice)
Duties:
1. Attaining daily, weekly and monthly targets specified by the process.
2. Motivating the team members and ensuring minimum attrition.
3. Engage in  improving processes through reengineering, system checks and
process automation.
4. Review daily key operational  variables.
5.Update Manager  on process performance and critical  people issue
6. Identify potential  people issues amongst the team & resolve the same on a proactive basis.
7. Provide coaching and feedback to team members.
8.Hold regular  team meetings with Team Members to ensure that there is constant flow of info
rmation  and knowledge dissemination query logs, issue resolution
9.Assist new hires such that they are productive on the floor in the shortest possible
Time frame.
10. Complete monthly one on one's with  all team members to identify areas of
improvement.
WIPRO BPO:
August 2006   January 2007.
Position: Customer care representative(Airline Ticketing).
Duties: Adhering to the schedule as prescribed by the TL
QED  Enabled Services  Private Limited
Business Development Executive  (  Now termed  as Demand  generation )
April 2010 till date
Handled a $5 billion client and  pitched  for Infrastructure Management Services in
Europe  and  UK geography.
Working on a California based  MNC pitching  to MSPs in the US  region.
Profiling companies across industries based  on revenue, employee strength, vertical etc.
and defining t arget companies.
Mapping  global markets, capturing  market intelligence  and defining t he  target market
for client's product or services.
Conducting  B2B surveys and  identifying  the  right business opportunities from target
companies.
Mapping  the  IT Environment of target companies.
Discovering Right Party Contacts in target companies.
Converting  the  right business opportunity/lead to an appointment for the  client.
Reliance Infrastructure Ltd
Graduate  Engineer Trainee
August 2008   August 2009
Consulting the HT premium consumers on supply related  issues, redundancies and
retaining  as well as creating  existing  & newer consumers respectively.
Analyzing  the  data records over a period of time  and  interpreting  the  same  to the team
members using  software such as SAP (Material Management module), MS  Office  and
Geographical Information Systems (GIS).
Co-ordinated  between the  Operations and  Maintenance  teams to execute  critical supply
related projects in a given timeframe.
Keeping  a pro active  check on the  monthly performance  parameters of the system and
suggesting  newer methodologies to achieve  the  targets.
Professional Achievements  :
QED  Enabled Services  Pvt.  Ltd.
Generated  a heavy volume of leads which enabled QED  to get a client into post pilot
agreement.
Made  a document for the  training  repository on the introduction of IT infrastructure  and
the  various offerings to be pitched  in it.
Learnt the basics of pitching  for IMS  in $500 million+ firms
Got a first hand  experience of interacting  with the  decision makers of large enterprises
from diverse verticals.
Reliance Infrastructure Ltd.
Helped  achieve a success rate  of 80%  in the  system parameters which increased  the
rank of Santacruz  depot consistently.
Recipient of 'Beat the  Best' award  for 'Outstanding  performance  as a Trainee'  for the
year 2008-09.
Managed  a team of 10 to execute  emergrency situations.
Trained in User Centered Design and Usability from Human Factors International,  Jan 2012
Trained in Basic  and Advanced Flex 3.0  from Teknopoint Multimedia,  Sep 2009
EDUCATION & CERTIFICATION
Certified Usability Analyst (CUA)
Human Factors International
CUA# 2012-3444
Bachelor of Engineering (BE) in Information Technology
Pune Institute of Computer Technology (PICT) 2003-2007, University of Pune
August 2011    Present
Organization   GS LAB
Location   Pune, India
Role   User Interface Designer
Designation   Senior Software Engineer
Overview
Part of user interface design team for  a cloud based Video Conferencing product
My responsibility dealt with the user interface for the web application
Assisted the development team with their design and UI development needs and
consulted them for UX best practices
Collaborated on interface and interaction design,  feature development and usability
Crafted first draft of iPhone app by working closely  with respective product managers
Created pixel level mockups for the iPhone app in congruence with the Apple Human
Interface Guidelines
June 2010   August 2011
Organization   Infonox, a TSYS company
Location - Pune, India
Role   User Interface Designer
Designation   Internet User Interface Developer II
Overview
Experience with designing and building interfaces for broad range of applications on
different platforms like web and kiosk
Instituted user-centered design (UCD)  principles and usability best practices across
multiple projects to ensure project consistency and success. Jointly responsible for the on-
time delivery and quality of user experience deliverables
Functioned in multiple roles: Interaction Design,  Visual  Design,  User Interface
Development
Provided graphic  support for multiple teams and participated in project discussions to
provide quick suggestions on design concepts and technical user interface concerns when
required.
Provided support for marketing collateral
It was at TSYS that I learnt to design effectively with a strict set of design guidelines.
April 2008   June 2010
Organization   Red Chilli Software Pvt. Ltd.
Location - Pune, India
Role   User Interface Designer and Developer
Designation   Graphic Designer
Overview -
Responsibilities included: Taking set of requirements, generate ideas,  wireframes,  and
graphical  prototypes,  and then work with a development team to build it
Experience of working in a leadership role,  where the designer is driving the earlier phases
of a project,  and in a passive role,  where the designer follows the lead of the engineers or
project managers
Worked on various project teams to build prototype user interface designs for usability
testing,  client review and sales demonstrations,  as well  as served as a knowledge resource
for the latest trends and technologies for web and standards-based user interface
development
Designed and developed interfaces for Web applications,  Dashboards, Mobile based
applications and provided graphic  support for multiple teams
It was at Red Chilli  that I  learnt to learn things fast and apply them effectively.
Project-wise
Enterprise applications for Banking and Financial services
HelpDesk systems
Booking systems
E-Learning systems
Kiosk based systems
Video Conferencing product
iPhone apps
High performance websites
Graphical prototypes for mobile-based portals
RIA Dashboards
RIA Data Visualization (charting)
Deliverable-wise
Task flows, User Journeys
Wireframes
Visual  Designs
High Fidelity semi-functional  prototypes for user and cross browser testing
Help and design documents (where ever applicable)
Flex skins and templates
Site maps
IT professional working  as System Analyst
5.4 yrs of coding  experience of development of web applications using custom developed  MVC
frameworks; Codeigniter,  Zend MVC framework
Experience  of working with PHP, MySQL, Smarty templates, JavaScript and CSS
Experience  of working with Wordpress/Thematic; beginners experience of working  with
Magento ecommerce  platform
Strong  understanding  of OOPs  concepts
Strong  understanding  of databases like  MySQL5.0
Professional exposure  of using  versioning  system like  Subversion(SVN),  CVS, GIT; bug
tracking  system like  Jira,  QC, project management system and  deployment service
Possesses good  cultural awareness and  client interaction experience
Awarded  as best trainee while  working  with Web Access India Pvt Ltd. (Year 2005 batch)
Organization : Cybage Software Pvt Ltd., Pune
Time Period : Jun 2010   Jan 2011
Designation : System Analyst
Role : Team Lead  (Leading  a team of 7)
Organization : Mediaglint (I) Pvt Ltd / Mediaglint LLC,  Pune
Time Period : Sept 2009   May 2010
Designation : Sr Software  Developer
Role : Developer
Organization : Rediff.com Pvt.  Ltd.,  Mumbai
Time Period : May 2008   Sept 2008
Designation : Sr Software  Engineer
Role : Development and  Product Enhancement
Organization : Web Access  (India) Pvt.  Ltd.,  Mumbai
Time Period : January 2005   April 2008
Designation : Sr Software  Developer
Role : Leading  team of 4
Project : Bluehornet
Organization : Cybage Software Pvt.  Ltd.
Client : Digital River-  Bluehornet, San Diego, CA
Domain : Email Marketing
Period : Jun 2010   Jan 2011
Team size : 10 (1 Project Manager + 1 Onsite  Coordinator + 1 Lead  + 7 Developers)
Platform : Linux
Development : Offshore
Technologies :
Core Technology : PHP 5
Web  Server : Apache
RDBMS : Oracle
Framework : Zend
Editor : Notepad++
Role : Team Lead
Project : Chessface online
Organization : Mediaglint LLC
Team size : 2 (1 developer and  1 designer)
Platform : Windows
Development : Offshore
Time Period : Oct, Nov, Dec  2009 (50days)  April 2010(In progress)
Technologies :
Core Technology : PHPIzabi (PHP, jQuery, HTML, CSS)
Web  Server : Apache
Editor : Codelobster
Role : Developer
Project : Target Centered Golf  http://www.mgstaging.com/targetcenteredgolf/
Organization : Mediaglint LLC
Team size : 2 (1 developer and  1 designer)
Platform : Windows
Development : Offshore
Time Period : Feb, March 2010 (33 days)
Technologies :
Core Technology : Wordpress/Thematic - PHP, jQuery, HTML, CSS
Web  Server : Apache
RDBMS : MySQL
Editor :
Codelobster
Role : Developer
Project : Athletes4U http://www.athletes4u.com
Organization : Mediaglint LLC
Team size : 8 (4 developers and 4 UI  designers)
Platform : Windows
Development : Offshore
Time Period : Dec  2009, Jan 2010(60days)
Technologies :
Core Technology : PHP, Java Script, Ajax, jQuery, HTML, CSS
Web  Server : Apache
RDBMS : MySQL
Editor :
Codelobster
Framework : Code Igniter
Role
: Developer
Project : Bertrand Custom Homes  http://www.bertrandhomes.com
Organization : Mediaglint LLC
Team size : 2 (1 developer and  1 designer)
Platform : Windows
Development : Offshore
Time Period : Oct 2009 (18 days)
Technologies :
Core Technology : Wordpress/Thematic - PHP, jQuery, HTML, CSS
Web  Server : Apache
RDBMS : MySQL
Editor : Notepad++
Role : Developer
Project : Keller William's  http://www.whykwev.com
Organization : Mediaglint LLC
Team size : 2 (1 developer and  1 designer)
Platform : Windows
Development : Offshore
Time Period : Sept 2009 (21 days)
Technologies :
Core Technology : Wordpress/Thematic - PHP, jQuery, HTML, CSS
Web  Server : Apache
RDBMS : MySQL
Editor : Codelobster
Role : Developer
Project : Rediff A ddMob Proxy for mobiles
Organization : Rediff.com Pvt.  Ltd.
Team size : 2 (1 leader and 1 developer)
Platform : Linux
Development : Offshore
Time Period : 30 days
Technologies :
Core Technology : PHP
Web  Server : Apache
Editor : Emacs
Role : Developer
Project : Airtel Customer Care Interface
Organization : Rediff.com Pvt.  Ltd.
Team size : 2 (1 leader and 1 developer)
Platform : Linux
Development : Offshore
Time Period : 30 days
Technologies :
Core Technology : PHP
Web  Server : Apache
RDBMS : Oracle
Editor : Emacs
Role : Developer
Project : Airtel Wireless  Broker Proxy
Organization : Rediff.com Pvt.  Ltd.
Team size : 2 (1 leader and 1 developer)
Platform : Linux
Development : Offshore
Time Period : 21 days
Technologies :
Core Technology : PHP
Web  Server : Apache
Editor : Emacs
Role : Developer
Project : Modifications t o Airtel Subscription Service
Organization : Rediff.com Pvt.  Ltd.
Team size : 2 (1 leader and 1 developer)
Platform : Linux
Development : Offshore
Time Period : 15 days
Technologies :
Core Technology : PHP
Web  Server : Apache
Editor : Emacs
Role : Developer
Project : QuestBridge
Organization : Web Access  (India) Pvt.  Ltd.
Client : Brenner, San Francisco, CA
Domain : Educational Services
Period : December 2005   September 2006
Team size : 5 (3 programmers and  2 designers)
Platform : Linux
Development : Offshore
Technologies :
Core Technology : PHP
Web  Server : Apache
RDBMS : MySQL
CMS : Drupal 5.X
Editor : Emacs
Role : Part of development team
Project : Kabissa  2.0
Organization : Web Access  (India) Pvt.  Ltd.
Client : Immediate  - Social Source  Foundation, San Francisco, CA
Actual - Kabissa, South Africa
Domain : Social Networking
Time Period : June  2007   October 2007
Team size : 5 (3 programmers and  2 designers)
Platform : Linux
Development : Onsite
Technologies :
Core Technology : PHP
Web  Server : Apache
RDBMS : MySQL
CMS : Drupal 5.X
Editor : Emacs
Role : Part of development team
Project : CiviCRM
Organization : Web Access  (India) Pvt.  Ltd.
Client : Social Source Foundation, San Francisco, CA
Domain : Relation Management
Period : January 2005   April 2008
Team size : 12 (12 Programmers including 1 Project Manager and  2 Leaders)
Platform : Linux
Development : Offshore
Technologies :
Core Technology : PHP
Web  Server : Apache
RDBMS : MySQL
CMS : Drupal 5.X, Joomla 1.0.X
Editor : Emacs
Role : Team Lead
Company: Aptara  Inc.
Aptara  specializes in  content  transformation,  offering  unparalleled  services in  the fields of learning  and
performance,  content migration,  publishing  and  information  technology services.
Designation: Sr.  Executive   International Business Development (July  2010-Present)
Lead Generation Activity:
Carrying  out web  based  research  in  US market.
Generating  leads through  email  campaigns.
Setting  appointments for Sales head.
Maintaining  and  updating  database as per different strategies.
Online vendor registration.
Pre-sales support:
Provide support to  the Sales Head  (SH) in  terms of detailed  web  based  research  of
prospects.
RFIs (Information  to  Client) and  RFPs (Proposal  to  Client)
Based  on  the inputs from the respective SH,  preparing  presentations,  web  links for
demos and  reports.
Helping  the concerned  SH prepare commercial  proposal for the solution  to  the
prospects
Coordinating  with  the SH and  Production  team  to  get answers on  the project  briefs
Helping  production  team to  understand  the client  business and  provide insight on  the
client's operations
Maintaining  proposal tracker for SH in  terms of Project details,  invoicing,  cost.
Management Information System:
Updating  and  maintaining  two  CRM systems (Ecosystem  and  Zoho)
Preparing  weekly  revenue recognition  report for the whole team and  forwarding  it  to
VP.
Preparing  monthly  recap  report  for the concerned  Sales Head.
Company: MarketsandMarkets (A division of IBN  Research)   A global market research  and
consulting  company.  The company publishes high-level strategically analyzed  reports for over ten
industry verticals and  serves as a  business intelligence partner to  Fortune 500  companies across the
world.
Designation: Business Development Executive.  (November 2009-July  2010)
To  tie up  and  develop  relationship  with top  100  channel  partners for distribution of premium
market research reports.
Reach out  to  prospective clients in USA and  UK to  achieve desired  targets through extensive
cold  calling.
To  develop  relationship  with the corporates   globally fortune 500  companies.
Maximize sales from  each channel  partner.
Handling  leads generated  through web  and  follow up  communication via  e-mail  and
telephonic discussion.
Identifying  target  markets,  extensive cold  calling,  negotiations,  solution selling.
Track  competitive landscape and  position IBN  accordingly.
Company: Trumount Cosmoceuticals   A cosmetic company based  in  Pune dealing  in  professional
skin  care products.
Designation: Techno-Marketing  Associate.  (May  2009-October2009)
Handling  sales and  marketing  as a  sales team leader.
Brand  building  & de signing  branding  collaterals.
Organizing  seminars & workshops.
Handling  complaints & ne gative responses.
Giving  technical  presentations.
Giving  inputs regarding  R & D  for future product line.
APPRENTICESHIP PROJECTS:
B.Tech Project: At  International  Flavours & Fragrances,  Mumbai,  in  the year 2006.
Title: Stability  study  of aroma chemicals in  cold  process soaps.
MBA Project: At Glosel  India Impex  Pvt.  Ltd.,  in  the year 2008.
Title: Market analysis of Hair Treatment  Products.
Database design, Property  system, Search
Property  from Google Base, Agent
Management System, News  Management
System.
Duration :  2.5 months
Team Size :  3.
Description : AskAgents.com connects  home buyers  and sellers  to the
top real estate agents  in the country. The real estate professionals  who are featured on our site
are not only  experts  in your local market, but they  have also proven themselves  to be some of
the highest producing and most successful agents  in the United States. Our website allows  you
to search homes  for sale, browse real estate listings, calculate your monthly  mortgage
payment, find the perfect real estate agent to help you, and then finance your dream home all
in one place!
4.
Doflix :
www.doflix.com.
Company :  Brainofast Technologies.
Technology :
PHP 5,My-sql,Jquery,HTML,CSS.
Role :
Software Engineer.
Responsibilities : Handling  design and  funcional issues, User
registration and  mail
functionality, maintain the
video functionality.
Duration :
2 Months.
Team Size :
4.
Description :  Doflix  is  the premier online entertainment destination
for guys  with over 18 million unique viewers  and 50 million page impressions  per month. Men
18-34 visit Doflix  for the best content online, viewing over 12 million videos  and 5 million picture
views  daily.doflix  is  more than a website - we are a cutting edge community  for guys  and the
content they  like, content made by  our viewers  for our viewers  combined with the best in
professional content.
5.
Crispytips :
www.crispytips.com
Company :Brainofast Technologies.
Technology : PHP 5, My-SQL, Html, CSS, Jquery, HTML,
CSS and JavaScript.
Role :
Software Engineer.
Responsibilities : Database design, User registration and
Login system, messaging  system.
Duration :  2Months.
Team Size :  3.
Description :
Share and discover the latest and the greatest
tips  from around the world.
6.
Redesing  Company Site :
www.puneitlabs.com
Company :PuneITLabs Pvt. Ltd  Pune.
Technology :
Joomla 1.5,PHP 5,My-sql,Jquery,HTML,CSS.
Role :
Software Engineer.
Creating template design and component and
modules.
Duration :
2 Months.
Team Size :  2.
7.
LiveDress :
www.livedress.com
Company :PuneITLabs Pvt. Ltd  Pune.
Technology : Codeigniter 1.6.0, PHP 4, My-sql, Html, Css,
Jquery, HTML, CSS and JavaScript.
Role :
Software Engineer.
Responsibilities : Work  on store registration, Handling
Design
Issues,Work on stores-shopper mail
System.
Duration :
5 Months.
Team Size :  4.
Description :  Livedress  allows  boutique retailers  to register
and connect with local shopper. They  can offer special deals, post blog, and keep shoppers
informed on what they're doing. Shoppers  can register on Livedress, browse through the local
retailers  and create a list of their favorite retailers. Whenever a retailer posts  something,
shoppers  see it on their homepage. Plus, shoppers  can connect with friends, comment on
stores, and share all their great deals.
8.
Kai Health Club Center :
http://puneitlab.com/cms_saudi/
Company :PuneITLabs Pvt. Ltd  Pune.
Technology :
Codeigniter 1.7.0, PHP 5, My-sql, Html, Css,
Jquery, HTML, CSS and JavaScript.
Role : Software Engineer.
Responsibilities : Work  on Member registration, Product
and
Subscription management,
Handling  Design
Issues,database design, implementing
business
Logic.
Duration :  3 Months.
Team Size :  4.
Description :
It is  club management system developed for Kai Club
Health Center in Saudi. System is  divided into number of different modules  such as  managing
membership, managing subscription, booking, access  control, employee management etc. in
this  system member can book  for different activities  through the booking module. User
(employee of club) can view vacant slots  using booking sheet.Member can also subscribe for
any  of these activities  through subscription module which can be rolled back. Access  control
system maintains  in and out time of member. Administrator can view all transaction
corresponding to booking, subscription, product sale and attendance system's  statistics  through
graphs.
Educational Projects :
With work  experience of 6 monthsin Servlet,Jsp,JDBC etc.
Name of Organization :  Abhinav  Infosol Pvt. Ltd.
Duration :  Jan 01, 2007 to June 01 ,2007 (6 months).
Technical Platform :  Servlet,Jsp,JavaBeans,MS-Sql 2000,HTML,
JavaScript,Weblogic  8.1.
Designation :  Trainee.
Team member: One.
Project Name  : Online Food Ordering Search.
Given System provides  facility  to customer to select area from where they  want to receive
order. User also selects  hotel, hotel's  menu etc. System will then display  bill, ask  for delivery
address, date-time, then system will forward detailed order to hotel by  mail. Also system
provides  facilities  to hotel owner add/remove their hotel's  menu item from its  menu list. System
also provides  facility  for viewing total month transaction to the hotel owner for financial analysis.
Responsibility: Software Programmer. Involved in analyzing and
understanding business  requirements  of system. Design of Database, Design of Servlet, JSP,
HTML/ JAVAScript, Creating JDBC Connection.
2.
Name : WinLinux.
Technical Platform : Core Java(AWT,Swing), Linux  Red Hat 9.
Year : 2005
Scope : This  application gives  the ease of windows  to Linux. This
application eases  the users  tasks  by  providing in depth
technical help about just every  aspect in project.
Applications  on Linux  can be launched by  our application.
3.
Name : System Viewer.
Technical Platform : C , Linux  Red Hat 9.
Year : 2006
Scope : This  application is  used to display  the system information
like hard disk, ram,process, mounted drives, swapped
space, users  & groups  etc.
4.
Name : Partition Detector.
Technical Platform : Core JAVA(AWT,Swing), Linux  Red Hat 9.
Year : 2006
Scope : This  is  information tool about Linux  partitions.
5.
Name : Global Tours  & Travels.
Technical Platform : C,C++ (DOS).
Year : 2005
Scope : This  application is  used for handling all transactions  of
traveling agency.
Currently working  as Sr Executive, International Business Development at Aptara Inc.
Worked  as a Demand Generation Executive  at QED  Baton from  August 2010 to
August 2011.
Worked  as Junior Draftsman with SVP Enterprises from July 2003 to Dec  2003.
Worked  as Enthusiastic  Campaigner (Marketing)  with Sphinx Adonis Venture  from July
2000 to Dec  2000.
Technical Environment:
O.S : Windows 95/98/XP.
Tools  :  Pro-Engineer Wildfire, Microstation-7, AutoCAD  14, AutoCAD-2000, Microsoft
Office.
Languages  : C, C++, VB 6.0
Project Name: Computer Aided  Progressive Die  Design
(Completed, Part as University Curriculum)
Duration : July 2009-April 2010.
Scope : We  have successfully created  a program in Visual Basic to stimulate  the die.
Various Formulae  are placed  in the program such that majority of the  press
components can be  designed  with little efforts from the designer
Role
Gathering  technical information from technical sources.
Leading  the  group.
Designing the parts of the Press.
Testing  and Simulating  the  Software for errors.
PROFFESSIONAL BACKGROUND
Company : Aptara New Media Inc.
Duration :  August  2011 to present.
Scope :  Executing  Email campaigns and  setting  up appointments with Sales Director.
Executing Email Campaigns: Preparing  my own database  with the  help  of
websites like hoovers, LinkedIn etc  across all verticals for the  designated  regions.
Sending  Emails to the  right persons from a set template.
Tracking Proposals: maintaining  a track of the  proposals being  sent and  reviewing
them weekly by interacting  with my designated  Sales Person.
Maintaining CRM and Sales  Tracker:  Responsibilities include  maintaining  the
CRM up  to date with the timely updates of the  amounts received from  a particular
project each month and  matching  the  same with the  sales tracker.
Creating Demos  and customized PPT's:  preparing  customized demos as well as
PPT's which were  required  by the  sales person on second  or subsequent calls to
showcase capabilities of Aptara.
Company : QED  Baton.
Client Name  : Impact Engineering  Solutions
Duration : August 2010   January 2011.
Scope : Interacting  with VP or Director level persons and setting up  appointments.
Client Interaction:  Dealing  with Impact Engineering  Solutions, a US  based  client
into the  Engineering  domain  - Direct interaction with the  VP Engineering  or
Director of Engineering. Keeping  client interaction till the  Servicing  Contract is
active. Regular interaction in regards to daily activities, leads generated and
closed, follow up  with existing  leads, internal and  external reviews.
Demand Generation:  Lending a helping hand  to the Client to get into new
business ventures. Calling and  analyzing potential prospects to convert into sales
and contracts.
Research:  Analyzing  potential prospects in regards to their profile, company,
role  played  in the  respective  vertical, opportunities for the  Client.
Company : QED  Baton.
Client Name  : Datamatics Global Services
Duration : January 2011 to May 2011
Client Interaction:  Dealing  with Datamatics Global Services, a Mumbai based
client into the  IT vertical  - Direct interaction with the  VP Technology, IT Directors
or CIO. Keeping  client interaction till the Servicing  Contract is active. Regular
interaction in regards to daily activities, leads generated  and closed, follow up
with existing leads, internal and external reviews.
Demand Generation:  Lending a helping hand  to the Client to get into new
business ventures. Calling and  analyzing potential prospects to convert into sales
and contracts.
Research:  Analyzing  potential prospects in regards to their profile, company,
role  played  in the  respective  vertical, opportunities for the  Client.
Company : QED  Baton.
Client Name  : MphasiS, A  HP company
Duration : June  2011 to August 2011
Client Interaction:  Dealing  with MphasiS, an HP company, a Bangalore based
client into the IT, ITES, BPO verticals  - Direct interaction with the VP Information
Security, IT Directors or Manager for Information Security. Selling  MphasiS
services into information security for the  Media, Communication and
Entertainment industries in the  entire  USA. Regular interaction in regards to daily
activities, leads generated  and closed, follow up  with existing  leads, internal and
external reviews.
Demand Generation:  Lending a helping hand  to the Client to get into new
business ventures. Calling and  analyzing potential prospects to convert into sales
and contracts.
Research:  Analyzing  potential prospects in regards to their profile, company,
role  played  in the  respective  vertical, opportunities for the  Client.
Company : SVP Enterprises.
Client Name  : Sandvik Asia Ltd. (PUNE)
Duration : July 2003-Sept 2003.
Tools  Used : Microstation-7 and  AutoCAD  2000.
Scope : Conversion of CAD  drawings to Microstation designs.
Role :
Conversation of drawing  sheets.
Scheduling  and  allocation of work.
Supervision of conversions made.
Updating  and assessing the work done.
Client Name: BLA Industries Ltd. (MUMBAI)
Duration: Sept 2003-Dec  2003.
Tools  Used: AutoCAD  2000.
Scope: Creating  drawings in AutoCAD.
Role:
Onsite  plant layout drawings.
Manufacturing  drawings of machines.
Reviewing  of the drawings.
Foreign Languages:
Japanese
German
Accountant
P&H Mi nePro  Services,  Mesa,  AZ
April  11-August 13
Tax  Support and  Service Representative
Intuit-TurboTax,  Tucson,  AZ
Nov 10-March11
Accounting/Tax  Provision Intern
Science Applications International Corporation  (SAIC),  San  Diego,  CA
Aug  07- June 10
Responsibilities/Projects at  P&H Mi nePro
Payroll  Duties
Perform  required  daily  payroll department  operations.
Manage workflow  to  ensure all  payroll  transactions are processed  accurately  and  in  a timely  manner
in  SAP.
Data entry  of employee records including  new  hires,  re-hires,  terminations.
Manual compute worked  hours and  process manual timekeeping  records.
Process request  for off cycle and  manual checks.
Reconcile payroll and  resolve issues prior to  transmission  and  validate confirmed  reports.
Process and  reconcile payroll on  a weekly  basis.
Research  and  resolve payroll  issues and  errors and  escalate where necessary.
Serve as payroll  contact for employees issues and  questions at all  levels.
Monitor employee inquiries via phone,  fax  or email.
Prepare and  distribute weekly  management labor utilization  reports and  other payroll related
reporting.
Accounts Payable Duties
Matching  invoices to  Purchase Orders: identifying  that every  item on  the invoice would  match
quantity,  unit price,  and  total  on  P.O.;  inform the Buyer to  adjust P.O.  or to  request Credit Memo  for
overcharges.
Reviewing  vendor's statements of account for past due invoices:  contacting  vendors to  request copy
of invoices or informing  them of invoice payment dates.  Generate reports to  show  paid  and  soon-to-
be paid  invoices.
Reviewing  non-Purchase Order invoices and  coding  them with  proper Cost  Element and  Cost Center
numbers.
Financial Analysis Duties:
Prepare annual cost  center budgets.
Forecast local  profit plans.
Support  the local leadership  team in  evaluating  current  and  future business opportunities.
Prepare the monthly  management book.
Provide support with  various finance and  accounting  processes as needed.
Supervise Accounting  Clerks with  Payroll  and  Accounts Payable Duties.
Responsibilities/Projects at  Intuit
Support  TurboTax  products via phone and  chat,  focusing  on  tax  related  questions,  data entry  and
navigation.
Provide accurate technical  solutions and  tax  advice to  TurboTax  customers during  tax  season.
Assist  TurboTax  customers in  preparing  Federal and  State Tax  Returns.
Perform  Tax  Research  for customers using  IRS publications as well  as the state tax  publications.
Responsibilities/Projects at  SAIC
Work  directly  with  the Manager and  Sr.  Manager of Tax  Reporting  and  International Accounting.
Utilize the SAP and  Costpoint  accounting  system as it relates to  tax  accounts for a company  with
more than  $10  billion  in  revenues.
Reconcile GL (General  Ledger) accounts including  tax  accounts and  trace the supporting  documents
to  the GL and  explain  differences.
Prepare and  post journal entries in  the accounting  system.
Prepare the GL account roll-forward  for SAIC and  Subsidiaries.
Communicate with  domestic and  international subsidiaries to  ensure timely  submission  of their tax
account reconciliation.
Train  interns for reconciling  tax  accounts and  preparing  the state blended  rate calculation.
COMPUTER/ACCOUNTING  SKILLS:
Proficient in  MS Office tools including  Word,  Excel,  Access (Creating/Accessing  Database),  and
PowerPointKnowledge of Accounting/Tax  Software:  SAP Financial,  Costpoint,  TurboTax,  and
TaxAct
Organization  : Stokota  India  Pvt. Ltd, Chakan
Project  Title : Marketing Research & Su rvey  of Tankers  and Trailer.
Project  Description: The project  is  to perform a broad assessment of
Trailer and Tanker segments,
within  the confines o f the commercial vehicle sector, considering the
impact  of five competitive forces of Supplier, customer, Competitor,
Technology and competitive products/likely  threats.
Duration : Two  months
Organisation: Amul India Limited.
Project Title:  Market  Research of Amuls  Products.
Project description:  The project  is to  perform on  Amul's  demand in  rural
and urban area  in  Nagpur. Amul is  a  well-known  brand in  India. They  are
manufacturing many  dairy  products  in  all over India.
How many  competitors  in Nagpur region.
Segmentation of Amuls different p roduct.
E.g. cheese, butter, ice-cream, ghee etc.
Duration :  Two month
Extra Curricular Activitie
Organiser of \u0022DISCOVER YOURSELF\u0022 programme in ISKCON temple.
NSS (National Services Schemes) volunteer since 2000-2002
Was  HandBall captain  at  inter college competition. 2002-2003
Was  arrange inter college games. 2002
Was  School's  Cultural progamme Incharge. 1999
Participated in  Dramatics  in School.1997
Belief: \u0022Possibilities exists every morning of our lives.\u0022
5+ years  of  successful business  development and sales  experience in both
domestic  and international  markets.
Sales  experience of three years  across  IT Sales  and Services,  Solutions  in the
domestic  & international  markets  into the ERP Sales  function.
Around two plus  years  of international sales  and work  experience in Energy
business, Food/ Retail  and Sports  and Amusement industries  in United Kingdome.
Corporate Sales  and Account Management  for high-end ERP software's  like SAP
and Oracle. Experience in managing large accounts.
Account management and consulting experience for domestic  clients  of Scottish
and Southern Electric  in energy  business  in United Kingdome.
Presales, sales  and administration experience in highly  diversified and challenging
environments.
Proven track  record on both academic  and at  employment. Academics  throughout
first class.
Manage sales  and after sales  services  on the retail outlets. (B2C)
Support sales  activities  and brand/offerings  promotion.
Successful in achieving the assigned quarterly  sales  target for consecutively  3 quarters.
(Over 110%)
Handle retail  operations  on daily  basis.
Conduct  market  research and competitor analysis  on regular basis.
Planning and executing business  strategies  for achieving monetary  and organizational
targets.
Execute centralized and local  promotions  of  the business.
Planning and executing the marketing campaigns  and business  merchandising for
promotions.
esume Nilesh Welde
Generating sales  reports  and presenting them to the management on weekly  basis.
Conducting training and product awareness  seminars  for the retail  staff.
Assisted the management  to introduce new software platforms  and initiatives  by
conducting training and workshops.
3.  Scottish and Southern Energy PLC.
London, United Kingdom  (Sept 08  Nov  09)
SSE Plc is  one of the leading British based energy  companies  in the UK and the country's
second largest energy  supplier. With more than 18,000 employees  and revenue of
21,550.4
million (2010), SSE is  the UK's  largest generator from renewable sources.
District Sales Manager-
Role:-
Front line sales  of energy  contracts  into south west,  and north region of  London city.
(B2C)
Planning and executing sales  strategies  with the team to achieve targets.
Managed Product  and field training for new  employees.
Managed team members  on the presentations  and sales  cycle function.
Account management  for energy  business  for domestic  clients.
Responsible for preparing the presentations  and sales  reports  to present to the higher
management.
4. Ivitesse Technologies Pvt. Ltd. Pune, India
(Aug  2006- June  2008)
Ivitesse Technologies  Pvt  Ltd. is  the IT arm of RSB Group,  one of India's  leading engineering
and automotive components  manufacturing entities.  The group,  with 6 manufacturing locations
in India along with one in US and Belgium, have turnover of  more than USD 200 millions. With
such rich domain and technical  expertise, Ivitesse offers  ERP implementation and IT solution
services  across  manufacturing and construction verticals.
Business Development Executive
Role:
Front line sales  of ERP solutions  like SAP and Oracle JDE to corporate and medium
sized manufacturing and construction companies.
Managed western India as  territory  for ERP implementation and services.
Prospect  qualification and requirement  gathering of  potential clients,  suggesting
solutions  matching the requirements.
Meeting prospective clients,  giving presentations,  understanding business  of clients  and
gathering information,  analyzing ERP requirements  for both Implementation and support
services  and pitching the company  offerings  accordingly.
Arranging and coordinating meetings  between technical team and the client.
Drafting proposals  as  per the requirements  of the client by  closely  working with delivery
team.
Account  management  with IT managers, CIO's  or CTO's  and Directors  of the client
organizations.
Planning and execution of the marketing strategies  for the domestic  as  well as
international market. (US, Middle east)
esume Nilesh Welde
Plan and conduct campaigns  to promote various  services  offered by  Ivitesse
Technologies.
Account  & Sales  Pipeline tracking.
Major Account wins on Oracle JD Edwards's ERP
Dee Tee Industries  Ltd, Supernova Engineers  Ltd, High Technology  Plastic  Ltd,
Greaves  Cotton Limited.
Major Account wins on SAP ERP
Vascon Engineering Ltd, PMT Machine Tools  Ltd, Grupo Antolino Ltd.
BI  Industries  Ltd.
An  MBA  with  sound  understanding  of  various Management concepts to  be utilized  in  any
organization.
A team member  with  strong  interpersonal,  analytical skills,  and  leadership  skills
Assets
Good  Listener  and  Quick  Learner  with  Strong  Interpersonal and  Analytical Skills.
Manage Time efficiently  and  effectively  through  scheduling  and  prioritizing.
Enjoy  working  in  a multi-cultural,  fast paced  and  simulating  environment.
Chronology  of  Employment
Working  as Senior  Associate - Regulatory  Reporting  on  US GAAP XBRL Fillings in  Sungard
Global Services Ltd,  Pune.  (Since From 5th April 2011).
Worked  as Financial Analyst for  client in  Investment Bank  with  E-Clerx  Services Ltd.  (Since
From 25th May  2010  to  01st April 2011).
Worked  as Insurance Advisor  with  Reliance Life Insurance Co.  Ltd  (From June 2007  To
March  2010).
Present  Company  :
Organization : Sungard  Global Services,  Pune
Designation : Senior  Associate -  Regulatory  Reporting
Process (Dept.) : XBRL Fillings.
Duration : From 5th April 2011    Till Date.
Current status:
Aug'09-Till Date: I-Link  Infosoft  Guj  Pvt.Ltd,  Ahmedabad
Designation: Jr.  S/W Developer
.  I have gained  working  experience in  the following  areas:
Working  in  .Net  Framework  3.5  ,  Visual studio  2008  including  latest  technology,
Asp.net and  Desktop  Application
Sql  server 2008,  Sql  server 2005
(As Jr.  Software Developer in I-link InfoSoft (Guj) Pvt.  Ltd at  GNFC Info  Tower,  S.G.
highway  (http://www.i-link.co.in) from 17th Aug'09 to  running  now.  Platform for Working  are
DotNet 3.5/3.0/2.0  (Asp.Net,  C#.Net),  Sql  Server 2008/2005/2000,  CMS based architecture.)
Currently Working  in Immply India  Pvt.  Ltd.  (Immply.com), Pune  as a Team
Leader since Nov-2007 to till date.
Worked  in Blue Valley Technology (bluevalley-inc.com), Aurangabad  as a
Web Developer from Nov-2006 to Nov-2007.
Worked  in Arun Infotech Software & System Development
(aruninfotech.co.in), Pune, for 1 year as a Software Programmer/
Developer.
Gridlogics  Technologies  Pvt Ltd,  Pune
A pioneering  end-to-end  intellectual property  software solutions  provider whose solutions use proprietary  and  cutting
edge text mining  and  visualization  capabilities to  aid  R&D and  Corporate strategy.
Business Development Associate,  July  2011  - Present
Part of a team of 3  sales professionals  responsible for handling  the sales  of US market of Patent iNSIGHT Pro  - an
industry  leader in  patent analysis software.
Exposure to  complete Sales cycle   Prospect research  and  profiling  in  CRM,  Cold  calling  for bringing  prospect to
product demonstration  stage,  Proof Of Concept Creation,  Product Demonstration,  Price Negotiation,  Invoice
Generation  and  Client Servicing.
Giving  Product demonstrations and  training  to  prospects  like Technology  Directors,  Intellectual Property  Scientists,
Strategic Innovation  Directors,  R&D Heads,  etc.
Coordinating  with  technical team & the sales support team to  handle client requirements and  feedbacks.
Accountable to  the Director of the company.
Involved  in  marketing  strategy  of upcoming  software product.
Conducted  online training  workshop  (10  participants) to  an  existing  client for up  selling  of the software product.
Associate Pre Sales/ Business Analyst   March 2010    June 2011  (1  year 4  months)
Conducting  prospect research and  profiling o f potential companies for US market.
Lead  Generation via telemarketing and  bringing  prospects to demonstration stage.
Product Demonstration  to  prospects.
Capable of handling  Pre-sales activities including  collateral such  as presentations,  webinars,  tutorials,  whitepapers,
blog,  responding  to  RFI/RFP/RFQ.
Conducting  training  sessions to  the existing  clients.
Analyzed  Patents to  generate competitive intelligence through  maps and  landscapes as  part of proof creation  for
demonstration  of the product to  the prospects.
1)Designed and developed Web Service.
2) Design  Rdlc Report.
3) Designed and developed web
interface.
Duration July  2010-Till Date
1) Design  and developed Data  Model and
Data  Access.
2) Designed and developed Web
Interface.
3) Analysis, Design, coding and support of
system
Project Description:
Follett Higher Education  Group  is seeking to  expand  its book rental
footprint in
USA and  Canada. To achieve this objective, FHEG  has entered strategic
business  relationship  with www.bookrenter.com,
www.nationalrental.com,to be its preferred  fulfilment agency. The
fulfilment will be handled by FHEG's RG1  [River Grove] warehouse.  PAD
manages and monitors  the back office operations of this business
relationship.  This  covers managing the  complete fulfilment process
[from  shipping through  returns], reconciliation of all RG1  and
www.bookrenter.com activities,  invoicing  BR.com, FA commissions and
FHEG-BR accounting transactions.
This  project contains  Web Interfaces , Web
services  ,Window services  ,ftp communication  logic.
Web based application
Ability  to fetch data  and convert to  required format
On  the fly conversion of reports  to PDF.
Technical Description:
Jquery,  JavaScript and Ajax  are used for UI development.
Application  log maintained using log4net.
Sql tuning was  used for increase the speed of application.
Window service for sending emails  at  regular intervals
Windows  scheduler to  schedule exe of parsing data.
Report  generation is  done using RDL and RDLC.
Title :  FHEG  -Vendor Portal
Environment C#, ASP.NET 4.0, CSS Oracle 10g,Rdlc  (SSRS
) Server and client, JQuery.
Company Interface Infosoft Solutions  Pvt. Ltd.
Responsibilities 1) Design  and developed Data  Model and
Data  Access.
2) Designed and developed Web
Interface.
3) Analysis, Design, coding and support of
system
Since 17 Oct 2011 to till date
Associate Software Engineer
Digital Group InfoTech Pvt Ltd,  Hinjewadi,  Pune
Since 2 Aug 2010 to 12 Oct 2011
Software Programmer
Edreamz Technologies,  Pune
17 Months  of experience  in software  development.
Having  good experience  in developing  application with strengths in Microsoft technologies
(  working  knowledge  of ASP.NET,C#.NET,VB.Net ,  SQL Server 2008 & SharePoint 2010
Basic )
Having  good experience in developing mobile  application with MVC3,  Jquery & Mobile
Jquery.
Organization: IGB System, Pune.
Duration: Dec  2009 to 30th Nov 2010
Designation: Jr. Software Developer.
Organization: Sahir Projects, Pune.
Duration: 1st Dec  2010 to Till Date
Designation: Jr. Software Developer.
Currently Employee  of the  Sahir Projects provides integrated  solutions in the
fields.
Database  designed  and  developed  and wrote stored  procedures for SQL Server.
Developed  the  web service using  C#.Net.
Developed  Windows Scheduler and Windows even log  writing.
Creating  SSIS  Package  for transferring  data.
Handling  data synchronization using  web  service and  multithreading.
Junior developer on .Net technologies for client/server and  web  application.
Installation and  setup  of existing  website  and  database on client machine.
Database  administration DBA and  writing SQL queries and  stored procedures for
SQL Server 2008, daily backups, testing  backups etc.
2) Tolani Examination System (TOLEX)
Technologies: ASP.Net with C#.
Back End  : SQL Server 2005.
Duration: 9 Months. (March 2010 to Nov 2010)
Team Size: 7 Members
Junior developer on .Net technologies for client/server and  web  application.
Wrote  stored  procedures for SQL Server.
Developed  windows application role  as designing  and coding.
Installation and  setup  of existing  website  and  database on client machine.
3) Feedback  Management System (TOFEB)
Technologies: ASP.Net with C#.
Back End: SQL Server 2000.
Duration: 3 Months. (Jan 2010 to March 2010)
Team Size: 5 Members
Documentation and  UML using  Visio.
HTML tabular reporting.
QED Enabled Services  Pvt. Ltd
www.qedbaton.com
Since June 2007- Till Date:
Research Analyst
A part of QED Enabled Services  Private Ltd., QEDbaton provides  integrated demand generation services  to
global technology  companies. Since 2004, QEDbaton has  worked with more than 70 technology  companies
assisting them with their new market penetration strategies  across  the geographies  of US, UK, Europe, APAC,
Middle East and Australia. With delivery  centres  based out of India, QED Baton has  representative offices
across  the US and Europe.
Responsibilities Handled:
Conducting secondary  market research for preparing reports  comprising of the market trends.
Coordinating with In-House Lead Generation team and providing them with needed Market Intelligence
by  generating database level reports.
Preparing various  Databases  for lead generation campaigns  in North America, Europe& UK regions.
Gathering market & competitive intelligence using internal and external research sources  such as
Jigsaw, Hoovers, Linkedin, Fundoodata etc.
Generation of right party  contact details, to which the client can pitch in its  Solutions  and Services.
Updating, Building & Managing central repository  of data for the organization.
Handling EDM (Direct email marketing) tool for the organization and generating the reports  of the
marketing campaigns.
Creating simple HTML templates  for email marketing campaigns.
Generating daily  floor reports  using CRM and representing the same in MS Excel.
Hewlett-Packard (HP)
Global  eBusiness Services,  Bangalore
Period:  July  2006    Till  Date
Assistant Manager   Pre Sales & Customer Management Team
(July'13  till date)
Managing  the Pre sales team  (40  member team) working  on  Siebel & Sales force.com (SFDC)
Process Management
Manages process performance and  reviews Metrics and  Operations SLA/KPI
regularly
Identifies Focus Areas/Pain  Areas and  develop  Process improvement plans.
Integrated  3  different processes into  one End  to  End  process enabling  a single
customer reach  point  for all  queries/issues irrespective of regions   APJ,
EMEA,AMS and  South  Pacific (AU & NZ)
Focuses on  continuous process improvements and  identifies project opportunities
to  enhance the process efficiency
Actively  contributing  to  a critical project  on
Metrics Standardization  across
various operation  centers
Conducts VSM workshops to  identify  and  eliminate Non  Value Added  activities
Client Management
Conducts Monthly  Governance Meetings with  clients to  discuss process
performance and  to  identify  opportunities for improvements
Conducts regular one to  one meetings and  feedback  surveys with  clients to
understand  their expectations/  requirements and  to  identify  focus areas for the
upcoming  months.
People & Talent Management
Sets Goals and  monitor employee performance through  monthly  reviews
Conducts appraisals and  recommends promotions & salary  grade changes
Guides and  mentors direct reports to  develop  their respective career progression
plans based  on  employee interests and  required  skill sets
Forecasts potential attrition  and  takes steps to  retain  and  maintain  minimum
attrition  levels
Manages employee conflicts and  issues when  required
Financial Management
Manages Budget HC & Cost  to  target
Team Leader   Financial Claims & Incentive Payments
(April'10    June'13)
Handled  a team  strength  of 24    The team  handled  financial  claims and  incentive
payments to  the customers using  SAP
Monitored  metrics,  KPIs,  Sigma rating  & CAPA for the team and  published  Performance
Dashboards to  the senior management and  customers on  time.
Conducted  production  planning  for the team  by  work  allocation/distribution  and  ensuring
completion  within  specified  SLA
Participated  in  governance calls with  customer to  review  process performance
Ensured  that  all process related  documentation  complied  to  ISO  requirements
Drove FMEA for the process to  identify  risks and  to  take preventive actions
Analyzed  Volume,  Value and  Business drivers for the team
Streamlined  the process by  system  migration  and  process changes
Motivated  and  drove the team  to  work  on  process improvements
Worked  closely  with  the team to  identify  their talent  and  to  bring  out their best
Initiated  Employee Engagement activities within  the team
Actively  participated  in  several  CSR activities
Senior Financial/Process Associate   India  Financial  Claims
(April'08    March'10)
Worked  as a Subject Matter Expert  responsible for preparing/making  changes to  process
documentation
As an  SME,  coached,  mentored,  assessed  and  certified  new joiners on  the processes.
Launched  rebate programs for the channel partners and  distributors of India consisting
around  20,000  partners
Was part  of process transition  wherein  the streamlining  of the process was done with
automation
Worked  with  all  the category  and  product managers for the program launch  queries and
requests
Worked  on  various Quality  Checks in  the Process to  make sure the payments were
reaching  the customers on  time and  without errors
Reported  process issues on  time to  ensure that the issues are resolved  immediately
Financial/Process Associate   APJ  Payments
(July'06    March'08)
Supported  customers across Asia-pacific to  make rebate payments based  on  financial
claims made by  the customer
Reconciliation  of HP accounts in  collaboration  with  Finance team  to  make sure the ledger
accounts are clear
Significant Achievements:
Played  instrumental  role in  2  customer six  sigma black  belt projects
Received  customer champion  award  from APJ Vice President for Lean  process
improvement  which  resulted  in  460hrs of savings per month  for processing
Worked  on  a process automation  which  resulted  in  saving  4  Head  count
Successfully  Transitioned  India Financial  Claims process
Received  Best  Production  lead  award
Received  awards from  customers for streamlining  the process
5times Performance award  winner
Operational Excellence award
Auditing & Assurance Service:
Preparation of Audit Program,  Vouching,  Ledger Scrutiny,
Stock Verification, Valuation of Stores & Spares,  Raw
materials,  Finished goods, Investments etc.
Cash and Bank vouching,  Purchase and Sales Ledger.
Scrutiny of various ledgers i.e. Cash Book,  Bank Book and
Journal Register.
Lead the Assignments of Statutory  Audit and Stock Audit.
Finalizations of Books of accounts of Companies,
Partnership Firms & Individuals.
Individually and as a part of Audit Group conducted audit
under Indian Accounting Standards,  finalisations and
preparation of reports of Companies, Firms and Charitable
Trusts
Assisted in Finalization of accounts of corporate in various
sectors such as Chemicals,  Banking and Engineering.
Verifying that advances to suppliers are as per norms
agreed by the management.
Checking proper deduction and payment of statutory  dues
like Excise,  TDS, PF, ESI,  and Service Tax & VAT.
Individually and as a part of Accounting Group prepared
financial statements i.e.  Balance sheet,  Profit and Loss
Accounts,  Capital Accounts,  Cash Flow.
Verification of Fixed assets register and depreciation there
on.
Tax Audit & Consultancy :
Exposure in Preparation and filing of Income tax Returns of
individuals, partnership firms including their partners and
corporations.
Advance Tax working, TDS compliance.
Certifications and Opinions.
Strong interpersonal skills that have been put to  good use while resolving crisis situations.
Recognised as an active participant in various cultural activities organised at the College and School Level.
Determined & patient individual with good written & verbal communications skills; ability to learn new concepts
quickly and utilise same in productive manner.
A quick learner with the ability to work in the team; a  positive thinker with focus on seamless flow of day to day
operations.
This position  is responsible for  Enterprise B2B  IT sales lead  generation  for  TSL's clients.
Making  sales lead  generation  calls to  senior  executives (CIO / CTO/ CEO / VP IT) in
end
user organizations in  North  America.
Selling  IT products and  searching  business opportunities for  IT companies in  US in  the
North  American  market.
Having  strong  product knowledge of various IT Products and  latest technologies.
Understanding  the IT environment in  target organizations.
Knowledge of using  MS office tools and  other  communication  softwares such  as Zoho
CRM,
Linkedin,  Jigsaw,  etc.
Reporting  weekly  progress of  the campaign  to  the respective clients.
Meeting  weekly/ monthly  targets
This position  was responsible for  connecting  the RSs to  the central server  of HUL
Implementing  ERP of  HUL on  the computers of  their stockiest.
Loading  all the business into  the ERP.
Training  RS,  operators and  TSIs to  how operate the application.
Troubleshooting  in  case if  any  problem arises after implementation.
Result oriented professional having Three years experience in the field of software (Web) development.
Currently associated with GMI an  Idhasoft Company, Pune from April '2011 As Software Engineer
Strong abilities in design and development of web, client server applications in PHP.
Good communication, collaboration & team building skills with proficiency at grasping new  technical concepts quickly and
utilize the same in a  productive manner
t-logic  system Duration:  Feb-2009 to Sep-2010
ASHORE SYSTEM  PVT.LTD Duration: Oct-2010 to  April-2011
GMI AN IDHASOFT COMPANY Duration: April-2011 to  till date
Technical Skill Set
Operating System :  Windows 2000/Xp
Internet Programming : PHP5.0x, JavaScript, HTML, CSS, AJAX, XML
Frameworks :  CodeIgniter, Symfony, Smarty, Expression  Engine
Database Technologies : Postgresql, My SQL, EZ-SQL
Payment Gateways : PayPal, PayPal Pro, PayPal IPN,  Icepay, MoneyBooker, Sagepay

Develop coder for web technology in Symfony.
Develop API's for interacting with UI and Web Services.
Code review and unit testing.
MONTACTS Duration: April-2011 to  Aug-2011
Team Size: 3 Role:  Software developer
Technologies:  PHP(Symfony), JavaScript, JQuery, Ajax
Scope: It is a clone of Face book,  having functionality to  track your friends.  User can upload there video, audio, can share
links and add status.
Develop coder for web technology in Symfony.
Develop API's for interacting with UI and Web Services.
Code review and unit testing.
Sinclus Duration: Aug-2011 to  till date
Team Size: 4 Role: Software developer
Technologies:  PHP(Symfony), JavaScript, JQuery, Ajax
Scope: This is job portal site where admin user can create resume and frontend user (Agency) can search them and can
send email, SMS or Contact respective user.
Develop coder for web technology in Symfony.
Code review and unit testing.
HHE (Historic House Explorer)  Duration:  Dec-2010 to March-2011
Team Size: 2 Role:  Software developer
Technologies:  PHP (Codeiniter), JavaScript, JQuery, Ajax
Scope: This is E-Learning site for school children developed under USA government.
Develop coder for web technology in CodeIgniter.
Code review and unit testing.
Creating DB schema  and relations in MySql.
Exercise expert Duration: Oct-201o  to  Dec-2010
Team Size: 2 Role:  Software developer
Technologies:  Core PHP, JavaScript, JQuery, Ajax
Scope: This site is for online health and fitness training. Site admin can add various videos, courses and registered user
can download them and can review courses.
Develop coder for web technology in Core PHP.
Code review and unit testing.
Implementing Sagepay payment gateway.
Bid2Battle Duration:  March-2010 to  Oct-2010
Team Size: 4 Role: Software developer
Technologies:  Core PHP, JavaScript, JQuery, Ajax,  JSON
Scope: This is Auction site where admin can add products with category from backend and user can place bid on them
and can win those products.
Develop coder for web technology in Core PHP.
Code review and unit testing.
Implementing PayPal payment gateway.
F  0
D  8
Responsible for  Lead  Generation  into  North  America
F  0
D  8
Develop  and  maintain  accurate and  detailed  customer  and  prospect account information.
Initiate the sales cycle by  contacting  and  targeting  prospective clients by  means of email
marketing  & cold  calling  and  responsible for all initial communication  with  the
prospective clients.
Responsible for  doing  research  and  analysis on  the IT Industry  to  know the current
market trends and  the company's in  need  of  our  service offerings.
Create database through  different search  engines.  Find  out detailed  information  about
these companies before targeting.
Follow up  with  Potential Clients.
Datamatics Financial Services Limited.
Location: Mumbai
Date Joined:  May  2011  to  Sept.  2011
Designation:  Business Development Executive
F  0
D  8
Responsible for  International sales & business development for United  States
F  0
D  8
Cold  calling  for  leads generation.
Build  a lead  pipeline of  qualified  prospects
F  0
D  8
Interact with  C  -level executives for  business and  sales opportunities
F  0
D  8
Assisting  in  preparing  commercial proposals,  sales / business collaterals
F  0
D  8
Campaign  driven  outbound  cold  calling  and  referencing  for  lead  generation
F  0
D  8
Fixing  up  meetings and  teleconference calls with  potential clients
F  0
D  8
Effectively  manage the existing  accounts to  ensure increasing  business
Smarte Solutions Pvt.  Ltd
Location: Mumbai
Date Joined: June 2010  to  Dec.  2010
Designation: Market Research  Analyst
F  0
D  8
Building  database as per client's specification
F  0
D  8
Worked  with  operations team for  enriching  the database
F  0
D  8
Responsible for  searching  contact details of  various industries.
F  0
D  8
Quality  check  of the recorded  database
Finding  and  recording  exact contact details i.e.  company  name,  executive name,
designation,  location,  phone number,  email address,  et al.
Maintaining  the databases for  client's up  selling  of products and  services.
I  am working with \u0022SoftDEL Systems Ltd.\u0022 as Business Development Specialist
I  have last 5 years a Successful enterprise business development experience in selling  large IT
services opportunities with primary focus on Business-IT alignment, IT Strategy, Analyst Relations,
Lead  generation, Lead  Nurturing, Depth profiling   of Prospects, Market Intelligence, Building
collateral and  consulting  for PES  (Centre  of Excellence), Manufacturing, E-Learning  and  IT
verticals.
A Business Development Professional with fair and  varied  experience  in providing
integrated  business solutions with emphasis on Industry Analysis, strategic  planning,
account management and  on-time delivery for commercial segments like  Manufacturing,
Finance, Education & Heal th.
Over 5 Years experience  in dealing  with US, Canada, UK clients. Have hands on exposure
in web-based applications research and  Pre-sales activities that includes developing  and
implementing  marketing  strategies, finding   and  progressing  sales opportunities,
negotiating  and  closing  business deals.
A professional with fair planning  & Optimization, Strategy & change consulting, IT
Strategy, Business Development specialist   Preparing  RFP and  RFI, market Research and
analysis, Market spanning across various verticals and  domain, Lead  generation and
Building  of Domain, Information Management including  Knowledge  Management, Presales
and Outsourcing  potential assessment and  Outsourcing  strategy, Lead  generation through
various International Conferences and  roadmap
BUSINESS  DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST
SoftDELSystems  Ltd. (http://www.softdel.com) July 10-  Till
date
Mapping  UK/US  markets, capturing  market intelligence  and  defining the target market for
SoftDEL's service  line.
Profiling companies across industries based  on revenue, employee  strength, vertical etc.
and defining  target companies.
Research various sources as well as identify and  qualify opportunities through strategic
relationships with the  client
Discovering Right Party Contacts in target companies, ability to develop  CXO level
relationships and  lead  strategic  initiatives with Clients.
Mapping  Industrial Automation Environment of the  target companies.
Converting  the  right business opportunity/lead to an appointment for SoftDEL Systems.
Writing  Proposals RFP, ROI  based  on the inputs received  from BD  team...
Specialties:
Analyst Relations,  Lead Generation,  Lead Nurturing,  Depth Profiling of  Prospects,
Market Intelligence,  Building  collateral
BUSINESS  DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST
Patni Computer Systems Ltd. (http://www.patni.com) Aug
08-  July 10
Pre-sales
Company Profiling
F  0  E  0
Studying and analyzing the business  needs  of clients  and prospects,
including
conducting market research
Company specific Research
F  0  E  0
Analysis  of company's  products  and services  with the objective to
develop software application that will enable clients  to compete effectively  in the global markets
Identification of  business  opportunities
F  0  E  0
Perform market research study  competitor's
offerings,
compare marketing strategies, key  product features  and suggest improvisation and upgrades
Lead Generating  and Profiling
F  0  E  0
Generating  the  Leads and  profiling c ompanies as Hot
prospective, Warm perspective, cold perspective and  Dead  prospective.
Emails  and cold calling
F  0  E  0
communication with clients through emails and  cold calling.
Conference calls to identify needs and suggest approach
F  0  E  0
Fix up Conference  calls
for Product Engineering  services & pr oduct and  identifying  the  exact requirements of the
client
BUSINESS  DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST
Brainvisa  Tech.  Pvt.  Ltd. (http://www.brainvisa.com) July 07-
July 08
Pre-sales
Company Profiling
F  0  E  0
Studying and analyzing the business  needs  of clients  and prospects,
including
conducting market research Business Development
Company specific Research
F  0  E  0
Analysis  of company's  products  and services  with the objective to
develop software application that will enable clients  to compete effectively  in the global markets
Identification of  business  opportunities
F  0  E  0
Perform market research study  competitor's
offerings,
compare marketing strategies, key  product features  and suggest improvisation and upgrades
Lead Generating  and Profiling
F  0  E  0
Generating  the  Leads and  profiling c ompanies as Hot
prospective, Warm perspective, cold perspective and  Dead  prospective.
Emails  and cold calling
F  0  E  0
communication with clients through emails and  cold calling.
Conference calls to identify needs and suggest approach
F  0  E  0
Fix up Conference  calls
for Microsoft Sharepoint services, product and  identifying the exact requirements of the
client
Business  Proposals
F  0  E  0
Writing Proposals based  on the inputs received from BD  team...
MANAGEMENT TRAINEE
India Infoline securities  Pvt.Ltd.
(http://www.indiainfoline.com) Dec06
July 07
Business  Development: Accounts development by identifying  business problems and
designing  solutions with a hidden motive  of making Prospects to Accounts. Deliverables
include  Designing  and  analyzing Survey questionnaires to know the business problems,
Research on web-applications (e-commerce  etc...)  to suggest the  solutions, and  Writing
Proposals
Business  Analysis: Identified   requirements in the context of helping  organizations to
achieve strategic  goals through organization's information systems, capabilities and
processes
Deliverables include  Analyzing, Documenting (Business Requirements
Document   BRD), Communicating  and Assessing (Functional Testing) the  identified
requirements.
Project Coordination:  Prepared  Project Plan and  had  a continuous watch (review)  on
planned  and  actual Schedules, efforts and  costs. Arranged  client meetings to resolve
critical and  other business issues, and  also managed  a development team. Actively
involved  in Functional Testing  of the Application and  updating  the observations onto Test
Log.
Customized Business Solution: The  range  of solutions I've  effectively involved  in
developing  and  customizing  includes CMS  (Content Management System), Project
Management Tool (PMT)  and  Work order tracking  System
Team Building and Facilitation:  Actively involved  in training  and  motivation of
employees for target achievement and compliance  with performance  parameters.
REAL-TIME\u005CINTERNSHIP EXPERIENCE
1.  SynfoSys Business  Solutions  Ltd
(http://www.synfosys.com)
Jan   April2005
Project Title: Business  Development at SynfoSys
Description:
The  objective is to develop  domestic  clients for the  company which is into offshore   and
onsite  project development
Explored  and  identified   potential companies who can outsource  their software  product/
Project development
Prepared  a contact's database  of those  potential companies capturing the lead summary
Called  the  identified   companies, fixed   the  appointment with the  respective  team and
Pitching  across with an objective  of finding t he  possibilities of alliances
Preparing  the  minutes and  updating the same  to the  Director
2.  Hutch
(http://www.hutch.co.in)
Oct   Nov.2005
Project:  Hutch Summer Privileges
Axa  Business Services Nov 2005    till  Date
Specialist/ANZ
(Australia  & New Zealand) An  Insurance Process dealing  with  Backend  Operations for
Australian  and  New Zealand  Customers.  Process Included  New Business,  Maintenance,
Withdrawals and  Contributions.
Responsible for End to End management of Insurance
Driving Process Improvement Ideas through effective streamlining
Process SLA and Quality Management
Managing account opening ,co settlement rate and Settlement TAT via
calls and post
Reports , Analysis, Improvements and implementation for reduction of
cycle time for efficient production
Identify, streamline & automate process for effectiveness & efficiency
Quality checks for each individual & to provide adequate support to
bottom quartile performers
Conducting team meetings.
Motivating the team through weekly/  monthly team building activities
to improve  retention
Authorizing payments for large claims
Ensuring accreditation and cross training
An  enthusiastic,  dedicated  and  result driven  individual with  highly  successful
background  in  computer  applications and  programming  languages.  I  am capable of
working  under  pressure and  managing  high  workloads with  milestones achieved  in
cost savings and  improved  customer  services.  Continually  worked  according  to  Key
Performance Indicators (KPI) and  achieved  Service Level Agreements (SLA)
outcomes.  I possess excellent customer  service,  communication  and  interpersonal
skills,  appreciated  for  negotiating  skills.
Trainee Manager (Dec2008-June2011)
Royal Victoria  Infirmary  Hospital,  Newcastle upon Tyne (NHS)
Key  member  of IT Projects Team within  Operational Services
Coordinating  with  Sales & Service Team
Researching  new market,  Dealing  with  International Clients
Cross-functional analysis to  improve IT functionality
Key  team member  providing  full support for  strategic analysis,  Budgeting  and
Forecasting
Managing  Management Information  System (MIS)
Managing  NHS Supply  Chain,  Resource planning  and  service processes using
MS CRM Dynamics
Risk  assessment,  Project Management and  SDLC
Handling  huge amount of  analytical and  logical data
Providing  full support to  line manager  for business case development
Proven  ability  working  with  other  departments exploring  new ways to
improve service deliverables achieving  organisational excellence
Developing  and  implementing  software applications
Creating  Crystal Reports and  Exporting  into  Excel
Analysing  business activities and  creating  market survey
Configuring  switches,  routers,  firewalls,  VPN devices and  Wireless equipment
Education and Qualification
Advanced Diploma  in Computer Science (Dec2008-Jan2010).  Topics:
Project Management,  Research  in  IT,  Enterprise System and  Business
Infrastructure,  Strategy  Analysis.
Post  Graduate Diploma  in Computer Science (2007-2008).  Topics:
Research  & Study  Methods,  System Architecture,  Systems Security,
Introduction  to  E-Commerce.
Bachelors in Computer Science and Engineering  (2003-2006).  Topics:
Computer networks,  Database Management & Warehousing,  Control
Systems,  Signal & Systems.
Diploma  in Computer Engineering  (2000-2003).  Topics: Oracle,  Java,
C,  C++.
Project Management,  Risk  Analysis,  Presentation  and  Communication  Skills.
Software  Professional with 1.4 yr of experience  in development of Web  based Application
Using  Asp.Net,  C#.  Net & Sqlserver 2005.
Application Support Engineer with 12  months of Experience in Application &
Network on Client Location.
Good communication, interpersonal,  analytical  and problem solving skills
Effective Team Player and an individual contributor with steep learning curve.
Master of Computer Application from Priyadarshini College  of Engg. From  R.T.M. University
Nagpur, in 2008.
B.Sc  (Math's) from Govt P.G.  College Seoni,  R.D.V.V.  Jabalpur, in 2005.
HSC from Board  of Secondary Education (M.P.)  Bhopal, in 2001.
SSC from Board  of Secondary Education (M.P.) Bhopal, in 1999.
Since Sep '11 to Till Date As  a Software Engineer(Dotnet) in Acuvate Software Pvt
Ltd (On Client Location-Suzlon Energy Ltd,Pune).
Since May `10  to May `11 As  a  Software Developer(Dotnet) in \u0022Heaven Techno
System\u0022 (12 months).
Since May '09 to May '10 As a  FMS  Engineer in \u0022Allied Digital Services Ltd.\u0022(12
months).
PROJECT SUMMARY
#1  Project
Project Title  :  -  EQD
Technology :  - Asp.net and  Oracle
Client : - Suzlon Energy Ltd.
Job Profile :  - Working as  a Software Engineer on Project of Suzlon Energy Ltd,Pune.
Roles and responsibility to develop the web application using Asp.net and
Oracle.
#2  Project
Project Title  :  -  Document Management System.
Technology :  - Asp.net and  Sql server 2005
Description :  -  This application belongs to the  insurance  firm t hat contains information about the
customers and  which policy has been taken by customer. and  maintaining  the document of the
customers.
3# Project
Project Title :  -  Marketting Management system
Technology :  - C#.net and Sql server 2005
Description :- This project based on marketing companies.  It contains all
information about company's employees,  products and their sales.  It calculates the salary
of their employees.  This project used for managing all the process including sales of
employee,  salary of employee,  area in which employee sale products of desired category,
commission of employee according to sales and TA, DA of an employee .
4# Project
Project Title :  -  Facility Management Services
Working as FMS Engineer on project of IBM India Pvt Ltd At Central
Board of Direct Taxes(CBDT).
Responsibilities to provide Technical  support like installation and
troubleshooting  of Desktop,  & general software's at end user.
Monitor network to ensure network availability to all  system users and perform
necessary maintenance to support network availability.
Managing and guiding Engineers at Remote Location in Network &Technical
Problems.
Firewall  configuration and maintenance.
Troubleshooting Network related, Port related problems.
Preparation of Daily,  Weekly and Monthly analysis reports.
Remotely troubleshooting.
Accounts  Executive from April 2011  Aug  2012  with,  Soniya  Sys-chem Pvt Ltd and
Pratima  Enterprises  Karve-Nagar,  Pune.
Accounting:-
Booking  of Sales  Invoices  for all Units.  (Tally  version  9)
Booking  of Purchase Invoices  for  all Units.  (Tally  version  9)
Verify  purchase  orders  and  invoices.
Checking  of  VAT Calculation  which  is  specially  calculated  manually.
Booking  of Debit  & Credit note if any  kind  of rejection  in  sales,  sales  return,
purchase return,  etc.
Handling  daily  Cash  & Ba nk  transactions.
Generated  reconsilation  statement,  general ledger,  checks  and  reports,  Quarterly
VAT reports.
Generated  monthly  sales  statements,  Outstanding  Reports
Maintained  Accounts  Receivables  And  Accounts  Payables.
Maintain  books  of accounts  in  Tally.
Preparation  of  Excise Invoices.
Generated  Excise reports,  Stock  Statements
Preparation  of  Quotations  for Products.
Preparation  of  day  to  day  Transactions.
PAGE 1  of 2
Auditing:-
Assisting  Sr.  Accounts  Officer regarding  the Internal Audit  for Sales,  Purchase,
Cash  Book,  Bank  Book,  Journal Vouchers  scrutiny,  etc.
Assessment:-
To  prepare data for various  types  of assessments like Vat Audit,  etc.
Follow  up  for various  Government  Forms  (i.e.  `C' form).
Purchase:-
To  collect  the quotations  for the material requirement from  various  suppliers  &
compare.
To  discuss  & finalize the quotation  with  the help  of seniors.
To  raise Purchase Order as  the requirement & forward  the Purchase Order to  the
Supplier.
Account and Admin Executive from March 2004  - November 2007  with
Accountancy  Academy Model Colony  Shivajinagar ,  Pune
Accounting:-
Booking  of Sales  Invoices.  (Tally)
Maintaining  Daily  Cash  & Bank  transactions.
Giving  Tally  training  for Excise Department and  Students.
Booking  of Sales  Invoices  for all Units.  (Tally)
Booking  of Purchase Invoices  for  all Units.  (Tally)
Verify  purchase  orders  and  invoices.
Generated  monthly  sales  statements,  Outstanding  Reports
Maintained  Accounts  Receivables  And  Accounts  Payables.
Maintain  books  of accounts  in  Tally.
Preparation  of  Quotations  for Products.
Preparation  of  day  to  day  Transactions.
Human Resource Activities:-
To  maintain  Attendance & calculate the Salary  for Employee's.
To  maintain  & calculate the Leave records.
Various  bookings  (Flight  + Railway  +  Hotel) for Seniors  & Guests.
Organising  for various  meetings  between  management & em ployee's.
Administration:-
PAGE 1  of 2
Handled  outgoing  communications  for promotion  of  sales  e.g.  submitting
quotations
Attended  the training  course of Tally  for - Tally  Programing  (TDL) at Mumbai.
Set up  of industrial Accounts  as  per clients  requirement  in  Tally  and  Solving
queries  of Tally  at
Rigicut  Tools Pvt  Ltd -  Bhosari
Lubricare Pvt  Ltd -  Bhosari
Field Engineering    Warje.
Astric Soft Solutions Pune. Software Developer (Oct 2010 to Sept 2011) (Total:12 Months)
G. M. C. Polytech. College. Lecturer (July 2008 to May 2009) (Total:11 Months)
PROJECT DETAIILS
Project  1 : Indibazaar Web Application
Technologies :  WVS 2008, ASP.Net 3.0 using C#.Net, SQL Server 2005.
Team size : 4
Description :
Indibazaar is a  web application. The main purpose of this application is for showing the advertising of different companies to
the registered users on indibazaar website. Like social networking websites. But it different one because many of the
companies in indibazaar provide the discount coupons for indibazaar users. If company gives to indibazaar users then we
make it as a merchant in different lists.  Most important thing is to  showing the advertisements as per users location
Features:-
.1
Provide the secure authentication like Admin and Normal User.
.2
Provide different profiles like Business profile and user profiles
3. Generation of coupons as per companies discount and offers.
4. Users can send scraps and testimonials.
5. Bulletin boards.
6. Customized Application according to Client.
1
Roles and Responsibilities :
1.
As a developer in a  team
2.
Involved in Design,  Coding and Architecture phase of the project.
3.
Creating tables and queries.
4.
Designed and developed Custom Reports using Crystal report
Project  2 : CRM  For Company
Technologies :  WVS 2008,  ASP.Net 3.0 using C#.Net, SQL Server 2005.
Team size : 4
Description :
Customer relationship management System  is a  web application.  Which is maintain the relation with company. We can view
the Project List,  Client List,  Notification List,  Appointment List,  Conversation List, Client Person List and Company Person.
Features:-
.1
Provide the secure authentication like Admin and Normal User.
.2
Provide different List like Project, Client.
3. Users can Edit And Delete record from list.
4. User can update record.
5. Customized Application according to Client.
Roles and Responsibilities :
1. Microsoft .Net Developer.
2. Involved in Design, Coding and Architecture phases of the project.
3. Designed and developed Custom Reports using Crystal report.
EXTRA COURSES
Have done the Dot Net course @  Bright Computer,  Nashik. (Oct 2009 to March 2010)
Have done the GATE  Exam in 2010.
From Feb 2013 to August 2013 in Maersk  Global Service Centers,  Pune,
Designation:-  Associate (Account payable)
Reasponsibilties:
Worked  as an Associate in FNA  process for RTP team.
Handling  Invoice  verification task for APA countries; Indonesia, Singapore, Australia,
Thailand, Vietnam, Philippines, New Zealand, Cambodia, and  Malaysia. Managed
invoices in OCR  application.
Processing  into FACT SAP; Exception handling; 3 Way match; Payment clearing; vendor
reconciliation.
Manage  Vendor relation and  ensure  invoices get posted  on time
Ensure  correct and  timely processing of Invoices for the  Vendor payments.
Ensuring  all SLA (Service  Level Agreements) are  met regarding  the  Maersk`s Vendor
payments using SAP R/3 system.
Handling  the  escalated  invoice  issues.
Responsible for checking  Duplicate  invoices through SAP R/3 system    (T   code:
ZAPMOTIIL)
Done  all kind  of posting  in SAP (T-Code: MIRO)
To undertake  weekly Calls regarding process updates and queries with the  clients
(  Maersk's Vendors )
Extensive  use  of Citrix and  SAP while  processing  invoices in Account Payable.
Responsible to process all types of invoices Purchase  Order, Credit Notes, Prepayment,
and Split Invoices.
Daily reporting of Productivity & Wo rkflows to Team Leader & Ma nager.
Active  Participation in Daily Review Meeting  and update  the  volume  of invoices for
every location.
From Nov 2010 to Dec 2012  in Nisar Sayyed & Co (Tax  Consultant)
Designation:-  Accounts  Assistant
Reasponsibilties:
Accounting  & Bo ok Keeping.
Maintaining  Day-to-Day  business accounting  of different clients.
Prepared Tax returns.
Prepared financial statements & repo rts.
Ensure  accuracy of information contained in financial reports & th eir compliance  with
statutory requirements.
Check Monthly Bank Reconciliation Statements of all bank accounts maintained;
resolved  any differences in a timely manner.
Conducted  Physical  Stock  Verification.
Maintenance  & fin alization of financial/accounting r ecords.
6.1 years of experience in the field of software testing, currently working as a  Test Engineer  with
WMS Gaming solutions India  pvt. Ltd., Pune.
Graduate in Electronics and communications engineering from ICFAI University in year of 2007.
Solid expertise in manual testing for projects during all phases, familiar with the life cycle and different
phases, requirements in a project and performing end to end Testing responsibility.
Working extensively on Functional, System, Integration and Regression Testing assignments.
Having 4.5 years of working experience with Healthcare Industry/US Healthcare industry.
Well versed with Healthcare Industry/EHR Standards such as HIPAA for data  security, HL7 for
interoperability and ICD10.
Having good knowledge of PBM  and Healthcare insurance Industry esp. claim processing and plan
creations in AS400 environment.
Currently working and having good knowledge of Casino Gaming Industry, spec. testing Slot machines/
EGM/VLT for Class II specific environment.
Skilled in good team work,  independent functioning, taking up new  challenges & profitable for the
company, planning and execution of ideas.
An excellent communicator with exceptional team building and interpersonal skills.
WORK  EXPERIENCE (73 Months)
Designation Organization Duration Work Field
Test Engineer WMS Gaming solutions 20th Jun'12   Till date IT-Software
Test Specialist IBM  India Pvt. Ltd. 3rd Dec'09   8th Jun'12 IT-Software
Software Engineer Satyam Computer
Services Pvt.  Ltd
29 Oct'07   2nd Dec'09 IT-Software
1) WMS Gaming solution  India  Pvt. Ltd.
Duration:  20th Jun'12   Till date
As a Team member,  Major responsibilities during this tenure are:
Understanding requirement, writing Test cases, review  and execution of Test cases.
To  test all major functionalities of game
Starting from loading it to  the EGM, running and
testing it using Slot Accounting System (SAS), OPTOS and GSL Monitor tool.
Verify accounting and game play features.
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
Project Summary
WMS Gaming is a manufacturer of slot machines,  video lottery terminals and software to  help
casinos manage their gaming operations. The company is based in Waukegan, Illinois.
Project's requirement is to test all the functionalities of Class II based themes.
1) IBM India  Pvt. Ltd.
Duration:  3rd Dec'09   8th Jun'12
RxClaim project had several modules, releases in every 2 months. Worked on more than 8 releases as a
Module Lead/Team  member, Major responsibilities during this tenure were:
Understanding requirement, estimation, task allocation,  status reporting.
Creating Test case scenarios, creating setups, writing Test cases, review and execution of
Test cases.
Responsible for the accurate processing and completion of medical claims,  includes
creating/processing claims and plan setups.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System Integration, smoke,
Regression Testing  and review  of deliverables
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
Project Summary
Healthcare industry products (drugs) are subsidized by insurance companies and services
companies like CVS CAREMARK, etc  through different schemes (plans) which provide benefits.
Health card is provided by the Health Insurance Company to  each member. A member goes to a
prescriber, to get prescription for drugs. Member then goes to a pharmacy and purchases the
drugs and then claims for the drugs purchased.  Pharmacy submits a claim to Caremark for the
member purchased drugs. The claim process begins when a  member goes to  a  pharmacy and
purchases the prescribed drugs. The pharmacy submits a  claim using the member's information
and BIN/Process or Control/Group Number (BPG) information. The claim is routed to  the switching
company or \u0022Switch\u0022 via  the BPG. The switch then determines which PROCESSOR should process
the claim. RxCLAIM  application uses the BPG  to  identify the claim  and begins eligibility validations
and the benefit plan for coverage. Once all the information has been verified, RxCLAIM
application will send a  message back to the pharmacy that communicates a paid or rejected
claim.
For its globalization, application was kept compliant with global health standards like HIPPA (for
data  security).
Project 2:  WGS Transition and Transformation    Process Renovation
Platform:  Windows XP
Technology:  Mainframes
Role:  Team Member
Front End:  Mainframes
Client:  Wellpoint, USA.
Duration:  3rd Mar'12   8th Jun'12
WGS- Process Renovation project had several modules, releases in every month. Worked on 2 releases as
a  Team member, Major responsibilities during this tenure were:
Understanding requirement, Creating Test case scenarios,  creating setups, writing Test
cases, review and execution of Test cases.
Responsible for the accurate processing and completion of medical claims,  includes
creating/processing claims and setups.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System Integration,
Regression Testing  and review  of deliverables
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
2) Satyam Computer Services Pvt. Ltd
Duration:  29 Oct'07   2nd Dec'09
Project 1:  Electronic Health  Record
Platform:  Windows XP
Language:  C#
Technology:  .NET
Role:  Tester
Front End:  ASP.NET
Back End:  SQL Server 2005
Client:  Emergency Management and Research  Institute, Hyderabad
Creating Test case scenarios, creating setups, writing Test cases, review and execution of
Test cases.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System, Integration, smoke
and Regression Testing and review  of deliverables
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
Meeting with Clients
Project Summary
EHR is web portal that stores the each and every health information of a patient from cradle to
grave. Users of this portal are patient,  doctor, Insurance provider, pharmacies, and laboratories.
Through this portal, a  fresh patient signs up for his user id and password. With his user id and
password he logs in to the portal and enters his personal details, medical history, family history,
medication (current/past), therapies, etc. The same process follows for doctor for signing up.
When doctor logs in, he searches for a patient. After the completion of search the all the details
entered by patient are available to the doctor (if allowed by patient).  Doctor can create an
Episode for this patient, under that episode;  he has got a  provision of creating Visits and events.
This portal also gives facility of order management where in doctor can place order for patient
and laboratories after doing the order, enters result through the same portal.
For its globalization, application was kept compliant with global health standards like HL7
(for interoperability), HIPAA (for data  security).
Project 2:  DB Independent Framework
Platform:  Windows XP
Language:  C#
Technology:  .NET
Role:  Tester
Front End:  ASP.NET
Back End:  SQL Server 2005
Clients:  Emergency Management and Research Institute, Hyderabad.
Health Management and Research  Institute, Hyderabad.
Write and execute SQL queries.
Creating Test case scenarios, creating setups, writing Test cases, review and execution of
Test cases.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System, Integration, smoke
and Regression Testing and review  of deliverables
Meeting with Clients
Project Summary
DB Independent Framework provides an abstraction to interact with databases without specifying
specific   Data  Source in application code. Data  Provider specific   methods are decoupled from
application code.
s Have successfully  Transitioned  & Maintained  various Procurement Processes from
Global teams to  Avaya GSO India team like SAP Data Stewards,  GR-IR (Goods & Invoice
receipt),  Blocked  Invoice & SAP Material Pricing  processes
s Played  a Significant role in  Avaya   Nortel Integration  as a Procurement Specialist,
Vendor  maintainer & Coordinator.
s Awards/Accolades Received  -  \u0022Avaya Ovation  award\u0022,  ;BEST PERFORMER; at Zensar
and  \u0022Employee of  the month\u0022 at Sutherland  Global Services for my  exceptional performance.
Trainings Attended:
s Lean  & Six  Sigma,
s Performance and  Operations Management
s Sarbanes-Oxley  General Overview & Control Tool Ownership  Training.
s Advanced  MS Excel & MS Access.
Wipro  Ltd    Powai & Pune 2007-2013
Customer  Service Assistant Manager,  09/11  to  06/13
Customer  Service Team Leader,  10/09  to  09/11
Customer  Service Trainer,  09/07  to  10/09
Customer  Service Representative,  06/07  to  09/07
Promoted  to  a managerial position  to  recruit,  train  and  supervise 100+ customer  service reps in
6  teams and  6  Team leads for  clients Order management (operations).  Foster  an  environment in
which  our  clients enjoy  high  levels of  service and  employees are motivated  to  deliver  top
performance.
Responsibilities (Team Lead/Assistant Manager):
Interacting  with  Support functions for  staffing  and  scheduling  requirements,  performance
reporting,  raising  employees concerns,  etc
Facilitated  training  of supervisory  and  line staff
Agent Variation  Management for  the Order  management tower  - Responsible for
identification  of  training  needs and  content creation  in  order  to  improve the client metrics for  the
site.
Lead  retail transformation  project in  SAP for  BPO,  in-coordination  with  Wipro
Technology  for providing  transformation  from legacy  applications to  SAP migration  in  4  phases.
Transitioning  and  implementation  of  all new products and  updates launched  by  the client
and  training  all productive and  non  productive FTE's.
Daily  client coordination  for performance tracking  in  the tower  and  issues log.
Improving  customer  service based  on  client feedback  through  the development of  new
policies and  procedures.
Conduct Leadership  performance reviews,  and  develop  strategy  for improving  Customer
Satisfaction  & business growth.
Coordinated  with  Support functions on  required  trainings to  support operations.
Creating  weekly  performance decks for  review.
Evaluating  areas of  improvement in  the Tower  of Order Management   continuous
improvement.
Played  a key  role in  knowledge management within  the tower  in  co-ordination  with  our
clients for the ultimate benefit of stakeholders & service users.
Responsible for  transition,  planning  & execution  of  Retail Transformation  (RT)
Readiness,  Go-live,  post-implementation  & Stabilization.
Planning  & Execution  of  migration  projects to  meet Go  Live criteria's & operational
readiness for such  migrations.
Part of  onshore travel to  client sIte knowledge transfer and  transitioning  of  queues and
stabilization
Responsibilities (Trainer):
Part of  onshore travel to  client site (Australia)  knowledge transfer  and  transitioning  of
queues and  stabilization
Trained  new hire employees the skills and  techniques of  speaking  English  clearly.
Trained  employees on  how to  speak  to  customer  over  the phone.
Designing  training  courses and  materials to  meet the training  needs of  the company.
Consulting  various departments and  understanding  their  training  needs and  requirements
Conducted  continuous education  sessions for  employees based  on  feedback  and  training
needs analysis.
Recognized  Training  requirements and  prepared  resourceful training  programs based  on
client requirements.
Conducted  refresher  workshops and  training  sessions for  employees who  were slow to
come up  the learning  curve.
Assisted  team in  customer service training.
Carried  out regular quality  feedback  for  staff  to  identify  gaps and  incorporate them in  the
Worked  as a Functional tester  as well as the test lead.  Below are the activities and
responsibilities carried  out
n Worked  in  Agile Scrum process.
n
Business requirements understanding  and  plan  test strategy.
Project Details Client Name: OCBC Project Name: MYLOS Operating  Software Windows 7 Tools Quality  Center 11,  Selenium 2.0,  Eclipse,  AS 400 Role Functional Tester,  Test Lead Team Size 2Project Description:
LOS (Loan  Origination  System)  is one of  the middle office applications for OCBC.  It generally
used  as the electronic medium for  loan  origination  process to  several corporates.  Basically,  there
was an  established  system of LOS for  OCBC's Singapore branch.  Project MYLOS is to
establish  a new system for Loan  Origination  for  OCBC  bank  Malaysia branch  catering  the
Worked  as a Functional tester  as well as the test lead.  Below are the activities and
responsibilities carried  out
n Finalizing  test scope.
n
Business requirements understanding  and  plan  test strategy.
Client Name: OCBC Project Name: MAS TRM TRANSACTION SIGNING Operating  Software Windows XP Tools Quality  Center 11,  Selenium 2.0,  Eclipse,  AS 400  Role Functional Tester Team Size 4Project Details:
The project is to  provide extra security  to  the online banking  transactions.  OCBC provides
several services like Funds Transfer,  Bill Payment,  TT and  other  online transaction  for its
consumer.  After  the implementation  of Transaction  Signing,  all the high  risk  online transactions
will be required  to  provide signing  OTP to  provide extra security  to  the transaction.  The project
Worked  as a Functional tester.  Below are the activities and  responsibilities carried  out
n Business requirements understanding.
n Preparing  Test Plan  documents.
n
Raising  issues with  the obscure business process and  the functionality  and  get them
Project Details Client Name: JP Morgan  Chase Project Name: JP Morgan  Chase International Private Bank Operating  Software Windows 7 Technologies Database: Sybase 15
Tools: HP Quality  Center  10
Performance Testing  Tool: HP Load  Runner  9.5
Role Functional Tester Team Size 13 Project Description:
JP Morgan  Chase International Private Bank  deals with  the Asset and  Wealth  Management of
high  net-worth  individuals.  The applications developed  and  tested  in  this project mainly  deal
with  entering  of  trades and  their  settlement in  secondary  market.  The banking  products dealt
with  include Mutual Funds,  Equity  Stock,  Fixed  Income Funds,  Hedge Funds ,  Forex
Working  as a Functional tester and  also  have hands on  experience on  Performance testing.
Below are the activities and  responsibilities are being  carried  out
n Business Requirement understanding.
n
Analyzing  Business Requirement Documents and  Functional Specification  Documents
Client Name: Affiliated  Computer Services (ACS) Project Name: ACS Health  & Welfare Operating  Software Windows XP Role Functional Tester Team Size 16 Responsibilities:
Worked  as a functional tester.  Below are the activity  carried  out during  the time span.
n Requirement understanding.
n Peer  Review of  Test Cases developed  by  other team members.
n
Worked  independently  for  preparation  of  Test Cases and  Test Execution  for  both  WEB
n Finalizing  test scope
n Provide test estimation.
n Preparing  Test Plan  documents.
n Raising  issues with  the obscure business process and  the functionality  and  get them
resolved  after discussing  with  client.
n Developing  Test cases for  as per  the business and  functional specifications.
n Peer  Review of  Test Cases developed  by  other team members.
n Signing  off the test cases after  review and  discussion  with  the Client side.
n Preparing  required  test data and  maintaining  the test data.
n Test Bed  set up.
n Developed  selenium automation  scripts.
n Maintain  automated  test scripts by  writing  maintainable scripts using  Java.
n Established  quick  data validation  process using  selenium and  Java technology.
n Perform Smoke Testing,  Functional testing,  End  to  End  integrity  testing,  Cross Browser
testing,  Interface Testing,  Regression  testing  & Production  sanity  check.
n Perform mobile application  testing.
n Raising  defects for  failed  modules and  follow-up  with  respective developers.
n Defect Management and  Test Management using  JIRA.
n Preparing  project closure reports.
MALAYSIA specific requirements. n Preparing  Test Plan  documents.
n Raising  issues with  the obscure business process and  the functionality  and  get them
resolved  after discussing  with  client.
n Developing  Test cases for  as per  the business and  functional specifications.
n
Peer  Review of  Test Cases developed  by  other team members.
n Signing  off the test cases after  review and  discussion  with  the Client side.
n Preparing  required  test data and  maintaining  the test data.
n Test Bed  set up.
n Perform Smoke Testing,  Functional testing,  End  to  End  integrity  testing,  Cross Browser
testing,  Interface Testing  & Regression  testing.
n Raising  defects for  failed  modules and  follow-up  with  respective developers.
n Defect Management and  Test Management using  Quality  Center  11.
n Preparing  project closure reports.
also  dealt with  the smooth  transition  of the bank's IB  site from normal mode to  transaction
signing  mode.
resolved  after discussing  with  client.
n Developing  Test cases for  as per  the business and  functional specifications.
n Peer  Review of  Test Cases developed  by  other team members.
n Preparing  required  test data and  maintaining  the test data.
n
Preparing  Selenium automation  scripts.
n Maintain  automated  test cases by  writing  maintainable test scripts using  Java.
n Test Bed  set up.
n Perform End  to  End  integrity  testing,  Cross Browser  testing,  Interface Testing  &
Regression  testing.
n Performed  mobile application  testing.
n Raising  defects for  failed  modules and  follow-up  with  respective developers.
n Defect Management and  Test Management using  Quality  Center  11.
n Preparing  project closure reports.
commodities and  OTC  derivatives.  The testing  activities in  this project mainly  involve testing  at
each  stage of the Trade lifecycle for  each  of these products,  till the booking  of  the trade.  The
testers are thus required  to  have a thorough  business knowledge about each  of  these products
and  how they  operate in  real-time business scenario.  The project also  handles account and
portfolio  creation  and  asset management and  strategic rebalancing  for the portfolios created.
to  prepare test scenarios.
n Developing  Test cases for  different applications as per the business and  functional
specifications.
n Reviewing  of  Test Cases developed  by  other team members.
n
Preparing  test data and  maintaining  the test data.
n Perform Smoke testing  and  functional testing  of  the new releases.
n Executing  the regression  test scenarios in  different environments.
n Raising  defects for  failed  modules and  follow-up  with  respective developers.
n Defect Management through  Quality  Center  10.
n Development automation  scripts using  selenium.
n Analyzing  the test results and  sharing  the result with  the stake holders.
n Performed  in  the role of Testing  Co-coordinator in  the project.
n Perform Data Migration  testing
n End  to  end  testing  on  Pega application.
n
Generate performance scripts using  HP Load  Runner.
n Setting  up  scenario  for  performance run.
n Analyzing  performance result and  publish  the result.
and  AIS.
n Involved  in  analyzing  the Document Spec and  Tech  Spec along  with  Business Related
Document.
n Involved  in  Test data preparation  using  Sybase.
n
Involved  in  analyzing  the Sybase CALC results as per  the business specification.
n Verification  of  the required  parameters and  transaction  tables as per  the requirement
documents.
n Involved  in  Reporting  the Bugs using  Client Specified  bug-tracking  tool Problog.
n Involved  in  sharing  knowledge with  ACS client side and  new team members.
Having  3  years of experience and  Strong  working  knowledge of  Software Testing
(Manual testing,  Functional testing,  Integration  testing,  Good  Knowledge of  Defect lifecycle )
Currently  working  in  IQ Microsystems,  Fatima Nagar,  Pune-13.
Technical Details:
Expertise in  Software Testing,  Test Planning,  Test Execution.
Performed  Functional Testing,  Regression  Testing,  and  Data base testing  according  to  the
test plan  activities.
Well versed  with  Bug  Reporting  tool like Dev  Track,  Jira and  BugZilla.
Proficient in  all cycles of  test life cycle from test planning  to  defect tracking  and
managing  defect lifecycle.
SDLC  Detail:
Good  Knowledge of  SDLC,  STLC  and  Bug  Life cycle.
Experience in  working  with  Analyst,  Developers and  Testers for  projects during  the full
Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC).
Domain  Knowledge:
Have good  judgment skills while reporting  and  prioritizing  bugs in  conjunction  with  the
development to  ensure testing  issues are resolved.
Having  good  analysis,  trouble shooting  and  problem solving  capabilities and  Ability  to
learn  new technologies and  tools quickly.
A strong  team player  with  excellent interpersonal and  communication  skills and  ready  to
take an  independent challenge.
Ability  to  grasp  the underlying  business process and  ability  to  work  as an  individual and
in  a team.
SQS India Pvt.  Ltd
Hinjewadi,  Phase-3. May  2011-  April 2012
Ansh  System Pvt.  Ltd.
Kharadi,  Pune-14. May  2012- 28th  Feb  2013
IQ Microsystems Fatima -
Nagar,  Pune-13. March  2013    Till date
PROJECT (Work  Experience)
Project [1]  : BAS Trucks
2
Technology  : PHP [Zend  framework]
Database : My  SQL
Description
Main  Business to  sell second  hand  and  occasional new vehicles in  different countries.  Include
various modules like order,  shipping,  workshop  and  document.
Project [2]  : Smartbooqing  [OCR]
Technology  : .net
Database : SQL server  2008
Description:
Smartbooqing  is the most advanced  solution  in  the field  of processing  invoices.
Project [3]  : Healthcare alert
Technology  : PHP,  i-phone,  Android
Database : My  SQL
Description:
This is the web  application  developed  in  PHP and  have mobile app  also; Android  app  and  i-
phone app.  In  this user have to  sign  up  and  fill up  all the info  about their  health  and  they  receive
the alert through  registered  email and  many  other functionalities.
Project [4]  : Jingles [New Dating  Site]
Technology  : PHP [Zend  framework]
Database : My  SQL
Description  :
This is Dating  Site for  Netherlands.  Where user  can  create account i.e.  signup  process,  making
profile,  photo  upload,  Image Viewer,  Blind  date,  wink,  Chat module,  internal mailing,  make
favorites,  upload  video,  matches,  updates,  send  a gift,  mask,  Block,  Abuse,  search,  Forum,
Account settings,  Privacy,  Status of  user,  online members etc.  kind  of functionalities.
Project [5]  : Gloop
Technology  : PHP [Drupal framework]
Database : My  SQL
Description  :
This is web  application  to  sell goods online.  Includes functionalities like select product,  Add  to
shopping  cart,  see product details,  signup  process,  make profile,  registration  process,  waiting  list,
blog,  online payment system,  billing  details,  sending  mail.  Etc.
Project [6]  : Delisky  [i-phone,  i-pad  Application]
Description  :
DeliSky  app  represents new and  easy  way  to  order users VIP jet catering  at various airports in
Europe.  App  will shows exclusive catering  menu  and  items list.  I-pad  and  i-phone base
3
application.  Includes functionalities like create,  delete,  modify  order.  Select region  and  country;
Make special request; select airport and  caterer,  select date,  time ,  flight.  Send  order.
Project [7]  : Izooble [i-phone,  i-pad  Application]
Description  :
Izooble is the social networking  application  for  i-phone and  i-pad,  where user  can  share i-phone
applications,  music,  movies ,  rate them,  user can  make friend,  Includes module like home,  wall,
App,  friends,  my  profile,  settings etc.
Project [8]  : Fountain  app  [i-phone,  i-pad  Application]
Description:
Fountain  app  locates the fountain  all over  the Germany,  details about the fountain  and  nearby
path  in  the Google map,  total distance,  navigation  etc.
Responsibilities for  above projects:
Study  the Functional Specification  and  understand  the client requirements.
Testing  with  the focus on  Functional Testing,  Regression  Testing,  Integrated  System
Analyzing  and  Defect reporting.
Client interaction  on  issues and  resolutions.
Involving  in  weekly  and  monthly  meetings with  Client.
Preparing  Daily,  weekly,  Monthly  status report.
Other  projects (Work  experience):
9.  Antidiscrimination  App.    I-phone
10.  Restaurant App.  I-pad
11.  Music player  -  Android.
12.  Festival needs   Android,  I-phone.
13.  Ekkelenkamp-  child  care   PHP
ACEDAMIC SEMINAR  AND PROJECT WORK
Bit Torrent (Protocol)
Bit Torrent is a peer-to-peer  file sharing  protocol used  for  distributing  large amounts of  data.
Filtering  Image Spam With  Near  Duplicate Detection
Project Detects the image spam which  are embedded  in  e-mails with  near  duplicate detection
Technique.  .
4
s Manual Test engineer with  2  years & 6  months of experience in  Software Testing  and
currently  working  in  Syntel Limited.
s Hands on  Experience in  Manual software testing  with  creation  and  execution  of  test
cases,  reporting  and  tracking  defects to  closure.
s Lead  a nascent team of 9  resources.
s Well acquainted  with  Software Testing  Life Cycle & Requirement Analysis and
Estimates (Test and  Resource).
s
Experience in  the preparation  of  Test Approach,  Test Conditions,  Test Plan,  Test
Execution,  Implementation  Plan,  Sign-off,  Risk  Memo  documents,  Traceability  Matrix  and  Test
Status Reports.
s Providing  assistance to  Production  Support teams when  necessary.
s Enthusiastic to  learn  new concepts in  emerging  technologies.
s Self-motivated,  cooperative,  self-starter  and  good  interpersonal skills.
s Strong  familiarity  & working  knowledge of  Method/1  (SDLC)  and  related  testing
methodologies.
s Strong  knowledge in  Defect life cycle.
s Hands on  experience in  HP Quality  Center.
s
Experience in  Agile methodology.
Working  as a Software Engineer  in  Syntel Ltd.,  Pune from June 2011  till date.
Professional Journey:
Project Description: AMEX SA-SSP
Role: Test Engineer
Team Size: 10
Client: American  Express (Amex)
American  Express is one of the major  Credit Card  and  Travel Related  services providers in  the
world.  It operates in  more than  130  countries.  Credit card  business of  American  Express is
primarily  concentrated  in  the United  States,  though  the company  is widening  its network
elsewhere in  the world.  The company  is best known  for its credit card,  charge card,  and  travelers
cheese businesses.
American  Express -  SSP   Application,  it's one of  the application  developed  for Customer  Care
Representative to  assist the Amex  Customer.  SSP stands for  Sales and  Service Portal.  It is a web
based  application.
Assistant Manager with  over  8  years of  Functional experience in  Finance,  Reconciliation  &
Process Migration  for  Back  Office Banking  Operations.  To  serve a challenging  and  rewarding
position,  utilizing  my  Analytical & Management skills & achieve the best in  every  step  of my
life,  thereby  contributing  to  organizational & personal growth
Current Assignment: Employed  with  State street HCL Services as Assistant Manager from May
09' till current.
s Reconciliation  of  US Institutional Accounts for Cash  and  Stock  for  Alliance Bernstein.
s Leading  and  Handling  a team of 25  Process Associates and  3  Team Leaders to  achieve
the Client Deliverables.
s Daily  Audits of funds Reconciled  & Reviewing  the Cash  Availability  Figure before it is
sent over to  the Client and  Portfolio  Management Group
s
Part of  the Offshore Oversight Team in  the US handling  Oversight Escalations sends over
by  the On  shore teams.
s Migrated  the Shadow Admin  Process from US.
s Part of the team that worked  on  the Migration  of  the process.(FTE Analysis,  Process
Documentation  ,SLA)
s Preparing  and  maintaining  SOPs,  Process Maps,  SLA's,  Cross training  Schedules and
ISO documents for  the process
s Part of Project teams that were involved  in  Email Analysis,  TLM Match  Rate,  TLM/PLM
Conversion
s Review Performance Objectives on  a periodical basis with  a view to  optimize team's
performance..
s Conducting  Monthly  1-2-1,Quarterly  Appraisal for the team
State Street Syntel Services Private Limited.
Dec 06' April 09' Team Leader
s Reconciliation  of  US Mutual funds for  Cash  and  Stock  & providing  the Cash  Availability
to  the Investment Manager
s
Reconciliation  of  Accounts of State street and  other Custodians like JP Morgan  ,City
National etc on  TLM for  Cash  and  Stock,  Coding  the exceptions on  TLM,  Researching  them on
Bloomberg  along  with  Internal Applications .Also  contacting  the Custodians in  getting  the
exceptions resolved.
s Recruiting  Team Members for the team
s Training  & Guiding  the Team to  prepare the cash  Availability.
s Handling  & Leading  a team of  23  Team members.
s Quality  Checking  of the funds Reconciled  & Reviewing  the Cash  Availability  Figure
before it is sent over to  the Client.
s Ensure the process is meeting  its Deadlines both  in  terms of  Timelines & Accuracy  &
find  ways in  reducing  the FTE's.
s Merging  the Cash  and  Stock  Team into  one unit
s Doing  External and  Internal Error  Analysis and  investigating  root cause and  providing
instant feedback  to  the team
s Preparing  and  maintaining  SOPs,  Process Maps,  SLA's,  Cross training  Schedules and
ISO documents for  the process.
s Recruiting  candidates for  the process.
s Handling  the weekly  Client Call and  updating  the client on  the status of  the work
completed
s Handling  customer  escalations and  grievances and  ensuring  customer  satisfaction  is met.
s Facilitate team-building  activities to  improve team bonding.
s Maintaining  Time sheet to  measure efficiency  and  time management in  the team.
s Review Performance Objectives on  a periodical basis with  a view to  optimize team's
performance.
AXA Business Services P Ltd.
Oct 04' Dec 06' Process Analyst
Reconciliation  of  US Equity,  Fixed  Income Bonds,  Mutual funds ,Global Accounts
Training  and  coaching  the team for Manual and  SSR  Accounts
Distribution  of  workload  among  the team for  manual and  SSR  reconciliation.
Quality  checking  for  the Accounts reconciled  manually  and  online.
Ensure that the process is meeting  SLA's and  find  ways to  reduce TAT as specified  in
SLA.
Doing  External and  Internal error  analysis and  investigating  root cause and  providing
instant feedback  to  the team.
Preparing  and  maintaining  SOPs,  Process Maps,  SLA's,  Cross training  Schedules and
ISO documents for  the process.
Handling  customer  escalations and  grievances and  ensuring  customer  satisfaction  is met.
Facilitate team-building  activities to  improve team bonding.
Maintaining  Time sheet to  measure efficiency  and  time management in  the team.
Review Performance Objectives on  a periodical basis with  a view to  optimize team's
performance.
Working  knowledge of BLOOMBERG.
Preparing  Ledgers and  Final Statement for  different Companies:-
n Preparing  all accounts
n Taxation  and  Depreciation
n Posting  Entries
Tally  all Ledgers and  Statements
Microsoft Dynamics NAV 5.0  Functional
Duration  1  Year (as a part of  Curriculum During  PGD Telecom Management)
Learning's :
n Business Scenarios mapped  in  Navision.
n Finance Module.
Business Development Specialist
TSL Consulting  Pvt.  Ltd.
(Sales consulting  company)
August 2010    Present
Key  Skills   Lead  Generation,  Profiling,  Gathering  business intelligence,  Updating  contact
details,  Part of  the pre-  sales team.
Making  sales lead  generation  calls to  senior  executives (CIO / CTO/ CEO / VP IT) in  end
user organizations in  US in  the North  American  market and  in  India.
Selling  IT products and  searching  business opportunities for  IT companies in  US and
India.
Having  strong  product knowledge of various IT Products and  latest technologies
Building  Database through  various sites,  Finding  Appropriate Titles.  Give a brief
company  details - What does the company  does.  Updating  the contact details with  their
respective Email Ids and  phone numbers.
Responsible for  Market research  activities globally  especially  UK/EMEA.
Responsible for  preparing  market reports for  verticals / horizontals.  Assisting  presales
team through  research
Proficient in  Hoovers,  Zoominfo,  LinkedIn,  Spoke,  Google,  jigsaw,  etc.
Researching  the procured  data to  obtain  contact details such  as designations,  multiple
contact names,  emails,  phone numbers etc.
Creating  daily  call report,  month/quarterly  report and  updating  the dashboards.
Confirming  the contact details by  calling  and  also  responsible for  doing  profiling  and
gathering  business intelligence.
PROJECTS / INTERNSHIP
Trainee Intern  (Market Analysis & Selling)
Angel Broking
(May  2009-  July  2009)
Learning: Experience of  Open  marketing  and  Cold  Calling  (Strategies of  Marketing).  I
learned  about Share Broking  industry,  how to  interact with  different customers and  convince the
potential customers.
Market Analysis
Research: Mainly  focused  on  the study  of  different techniques used  by  Marketing
Managers to  analyze the market for  the product.
Selling
Research: To  acquire knowledge and  skills of Open  Marketing  & Cold  Calling.
Met Company  officials and  had  few healthy  discussions regarding  my  understandings and  ideas.
It was a great experience and  learning  for me.  I  put forward  some feedbacks and  suggestions for
Business development which  was been  appreciated  and  later implemented  in  their  process
Influence of  Factors that affect Telecom Customers
Description: Studied  the impact of  various factors which  influence Customers decision
whether  to  switch  or  stay  with  a service provider.  For research  work  I used  a questionnaire to
make comparison  between  the factors and  according  to  that survey,  I  put forward  my  findings.
(Duration: 4  month)
Organization Location Duration  Designation Mitej Technologies Pune From Jan-2010  to  till date Developer  and  Tester
Title: Spidanet Website
Description: It's a website which  provides details about client's product,  also  give facility  to
customer  to  register,  select service they  want and  pay  for  the service through  payment gateway.
Environment: Dot net Framework,  Sqlserver  2008
Role: Development
Responsibility: Designing  and  coding  for  the website for client and  administrator module.
The process starts with  customer  registration  and  continues with  service selection.  Client can
use google map  to  view and  select device locations i.e.  point of  presence (PoP)  id.
Team: 3
Duration: ongoing  project
Title: SpidaProfit Website
Description: It's a website which  provides details about client's device,  also  give facility  for
associates of client to  register,  select location  they  want to  place the device and  pay  for the
device through  payment gateway.  This website is co-  related  with  Spidanet website.
Environment: Dot net Framework,  Sqlserver  2008
Role: Development
Responsibility: Designing  and  coding  for  the website for client module.  The process starts with
associate registration  and  continues with  PoP selection.  Associate is providing  address to  place
device which  is specified  as point of  presence (PoP)  id.
Team: 3
Duration: ongoing  project
Title: Pyle audio  website
Description: It's a website which  gives details of their  manufacturing  products.
Environment: Dot net Framework,  Sqlserver  2005
Role: Manual Testing
Responsibility: Functional Testing  of  website.
Team: 3
Duration: 3  months
Title: Allinaudio  website (Online inventory  system)
Description: Allinaudio  System is for  the administrators which  enable them to  allocate orders,  to
prepare orders,  to  add  warehouse or  vendor,  to  print orders,  to  transfer or  replace stock  of  item
between  warehouses and  also  to  update shipment details.
Environment: Dot net Framework,  Sqlserver  2005
Role: Manual Testing
Responsibility: Function  testing  of  system and  integration  testing.
Team: 3
Duration: 5  months
Title: Times Manager  (Windows application)
Description: Times Manager  enables users to  record,  to  plan,  to  analyze,  to  record,  and  to
understand  where and  how time is used,  at the individual,  team,  departmental,  and  business
levels.  In  addition,  Times Manager  is Windows compatible and  runs in  the background,
simultaneously,  while other  applications are open.
Environment: Windows 7  OS,  Dot net Framework,  Sqlserver  2005
Role: Manual Testing
Responsibility: Functional testing  of  Times Manager  application.  Testing  involves installation  of
Times Manager which  checks for  sqlserver,  dot net framework  on  the target system.  If system
does not have any  of them,  installer  provides and  runs those set up  and  then  start actual Times
Manager  set up.
Team: 4
Duration: 4  months
This project facilitates the user.  This application  enables the user to  handle the
multimedia player  through  its mobile by  sitting  at its place.  In  this case the mobile works as
remote control of  that player  in  the computer.
Diploma Project:
\u0022Application  to  control Examination  in  College\u0022
This is kind  of application  that is developed  using  VB.  The project is live project as it is
specially  developed  r the registrar of  the college.  The utility  of  project is to  control the
examinations.  This application  keeps record  of  all papers and  the corresponding  author  of  paper;
at the time of allocation  of  the paper system does not allow repetition  in  the papers.  This makes
it easier  for  Registrar  Sir to  allot the papers (The College is autonomous so  all the papers are
authored,  conducted  and  checked  within  the college premises).
I have worked  as Business Development Officer  with  Times Group  of Institutes for three
months as part of  my  summer Internship  program.
Here my  key  responsibilities were to  generate leads,  interact with  interested  clients,  cold  calling,
conduct awareness campaign..
PROFESSIONAL EXPERIANCE:
I joined  TSL Consulting  Pvt.  Ltd  on  4  July  2011  Sr.  Business Development Specialist.
Here my  Key  responsibilities are to  search  new prospects,  position  the products,  Client
management,  cold  calling,  data management,  assessments of  marketing  opportunities,  follow-up
sales activity,  market analysis and  research  and  reporting.
I worked  with  TRIDENT Microfin  Pvt.  Ltd.  as a Branch  Manager from 26  July  2010  to
11  June 2011.
Here my  key  responsibilities were to  handle all operations within  branch.  I  was the ultimate
responsible person  for branch  activities.
This included  marketing  activities,  employee handling,  distribution  of  work  and  monitoring,
credit appraisal,  disbursement of  loans,  recovery  on  regular  basis,  follow ups and  reporting,
making  it sure that all the branch  activities are running  smooth..
I  got promoted  as a field  Executive (Loans for Education  Institution)  on  separate loan  product
from 29  December  2010.
Here my  key  responsibilities are to  coordinate with  different branch  managers to  check  out the
requirement of loans in  those respective areas of  the branches,  convince them to  work  for  this
product also  as this product is included  in  main  operations.  Conduct survey  indifferent areas,
generate leads,  perform assessment,  credit analysis,  prepare loan  report,  follow ups and
reporting.
I  have worked  as a Business Development Manager  in  Chester Information  Archives,
Nagpur  from 07  December  2009  up  to  30  June 2010.
Page 2
My  key  responsibility  there was to  generate extra business which  should  be addition  to  regular
business.  This included  segment analysis,  positioning  of  product( various courses ) by
conducting  seminars and  workshops,  generating  leads,  maintaining  relations,  monitoring  actual
business of  different branches,  generating  data,  monitoring  advertisement campaigns,  cold
calling,  follow ups and  reporting.
I  have worked  as front desk  Manager  also  where my  responsibilities were to  look  after  targets,
handling  the manpower,  arranging  the courses,  monitoring  the faculties,  assessing  the student
satisfaction  and  looking  after  post sale service.  .
I have been  member  of group  which  worked  in  project conducted  by  NASR.  The project
was related  to  rural marketing  (This was 15  day  programme).
Here the key  responsibility  was to  conduct survey  and  report to  senior.
s
Working  at A.  A.  & Brothers as accountant from 28.1.2013  till now.
s Company  carries textile business.
s Approx  turnover 100  cr.
MY WORKING AREAS IN COMPANY
s Daily  Reporting  to  management regarding  Sales,  Purchase and  Collection  activities.
s Production  and  Marketing  analysis like stock  aging,  outstanding  aging,  Average Sales
Price,  Region  wise Sales compare to  plan  and  region  wise contribution  earned  on  sales.
s Analyzing  efficiency  of various production  department and  highlighting  the areas of
concern  to  management and  concern  HOD's.
s
Preparing  Commercial Invoice and  Passing  bills of vendors.
s Jobwork  related  activities (  Desp.  Received  and  payment)
s Looking  all activities related  to  return  goods and  prepare Credit Note.
s Coordinate with  party  for payment.
s Prepare day-to-day  accounts,  e.g.,  Purchase Register,  Sales Register,  Cash  Book,  Bank
Book.
s Maintaining  Debtor's / Creditor's Accounts and  settle their  accounts.
s Overview about Sales Tax,  Income Tax.
s
Preparing  the Account Statement month  wise and  reporting  to  HOD
s Make the voucher for  all type of  Expenses.
s Participating  in  preparation  of  Final Accounts with  C.A.
s Vat computation  & prepare challan  monthwise/quaterly
s Co-ordination  with  sales tax  consultant for  sales tax  scrutiny
Zensar  Technologies,  Pune March-11- Till Date
Associate Manager
Zensar  Technologies (Zensar)  is a globally  renowned  software services company  that specializes
in  providing  a complete range of Software Services and  Solutions.  Zensar  is ranked  amongst
India's Top  20  Software Services Companies by  National Association  of  Software and  Services
Companies (NASSCOM)
.  Responsible for  managing  & supporting  the Global inside Sales (US,  UK,  Europe,  ME,  South
Africa,  SAARC,  Australia & Singapore)  & Marketing  function.
.  Responsible for  budgeting,  costing  & recruitment of  the team.
.  Identify  and  recommend  attractive and  addressable market segments.
.  Develop  Marketing  and  Go-to-Market strategies.
.  Recommend  actions to  drive performance in  their  market/ region  and  establish  objectives for
Go-to-Market Plans,  including  Routes-to-Market,  Market conditioning,  Demand  generation
.  Execute the sales & marketing  plan  in  various geographies.
.  Responsible for  marketing  & lead  generation  activities for  Manufacturing,  Media,  Retail,
Banking,  Insurance & Connected  Services vertical.
.  Plan  & execute campaigns with  respective Vertical & Practice heads.
.  Successfully  increased  the team size from 6  people to  25  people.
.  Arrange for trainings on  new trends & technologies for the team.
Fujitsu  Consulting  India Pvt.  Ltd.,  Pune,  India July  2008  -  Jan  2011
Sr.  Business Enabler
Fujitsu  America is the 3rd  largest IT service provider  and  Fujitsu  is No.1  in  Japan  with  US$53
Billion  Revenue; CMMi Level 5  Company,  one among  the Three SAP Global Technology
Partners with  customers including  half  the Fortune Global 500  Companies; approximately  1,
60000  employees supporting  customers in  70  countries.
.  Participating  in  pre-sales activities such  as market research,  market segmentation,  customer
identification,  prospecting,  customer  analysis review,  sales management,  and  new territory
business development
.  Creating  call strategy,  up-sell/ cross-sell,  and  new business opportunities in  the named  accounts
.  Identifying  target customer segment and  promoting  services such  as Application  Management
Support Services,  ERP systems (SAP,  Oracle),  CRM etc.
.  Interacting  with  C-level Executives such  as CIO,  CTO,  CFO,  VP-IT,  IT Director,  and  IT
Manager  to  procure immediate opportunities and  pass it on  to  Practice heads and  Sales Directors.
.  Sole responsibility  of  managing  leads from all sources
.  Maintaining  detailed  and  accurate pipeline in  CRM and  tracking  the accounts for  updates
.  Leveraging  existing  client relationships and  developing  new ones
.  Providing  direction,  motivation,  and  training  to  the members of team to  ensure they  reach
targets
.  Reviewing  performance of  Inside Sales team and  reporting  to  top  management
.  Analyzing  latest marketing  trends,  tracking  competitors' activities,  and  providing  valuable
inputs for fine-tuning  Sales and  Marketing  strategies
.  Managing  Sales and  Marketing  operations,  and  ensuring  set business targets are met
.  Overseeing  the preparation  of  MIS on  a periodic basis and  providing  information  about the
progress in  the field  to  the top  management
.  Formulating  strategies and  reaching  out to  the unexplored  market segments/ customer  groups
for business expansion
.  Conceptualizing  and  implementing  services plans/ policies for  the organization,  organizing
promotional campaigns,  and  ensuring  accomplishment of  business goals
.  Talking  to  partners regularly  to  explore new business opportunities
.  Building  trusted  relationship  with  existing  customers and  ensuring  that they  understand  the
value proposition  of  working  with  Fujitsu  America in  the specific region
.  Receiving  and  reviewing  RFPs to  determine scope of  work,  communicating  findings to  key
personnel,  and  coordinating  all pre-bid  actions
.  Consistently  generated  high-quality  leads for  Software Services and  Solutions in  the ERP space
(SAP and  Oracle) services on  a regular basis; the leads have a definite potential to  culminate in
a deal
.  Participated  in  Sales & marketing  campaigns such  as ; San  Francisco,  CA; SAP Sapphire-2008,
2009,  2010; Oracle Open  World-2008,  2009,  2010; and  Oracle Collaborate 2008,  2009  and  2010
.  Successful in  generating  revenue for  the company  within  3  months of  joining
.  Rated  Best Performer in  first performance appraisal (with  a 17%  raise)
.  Closed  deal for  $1,250,000
.  Generated  leads worth  $17.5  million  till date
.  Successfully  added  clients like Wal-Mart,  Dawn  foods,  Kraft foods,  Papa Johns etc.
Soltius Inc,  Hyderabad,  India May  2006  -  June 2008
Business Development Manager
.  Identified  prospective customers for Soltius,  communicating  the company's value proposition,
establishing  customer qualification,  and  securing  initial customer  network  assessments and  Field
Sales calls
.  Transitioned  prospects to  Field  Sales at the time of  qualification  and  provided  assistance in  the
relationship  hand-off
.  Responded  to  inbound  leads in  a timely  and  professional manner,  with  the goal of  ensuring  that
Soltius message was accurately  delivered,  and  any  opportunities to  sell products to  the customer
was uncovered
.  Execute marketing  campaigns,  and  provided  feedback  on  the effectiveness of  campaigns
.  Worked  with  Sales teams to  support all activities in  region  or market (USA and  APAC)
.  Researched  and  profiled  targeted  companies to  identify  key  contacts
.  Generated  qualified  leads and  set sales appointments for  Field  Sales team.
.  Tracked  and  documented  activity  within  Sales Automation  system (Salesforce.com)
.  Developed  an  on-going  future business plan  and  enhanced  the public image and  recognition  of
the firm's name within  the business community  through  new business development,  community
outreach,  and  aggressive networking
.  Manager  of the Marketing  team-successfully  oversaw the implementation  of  the entire
Marketing  program
.  Directed  marketing  strategies,  business development plans,  and  promotional activities.
.  Responsible for  training  and  monitoring  the team
s Understand  the business scenario  of enterprise accounts & identify  operational/business
issues in  various lines of  business viz.  sales,  human  resources,  manufacturing,  supply  chain,
financial management.  Work  with  the CXO's and  help  them achieve a better business process
management.
s As part of the Business Development team,  developing  a strategic relationship  with
enterprise accounts and  bringing  in  customer  centricity  in  the sales to  execution  cycle by
engaging  in  relationship  management at all levels within  the prospective organization.
s Penetrating  new enterprise accounts by  drawing  out an  IT strategy  based  on  domain
understanding  and  relationship  with  key  stakeholders/influencers in  the prospective
organization.
s Keeping  a track  of  domain  trends and  conceptualizing  ideas,  resource mobility  to  launch
new initiatives to  address emerging/uncovered  Information  Technology  needs.  Liaison  with
various Fulcrum's Technical teams for  addressing  opportunities/initiatives and  moving  towards
closure.
s Conduct analysis of  all the verticals,  territory  intelligence to  provide critical inputs to  the
team which  help  in  planning  growth  strategies.
2. Role : Consultant ,  Coordinator  ,Director  of  Operations ,Freelance
Project Name  : The Coffee Shop
Team Size : 25
Duration : August2008  to  June 2010
Synopsis : The Coffee Shop  is Pune based  outlet which  provides coffee
based  products to  the consumers.  It involves the 25
3. Project Name  : Business Analyst (MBA Project)
Topic : Personal Portfolio  Management System
Team Size : 1
Duration : Dec2009  to  June 2010
Synopsis : The project was all about designing  the whole Portfolio
management system keeping  individual investor in  the
center  of the whole process.  It involves the derivative
segment ,cash  segment,  account management,  alerts,
value fetching  through  internet
s Performing  Requirement gathering  & Requirement analysis.
s Designing  the SRS document
s Designing  the Vision  & Scope Document
s
Study  of Business Objective
s Study  of  the System Objective
s Study  of  the involved  business process for  the System optimization
s Creating  Use Cases,  UML,  ERD,  DFD,  Sequence Diagrams,  Activity  Diagrams,  class
diagrams,  Collaboration  Diagrams etc.
s SDLC
s Creating  Reports & MIS
s Creating  Test plan,  Test Cases ,  Test Case execution
s Deployment
4. Project Name : Business Analyst/Developer
Title : Multiplex  Management System
Team Size : 5
Duration  : Jan2008  to  April20  08
Synopsis : The project was about designing  the whole Multiplex  management
system by  studying  all the processes includes in  the business
operations of  the Multiplex.  The main  objective behind  this
was to  create the efficient system and  to  reduce the operation
overheads to  enhance the productivity  of the all business processes in
order to  give pleasant customer  service.
s Requirement gathering  & Analysis,  Design  Analysis
s Designing  the SRS document
s
Designing  the Vision  & Scope Document
s Study  of  the involved  business process for  the System optimization
s Creating  Use Cases,  UML,  ERD,  DFD,  Sequence Diagrams,  Activity  Diagrams,  class
diagrams ,  Collaboration  Diagrams Etc.
s SDLC
s Creating  Reports & MIS
s Creating  Test plan,  Test Cases ,  Test Case execution.
s Deployment
5. Project Name : Banking  & Financial Markets & Business Study
Duration  : Nov  2008  to  May2010
Synopsis : Wide varieties of topics been  covered  during  this study  in  order to
obtain  and  gain  the knowledge & working  of  various
financial markets.  The reason  behind  this study  was to  gain  the
exposure in  financial vertical which  is very  essential as to  become
a good  leader,  a good  management professional,  a good  strategic thinker.
s Study  of  Financial markets ,  Capital markets
s Study  of  CRM,  ERP,  SCM
s Business Strategy  formulation
s Business Analysis & Modeling
s Study  of  SWOT,  Value Preposition,  Kaizen,  Competitor analysis Etc.
s Study  of  various Financial system such  as BASEL 1  & BASEL 2,Mortgage Backed
Securities,  Anti money  laundering  etc.,
s Study  of  Indian  Economic Planning
s Study  of  Legal aspects of  Contracts and  measures while designing  the contracts
s Study  of  Demand  & Supply  Mechanism & its relation  with  business & economy
s Study  of  the Business growth  drivers
s Study  of  Indian  Stock  markets
s Study  of  the role of RBI  on  Indian  Businesses
people team working  under  it.  The project was about revamping  the
whole business model and  processes associated  with  it.  The
main  objective of the project was to  increase the top  line and
the bottom line of  the business and  to  reduce the
operational cost.
s Creating  Marketing  plan
s Product Placement & Product Innovation
s Market Research
s Branding
s Vendor  Management
s Co-ordination  of  the daily  business Activities
s Managed  the administrative function  for  CEO
s
Organizing  & Managing  the management meetings
s Inception  of  market driven  products
s Working  on  SAP
s Handling  more than  3000  suppliers from overseas.
s To  see timely  booking  of invoices & payment to  suppliers.
s Bill booking  of  important suppliers invoices.
s
Validation  of invoices and  approval of  them.
s Distribution  of  new suppliers to  Analyst.
s To  check  emails received  in  Comptroller  mailbox  and  update it in  Tracker.
s Non-invoice emails forwarding  to  VTS1  Analyst team.
s Manual entry  of  new supplier  in  MBL forwarding  soft copy  to  relevant analyst.
s Invoices / Declarations sending  to  Razorsight and  same is updating  in  Tracker.
s Following  up  with  suppliers for incorrect or  incomplete invoices/ declarations.
s Daily  data reconciliation.
s Weekly  MIS reporting  to  DGM.
s Monthly  MIS.
s Participation  in  dispute resolution  & negotiation  of  payments.
Worked  in  Autoline Industries Limited,  Pune from 1st Oct'11  to  30th  Sept 12  as Asst.
customer  support.  AIL is manufacturer  of  sheet metal parts,  sub  assemblies & assemblies to
OEMs like Tata Motors,  VW,  AMW,  Cummins & other  Tier-1  suppliers.  The group  has more
than  12  manufacturing  plants with  more than  Rs 400  crores turnover.
s Account receivable,  major  customer  account Tata Motors.
s Making  sales report.
s Hundi preparation.
s Payment follow up
s
Receipt of  payment & account reconciliation.
s Preparing  debit & credit notes.
s Bank  reconciliation
s Weekly  reporting
Worked  with  Bosch  Chassis Systems India Limited,  Chakan  Pune from 1st Oct'10  to  30
Sept'11  as computer  operator  in  accounts department.  I  was there on  contract for  one year.
s Account payable
s
P.O.  & GRN checking
s Bill booking,  processing  and  arranging  of  documents
s Payment to  suppliers & assisting  in  other  accounting  activities.
1. 24  month  experience at \u0022 Tech  Mahindra \u0022 -  Pune as Technical Customer  care
Associates .
Billing  problem.
Internet Troubleshoot -  Online .
Duration: date of  joins 28/10/2009.  15/ 8  / 2011
2. 9  month  experience at Medi Assist Healthcare Services (a unit of  Net Logistics Private
Limited)
Role: Associate (  executive )
Client interaction  & counseling.
Maintaining  the database of  generated  leads
Maintaining  the database
MIS reportsing
Industry  Type :-Insurance
date of joins :-15/ 11/2011
Other  course
OS Know :-  Win  XP ,  Win  7  ,
Tally  7.2
MS   office 2003/ 2007
MS CIT
-  Hardware & Networking
Qualifications
Exam Board  / university Year  Of Passing Percentage B.com Pune University Apr-2007 55  % H.S.C. Maharashtra Board Feb-2004 53% S.S.C. Maharashtra Board Mar-2002 45%
A dynamic professional with  more than  6  Years of qualitative experience in  Back  Office
Operations-KPO / Key  Account Management with  leading  organisations.  Currently  associated
with  SYNTEL LTD (KPO),  Pune as Deputy  Manager  Back  Office Operations.
Experience in  setting  up  and  managing  business operations.  Highly  successful in  building
relationships with  upper-level decision  makers and  business partners.  Adept in  handling
operations,  client servicing  and  team management activities.  Skilled  in  effectively  managing
documents for  streamlining  systems to  facilitate achievement of  organizational objectives and
ensure profitability  of  operations.
An  intense planner  with  demonstrated  abilities in  devising  strategies to  enhance business.
Exceptional relationship  building  and  maintaining  skills with  upper  level decision  makers;
seizing  control of  critical problem areas and  delivering  on  client commitments.  Excellent
interpersonal,  communication  and  organisational skills with  proven  abilities leading  motivated
teams towards achieving  organisational goals.
AREAS OF EXPERTISE -Back  Office Operations ((Capital Market,  Securities,  Finance etc))
S Extending  administrative / back  office support to  the team for  achievement of  the set
targets.
S Coordinating  with  Manager  in  planning  & implementing  monthly  strategies.
S Identifying  loopholes in  the business plans & suggesting  corrective actions to  improve
them.
S Ensuring  maximum customer satisfaction  by  providing  delivery  on  time.
S Solutions oriented  approach  with  excellent relationship  management skills,  successfully
and  consistently  delivering  the responsibilities thereby  streamlining  finance operations leading  to
revenue generation  and  profitability.
S Excellent time management skills with  proven  ability  to  work  accurately  and  quickly
prioritize,  coordinate and  consolidate tasks whilst simultaneously  managing  the diverse range of
functions from multiple sources.
S Adept in  diagnosing,  trouble shooting  and  resolving  complex,  business critical and
technical issues.
S Demonstrated  ability  to  manage human,  financial and  material resources towards the
achievement of  stated  targets/objectives.
Customer  Relationship  Management
1. Managing  customer service operations for  rendering  and  achieving  quality  services.
2. Providing  value added  customer  services by  attending  customer  queries and  issues.
3. Monitoring  the post service activities like follow up  with  the customers,  service
reminders and  handling  customer  grievances for  superior customer service.
Since Dec 2007; SYNTEL LTD,Pune
Deputy  Manager,  Back  Office Operation  since Oct 2012
1. Spearheading  efforts across by  managing  a team of  25  Trainees/associates/Sr  associates
and  by  coordinating  and  liaising  with  the clients
2. Instrumental in  preparing  Dash  Board,SLA and  in  reporting  attrition
3. Handling  the various activities as specified  by  the client within  set time frames.
4.
Handling  Custodian  Bank  Operations
5. Accountable for dealing  with  cash  and  share reconciliation.
6. Responsible for  monitoring  all client trades and  diligently  researching  all failing  trades to
ensure timely  settlement.
7. Adroit in  researching  and  responding  to  discrepancy  inquiries in  order  to  reconcile and
resolve accounting  variances which  include share quantity  breaks,  pricing  exceptions and  cash
breaks
8. Doing  internal reconciliation  of  cash  exceptions and  figuring  out cash  discrepancy.
9. Preparing  various reports and  presenting  the same to  the client within  the specified
deadline.
10.
Training  new hires and  enable them to  settle down  in  the process.
11. Handling  of  the process related  calls with  the oversight team.
12. Working  closely  with  the other  teams for the smooth  functioning  of  the process.
1.
Handling  sales and  marketing  operations & accountable for increasing  sales growth  and
driving  sales initiatives of  Health  Insurance to  achieve business goals.
2. Initiating  & developing  relationships with  key  decision  makers for  business development.
3. Identifying  prospective clients from various sectors thereby  achieving  business targets.
4. Providing  information  about the sales progress to  the management from time to  time.
5. Providing  value added  customer  services by  attending  customer  queries and  issues.
Understanding  the client's requirements & providing  quality  services.
Executive (Warehouse,  Logistic & Inventory)  in  Stallion  Group  Nigeria from Sept 12,  24  July,
13.
Operation  (Logistic & Inventory  Control):
Handled  W//H operation; (Inventory  control,  Logistic,  W/H,  team handling,  Customer
handling  as per  SOP)
Implement Planning  & Execution  of W/H operation  flow & co-ordination  with  client &
HO..
MIS & Analysis:
Monthly  reconcile Ledger  vs ERP vs physical
Stack  planning  & Ageing  MIS (movement & balance)
Clarification  on  monthly  & quarter Auditor  query,
Raising  MIS & Co-ordinate with  customer for  Order  booked  vs delivery  & balance PO/
physical qty
Tool used: ERP,  Excel pivotal table,  formulas,  Lookup  etc and  ERP report checking;
Achievement: Handled  Logistic & Inventory  Operation,  ERP & MIS / Analysis as per  SOP &
expectation  of  HOD.
Sr.  Executive Project Operation  (Material Mgmt (Reverse Logistic,  Inventory  ,  ),  Commercial
(Customer  Order  & Invoice) in  Alcatel-Lucent Ltd,  from Dec 07  to  Sep  12  (Off Roll Dec 07  to
Jan  10; On  Roll from 11  Jan  10  to  10  Sep12  ;)
Material Mgmt
Planned  & Execute model to  keep  right qty  at right place to  keep  KPI
Spare parts Mgmt & Reverse logistic
Working  on  MRP/ BOM with  technical & raise PR/PO,
Follow-up  with  delivery  at abroad  Alcatel factory  & local vendor,  Maintain  Tracker &
Invoice processing.
Handling  3  pl W/H in  different branches
Reconciling  weekly  reports at Branch  & cluster  level
Vendor  invoice
MIS
Spare parts tracker,  reconcile,
Failure rate vs as per  MTBF and  planning  spare parts availability  accordingly
Spare parts PO & cost occurred  in  logistic & consumable (need  to  take in  cost)
Inventory  book  value
Monthly  Customer capitalize active inventory  (Key  KPI)
Order  & Customer  invoice & Co-ordinate for finance data for  project (Supporting  Project
Finance Controller)
I&C PO Invoice ; Collecting  test report & updating  in  tracker; taking  approval from
customer; giving  finance dept to  raise invoice; help  collection  team to  decide to  opening  LC  &
sorting  query  at customer  end;
Service PO & ; Collecting  approval for customer detail or  active site; taking  approval
from customer; advising  finance team to  raise invoice;
Vendor  Invoice & PO; Maintaining  record  &
MIS;
Total invoice generate vs cost occurred  on  subcontractor  for I&C.
Open  & Close PO,  LC  expiry  detail of PO
Invoice tracker  upto  release of payment (release periodically)
Service & Spare parts invoice & PO tracker
Achievement: As per  instruction  of Sr.,  Successfully  planned  implement implemented  Spare
parts SCM model
As SPOC  Successfully  handled  transitioning  (won  competitive circle
Successfully  handled  as SME/ SPOC for  Project Spare parts Mgmt/ Customer
invoice,  Capitalize invenotory
Sr.  Executive Commercial From 16  November  2006  to  10  Dec 2007; M/s Jindal Group  of
companies
Commercial support: Commercial (Customer invoice & payment follwup),  Logistic & Sales,
Liaison  with  Exchange,  Sale,  Procurement.  Industry  Commodity
Sale/ Hedging  (Cummins Seeds,  Black  Pepper,  Menth  oil,  Guar  Gum & Guar  Seed)  from
different channels of like Mandis,
Fair idea of  Procurement/ Vendor  development for sourcing  of different agro-
commodities.
Hiring  Godown/ collateral issue with  banks;
Releasing  qty  from bank.Dealing  with  Vendors,  Manufacturers,,Govt officials and
Farmers for various functions.
Planning  and  execution  of  effective supply  chain  system to  deliver superior  value to
customers.
Handling  deliveries through  NCDEX and  MCX & compliance with  exchange.
Get updated  for fresh  norms & analysis of  exchange e.g.  Exchange Circulars/ Govt
circulars.
Preparation  & presentation  of  MIS reports of  Agro  commodity  business; e.g.  expense
occurred  to  meet future commitment (Godown  rent/ delivery  expense vs.  future selling  price) to
making  decision  relate to  hedging  or  deciding  to  deliver future commitment through  fresh
buying  or from hedge qty.
Technical and  Fundamental analysis of  Commodities listed  at exchange; e.g.  comparison
of  quality  discount/ shortage.
Timely  submission  of  various compliance reports to  exchanges & doing  collateral issue
for godown,  ( Also  Working  as a compliance officers)
Managed  Dematerialization,  Re materialization,  Re.  Validation.
Handling  the branch  expenses & keeping  total operation  cost and  .
ACHIEVEMENTS:-Handle claims from NCDX/ NCML for  qty./ Quality  issue; And  settle down
the same in  company  benefits Handle operation  in  Jodhpur/ Unjha/ Chandausi for  purchase/ sale
of  commodity
Store Incharge,  From Dec 05  to  12  Nov  06  M/s Sakha Engineers Pvt Ltd  (Industry  Construction
& Mechanical).
Vendor  compliance: maintains updating  rates/vendor in  diff.  location.
Maintained  stock  register  and  inventory  control on  the base of Register  and  Excel.
Maintaing  fast movement; cost and  value of  inventory.
Detail of material for raising  the project invoice; Material MIS reports:(Running  pipe
supply  + billable item)
ACHIEVEMENTS:-Developed  list of  vendor  at NCR  Gurgaon  and  Noida for  procuring  the
material/
Supervisor  Operation,  Mithal International (CHA)  July  04  To  Dec- 05  Handle operation  in  Dry
port,  Logistic,  W/H
6.1 years of experience in the field of software testing, currently working as a  Test Engineer  with
WMS Gaming solutions India  pvt. Ltd., Pune.
Graduate in Electronics and communications engineering from ICFAI University in year of 2007.
Solid expertise in manual testing for projects during all phases, familiar with the life cycle and different
phases, requirements in a project and performing end to end Testing responsibility.
Working extensively on Functional, System, Integration and Regression Testing assignments.
Having 4.5 years of working experience with Healthcare Industry/US Healthcare industry.
Well versed with Healthcare Industry/EHR Standards such as HIPAA for data  security, HL7 for
interoperability and ICD10.
Having good knowledge of PBM  and Healthcare insurance Industry esp. claim processing and plan
creations in AS400 environment.
Currently working and having good knowledge of Casino Gaming Industry, spec. testing Slot machines/
EGM/VLT for Class II specific environment.
Skilled in good team work,  independent functioning, taking up new  challenges & profitable for the
company, planning and execution of ideas.
An excellent communicator with exceptional team building and interpersonal skills.
WORK  EXPERIENCE (73 Months)
Designation Organization Duration Work Field
Test Engineer WMS Gaming solutions 20th Jun'12   Till date IT-Software
Test Specialist IBM  India Pvt. Ltd. 3rd Dec'09   8th Jun'12 IT-Software
Software Engineer Satyam Computer
Services Pvt.  Ltd
29 Oct'07   2nd Dec'09 IT-Software
1) WMS Gaming solution  India  Pvt. Ltd.
Duration:  20th Jun'12   Till date
As a Team member,  Major responsibilities during this tenure are:
Understanding requirement, writing Test cases, review  and execution of Test cases.
To  test all major functionalities of game
Starting from loading it to  the EGM, running and
testing it using Slot Accounting System (SAS), OPTOS and GSL Monitor tool.
Verify accounting and game play features.
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
Project Summary
WMS Gaming is a manufacturer of slot machines,  video lottery terminals and software to  help
casinos manage their gaming operations. The company is based in Waukegan, Illinois.
Project's requirement is to test all the functionalities of Class II based themes.
1) IBM India  Pvt. Ltd.
Duration:  3rd Dec'09   8th Jun'12
RxClaim project had several modules, releases in every 2 months. Worked on more than 8 releases as a
Module Lead/Team  member, Major responsibilities during this tenure were:
Understanding requirement, estimation, task allocation,  status reporting.
Creating Test case scenarios, creating setups, writing Test cases, review and execution of
Test cases.
Responsible for the accurate processing and completion of medical claims,  includes
creating/processing claims and plan setups.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System Integration, smoke,
Regression Testing  and review  of deliverables
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
Project Summary
Healthcare industry products (drugs) are subsidized by insurance companies and services
companies like CVS CAREMARK, etc  through different schemes (plans) which provide benefits.
Health card is provided by the Health Insurance Company to  each member. A member goes to a
prescriber, to get prescription for drugs. Member then goes to a pharmacy and purchases the
drugs and then claims for the drugs purchased.  Pharmacy submits a claim to Caremark for the
member purchased drugs. The claim process begins when a  member goes to  a  pharmacy and
purchases the prescribed drugs. The pharmacy submits a  claim using the member's information
and BIN/Process or Control/Group Number (BPG) information. The claim is routed to  the switching
company or \u0022Switch\u0022 via  the BPG. The switch then determines which PROCESSOR should process
the claim. RxCLAIM  application uses the BPG  to  identify the claim  and begins eligibility validations
and the benefit plan for coverage. Once all the information has been verified, RxCLAIM
application will send a  message back to the pharmacy that communicates a paid or rejected
claim.
For its globalization, application was kept compliant with global health standards like HIPPA (for
data  security).
Project 2:  WGS Transition and Transformation    Process Renovation
Platform:  Windows XP
Technology:  Mainframes
Role:  Team Member
Front End:  Mainframes
Client:  Wellpoint, USA.
Duration:  3rd Mar'12   8th Jun'12
WGS- Process Renovation project had several modules, releases in every month. Worked on 2 releases as
a  Team member, Major responsibilities during this tenure were:
Understanding requirement, Creating Test case scenarios,  creating setups, writing Test
cases, review and execution of Test cases.
Responsible for the accurate processing and completion of medical claims,  includes
creating/processing claims and setups.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System Integration,
Regression Testing  and review  of deliverables
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
2) Satyam Computer Services Pvt. Ltd
Duration:  29 Oct'07   2nd Dec'09
Project 1:  Electronic Health  Record
Platform:  Windows XP
Language:  C#
Technology:  .NET
Role:  Tester
Front End:  ASP.NET
Back End:  SQL Server 2005
Client:  Emergency Management and Research  Institute, Hyderabad
Creating Test case scenarios, creating setups, writing Test cases, review and execution of
Test cases.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System, Integration, smoke
and Regression Testing and review  of deliverables
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
Meeting with Clients
Project Summary
EHR is web portal that stores the each and every health information of a patient from cradle to
grave. Users of this portal are patient,  doctor, Insurance provider, pharmacies, and laboratories.
Through this portal, a  fresh patient signs up for his user id and password. With his user id and
password he logs in to the portal and enters his personal details, medical history, family history,
medication (current/past), therapies, etc. The same process follows for doctor for signing up.
When doctor logs in, he searches for a patient. After the completion of search the all the details
entered by patient are available to the doctor (if allowed by patient).  Doctor can create an
Episode for this patient, under that episode;  he has got a  provision of creating Visits and events.
This portal also gives facility of order management where in doctor can place order for patient
and laboratories after doing the order, enters result through the same portal.
For its globalization, application was kept compliant with global health standards like HL7
(for interoperability), HIPAA (for data  security).
Project 2:  DB Independent Framework
Platform:  Windows XP
Language:  C#
Technology:  .NET
Role:  Tester
Front End:  ASP.NET
Back End:  SQL Server 2005
Clients:  Emergency Management and Research Institute, Hyderabad.
Health Management and Research  Institute, Hyderabad.
Write and execute SQL queries.
Creating Test case scenarios, creating setups, writing Test cases, review and execution of
Test cases.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System, Integration, smoke
and Regression Testing and review  of deliverables
Meeting with Clients
Project Summary
DB Independent Framework provides an abstraction to interact with databases without specifying
specific   Data  Source in application code. Data  Provider specific   methods are decoupled from
application code.
Responsibility  of  production  and  online Quality
Process Optimization  and  Trouble Shooting
Rejection  Analysis and  Corrective Action
Material handling  and  Man  power  utilization
Tryouts of new Moulds and  Materials
Mould  change Monitoring
To  improve production  efficiency  and  machine utilization
Lump  reduction  and  Rejection  analysis
Interaction  with  Maintenance and  Tooling  department to  solve the problems
Exposure
Machines : SPH   450,  POLO   350,  ENGEL   40,  SPH   300,
SM   450,  EPM   140,  HP   80,  ST   80.
Material Handled : PC/ABS/HIPS/PA/PP/LLDPE/LLDP/HDPE
2. Work  Experience:
Worked  as a Production  Engineer  in  MOTHERSON AUTOMOTIVE TECHNOLOGY &
ENGINEERING.,  (MATE) Chennai.
MATE is the leading  manufacturing  of automotive parts for  Hyundai,  Ford,  General Motors,
Toyota and  Borg    Warner  Colling  System.
My  Exposure
Machines Handled
Hands on  experience with  latest Injection  Molding  Machines ranging  from 60T to  775T
Battenfeld  Machines  : 60T,  160T & 200T
L & T Machines : 150T,  200T
Cincinnati Milacron  : 400T,  660T & 775T
FCS Machines : 60T,  150T & 260T
Windsor  Machines : 300T,  350T (POLOSMART)  & 450T
Material Handled
PA,  PC,  PBT,  PVC,  POM,  ABS,  (PC  + PBT)  Alloy,  (ABS + PA) Alloy,  PP,  HDPE,  LDPE.
Handling  Gas Assist Injection  Molding  Machine and  Knowledge of  Air  ejection  Mould
Knowledge of KAIZAN,  5S,  KANBAN etc.,
Blow plast industries is manufacturing  jerry  cans,  carboys,  drums for  chemical filling  and  food
items for airproof  containers manufacturing  of  Printer  accessories for  WIPRO,  Body  case for
BPL and  razor  for  WILKINSON,  AUG 1999  to  April 2004.
From April 9th  2005  to  April 30th  2006  have worked  in  M/s Sycamore (I) Consultancy  Services
as an  Office Assistant cum Secretary.
*  Fixing  appointment of  Candidates and  scheduling  interview with  the client.
*  Searching  suitable resumes from the search  Engines we have.
*  To  segregate the CV according  to  the skill required  by  the clients.
*  Maintaining  candidate and  employee records and  their  status in  the master report.
*  Keeping  records minutes of  the meeting.
*  Preparing  Salary  and  Vouchers.
*  Searching  new websites through  Internet.
From May  2nd  2006  to  Feb  28,  2007  have worked  in  R.B.  Mehta & Co.  as an  Assistant Officer
cum Secretary.
*  Preparing  Sales reports
*  Preparing  Sales Bill,  Purchase Bills
*  Keeping  records of  Generation  of weekly,  quarterly  and  yearly  reports etc.
*  Maintaining  Factory  Stock  records.
*  Preparing  D.O.  files.
*  Preparing  Daily  reports and  updating  in  filing
*  Filing,  Documentation,  Dispatching.
*  Travel Booking
From March  12th  2007  to  till date working  in  Donear Industries Ltd.,  as a Secretary  of Vice
President.
*  Fixing  appointment,  meeting
*  Keeping  records minutes of  the meeting
*  Domestic & International Travel booking.
*  Booking  of  Hotels,  Conference Rooms,  Executives Rooms,  Auditoriums etc.  for  Client
meeting.
*  Booking  Car  for a Client,  Visitors.
*  Booking  Car  for a trip  wherever my  Seniors are going.
*  Booking  Guest House wherever  my  seniors required  near to  Station  / Airport.
*  Maintaining  Daily  Dairy  records of  the Senior Person.
*  Organizing  Small Parties for  the Senior  Person
*  Sending  mails,  Letter  Drafting  .
*  Getting  Approval for  Travel Advance Request from Finance Dept.
*  Getting  Approval for  Travel Reimbursement,  Conveyance,  Leave.
*  Applying  for Leave on  behalf of  my  senior.
*  Scheduling  Business Meeting,  Client Meeting.
*  Attending  Phone Calls of  Incoming  & Outgoing.
*  Handling  other Official functions and  other  day  to  day  routine work.
*  Applying  Medical,  Domiciliary  Claim on  behalf  of my  Seniors.
Notice Period  : 15  Days
Lean  Principals
Presentation  Skills
E Mail Writing  Skills
Advance XL
Effective Time Management
Period Organization  / Location Designation/Responsibility Jan  2006  Onwards GENPACT,  Jaipur Team Leader  (Process Developer),  Global Mobility  Services.
Support the Payroll and  other  Payments for Expatriates,  both  for US and  Global locations.
Dec 2002-  Dec 2005 Bharati Infotel Limited,  Faridabad Sales Officer,  DSL Connections.
Responsibility  of  Customer  retention  and  Growth  for  Faridabad  Territory,  Delhi Circle.
Oct 2000    Dec 2002 Asian  lak  Health  Foods Limited  (Bisleri) Area Field  Manager,  Distribution  and  Consignee Agents
Manage Distribution  network,  Screen  Competitor  activities in  the region,  Device Schemes to
1. Qualified  Electrical engineer  with  over 5  years of experience in  Textile,  Petrochemical
Industry  in  India/Abroad.  Superb  management and  labor relations.  Great ability  to  plan  and
effectively  apply  cost-savings and  service developing  process.  Expert in  system planning,
precautionary  maintenance,  budget managing  and  designing  regular  procedures and  training
plans.Persuing  MBA from Sikkim Manipal University  through  correspondence.
Company: Pt Gajah  Tunggal Tbk,  SBR Division,  Indonesia.  (Nov'07  to  Mar  '09)
Role/ Designation: Technical Advisor  for Electrical & Instrument.
F  0
B  7
Support to  Plant Manager  in  the technical and  overall management system.
F  0
B  7
Report to  General Manager/Director
F  0
B  7
Organized  plan  that cut maintenance overtime,  improved  system consistency  during  main
system interruptions and  decreased  outage times for all 4  substations.
F  0
B  7
Advising  and  Coordinating  for  Ordering  Machine Parts,  Testing,  Calibrating  and
Installing  of  all types of Transmitter,  Control valve,  Pressure gauge,  Temperature gauge and
Flow meter.  PLC's,  A.C Drives,  and  Installing  Electrical Panels.
F  0
B  7
Handled  peak  calculating  equipment installation  and  set up,  which  resulted  in  yearly
savings of  almost $200,000.Planned  precautionary  maintenance programs.  Investigated
programs for  the future power  provisions.
Company: Pt Sai Apparel Industries,  Indonesia.  (April '05  -  Nov  '07)
Role/ Designation: Electrical Engineer/Management
F  0
B  7
Primary  duties include attending  meetings,  working  on  strategic planning,  and  tracking
projects.  operation  & testing  of sub-station  equipments.
F  0
B  7
Responsibilities include studying  technical manuals,  articles,  and  other  publications as
well as designing,  testing,  and  assembling  various devices.
F  0
B  7
Planned  and  executed  precautionary  maintenance plan  for  most important power
substations and  delivery  facilities.
F  0
B  7
Taking  care of Installation  and  assembling  various kinds of Machinery.  Discussing,
Negotiating,  Convincing,  managing  with  the Vendors,  Contractors,  Customers.
Company: Screenotex  Engineers Pvt.  Ltd,  India (From April -  2004- April '05)
Role/ Designation: Maintenance / Operation  Incharge
F  0
B  7
Making  and  install electrical panel.  Checking  and  maintenance Contactors,  Relays,
motors,  Electrical,  Mechanical as well as Electronic accessories and  fittings.  problem solving  &
trouble shooting.
F  0
B  7
Convene the meetings of  Engineers to  upgrade the system.
F  0
B  7
Prepared  the reports on  works done.Sought opinions of the customers to  upgradethe
quality.
PRESENT JOB:-
Employer:-N.T.P.C,Kaniha,(Odisha)
Post:-  Site-in-Charge,(Elect-Maint),Contractual basis
Date of  Joining:-1st.jan.2009  to  till date.
E.S.P Maintenance,
Operation  & Maintenance of LT(415  Volt)PMCC  Panel
Maintenance & Trouble Shooting  of  ABB  make microprocessor  based  thyrister  D.C
drive kin  main  drive D.C moter.
Predictive & preventive Maintenance of  6.6KV HT Panel & its associative switchger &
protection  system.
AC drive ABB  make (ACS 550).
EARLIER  JOB:-
Employer:-SHIV SHAKTI SPONGE IRON LIMITED,(JAMSHEDPUR)
Post:-  Asst.Engineer,(Elect-Maint)
Date of  Joining:-1st.May.2005  to  02.07.2006.
Fresher
CAREER  PROFILE: MULTIMEDIA SOFTWARES:
Illustration
: Adobe Illustrator,
CorelDraw.
Image Editing  Adobe Photoshop
Image Ready
Text Editing
: Adobe InDesign,
Adobe Pagemaker
Video  Editing :
Premier  Pro
Combustion
Adobe After Effect
Sound  Editing
: Sound  Forge  3D Software : Autodesk  3DS Max  9
Autodesk  Maya 9
PERSONAL DETAILS Date of  Birth : 08-  july  -1987 Marital Status : Single Father's Name : Omvir Singh  Fauzdar Nationality : Indian Hobbies : Watching  Movies
Listening  to  music,
Photography
Surfing. Communication  Address
:: 195/5  Ramesh  Market,
Street   1  Garhi,
East of  Kailash
New Delhi - 110065
Areas of  Interest : Graphic designing,
Layout Designing.
Visual Effects
Motion  Graphics
Fresher
CAREER  PROFILE: MULTIMEDIA SOFTWARES:
Illustration
: Adobe Illustrator,
CorelDraw.
Image Editing  Adobe Photoshop
Image Ready
Text Editing
: Adobe InDesign,
Adobe Pagemaker
Video  Editing :
Premier  Pro
Combustion
Adobe After Effect
Sound  Editing
: Sound  Forge  3D Software : Autodesk  3DS Max  9
Autodesk  Maya 9
PERSONAL DETAILS Date of  Birth : 08-  july  -1987 Marital Status : Single Father's Name : Omvir Singh  Fauzdar Nationality : Indian Hobbies : Watching  Movies
Listening  to  music,
Photography
Surfing.
Communication  Address : 195/5  Ramesh  Market,  Street   1
Garhi,  East of Kailash
New Delhi - 110065
Areas of  Interest : Graphic designing,
Visual Effects
Motion  Graphics
1.  Project name-  MFP-CPE-  Here worked  on  Clearcase tool on  UNIX environment and  on
C++.
Activities done here:
Worked  on  enhancing  the features of  printers by  porting(including  changes on  code of
parent printers etc).  This includes creating  a config  spec,  checking  out files ,porting  necessary
changes here ,building  the code and  checking  if  the necessary  requirement is been  implemented.
Worked  on  gdb  debugger  to  fix  a lot of  defect codes.  This allows to  trace the code in
stepwise ,insert breakpoints at the error  location  etc.
1. Project name-  RMS team
Activities done here:
Worked  on  a very  interesting  tool called  WJA (Web  Jet Admin)  which  is basically  used  to
remotely  access all the printers in  the network.
It is used  to  defect fix  any  errors by  making  changes in  the .dao  file associated  with  each
printer.  A lot of  defects like this have been  sorted  out.
Also  worked  on  a portal called  RMS portal where various testing  of  many  portlets had  to
be done like Event Flight Recorder,  Photocenter  Settings etc.
Also  lot of  technical seminars have been  given  by  me on  various tools like Clearcase ,
WJA etc.
Done coding  on  html ,  javascript etc
Also  worked  on  assembly  languages microcontrollers .
Ingersoll-Rand  India Limited  a multi product,  multinational company  is a part of  Ingersoll-Rand
Worldwide,  USA.  IR India manufactures large variety  of  compressors ranging  from small air
cooled  reciprocating  air  systems to  large centrifugal installations as well as comprehensive
service for  all makes of air  compressors.
Currently  working  in  their  service center as Apprentice Engineer  from 16th  July,2009
Decide daily  workload  with  my  team member.
s Supervising  assembly  & package area.
s Take daily  shortage & issue short material.
s Handling  whole department in  absence of My  team member.
Technical Training:-
s Undergone for Technical Training  at \u0022INGERSOLL RAND (INDIA) LTD.\u0022 at GIDC
Naroda\u0022 Ahmedabad  - for  the duration  of 10  days.
Industrial visit:-
s Industrial visit at 'Alang' Bhavnagar,  Gujarat.
s Industrial visit at 'G.E.B' at Gandhinagar,Gujarat.
Relevant Course Work:-
s Pro-engineering
s Autocad
I  have 2.3  years experience in  cad  projects.
Worked  as Software Developer  at Globelink  pvt ltd,  Chandigarh  for  6  months.
Worked  as a Project Trainee at Punjab  Communication  Limited,  Mohali for  six  months.
Worked  as an  assistant professor(MBA-IT)  in  CMTR  ,CAT affiliated  MBA college.(3.5
years)
Online Author  (www.oboulo.com)
0-1  Years Experience working  in  a Chartered  Accountant Firm.
3 Working  with  Kilmist InfoTech  Pvt Ltd,  Bangalore from March  2010    Till Date as a
SQA Test Engineer.
Technical Exposure
Operating  System Windows 2000/XP/Vista/7  and  UNIX Languages C,  C++,  Dot Net,  HTML. RDBMS SQL server 2008. Test Automation  Tools QTP 8.2  and  Load  Runner
Project #1 SpryBill (CASLiberty). Client Name Highland  Lake Software (HLS),  USA. Technologies NET,  SQL Server  2008,  IIS,  Test Track  Pro  7.5. Tools QTP 8.2  and  Load  Runner. Team Size 10 Role Test Engineer Duration March  2010    Till Date
Abstract
SpryBill supports the processing  and  billing  of  different sort of  usages like calls,  Messages,  Data
Transfer,  Connect Time,  Storage and  Internet,  etc.  Telecom industries can  use this software to
process the telephone usage,  rate those usages and  generate bill statements for  the
customers.CAS requires that user  should  provide enough  information  about the customer to
render a correct bill,  in  the format desired.  So  we should  be able to  setup  the customer  in  the
system.  User  should  get the data for  the customers and  feed  into  the system.  We should  be able to
group  the customers into  departments.  Once we setup  the customer  then  each  customer  can  have
one or  multiple phone numbers.  We talk  about phone usage,  eventually  usages will be associated
with  the phone numbers.  If  customers are having  multiple phone numbers then  it can  be grouped
into  departments.
Understanding  the client requirements.
Involved  in  preparation  & Execution  of test cases.
Involved  in  User  interface testing.
Involved  in  Smoke,  Functional,  Retesting  and  Regression  testing.
Involved  in  Defect Tracking.  Interacted  with  the client on  a daily  basis.
Project #2 SpryBill Customer Care Services. Client Name Highland  Lake Software (HLS) Technologies ASP.net,  SQL Server 2008,IIS,  IE 6&8, Mozi lla Fire Fox,  TTP 7.5 Tools Load  Runner Team Size 4Role Test Engineer Duration Jun  2010  Aug  2010  (Middle of  above project)
Abstract
SpryBill customer  care site provides the customer  to  pay  customer's bill online through
PayPal.  It has two  roles that are Admin  and  Customer
a. Admin: -  Admin  has all control on  entire application.  He creates customer  records and
provides user  id  and  password  credentials to  customers.  If  customer  sends bank  check  to  admin,
after  clearance of check  he can  make invoice status as paid.
b. Customer: -  Customer  can  see the invoice details and  it allows the customer to  pay  bill
through  PayPal.
Understanding  the Client Requirements with  the help  of the document.
Developing  and  Execution  of test cases as per  requirements.
Performing  Smoke Testing,  Regression  testing.
Involved  in  the Browser  Compatibility  testing.
Involved  in  PayPal sandbox  testing.
Reporting  Bugs.
Retesting  the cases where defect has been  resolved  by  the developers.
BBA Completed  From MDU Rothak(Harayana).
MBA Persuining  From Sikhim Manipal University.
BBA Completed  From CCS University  (Meerut).
High  voltage underground  cable laying
3).Larsen  & Toubro  Ltd(ECC Division) :-  As Site Engineer   Electrical
Worked  in  Delhi Metro  Rail Project at Central Secretriat Station  for  International
Metro  Civil Contractor(IMCC)  Delhi.
1  Overall responsibility  for  site work,  installation.
2  Installation  of  temporary  construction  power  and  lighting  network  in  consultation  with
the operation  group.
3. Installation  of  Earth  Mats for  Main  Earth  Grid  & Settelite Earthmate &
also  MET's(Through  50x6  Copper Flat).
4  Installation  of  Cable Trays inside Substations,  Station  Control Room(SCR).
5  Providing  primary  and  secondary  supports to  the routes of  cable tray.
6  Laying  of  underground  cables for  HV & LV power  distribution.
7  Installation  Transformers,  Switchgears,  Control Panels and  related  accessories in  the ASS.
8  Installation  & Testing  of Motors of  different capacity  and  rating.
9  Installation  and  making  operational different lighting  fixtures
F  0
B  7
On  building,
F  0
B  7
Platform Level,  Concourse Level & also  Undercraft Level.
F  0
B  7
On  street lighting  poles,
F  0
B  7
Inside Substation,  Control Room and  Office lighting  with  false ceiling.
10  Conduits & Cable Trays Installation  for CCTV,  P.A.  system.
11  Installation  of  HVAC units and  heavy  duty  blower  for  effective cooling  and  air flow.
12  Installation  of  Split AC & FCU.
13  Conducting  final inspection  after  installation  of  Electrical Equipments and  systems.
As a Supervisor--  Process Control Technology  PVT LTD
1. Installation  of  Cable Trays & Conduits.
2. HV & LV Cable laying  & also  glanding  + termination  for it.
3. Installation  & supporting  of  Power & Distribution  Transformer  & DG sets.
4. Installation,  Testing  & Commissioning  of  Area Light with  Photo  Cell.
5. Installation  of  HT/LT Switchgear  of different ratings.
6. Adapting  High  Standard  of  safety  & field  quality  assurance.
Computer Literacy:
Packages: MS Office 2007(MS Word,  MS Exel,  MS Power Point)
and  Internet etc.
Design  Tools: Auto  CAD 2007
Import-Export Policy  Procedural,  Duty  Drawback  & JDGFT Related  Matters,
Co-ordination  with  Customs Clearing  & Freight Forwarding  Agents
Bank  & Insurance Policy  Coverage related  Activities
General Office Administration
Worked  for M/s.  Hystandard  Hydroservices Pvt.,  Ltd.,  from Dec 1992  to  Feb  1997,
handling  Commercial and  General Administrative related  activities.
Worked  for M/s.  Kochi Logistics Services Pvt.,  Ltd.,  from Mar  1997  to  March  2000  as
Documentation  Executive handling  Import-Export Policy-Procedure related  matters for
M/s.  Motorola India Limited,  Bangalore
M/s.  Motorola India Electronics Limited,  Bangalore
M/s.  Philips India Limited
M/s Sanyo  LSI
M/s Sun  Micro  Systems
M/s.  Wipro  GE Medical Systems
Since April 2000  working  on  Periodic Contractual / Consultant /Assignment Basis
Worked  for Convergent Communications (India)  Pvt.,  Ltd.  (Dealers in  Networking
Equipments),  Bangalore,  from January  2001  to  September 2011  as support to  Materials,
Accounts and  Stores Department handling  Commercial Related  Activities,
n Preparation  Purchase Order
n Reconciliation  & Generating  of  Goods Inward  Note
n Stocking  Checking
n
General Commercial Support to  the requirement of  Seniors
n Re-Export of Repair and  Return  of  Goods under  general and  duty  drawback  scheme.
n Independently  Handling  Duty  Drawback  under Section  75
n Periodic Insurance Declaration  & Timely  Renewal of Policies
n Support to  Accounts Department
Handled  Import-Export Policy-Procedural Related  Activities for  100% Export Oriented  Units
under  STPI-Customs Private Bonded  Warehouse
Worked  for Consultant on  Sub-Contractual basis   Bond  Period  Extension  for Sasken,
Bangalore
1002,  II Stage I  Block  11th  Main  Basveswara Nagar  Bangalore   560  079
Telephone No.  2322  0473  e-Mail ID   sunil3md@gmail.com ; sunil3md@yahoo.co.in Mobile
#  9880785391
Page 1/3
Being  a Support to  Purchase and  Accounts Department for  ANZ Information  Technology  Pvt
Ltd,  Bangalore for the period  from May  2003  to  Dec 2003  have handled  independently  Import
Export Related  Assignments   (Details as per  Annexure Attached)
Represented  through  Supreme Freight Forwarders.,  Bangalore from Dec 2003  to  April 2003  as
support to  Accounts Department of  Hughes Software,  Bangalore,  have handled  independently
Import Export Assignments -  (Details as per Annexure Attached)
Represented  through  Professional Access,  Bangalore from Apr  2004  to  Sept 2004  as support to
Accounts Department of  Swiss Re Shared  Services Private Limited,  Bangalore have handled
independently  Import Export Assignments - (Details as per  Annexure Attached)
Represented  through  Bax  Global Pvt.,  Ltd.,  Bangalore from Sept 2004  to  Jan  2005  as support to
Accounts Department of  GE Capital,  Bangalore,  have handled  independently  Import Export
Assignments - (Details as per  Annexure Attached)
Represented  through  Bax  Global Pvt.,  Ltd.,  Bangalore from Mar 2005  to  May  2005  as support to
Logistics Department of  Honeywell Technologies,  Bangalore,  have handled
n Capital Goods Enhancement Project
n Export Invoicing
Worked  for Swiss Re Shared  Services India Pvt Ltd.,  Bangalore,  from July  2006  to  June 2007  as
support to  Accounts and  Purchase Department handling  independently  Import Export Related
Assignments   (Details as per  Annexure Attached)
Presently  involved  in  Part Time Online Jobs
Internet Marketing
Business & Commercial Adposting
HR Consultancy
Data Entry  Operations
Programmes Earn  per Click
Formfilling  Jobs
- Diploma in  Architecture
Institute: Girls Polytechnic Patiala (SST Nagar,  Rajpura Road)
Year:  2006-2009
- Diploma in  Archicad
Institute: Cadd  Center
Year  June 2010-  Dec 2010
Advance Diploma in  Graphics,  Multimedia & Web  Designing
Institute: ICAII
Year:  2010-Still.
7  months working  with  Ar.  Harpreet Kaur  Dhillon  Ludhiana as a Architect Assistant
7  months working  with  Akzonobel Dulux  Paint Studio  as a Color  Consultant
7.5  months working  with  Bull Doors India Limited  as a regional designer.
PRESENTLY WORKING
Part Time work  as a Instructor of  Auto  cad  and  3ds max  in  ICAII B.R.S.  Nagar  Ludhiana
SALARY STRUCTURE
At Present I  am earning  13000/-  + Expenses
Part Time Instructor earning  6000/-
Expected  20000/-
At present I  am working  in  Excel Crop  Care Limited,  Bhavnagar  as an  trainee
engineer  since 01/02/2011  to  till date
s Knowledge of Distributed  Control System,  Programmable Logic Controller.
s Working  on  Electrical,  instrumentation  field
6  month  Experience in  Power  Tech  Marine,  Bhavnagaras a Maintenance Department -
Electrical engineer
Computer knowledge:Proficient with
Microsoft Word,  Microsoft Excel,  Power point
C,  LAB  view,  Windows 98,  MS Office
Internet
Special achievements:
First Rank  Archived  In  Safety  Examination  4TH March  2011
Event: Safety  day  at Excel Crop  Care Limited,  Bhavnagar
Seminar On  Public Governance & Corporate Social Responsibility
2
Event: `Productivity  week  celebration' of  KSPC (Kutch  Saurashtra Productivity
Council)
Certificate \u0022A\u0022 Examination  Of 3  Gujarat NevalNCC  Unit
Event: under  the authority  of  Ministry  of  Defence,  Government of  India
As a Supervisor  in  Super Tech  Diamond  Tools Pvt.  Ltd.Plot no.  15,16,17  Sector
10,Behind  R.K.Hospital Kankroli ,Rajsamand  (Rajasthan)  India from 14.08.2005  to  02.08.2007.
As an  Accountant in  Super  Tool Industries Plot no.  7,Sector IIDC  SIDCUL BHEL,
Haridwar  (Uttarakhand)  India from 03.08.2007  to  30.08.2008.
As a Manager  in  Super  Tool Industries,  Plot no.  7,Sector  IIDC  SIDCUL BHEL,
Haridwar  (Uttarakhand)  India from 30.08.2008  to  continuous.
As a Supervisor- To  lead  the team,  manage the production,  Handling  the stone cutting
tools .and  report to  the owner.
As an  Accountant-watching  all type accounting  in  Tally  7.2  like (purchase ,sell,  PF,  ESI
payment ,receiving  ,,data mailing  to  the head  office ,all type form issue to  parties,  and  receiving
etc.),banking  ,pay  rolling  ,scrutinizes,  and  manage the accounts department ,and  report to  the
owner.
As a Manager-  Watching  the accounts department ,to  lead  the supervisors,  recruiting  the
manpower,  Income tax  department,  sale tax  department,  Excise department,  Auditing  works,
and  other government department works ,make summery  report of  production,  Income and
expense,  and  all management of company  works ,etc.
Strengths and  weakness
Work  in  challangious situation.
Listen  every  person's suggestion.
Strong  and  positive thinking.
Ability  to  lead  a team.
Faith  & confidence in  myself.
n Working  as Power System Engineer  in  Power Research  and  Development Consultants
Pvt.  Ltd,  Bangalore from May  2008  to  till date.
Role and  Responsibilities:
n Delivering  the project with  plan  and  efficiency
n Team Leadership
n
Management of  Complex  multidisciplinary  project
n Specialist expertise in  Power System Studies
n Technical expertise to  handle the complete project
n Regulatory  Compliance
n Assessment of Losses in  Power  System
Projects Executed:
33  kV & 11  kV Feeder  wise Analysis and  Energy  Audit for CESU(Central Electricity
Supply  Utility),  Orissa
Main  Project Features: Distribution  network  survey  & Consumer Indexing.
3
Asset Data Collection  of  existing  distribution  condition.
3 GPS survey  of  33  kV & 11  kV network  & DTCs.
3 Walk  over  survey  of  LT Network.
3 Creation  of  digitized  maps of 33  kV system -  Sub-Division  wise,  11  kV feeder  wise,  LT
System   DTC  wise & its Network  Analysis (i.e.  Load  flow analysis using  Mipower  Software.).
3 Consumer Indexing.
3 Study  performed  for  base case Condition  and  finding  out the system condition.
3
Providing  the suggestion  improvement proposal (i.e.  load  sharing  or express feeder  as for
the load  demand).
3 Collection  of  DT meter reading  and  load  survey  data using  MRI.
3 Taking  Dump  of  meter  data using  Smart2000  Software.
3 Calculation  of  technical and  commercial loss Distribution  network  using  Mipdap
Software.
Under  Ground  Cabling  System for CESU(Central Electricity  Supply  Utility),  Orissa
3 GPS survey  of  distribution  network.
3 Creation  of  digitized  maps using  Mipower Software.
3 Dismantling  of existing  over  head  line.
3
Load  flow analysis of  both  existing  and  proposed  system.
3 Planning  and  designing  of RMUs and  UG cable.
3 Cost Estimation.
Transmission  planning  and  Prioritization  study  for OPTCL (Orissa Power Transmission
Corporation  limited),  Orissa.
Main  Project Features: System study  of  transmission  network  by  the end  of  11th  & 12th  period.
3 Operational studies for  existing  transmission  condition.
3 Study  performed  up  to  2012-13  year  load  demand  with  considering  the different
generations,  to  finding  out the system condition  and  suggested  the new sub-stations of 400kV,
220kV,  132kV voltage levels.
3
Contingency  done for all the conditions to  find  line loading  and  transformer  loading  and
suggested  the transmission  line and  the transformer  capacity  of  the above mentioned  voltages.
3 Short Circuit Study  performed  to  obtain  the fault level
3 Transient study  performed  for obtain  the system behavior  when  there is an  outage of
major  tie lines and  the Generators.
Evacuation  Studies carried
3 Bhubaneswar Power Plant Ltd.  evacuation  study  for 2  x  67.5  MW Captive Thermal
Power  Station  at Anantapur,  Cuttack,  Orissa.
3 Indian  Metals & Ferro  Alloys Limited  evacuation  study  for  2  x  60  MW Captive Thermal
Power  Station  at Choudwar,  Cuttack,  Orissa.
Year  wise Geographical and  District wise single line diagrams of Orissa network  up  to
year  2016-17.
Power  system study  for  proposed  400  kV ring  system of  OPTCL (Orissa Power
Transmission  Corporation  limited),  Orissa.
3 Performed  system studies including  Load  flow,  Short circuit and  Transient stability.
3 Study  performed  for  base case,  low hydro  & high  hydro  condition  for  finding  out the
system condition.
3 Detailed  single line diagram as well as geographical map  for  Orissa grid  from 400  kV
network.
3 Contingency  done for all the conditions to  find  line loading  and  transformer  loading  and
suggested  the transmission  line and  the transformer  capacity  of  the above mentioned  voltages.
3 Short Circuit Study  performed  to  obtain  the fault level
3 Transient study  performed  for obtain  the system behavior  when  there is a outage of  major
tie lines and  the Generators.
Technical forte:
n Power  system engineering.
n MS-office for  relevant applications at work.
n
Hands on  experience on  software tool   Mi-power  for  power  system studies.
n Hands on  experience on  software tool   Auto  CAD.
Language Skill:
n C
n C++
6  Months as a trainee in  NIIT
7  months as a employee in  software testing  department.
Total experience:-1year  1  month
June 2010- Present date: Working  as the HR Executive for  Maple Careers,  Visakhapatnam with
the following  responsibilities as the post holder.
Sourcing  and  screening  profiles according  to  the client requirement.
Sending  resumes to  the Client.
Getting  Short listing  from the Client.
Scheduling  Interviews
Getting  the feedback  from the Client
Follow up  with  the candidate for the offer.
Preparing  Invoice for  the joining
Coordinating  the HR during  campus drives.
Aug  2008-Aug  2009: Worked  as the Telecaller  for Centum Learning  Centre,  Visakhapatnam with
the following  responsibilities
Collecting  data from marketing  department.
Preparing  daily  and  monthly  call execution  reports
Interacting  with  students and  parents on  telephone and  motivating  them
Project Scenario
Industrial project on  the topic \u0022Training  and  Development\u0022 from Vizag  Steel Plant in  the H.R.
Department for  a period  of  6  weeks (4  January-13  February)
Description:
Gaining  the knowledge of Training  and  Development.
Conducted  survey  among  the steel plant employees of  H.R.  Department by  distributing
questionnaire and  collected  their  feedbacks.
Prepared  a report on  our project.
Course University/Institute Year  Of Passing Marks Diploma in  Civil
s Working  as a Site Engineer  in  AASH ENTERPRISES in  lalitpur from 2nd  jul 2010  to
15th  march  2011,  and  23th  april 2011  to  till now.
s C&DS JAL NIGAM,  UNIT 50  ,  BARABANKI
Duration  :-  4  weeks
s Company  :-  \u0022DYNAMICA INDIA PVT.LTD\u0022,NOIDA,UP
s Designation:-  Software Testing  Engineer.
s TOTAL EXP :-  15TH DEC  2010  TILL DATE .
(APPROAX \u00221\u0022YEAR  EXPERIENCE)
s Did  In-College Training  in  HP for  Soft Skills,(Duration-50  hours)
s Did  In-C  and  C++ Training  in  APTECH-Salem.(Duration-3  months)
Highly  organized  and  detail-focused  Senior  Finance/Accounting  Professional with  an
exceptional track  record  of  accurately  analyzing  and  providing  financial decisions in
deadline-oriented  environments.
s Expertise in  preparing  & analyzing  Budgets/Forecasts,  developing  strategic MIS
reports for  the management.
s Proficiency  in  cash  flow management through  effective accounts receivable and
payable management.
s Keen  understanding  and  significant experience in  managing  the tax  procedures and
handling  audits for  various reputed  companies.
s Knowledge & skills in  ensuring  statutory  compliance with  various regulatory  bodies
& institutions.
s
Proficiency  in  developing  and  implementing  effective cost control/reduction  measures
with  positive results in  operational and  financial results.
s Ability  to  identify/implement Controls and  Procedures to  streamline operational
processes and  decrease risks without affecting  cost,  efficiency  or productivity.
s Excellent compatibility  with  various accounting  & application  software (Tally,SAP
R-3,  Oracle,  MS Office,  etc.) and  implement new systems/applications with  ease.
Critical Competencies
Attention  to  Detail Communication  Skills Managing  under Pressure
Planning  / Coordination
February'2011    Till Date with  MS Technologies Pvt.  Ltd.  as AVP   Finance and  Accounts.
Notable Contributions
An  integral member of  the leadership  group,  responsible for all financial and  fiscal
management aspects of company  operations.
Reporting  directly  to  the COO with  dotted  line reporting  to  the CEO and  have
significant contact with  Internal and  External Auditors.
Responsible for  leadership  of the finance operations and  administrative activities.
Responsible for  the financial control,  budgeting  and  forecasting,  financial strategy
and  planning  efforts while having  an  impact on  company-  wide policy  and  procedure
development.
Assess the working  capital requirements,  monitor  fund  positions and  indicate time
and  extent of funds needed  to  meet maturing  obligations.
Analyze and  monitor  sales,  revenue,  operating  expenses,  capital expenditures,
headcount and  other key  performance indicators to  ensure achievement of  annual budget and
optimization  of  financial results.
Responsible for  the preparation  of  all monthly,  quarterly  and  annual financial/
operating  reports,  budgets & forecasts and  provide comprehensive analysis &
implementation  strategies on  variances.
Provide direct oversight and  direction  for  the finance/accounting/administrative/
operation  functions of  the organization  and  building  the team to  support the businesses
Highly  organized  and  detail-focused  Senior  Finance/Accounting  Professional with  an
exceptional track  record  of  accurately  analyzing  and  providing  financial decisions in
deadline-oriented  environments.
s Expertise in  preparing  & analyzing  Budgets/Forecasts,  developing  strategic MIS
reports for  the management.
s Proficiency  in  cash  flow management through  effective accounts receivable and
payable management.
s Keen  understanding  and  significant experience in  managing  the tax  procedures and
handling  audits for  various reputed  companies.
s Knowledge & skills in  ensuring  statutory  compliance with  various regulatory  bodies
& institutions.
s
Proficiency  in  developing  and  implementing  effective cost control/reduction  measures
with  positive results in  operational and  financial results.
s Ability  to  identify/implement Controls and  Procedures to  streamline operational
processes and  decrease risks without affecting  cost,  efficiency  or productivity.
s Excellent compatibility  with  various accounting  & application  software (Tally,SAP
R-3,  Oracle,  MS Office,  etc.) and  implement new systems/applications with  ease.
Critical Competencies
Attention  to  Detail Communication  Skills Managing  under Pressure
Planning  / Coordination
February'2011    Till Date with  MS Technologies Pvt.  Ltd.  as AVP   Finance and  Accounts.
Notable Contributions
An  integral member of  the leadership  group,  responsible for all financial and  fiscal
management aspects of company  operations.
Reporting  directly  to  the COO with  dotted  line reporting  to  the CEO and  have
significant contact with  Internal and  External Auditors.
Responsible for  leadership  of the finance operations and  administrative activities.
Responsible for  the financial control,  budgeting  and  forecasting,  financial strategy
and  planning  efforts while having  an  impact on  company-  wide policy  and  procedure
development.
Assess the working  capital requirements,  monitor  fund  positions and  indicate time
and  extent of funds needed  to  meet maturing  obligations.
Analyze and  monitor  sales,  revenue,  operating  expenses,  capital expenditures,
headcount and  other key  performance indicators to  ensure achievement of  annual budget and
optimization  of  financial results.
Responsible for  the preparation  of  all monthly,  quarterly  and  annual financial/
operating  reports,  budgets & forecasts and  provide comprehensive analysis &
implementation  strategies on  variances.
Provide direct oversight and  direction  for  the finance/accounting/administrative/
operation  functions of  the organization  and  building  the team to  support the businesses
Possesses qualitative knowledge in  software quality  testing,  technical support & trouble
shooting
Exposure in  automated  & manual software testing,  writing,  & execution  of  test cases
Knowledge of SDLC  Methodologies & testing  using  automated  testing  tools
Acquired  knowledge in  White box  testing,  Black  box  testing,  Functional testing,  Performance
testing,  Load  & Stress testing
Adopt in  testing  software products & handling  projects efficiently  for delivering  the required
application  in  a very  systematic way
Excellent communication  & interpersonal skills with  abilities in  resolving  complex  software
issues
Educational Profile
UG   B.Tech  (Electronics & Communication)
72.5%,  Pondicherry  University,
Year  of  Passing: 2010
12th    63.58%
10th    70.72%
Company  Name: DSM Soft Private Limited
Designation: Junior  Engineer
Experience: 28th  January  2011  to  31st August 2011
Wind
ows as
Administrator
Have
done one
month
training  in
PATRATU
THERMAL
Assignment Vocational
Training
1 Jindal Stainless Ltd.  Maintenance Engineer Dec.2007  to  continue
Electrical Field  Knowledge:
All type electrical wiring  ,testing  ,repairing  and  winding  of  single phase and  three phase a.c.
motor,star  delta starter  ,m.c.b.  fuse,  testing  of  amp.volt.  resistence,insulator,  alternator r.p.m.,
single phase and  three phase transformer,generator,inverter,batteries,all type fan  repairing  and
winding,  repairing  of winding  machine,  find  fault in  cable and  wiring,  m.c.c.  ,p.c.c.  ,p.l.c.,  L.T.
and  H.T.  control pannal,electrical protecting  devices,  all type regulators,  power  supply  ,  u.p.s.
stabilizers etc.  Able to  handle a big  team of  electricians.  Testing  ,  input output meter  reading,
street lite metering  ,
Ensure proper functioning  of  generation  & distribution  system,  for  all the contractors,
and  sub  contractors for  work.
Management of  stores & their  inventory  updates for  all departmental works.
s Experience from 5th  October  2008  till to  date (3  years):
Working  as a Site Engineer(Electrical)  in  Real Estate in  Client SS group,
Sector-51,  Gurgaon.
Looking:
All internal and  External Electrical work  of  high  rise buildings(conduting  ,
wireing,testing  all electrical points) as per  drawings ,  reading  electrical drawings &
execution  part ,contractor  dealing  & quality  of  work  verifying  bills ,  and  electrical and
mechanical work  on  project site.
Verifying  all items in  the inventory  of  contractor  as per  BOQ and  rate as per  Tender.
Verification  of  contractor's bills .
Operation  & maintenance of Cummins D.G.  SETS,  (62  kva-160  kva)
Operation  and  Maintenance of  LT panel,  distribution  board,  MCCB.
Maintenance of  Large Building  electrical system for  project site.
Implementation  of  Report of  Daily,  Monthly,  Yearly  as Per Schedule & Responsible.
Certifying  bills & taking  care of Vendors.
Vendor interaction,  coordinating  with  employees etc.
Wind
ows as
Administrator
Have
done one
month
training  in
PATRATU
THERMAL
Assignment Vocational
Training
I  have the more than  three year  experience in  handling  the D.C.  Motor,  Electrical Installation,
Erection,  commissioning  and  Testing  of Transformers depends upon  client requirements.
WORK EXPERIENCE IN DETAIL
Company  : M/s POWER ELECTRIC CORPRATION,  Coimbatore
Designation  : Project Engineer
Duration  : Jan2011  to  Present
Client : M/s.  TNEB,  M/s.  KSEB,  M/s.  AP Transco,  M/s.  Robert Bosch,  M/s.
APCPDCL,  M/s.  Toyota Kirloskar India Ltd,  M/s.  Power Grid,  M/s.  AP Genco.  Annual
Maintenance of  MCC  and  PMCC panels at M/s.  Sterlite Industries India Ltd.,  etc.,  Preventive
Maintenance at M/s.  Nokia Ltd.,  etc.,  Servicing  of  APFC  panels at M/s.  Madras Cements Ltd.,
Retrofitting  works in  M/s.  HPCL,  M/s.  Vizag  Steel Plant,  M/s.  Madras Cements Ltd.,  Seismic
test at IIT Madras.
Nature of  Project : Electrical Installation,  Communication,  Tower  Installation,  Lighting
System Design
Annual Maintenance,  Safety  Approval,  Procurement and  Project
Designing  and  preparation  of  drawings.
Preparation  of  BOQ,  estimation  of  material,  issue of  purchase request and  arrangement of
material.
Material submittal.
RESUME JAYA KUMAR.R Email: specjayakumar@gmail.com
Mobile: 9444970627,  044-26345856
Coordination  with  consultant.
Supervision  of  the overall execution  of  the projects.
Approval of Inspection  Reports.
Making  daily,  weekly  and  monthly  reports on  project progress.
Company  : M/s.  OMEGA TECHNO INDUSTRIES,  Chennai
Designation  : ELECTRICAL SUPERVISOR
Duration  : Jan  2010  to  Jan  2011
Client : Wheel India (TVS group),  Private and  Public ITI and  Colleges.
Nature of  Project : Manufactures of D.C.  Motor,  Controls,  Trailers and  Acoustic Enclosure
Review of project requirements & specifications and  implementation  during  work
execution.
Planning  and  monitoring  of  site activities and  managing  site resources.
Preparing  & maintaining  of  records all related  activities.
Monitor  problem areas and  make recommendations to  Project Manger.
Preparation  of  technical & internal reporting  as required.
Attending  meetings with  clients and  arranging  meetings with  contractors.
Preparation  of  modification  proposal in  case of site contrains.Raise the deviations &
getting  approval from the client.
Company  : M/s SEC  Engineering,  Manali
Designation  : ELECTRICAL SUPERVISOR
Duration  : July  2009  to  Dec 2009
Client : M/s SIEMENS PVT LTD.
Nature of  Project : Erection,  commissioning  and  Testing  of  Siemens make circuit Breakers,
Relays,  Current Transformers,  Capacitor  Voltages Transformers and  Isolator.
Erection,  Testing,  Commissioning  and  Servicing  of  Circuit Breakers
Annual Maintenance of  MCC and  PMCC  panels.
Preventive Maintenance.
Servicing  of  APFC.
Retrofitting  works in  Steel and  cement Plant.
Seismic test at IIT Madras.
Interpersonal Skills
Adaptability  to  any  situation  & commitment.
Learned  discipline,  teamwork,  how to  follow instructions and  hard  work.  Ambitious,
outgoing,  reliable and  have solid  work  ethic.
Determined  & willing  to  put maximum effort to  achieve goals.
Concerned  with  quality.  Produce work  that is orderly  and  attractive.  Ensure tasks are
completed  correctly  and  on  time.
Willing  to  try  new things and  am interested  in  improving  efficiency  on  assigned  tasks.
n Pursuing  Bachelor  of  Journalism and  Mass Communication  from Jagannath  International
Management School (JIMS),  Vasant Kunj,  New Delhi.  The Institute is affiliated  to  I.P University,
Delhi.
Volunteered  the Indian  Idol 5th  Season    Delhi Audition.
Worked  as an  Asst.  Director  in  a recently  released  Bollywood  Movie named  \u0022WITH
LOVE,  DELHI!!\u0022 and  also  with  the Promo  Song  of the movie Aaja Aaja Janejah.
Worked  as a paid  trainee in  Basic 4  advertising  for  2  months in  Client servicing  and  copy.
Wind
ows Family
as
Administrator
Have
done one
month
training  in
PATRATU
THERMAL
Assignment Qualification
s
Operating
System
Application
Networking
One year experience in  Chang  Yun  India Ltd.  Gurgoan.  As a Line supervisor After
Diploma
Working  In  Ambition  polytechnic,sirsa.  As a Lecturer  since 1st Feb.2011  to  Till Date.
ACADAMIC QUALIFICATIONS:
10th  from Parvati Devi Memorial high  school,  Sirsa from BSEH.Bhiwani.
INDUSTRIAL TRAINING:
Six  weeks industrial training  in  Super Thermal power  plant Rajasthan.
Six  weeks industrial training  in  BHEL,  HARIDWAR.
Company:-Ericsson  India Limited.  (May  2011  to  march  2012)
Designation:-FM engineer
Company: - NuTek  India Ltd.  (October  2010  to  April 2011)
Designation: -  BSS engineer
Company:-Bright View Telecom India Pvt.  Ltd.  (June 2010  to  October  2010)
Designation:-GET
Responsible for  team coordination  and  their  movement for  the activity.
Daily  basis update of project and  material,  man  force needed  for  its proper execution.
Updating  of  database at sites as per requirement.
Quality  Audit & acceptance of  sites.
Maintenance & supervision  of Ericsson  Transmission  system (SDH).
Maintenance & supervision  of MINI  LINK Transmission  system of Ericsson  (PDH).
E1/ PCM routing  for  new sites from BSC to  the site.
Alarm monitoring  of  site using  WINFIOL AND CITRIX software.
Maintenance of  ERICSSON and  ZTE BTS.
Maintenance of  Microwave antennas,  alignment and  Rx  level.
Removing  Radio  Base Station  faults.
Regular  Software Upgrades of  ERICSSON Transmission  Equipment's.
Alarm configurations for  proper functioning  and  their troubleshooting.
Transmission  alarm troubleshooting  and  rectification.
TRAINING AND PROJECTS:
Six  week  training  in  AERF,  NOIDA in  MICRO-CONTROLLER.
Six  week  training  in  BSNL,  MAHENDERGARH in  GSM.
One week  Training  in  ZTE,  Kolkata in  3G on  TECHNOLOGIES.
COMPUTER  PROFECIENCIES:
Operating  Systems : MS WINDOWS (98,  2000,  XP,  VISTA,  Windows 7).
Application  Software : MS office 2010,  2007,  2003,  adobe flash
Responsible for  managing  backend  and  front end  tasks.
Involved  in  managing  walk-ins.
Handling  incoming  and  outgoing  calls.
Acting  as office coordinator
Handling  all documents related  to  employees
Operate EPBAX,  handle payments,
Handling  Admin  & back  office operations
Guest relationship.
Handling  guest complaints Etc.
Handling  house-keeping  Dept.
Auditing  room service bill day  wise
Maintained  daily  report(  occupancy  & maintenance )
2. HAD WORKED WITH ANGEL BROKING(FRANCHASEE )  AS ARM FOR 01  YEAR
IN ULHASNAGAR  BRANCH IN DEEMAT ACCOUNT.
3. HAD WORKED WITH INDIA BULLS DEEMAT DEPT AS BDM (BUSSINESS
DEVELOPMENT MANGER)  FOR 15  MONTHS
4. HAD WORKED WITH ROSE WOOD BOUTIQUE FOR  04  YEARS.  AS CASHIER
CUM ACCOUNTANT IN COLABA MUMBAI
**EDUCATION HISTORY--:
T.Y.BCOM PASSED IN THE YEAR  2000  FROM MUMBA UNIVERISTY.
H.S.C.  PASSED IN 1997  FROM MUMBAI UNIVERSITY
S.S.C.  PASSED IN YEAR  IN 1994  FROM PUNE BOARD
Presently  Working  with  Naresh  Agarwal Construction  Pvt.  Ltd.  as a Executive
Accountant since Oct-2011  to  till date.
s
Preparation  of  all purchase records,  Bank  records .
s Preparation  and  making  daily  all expenses.
s Preparation  weekly  expenses & monthly  payments record.
s Making  staff  salary.
s Handling  & preparation  all creditors records and  maintain  payment records.
s Maintain  day  to  day  bank  reconciliation  and  banking  work.
s Preparation  project bill record  on  excel sheet,  letter  drafting,  mail checking  & sending.
s
Maintain  stock  record  and  reconciliation  as a RMC,  Concrete,  and  Cement etc.
s Preparation  of  Store record  on  computer  bases & manually.
s Maintain  day  to  day  store stock  register  and  handling  store material.
s Making  store stock  reconciliation  report and  issue,  receive quantity  to  labour  & staff.
s Making  P.O letter,  approval letter & Agreement.
Worked  with  MVM Handicrafts Pvt.  Ltd.  in  Export Department from Dec2010  to  Sep2011.
s
Preparation  compliance & audit work.
s Making  & maintain  compliance & audit record  (social,  technical).
s Preparation  of  ECGC  report.
s Making  & maintaining  export documents as a (G-Form,  Export Challan).
s Making  export invoice bill as a
s Maintain  attendance register and  making  monthly  salary  and  weekly  Expenses records.
s Preparation  monthly  stock  statement & reconciliation.
s Preparation  export records on  master  sheets & formally  record.
s
Preparation  Performa invoice,  credit invoice export invoice.
s Making  barcode slip  and  scanning  barcode.
s Working  on  paper  work  in  officially.
Worked  with  Anraj Cables Industries Pvt.  Ltd.  as a executive accountant from Oct2009  to  Nov
2010.
s Making  & Maintain  day  to  day  all Voucher.
s
Maintain  & Posting  Entries day  by  day  in  sales,  purchase,  journal & expenses.
s Maintain  & handling  stock  entries and  reconciliation.
s Preparation  bank  reconciliation.
s Tax  calculates in  tds,  service tax,  sales tax,  purchase tax  & local tax  VAT.
s Making  vendor payment record  and  making  cheque records.
s Submit tds challans and  service tax  challans in  bank.
s Maintain  day  by  day  cash  book  and  cheque book  accounts.
s Making  sales invoices.
s Preparation  salary  sheet and  weekly  expenses records.
s Summer Training  in  HDFC Bank  in  Sales Department.
s Project Report for Marketing  Producer  In  working  Process
Worked  with  Fine-Art Jewelry  as an  accounts assistant.
Currently  working  with  Infosys BPO at Jaipur  as a contractual employee since Aug  2009.
Handling  Front office of  security.
Handing  Visitor  Management system
Maintain  Visitors Record  on  Daily,  Weekly  and  Monthly  Basis.
Maintain  Weekly  duty  Shift Roster  of  security  Team.
Maintain  Daily,  Weekly  and  Monthly  Task  Report.
Maintain  all Documents and  file works for Admin  security.
Computer data entry  work.
Handling  CCTV Camera Operation  and  prepare the violation  report on  daily,  weekly  and
monthly  basis.
Been  the SPOC  (Single point of  contact) for  all logistics requirements.
Designation  & Employer (Current )
Front Office Executive in  M/s Hindustan  Automotives (Delhi)
(1st June-2010  to  till date)
s Invoicing  in  Tecpro  Software & Tally  7.2
s
Handling  EPABX System
s Coordinate to  H.O.  ,  Branch  Office & Vendors
s Handling  Incoming  & Outgoing  phone calls
s Maintain  Fileing  record  & Taking  Care at all the correspondence
s Handling  Courier incoming  / outgoing  & Coordinate to  Courier  Agencies
s Handling  Kitchen  & House Keeping  Staff
s Keep  record  of  \u0022C\u0022 form and  form `38'
s Maintaining  Stationary  and  attendance Register
s Arrangement for  internal meetings / conference room
s Co-coordinating  with  various departments for  document tracking  and  keeping.
s
Managing  Office,  Factory  Premises and  all the aspects of  maintenance e.g.  electricity
distribution  panel,  electrical appliances,  machine,  furniture,  computer  systems,  printer,
projector,  sound  system.
Designation  & Employer
Front Office Executive in  M/s Premium Speciality  Paints P.Ltd.  (Delhi)
(1st May  2009  to  31  May  2010)
s Invoicing  in  ACE (Coral Software)
s Handling  EPABX System
s
Handling  incoming  & outgoing  phone calls records
s Maintain  Fileing  record  & Taking  Care at all the correspondence
s Handling  Courier incoming  / outgoing  & coordinate courier  agencies
s Maintaining  Office Exp.
s Maintaining  Stationary  and  attendance Register
s Arrangement for  internal meetings / conference room
Designation  & Employer
Store Keeper  in  M/s U.S.  Foods P.Ltd.  (Delhi)
(1st February  2008  to  31  April 2009  )
s
Handling  Dispatch  & Purchase Material
s Taking  Care at all Store Correspondence
s Attend  The Customer Query
s Maintaining  proper  stock  Materials Computerized
s To  manage all the sale Computerized  of  individual sales executive with  payment
pending  and  received  information.
s Making  Challan
s Co-coordinating  with  Vendors
Good  Interpersonal Relationships,  Communication  Skills,  Leadership  Skills,  Analytical Skills &
learning  Capacity  is very  Quick.
Master  of  Business Administration  (M.B.A)  from AIIMT
Specialization  Marketing
BASIC QUALIFICATION
Bachelor  of  Commarce (B.Com)  from V.B.S.  Purvanchal University
ADITIONAL KNOWLEDGE
Dipploma In  Computer  Application  (D.C.A)  & Internet
1. Company  Name : Den  infra structure India pvt ltd  (Wind  Energy).
Thirumalai nagar,  4road,  Gudimangalam,  Udumalaipet.
Position : Safety  Supervisor
Dated  From : Dec 2011-Mar 2011
2. Company  Name : Coromandel engineering  company  limited,
MURUGAPPA GROUPS
Parry  House,  3rd  floor,  43  Moore Street,  Chenna600001.
Projects : TNPL Cement plant,  TG house projects (On  duty)-Karur  &
Sinter  plant project-Kalahasthi-A.P
Position : Senior  Safety  Supervisor
Dated  From : April 2011- December  2011
3. Company  Name : ATC Tires India limited,
ALLAINCE GROUP,  Gangaikondan,  Tirunelveli-627302.
Position : Junior  engineer  trainee (Safety)
Projects : Client safety  (ATC)  in  industrial safety
Dated  From : Jan  2012-  Till date
Duties are,
Assigned  the tasks of  preparing  reports as well as marketing  fire & site safety
inspections
Handled  the responsibilities of  reviewing  engineering  drawings and  specifications
like-  Electrical drawings for  Excavation
Designed  as well as prepared  specifications for  induction  trainings
Participated  in  formal audits and  conducted  research  on  major  issues related  with
construction  hazards
Assigned  the tasks of  conducting  test of Ground  leakage and  ELCB
Handled  various projects as assigned
Analyze accident and  incident reports for trends.
Make recommendations for  correcting  unsafe conditions and  actions.
Respond  to  emergency  situations involving  hazardous materials,  radiation,  or  fire and
smoke incidents.
Lead  and  guide the work  of  lower  level safety  technicians and  student employees.
Madison  Media,  new Delhi,
Management Trainee (Strategic Planning)  Duration    feb  2012    April 2012
Roles & Responsibilities
n Making  Strategy  plans for Airtel.
n Handling  of  airtel's Global Best Practices.
n Analysis for  airtel Studio  Survey.
n Looking  after all research  aspects of  media.
n
Making  strategic plans for  existing  clients and  for  new pitches,  using  TAM,  MAP,  IRS.
R  j corp  cryobanks international
Relationship  executive Duration    may  2011    dec 2011
Roles & Responsibilities
n Popularize a new concept of Stem Cell banking  among  the target Audience.
n Seek  target groups and  build  database of  Potential clients and  Lead  sources.
n Build  relationship  with  key  Stakeholders like Gynecologists,  Hospitals,  Pathology's and
centers.
n Conduct presentation  to  prospective clients.
n Enroll targeted  number  of potential clients every  month.
Company  name:- Cryobanks international Stem cells department 06  MAY 2010  -30  JUNE 2010  & 05  Description n Study  and  analyzed  the market potential of  stem cell banking  awareness level about
stem cell banking
n Generated  potential leads for  the company
n Sold  the product to  customers
n Forecast the future trends in  the industry  and  designed  a marketing  communication  mix
for the company.
Learning n Learnt about the scope of  stem cells banking  and  about the various techniques used.
Understanding  of  customer  and  market dynamics and  requirements.
LIVE PROJECT
Aaj Tak  (Client)  AC Nielsen,  Delhi
20thJuly'10-25thAug'10
Project Coordinator of  Net link  Software Solution  private ltd,  Bhopal,  M.P (December
2011    May  2012)
INDUSTRIAL VISITS
Hindustan  Photo  Films,  Ooty
B.H.E.L,  Bangalore
N.T.P.C,  Ramgrah,  Ranchi
S.A.I.L.  Bokaro
MEMBERSHIP
Student member of  Indian  Society  for Technical Education,  New Delhi.
Active member  of Science Club,  VMKV,  Salem.
Executive member- \u0022EEE ASSOCIATION\u0022 (2007-08,  2008-09)
Member- \u0022IE\u0022 (2009-20; 3rd  year)
Member- \u0022ROBO CLUB\u0022 (2009-10; 3rd  year)
Member  of  \u0022ANTI RAGGING COMMITTEE\u0022 (2009-10)
PERSONAL IDENTITY
Father's Name -  Mr.  RABINDRA KUMAR  SINGH
Mother's Name -  Smt.  MINOO SINGH
Date of  Birth  -  12  Feb,  1987
Gender - Male
Height -  5'7''
Weight -  65  KG
Marital Status -  Single
Page 2  of  3
Nationality - Indian
Religion  -  Hindu
Language Known -  Hindi / English  / Tamil
Hobbies - Listening  Music,  Playing  Chess & badminton
Blood  Group  -  O +
Passport Number -  J4283982
I  hereby  acknowledge & authenticate,  every  bit of information  mentioned  in  this document is
correct by  all means.
Date: -
Place: - Nikhil
As Sub-Engineer  in  Kerala State Electricity  Board  on  contract May  2012-
onwards
Operation  and  Maintenance of  110/11  kV Substation  Edarikkode and  33kV s/s
Kooriyadu.
Main  activities and  Responsibilities:
3 Operation  and  maintenance of  Power  Transformers.
3 Operation  and  maintenance of  H.T and  L.T Switch  Gears,  Panel Boards,  Circuit
Breakers,  Current Transformers,  Potential Transformers,  Isolators.
3 Preparation  and  maintenance of  substation  log  sheet,  log  records for  Load  and  Energy
Consumption  under  different lines and  feeders,  and  Monthly  Operating  Review (MOR)
reports.
3 Meggering  of  power  equipments.
3 Maintenance of  Battery  and  battery  charger.
As Electrical Engineer  in  Qatar  General Electricity&Water Corporation-KahraMaa on
contract.  Aug2009-Apr  2012
Operation  ,  Maintenance & Control of  Substations.
Main  activities and  Responsibilities:
3 Handling  operation  and  maintenance activities.
3 Inspection  & monitoring  of  relays and  other protection  systems,  Power  transformers,
CTs,  PTs,  Earthing  Transformers,  Circuit Breakers,  Gas Insulated  Switch-gear(GIS) systems,
Substation  Control Systems (SCS),  Supervisory  Control & Data Acquisition  (SCADA)
Systems.
3 Experienced  with  Protection  panels of  AREVA,  ABB  & Siemens.
3 Inspection  for alarms & faults like over  current,  earth  fault,  standby  earth  fault,  and
mechanical faults.
3 Experienced  with  switchgears of voltage rating; 11kV,66kV,132kV and  220kV
manufactured  by  Hyundai,  ABB,  Siemens,  AREVA etc.
3 Inspection  and  monitoring  of  transformer  protection  systems like SERGI  and
DELUGE systems...
3 Experienced  with  Low Voltage ac & dc distribution  panels (LV AC  & DC)  and
Battery  charger  systems.(110  volt & 48  volt)
3 Maintaining  proper  communication  with  Control centers on  different activities taking
place in  the substation,  preparation  of load  and  power consumption  reports.
3 Assist the Senior  engineers.
3 Experienced  the trench  excavation,  cable laying  ,termination(11kV,66kV &220kV),
gasing  and  de-gasing  of GIS ,  bay  extension  of GIS,  Stability  test,Meggering,BDV etc.
As Sub-Engineer  in  Kerala State Electricity  Board  on  contract June 2007-
July2009
Operation  and  Maintenance of  110/11  kV SubStation  Edarikkode & 33kV s/s
Thirunnavaya on  contract.
Main  activities and  Responsibilities: same as no.(1)
Driving  License
3 Holding  Qatar  and  Indian  driving  license.
Company  Name: -  SHREE CEMENT LTD.  BEAWAR,
RAJASTHAN
Period  of  Training: -  13/06/2011  to  13/07/2011.
project Detail: -  Study  of  steam power  plant and  FGDP
Position:- As a trainee
Extra Activity:-
I  have done diploma in  Product Design.
Intrest:-
Appreciate Music
Watching  Movies and  Cricket
s
I  am working  as a service enginner  in  SCANTECH SERVICES from January2012  to
till date.
s I  worked  as a jr.site engineer  in  VIVEKA ELECTRICALS from August2011  to
December2011.  (A.P.C.P.D.C.L private contract works)
s I  worked  as a site supervisor in  HYCON pvt.ltd  for 8  months from November 2010  to
june 2011.
Base Station  Subsystem (BSS).
n Study  of Base Station  Subsystem(BSS) at IDEA Cellular Ltd.,  Dehradun; for 6  weeks in
B.Tech.
6th  semester.
E-10  B  Signal Transmission  Control System
n Call Connection  training  at BSNL,  Aligarh; for  4  weeks in  B.Tech.  4th  semester.
Graduation  Project/Case Study  :
Project -1
Title : RF control wireless Chopper
Description  : This project is useful for  security  purpose,there largest uses in  Military
application.It is defined  as a
reusable,  uncrewed  vehicle capable of  controlled,  sustained  and  level
flight.This is itself a weapon,
even  though  it is also  unmanned  and  in  some cases remotely  guided.
Team Size : 6
Role : Assembler
Project -2
Title : Mini Electronic Voting  Machine (mini EVM)
Description  : This project is to  count the voted  that are polled  through  the counter.  It avoids
multiple voting  at a
time.It also  shows the individual votes of each  constituent and  the total votes.
Team Size : 5
Role : Design  & Assembling
1. REC  Power  Distribution  Company  Limited
At present I  am working  as a \u0022SITE ENGINEER\u0022 from 23rd  April 2012  to  Till Date.
2. M/s.  Krishna Agencies-Surat
I  have worked  under  SMC contract of  street light maintenance as a \u0022SUPERVISOR\u0022
from 23rd  June 2011  to  22nd  April 2012.
Prepare a detailed  month  wise work  plan  with  clear  deliverables and  milestones to
ensure the achievements of  the deliverables in  the project.
To  lead  the district in  execution  of  the project as per Annual Action  Plan
To  prepare the Annual Action  Plan  & budget of  all the Blocks
Formation  of  Women  farmer  producer company
To  Manage 150  Human  resources (professionals) of  the district
Rigorously  implement activities outlined  in  the project proposal to  promote social
mobilization  in  the selected  districts,  which  include SHG Formation,  federating  SHGs at
block  and  district level,  organizing  SHGs into  producer  groups and  their capacity
development,  Financial Literacy,  hand-holding  services etc)
Nurturing  of  more than  8000  SHGs & 450  Federation  in  Madhubani district
Bank  Linkage & disbursement of Cash  credit Limit to  more than  5500  SHGs
Adherence to  financial rules & System
Adherence to  administrative & office Management system.
Livelihood  promotion  of  the groups through  Agri,  Agri Allied  (Farm & Non  Farm).
Regular  update of MIS
Grievances of staff/community  redressed.
Liaise with  government departments,  technical and  research  institutions,  and
stakeholders for  convergence of livelihood  and  financial deepening  programs at district level
Carryout regular  visit to  project locations in  the district to  ensure the quality  of
deliverables and  suggested  mid  course strategy  change (if  needed)  based  on  field  evidence
Beneficiaries under scheduled,  Social action,  health,  education  intervention.
Preparing  of  annual action  Plan  & budget of  district.
Since Dec'08  with  BASIX,  Patna as Unit Head  Khagaria,  Purniea & Munger
In  charge of  three districts of  Bihar  namely  Khagaria,  Purniea,  Munger  (6  Blocks)
Nurturing  of  more than  1200  SHGs in  Three Districts (6  Blocks)
Formation  of  farmer company
Bank  Linkage of more than  500  SHGs
Disbursement of 20  Lakh  in  ICF.
Successfully  operation  of  CBRE in  Gogri & Baisi Blocks of  Khagaria & Purniea.
Livelihood  promotion  of  the groups through  Agri,  Agri Allied  (Farm & Non  Farm).
Intervention  of new technique of  Farming  i.e.  SRI,  WIS,  MIS,  TPS.
Providing  Credit to  SHGs,  CAGs,  JLGs for  Livelihood  activities live agrabatti
making,  Papad  making,  Livestock,  Retail store,  Patta Plate making  & others livelihood
In  charge of  two  Blocks (12  Villages)
Promotion  of Livelihood  through  Agriculture to  poor  & marginal farmers
Purchase of Staples (wheat,  Rice,  Maize,  Pulses,  etc),  Fruits & Vegetables with  given
Quality  specification.
Formation  of  Joint Livelihood  Group  of  Men  & Women  in  terms of Agriculture.
Looking  after 180  JLGs
Purchase of Fruits & Vegetables,  Staples directly  from Farmers (Contract farming)
Farmers Development/
Inventory  Control
Introducing  new products as per  seasonal changes.
Follow up  with  growers ,pre-timely  delivery  and  dispatch  of orders
Make timely  payment to  growers
Interacting  with  end  users for  better  understanding  of  their  needs and  suggesting
technical specification  and  changes as appropriate
Training  to  growers on  Crop  production
Coordinating,  directing  store staffs to  ensure proper  merchandising.
Providing  training  for innovative product handling  methods,  controlling  losses (dump
shrinkage and  other  losses etc).
Since Mar 07  to  Mar 08  with  Reliance Retail Ltd.  Ranchi/Jamshedpur,  as Sr Associate
Corporate Social Responsibilities (CSR)
In  charge of  Three Blocks .(18  Villages)  in  Ranchi & two  Blocks in  Jamshedpur
Formation  of  Farmers producer  groups & Common  Activities Group  for  women
Promotion  of Livelihood  through  Agriculture to  poor  & marginal farmers
Formation  & Nurturing  of more than  140  Farmers Group  & 200  CAGs
Farmers Development through  contact farming
Inventory  Control
Sorting  & Grading  of Material according  to  Quality  SOP
Introducing  new products as per  seasonal changes.
Follow up  with  growers ,pre-timely  delivery  and  dispatch  of orders
Make timely  payment to  farmers
Interacting  with  end  users for  better  understanding  of  their  needs and  suggesting
technical specification  and  changes as appropriate
Training  to  farmers/Women  on  Crop  production
Coordinating,  directing  store staffs to  ensure proper  merchandising.
Providing  training  for innovative product handling  methods,  controlling  losses (dump
shrinkage and  other  losses etc).
Conducting  team meetings and  brainstorming  sessions etc.  for  improvements.
Since Sept 03  to  Feb  07  with  Sungro  Seeds Ltd,  Patna as Officer-Research  & Development
of  Agricultural Inputs
Successfully  managing  the research  & development operations for attaining  increased
growth  & profitability  of  Agricultural seeds,  pesticides,  fertilizers.
Actively  assisting  the top  management in  planning/ Budgeting  for  achieving  the
corporate goals
Effectively  executing  marketing  strategies for  augmenting  the business volume by
enhancing  brand  visibility  & recall.
Upholding  cordial associations with  customers to  maintain  the profitability  of the
business.
Commencing  market research  devices to  feel the pulse of  the market & accordingly
implementing  the course of action.
Successfully  dealing  with  Dealers & Distributors\u005C
Sales promotion  and  advertising  of  Seeds,  Pesticides,  Fertilizers
Planning  to  identify  reliable and  cost efficient channel partners (Retailers)  for
enhancing  market reach  and  penetration.
Training  to  farmers on  Crop  management
Since Sept 02  to  Aug  03  with  TATA Steel Rural Development Society,  Jamshedpur  as
Specialist WATERSHED & NRM Development
Project in  charge of One Block  in  Ghatsila in  Musabani district
Looking  of  overall project of  watershed  & NRM
Plantation  of  horticulture & timber  sapling  with  Specification.
Training  to  farmers on  agronomy,  crop  management.
Training  on  farmers on  SRI,  TPS,  WIS System of  cultivation.
Soil testing  & recommendation
Formation  of  User  group  & Self Help  Group  (SHGs),  Common  activity  Group
(CAGs).
Promotion  of Livelihood  to  SHGs through  various activities
Promotion  of  Livelihood  to  CAGs & SHGs through  different Activities
marketing  of  finished  products (Wheat,  Rice,  Maize,  Spices)
Promotion  of Livelihood  through  Agriculture
DSC Ltd. asst.manager    projects Jul '10    Till date (24
Months)
CURRENT ORGANIZATION: DSC  Ltd.  (gurgaon)  formerly  known  as DS Construction  is the
Indian  infrastructure investment company  of  $4.5  bn  DS group.  Owning  and  managing  BOT
road  projects,  urban  infrastructure,  hydro  power  plants,  metro  and  real estate.
Currently  Organization: Sanjay  Maken  & Associates
Designation: Accountant & Audit Assistant
Work  Experience: 2  years
INTERNAL AUDITS of  FDDI,  a Government organization  (Ministry  of  commerce)
1.
Functions: Perform Vouching,  Reviewing  the works of  various departments like
Administration-Personnel-IT and  also  review and  cross verify  the records/registers
maintained  by  the respective dep't.  With  actual situation.  Collecting  Cash  Certificates,  bank
statements fixed  asset details etc.
STOCK AUDIT of  FDDI,  a Government organization  (Ministry  of  commerce)
1. Functions: Cross verify  the stock  details with  registers and  physical verification  and
Reporting  in  case of  any  discrepancy  if any  found.
ACCOUNTING: Maintaining  accounts/ledger  posting  of  various types of
organizations'.
BIJAN ADS & FILMS PVT.  LTD.
2006  to  Present Date
Designation: Sr.  Graphic/Web  Designer (Creative Department)
Website Layout Designing
Heading  the designing  team on  projects involving  deciding  the layout of  the entire site.
Newsletter & Emailer Designing
Logo  Designing
Print Media (Brochures,  Press Ads,  Magazines,  Posters,  Calendars,  Banners,  and  all
Stationary  Work)
Print Production
Product Packaging
Handled  Outdoor  Campaigns
TV Commercial Story  Board
Flash  Presentations
Apply  usability  heuristics to  design  problems.
Website Layout Designing
Newsletter & Emailer Designing
Logo  Designing
Print Media (Brochures,  Press Ads,  Magazines,  Posters,  Banners,  and  all Stationary  Work)
One year Certificated  \u0022Industrial Accountant\u0022 Course from `The Institute of
Computer Accountant' at Muzaffarnagar (U.P).
Three Month  Certificated  ;Basic Course (M.S.  Office & etc.); & ;Tally 9.0 & 7.2;
from ;CAD Computer  Centre; at Muzaffarnagar (U.P).
Graduation  (B.Com) from S.D.  Degree College,  Muzaffarnagar  (C.C.S.  University,
MEERUT) in  2008.
Post Graduation  (M.Com)  from S.D.  Degree College,  Muzaffarnagar  (C.C.S.
University,  MEERUT)  in  2010.
Work  Experience Profile
Total Apprehension: -  4.3  + year's
May  2010  - Present
s Sun  Nirman  Infrastructure Pvt.  Ltd.  at New Delhi
Branch-  Gurgaon  (Haryana)
Jr.Accountant & Computer  Opt. = 2.4  + years Continue....
Filing  and  documentation  of  all the office documentation
All Data daily  process to  H.O.
Maintain  Account in  Tally  9.0  & Manual also
Working  on  M.S.  office (M.S.  Word,  M.S.  Excel etc.)
To  maintain  all the database of  the company  of  paper
Prepare Purchase Order  and  to  check  & maintain  the Purchase invoices before
sending  them to  the higher  management for the approval
To  keep  records of  mailing  list and  client database
Drafting  letter
Daily  checking  Stock  Material and  update Material & Stock  Register
Networking,  (check  mail and  reply  to  them)
Handling  Imprest.
Preparing  Monthly  Balance Sheet
Maintain  Staff  Salary  and  Vendors Payment.
NIKHIL
MITTAL
Temp.  Add.
H.  No.  1150
Sec 15  Part II
Gurgaon
September 2008  to  May  2009  = 1.9  years
s Swastik  Engineer's Pvt.  Ltd.  at Muzaffarnagar  (U.P.)
Computer Operator
Filing  and  documentation  of  all the office documentation
Working  on  M.S.  office (M.S.  Word,  M.S.  Excel etc.)
To  maintain  all the database of  the company  of  paper
To  check  & maintain  the Purchase invoices before sending  them to  the higher
management for  the approval
Drafting  letter
Filing  and  documentation  of  all the office documentation
Data entry  and  record  keeping
1. Presently  Working  as Senior Process-Executive in  manufacturing  vertical.(May,  2010
till date).
Company: Infosys Ltd
Client: CISCO SYSTEMS INC.
Responsibilities: Involved  in  resolving  customer problems regarding  the products and  internal
issues in  shipping  the Cisco  products to  the customer  and  after  shipment issues.
s
Contacting  Manufacturing  team,  logistics team and  customs team depending  on  the
customer  issue.
s Helping  customer  in  checking  the shipment status of  the products and  providing  the
tracking  details.
s Helping  customer  to  clear  the customs by  providing  the shipping  documents (such  as
commercial invoice,  packing  slips).
s Assisting  customer  with  replacements for the damaged  or  for  the products which  are not
delivered.
s Assisting  customer  in  returning  of  the faulty  or damaged  goods back  to  the Cisco.
s
Customer  comes with  the request to  return  and  replacement of  the goods.  The reason
would  be any  one of  the below:-
Damaged  Goods -  In  this situation  if  customer  wants replacement we will proceed  with
replacement and  RMA (Return  Material Authorization).  If  customer  requests for  credit then  we
will proceed  with  RMA with  Credit where customer  will be credited  once the goods are returned
to  Cisco.
Faulty  Goods - In  this situation  we will check  if  the goods are under  warranty,  if  so  we
will book  replacement and  RMA (Return  Material Authorization)  for the faulty  goods.  If it is not
under  warranty  we will update the customer  with  the same and  ask  them to  place a Fresh  order
with  Cisco.
CIP process [carriage Insurance Prepaid]-  Working  with  Insurance Company  (`Chartis',
Nederlands) for  claims on  damaged/lost shipment during  transport for EU countries and
providing  customer  with  the customer credit once claim is settled.  This only  for  the shipments
shipped  with  Insurance.
s Acknowledging  customer with  the order details (such  as sales order  number,  purchase
order number  etc.) once the replacement or  RMA is booked.
s Contacting  customers for  contact details and  address information,  if  logistics is unable to
deliver  the product to  customer.
Additional Responsibilities:
s Taking  training  sessions for  new joiners and  refreshing  sessions for  the team members.
s Auditing  the work  done by  the team and  check  for the errors if  any  to  improve the
quality.
s
Conducting  team huddles to  improvise the quality  and  efficiency.
s Assigning  the work  to  the team members.
Trainings Attended:
Corporate Personality
Active Listening
Client interfacing  skills
Written  communication
Risk  awareness Session
Excel At Work
Personal Strengths:
Good  communication  skills
Good  analytical skills
Quick  Learner  of  new things and  can  implement in  efficient way  for  better  results.
Dynamic team player
Sense of  responsibility
Able to  work  under  pressure independently
Handled  entire gamut of HR  Functions encompassing  full employee life cycle
Company Start Date End  Date Designation Duration Trilasoft
Solutions
Pvt.  Ltd
Jan'2011 July'2012 Assistant
Manager  HR
1  Yr  7
month
Genie
Events &
PR  Pvt.  Ltd.
Jan'2010 Jan'2011 Asst.
Manager  HR
1  Yr  ICS
Manpower
Services
July'2008 Aug'2009 HR
Executive
1  Yr  1
month
Training  History
Company Start Date End  Date Designation Duration BHEL,  Jhansi,  U.P May'2007 Sep'2007 Trainee 05  months Cadbury  India Ltd. Dec'2007 Jan' 2007 Trainee 02  months
Organization  : Trilasoft Solutions Pvt.  Ltd(  Domain    Logistics Software)
Industry : TrilaSoft is a software development company  specializing  in  building
systems for  mobility  solutions used  in  the transport,  warehousing  and  relocation  service
industries.  When  I  left,  the company  serviced  more than  15  clients in  12  countries.
Designation : Assistant Manager  HR  & Admin
Roles and  Responsibilities:
Talent Acquisition,  On-boarding  and  Induction
Managing  recruitment for  sourcing  the best talent from diverse sources after
identification  of  manpower  requirements for  new / existing  branches'
Preparing  the JDs (Job  Descriptions) for  all positions
Planning  human  resource requirements in  consultation  with  heads of different
functional & operational areas
Posting  the Jobs on  Job  portals,  Recruiting  through  Job  portals as well as through
social networking  sites (i.e LinkedIn,  Facebook),  Head  Hunting,  coordinating  with  the
Consultancies/ Vendors related  to  all open  positions
Full fledged  joining  formalities and  boarding,  induction  of  new joinees,  giving  them
an  insight about the HR  Policy  and  Procedures
Ensure infrastructural setup  for  new joinee in  coordination  with  admin  team
Weekly  engagement and  feedback  meetings with  the new joiners for  smooth  transition
in  the organization.
Employee Engagement & Team Building
Conducting  process and  policy  orientation  session  for all employees and  receive their
feedback
Coordinating  and  arranging  for  both  internal and  external trainings
Responsible for  arranging  HR  engagement events such  as monthly  and  annual award
celebrations,  foundation  day  etc.
Ensuring  employee motivation  and  recognition  with  the help  of both  monetary  and
non  monetary  rewards.Roll out Awards-  Monthly/ Annual and  / or any  special award  in  order
to  Recognize and  motivate employees for their  good  efforts/ work  in  the organization.
HR Processes and  Policies
Implementing  and  developing  HR policies for  effective engagement of  available
human  resources and  developing  them across locations.
Manpower  Planning  -Strategizing  the long  / short term directions by  forecasting  the
future manpower  requirement and  designing  plans for  acquiring  requisite skills and
Company  name :- Kalyani Carpenter  Special Steel Ltd,  Pune
Duration  :-  From dated  5  October  2011  to  dated  30  September  2012  (1  Year)
Designation  :-  Electrical Maintenance Engineer  (GAT)
Job  Summary  :- Utility  Maintenance
Maintenance Transformers,  Maintenance of  Electrical Motors,
Maintenance of  Electrical Panel,  Maintenance of  Siemens Circuit Breaker,
Knowledge of star-delta starter  & d.o.l.  starter.
ITI  (fitter)  from J.P.T.C.  Samirpur in  2009  with  70%  marks (NCVT)
Working  as a Jr.  fitter for  one year  in  JP Cement
Good  knowledge of cement mill and  bag  house and  their  operation  and  maintains,
assembly  of  bearing  and  working  knowledge of  pipe fitting.
s 3  months experience in  switchgear
s 3  months experience in  switchgear
In  ADP India Ltd:
Ensure all the valid  interfaces that come in  for all the clients are allocated  to  team are completed.
Perform Peer-Audits on  all the interfaces processed  within  the team.
Try  and  resolve Failure/ errors interfaces due to  various problem (SQR,  File Transmission
Problem)by  Working  with  onshore team,  Database team if  not resolve escalating  them properly.
Ensuring  Ad-Hoc requests of  the clients are completed  in  a timely  manner
WFM by  assigning  the interfaces within  the team.  Record  the assigned  interfaces on  the
validation  log,  update the log  upon  completion  of those interfaces.  Record  issues with  the
interfaces on  to  the log  and  share the log  with  the Clients at regular intervals and  get them
resolved.
Help  the colleagues for  the processing  of  difficult interfaces.
Maintaining  the MIS software for the process by  Taking  backup,  Adding  changes to  improvise
performance
Acheivements:
Achieved  the Quality  of  the month  Award  for  the month  of  July  2012
Achieved  the Spot award  for designing  the Password  word  expiry  tracking  sheet.
Achieved  the Spot award  for timely  processing  the Pay  data file for  the BU.
Achieved  the Spot award  for taking  ownership  of  the New Client.
In  Infosys BPO LTD.
Worked  for an  UK Registrar  company  in  Infosys BPO Ltd.
Skilled  in  managing  the Electronic Share Dealing  Accounts of  the clients.
Responsible for  Opening  a new Account,  Anti-Money  Laundering  Check,  Managing  the account,
Broker  Transfers,  Stock  Deposits and  solving  various issues of  the Clients.  Taking  calls of  the
clients and  the Stock  brokers regarding  the transfer  of  shares and  Trading  accounts.
Equiniti (Transfer-IN Team):
Equiniti is the leading  share Registrar  in  United  Kingdom of  Investment Services.
Equiniti is maintaining  all the share holder or  client register  for  their  different investment
objective.  It is providing  custodian  services to  their  clients.
Responsible for  achieving  the team target as per  SLA and  threshold  quality  requirement.
Analyze each  error to  fix  the discrepancy  issue and  prevent them to  reoccur  in  future for
same transaction.
Contd....
(Page-3)
Providing  training  for new Associates in  the team and  the team ,  banking  the cheques
received  from the customers relating  to  the purchase of shares,  and  also  for timely  investments as
per  direction  of the customers and  Stock  Deposit.
Motivating  the team towards their work  and  in  the absence of  team leader  managing  the
transfer  team.
Responsible for  providing  update and  query  resolution  to  the team with  the help  from
onshore team.
Worked  for Verizon  Billing  (Voice).
Skilled  in  taking  calls of the US clients and  solving  their  billing  queries over the phone.  Skilled
in  Applications   Remedy.  Achieved  many  Promoters and  appreciation  from the clients and
customers.  Happened  to  win  the highest number of  promoters in  Verizon  Billing-  Pune .
In  Don  Bosco  High  School
Served  as an  ASSTT.  Subject Teacher(Computer Science)  .
Responsible for  teaching  and  grooming  the students in  the subject of  Computer  Science
Preparing  the students for  HSLCE.
Introduced  the subject -  Computer Science for the first time in  the Hojai Sub-division  in  DBHS
with  co-ordination  with  Fr.  Principal Alex.  (Assam)  in  the year 2008  and  was successful in
helping  the batch  in  passing  with  100  pc result consecutively  for  2years during  my  tenure.
s Having  a total experience of  9+ years.
T E C H N I C A L S K I L L S
Acquired  basic knowledge in  handling  software like MS Office,  Visual basic,  C++,  C,  HTML,
TALLY,  DOS,  Java,  and  Windows & Oracle.
K E Y S T R  E N G T H S
Ambitious,  enthusiastic and  a very  good  team player.
P E R  S O N A L D E T A I  L S
Sex  Male.
Marital Status Single
Linguistic ability  English,  Hindi,  Bengali,  Nagamies and  Assamese.
Permanent Address \u0022MAZUMDAR  ENCLAVE\u0022,  2No.  Janata Path,  Gobindapalli,  Hojai
Assam- 782435.  Phone +91-9864284672  (Assam)
JAYASHREE
Tel: +91  9611361512/ E-Mail: jayashreeshetty86@rediffmail.com
Intend  to  build  a career  with  leading  corporate of hi-tech  environment with  committed  &
dedicated  people,  which  will help  me to  explore myself fully  and  realize my  potential.
Having  2.5  years of teaching  experience on  different computer  subjects
Experience in  handling  projects of  final year  BCA students as internal guide
Extensive hands-on  project development experience on  Java,  VB  and  Scripting  languages
Efficient and  Effective knowledge of OOPS Concepts
Experience in  software Implementation,  Analysis and  Deployment of  client/server  and
object oriented  systems
Got internship  of six  months in  NITIN SPINNERS LTD.  (BHILWARA)
Qualified  Chartered  Accountant (November 2009)
More than  2  years of working  experience as a Senior  in  Assurance department of  BSR
and  Company  (a member  firm of KPMG international).
Dynamic professional having  rich  and  extensive experience in  statutory,  internal and
tax  audit with  a thorough  grasp  of various corporate and  taxation  laws and  statutory
enactments with  the ability  to  relate theory  with  practical application.
A team leader/player  with  exceptional interpersonal skills and  analytical bent of  mind
thus being  able to  comprehend  and  explain  complex  financial data easily.
Ability  to  work  under  high  pressure situations and  meeting  deadlines.
Position  : Graduate Electrical Engineer Trainee (July  2012  to  January  2013)
Company  : 400kV Madakkathara Substation  under  KSEB  (Kerala State Electricity
Board)
Operation  and  Maintenance works of 400/220kV,  220/110kV,  110/11kV Power
transformers,Circuit breakers,  Instrument transformers,  Isolators and  Earthing  Switches.
Testing  of  power  equipments using  DOBLE kit.
Testing  BDV of  transformer  oil.
DGA of  transformer  oil.
Routine test of  various power  equipments.
Handling  thermal image camera.
Position  : Electrical Engineer (January  2012  to  July  2012)
Company  : Maxwell Electric Corporation  Electrical Contractors & Engineers,  Thrissur,
Kerala
According  to  the load  details given  by  the client,  calculate Maximum Demand  and
specify  the transformer  required  and  its protection
Calculate fault level from the data get from client and  substation,  design  the earthing
requirement and  HT cable size.
Organize the loads into  MSB,  SSB s & DB s as per  IE rules and  provisions required
for the client.
Calculate the Power factor  to  be improved  and  design  the APFC panel.
Provide protection  for  Cables,  motors,  starters as per  standards.
Draw the schematic and  physical diagrams in  AutoCAD
Take approval from Electrical Inspectorate.
Site supervision  during  execution  of  work.
Testing  and  Commissioning  of the electrics.
Projects Involved
Electrification  of  MuraleeravamApartment,Guruvayoor,  having  200KVA Unitized
Sub  Station  and  40KVA Generator.
Electrification  of  ShivamApartment,Thrissur,  having  160  KVA Unitized  Sub  Station
and  62.5KVA Generator.
Electrification  of  M.R.G Sreekrishna,Thrissur,  having  250  KVA Unitized  Sub  Station
and  62.5KVA Generator.
Training  & Certifications
Certified  in  Autocad& Electrical cad  through  autodeskauthorised  training  centre
Two  week  training  in  Kerala Electrical & Allied  Engineering  Co.Ltd  [A
transformer  manufacturing  company  under  kerala government]
Computer Skills 1. AutoCAD -  2011  (Autodesk  Certified  )
2. Electrical CAD -  2010  (Autodesk  Certified  )
3. Basics of C   Programming
4. Matlab  ,P-Spice ,Mi-  Power
5.  MS Office 2007
Functional Areas Years MFG Industry 3  years I.T Software 7  years 9  months Total years 10  year  9  Months
Company  Name/Address. Duration Total Years Department M/S.  S.R.P.Tools Pvt Ltd.  (MHI)
Sipcot complex,  post bag  no:1
Ranipet,  Vellore-Dist,  Pin-632403.
2002  to  2005 3  Years Quality  dept/
Electrical Maintenance
Years Designation From 2002  to  2004 Quality  Department Assistant From 2004  to  2005 Government Apprentichip  (Electrical Dept) Company  Name/ Address. Duration Total Years Department M/S.  Samsung  India software Operations Pvt Ltd.
#66/1  Bagmani Techpark,  lake view B  block.
C.V.Ramannagar.Bangalore-93.
2005  to  2013 7  Years
9  Months
Admin/Facility  Maintenance
Years Designation From 2005  to  2006 Senior Technician From 2006  to  2007 Site supervisor From 2007  to  2013 Electrical Executive Engineer
SRP Tools Pvt Ltd.  (Now M.H.I)
11KV/440  V 1000  kva Transformer operation  maintenance.
600  A Vacuum circuit breaker operation  & maintenance.
1000  A Air  circuit Breaker operation  & maintenance.
500  KVA *  2  No's D.G Operation  & maintenance.
Gear  cutting  tools breakdown  & Rectification.
CNC  Machine breakdown  attend  and  rectification.
Up  to  1000kva transformer  heat treatment plant operation  & maintenance.
Various energy  meter  reading  taken,  calculation  and  entry  activities.
Company  Tele phone system maintenance.
In  Samsung  India Software Operation  Pvt Ltd.  (Under PWS out sourcing)
Buildings: Bagmani Tech  Park,  Lake views \u0022B\u0022Block,  Tridib,  and  Laure.
C.V.Ramannagar.Bangalore-93
Building: J.P Techno  Park.  Millers' road.bangalore-01.
11KV/400  V 3000  kva Transformer operation  & Maintenance.
11KV/600A Vacuum circuit breaker  operation  & Maintenance.
3000  A Air  circuit Breaker operation  & Maintenance.
3000A ATS operation  & Maintenance.
1010  kav  *3  Nos,  D.G operation  & maintenance.
300  KVA *6  No's UPS operation  & Maintenance.
400  Ton  Chiller  plant Observation  with  AMC  Vendor.
22000  cfm AHU'S *  16  Nos operation  & Maintenance.
10  Floor BMS system operation,  Maintenance & service.
15  Technician,  100  office boys & Housekeeping  boys maintenance.
All type of document creation  and  modification  activities.
MY SKILLS IN SAMSUNG
FACILITY/ADMINISTRATION RELATED
7+ years of  Experience in  Office Administration  /Office facility  Management/Facility
Executive engineer.
E.B BILL preparation  activities for  all sites in  Bangalore.
Multi Clint power sharing  calculation  activities.
Site KWH reading  verification  activities.
Arranging  Business Card  Requisitions.
Manage and  handling  of  the all vendors.
Technician  and  office boy  interview activities.
Maintained  Expense Reports every  month.
Management of  Stores and  issue of  Stationary  and  other items.
Technician  shift scheduled  preparation  activities.
Regularization  of  AMC  with  outside service vendors.  like Maintenance,  Cab  hires
services,  Cafeteria,  Housekeeping,  Security,  printing  & stationary,  courier,  travel,
All type of check  list preparation  and  utilization  activities.
BMS AHU Running  hrs changing  activities.
Daily  follow up  of  the meals requirement as per  employee attendants.  Quality  & variety
of  food  served  with  nutrition.
Monthly  Power saving  and  safety  meeting  with  technicians activities.
Vendor  complaint report preparation.
Manage outsourced  contracts and  Manpower.
To  check  & process monthly  bills of  all contractors for  electricians,  housekeeping  &
pantry  staff,  office subordinates staff,  and  telephone services.
To  Facility  General Manager  reporting  work  activities.
Maintenance and  housekeeping  documentary  preparation  activities.
Annual P.M.work  scheduled  preparation  activities.
Month  load  chart preparations and  submit to  management.
Materials requirement report preparation  activities.
Materials stock  list maintenance activities.
AHU history  card  maintenance activities.
Hub  room /Server  room activities.
CCTV Operation  and  maintenance.
ELECTRICAL RELATED
Transformer  Operation  and  Maintenance.
VCB,  ACB  Operation  and  Maintenance.
ATS,  BUS Coupler  Operation  and  Maintenance.
Capacitor  panel Operation  and  Maintenance.
Distribution  panel Operation  and  Maintenance.
Working  knowledge of till 600sqmm cabling  and  gland  work.
D.G Operation  and  Maintenance up  to  1500  kva.
UPS Operation  and  Maintenance up  to  300  kva.
BBT Rising  main  Operation  and  Maintenance.
SCHINDLER  Elevator  related  control Operation  and  Maintenance.
Floor SMSB Operation  and  Maintenance.
MCCB,  RCCB,  ELCB,  MCB,  Operation  and  Maintenance.
DOL and  STAR  DELTA starter Operation  and  Maintenance.
3  phase induction  motor  Operation  and  Maintenance (up  to  50  HP).
LAB  power design  and  wiring  activities.
Cubical wiring  work  supervise and  faulty  find  out activities
A/C  RELATED
FCU Operation  and  Maintenance activities.
PAC  Operation  and  Maintenance activities.
CSU Operation  and  Maintenance activities.
VFD Operation  and  Maintenance activities.
VAV Operation  and  Maintenance activities.
AHU Operation  and  Maintenance activities.
VCD Operation  and  Maintenance activities.
CHILLER  Plant Operation  and  Maintenance activities.
Split /window A/C  Units Operation  and  Maintenance activities.
Air  CFM Balancing  activities.
BMS Software installation  and  execute activities.
BMS DDC  Panel activities.
Actuators Operation  and  Maintenance.
Thermo  start control activities.
AHU Motor shaft bearing  replacement activities
n Project : UAIP-SET.
n
Job  Title : Sr.  Engineer.
n Company  Name : AFTL,  Bangalore.
n Client : CESC.
n Duration  in  this Job  : Oct 2012  to  Present
Description: Planning,  Monitoring  & Execution  of  Trunkey  contract project,  i.e.  design,
testing,  transport,  construction,  erection,  testing  and  commissioning  of  distribution  HT/LT
lines,  distribution  transformers of varying  capacities and  other allied  Works.
Role &Responsibilities:
n Studying  of  DPR  and  clearly  understanding  the scope of work  to  be carried  out.
n Carrying  out Survey  at site and  understanding  the actual work  to  be carried  out.
n Preparation  of  drawings or  pole schedules as per the survey  carried  out.
n Getting  approval for surveyed  drawings from the client.
n Calculation  of  materials required  for  the complete execution  of  work.
n Preparation  of  Estimations for the work  for which  approval is given  by  client
n Getting  the work  order  for  the Estimation  prepared
n Training  the Contractors and  labors about the work  to  be carried  out.
n Planning  and  Execution  of  work  at site within  the given  time.
n
Tracking  of  correspondence to  and  from Clients / PMC  / Subcontractors /Suppliers /
Other  agencies involved  in  execution  and  coordinating  with  HO for  draft replies.
n Maintaining  of all documentation  required  contractually  which  includes
Drawings receipt registers Materials Indent Status daily  and  Monthly  Progress Reports
Presently  working  as Electrical Maintenance engineer for  \u0022M/S Manaksia Limited\u0022 from
22  April 2011  To  Till Date.
Maintenance of  GE FANUC,  Siemens,  Messung  PLC  etc.
Controllers Tuning  of Athena .Eurotherm,  Masibus,  Pioneer.
Drive commissioning  of ABB,  SIEMENS,  MITSUBUSHI,YASKAWA
DELTA,  HITACHI  Drives.
Maintenance of  PMC  250  Sacmi lining,  zapata lining,  PTC  027  Sacmi Punching  M/C.
Maintenance and  servicing  of  Atlas copco  Air  compressors,  Air  Driers.
Maintenance and  Trouble shooting  of  Plastic closures CCM32,  FSM12,  PMV24  Sacmi
Lining  m/c.
Maintenance and  operation  of 380  KVA,  320  KVA,  125  KVA Diesel Generator sets.
In  house Calibration  of  all Equipments.
Documentation  and  facing  of  ISO Audits
Worked  for \u0022Abhedya Industries Ltd.Kothur\u0022 in  Metallizer  department as electrical
maintainance engineer.  From 21  Feb  2010  to  14  April 2011.
s Power complaints,  maintenance & attend  breakdown  of 33KV HTOH,  11KV HTOH,
LTOH,  LT & HT UG Network  &, im provement of  old  LT Network,  replacement of
transformers and  old  LT line by  new UG line,11  KV feeder  separation  work,  Underground  of
Cabling  by  using  Trenchless Technology.
s Handling  subcontractor  Team for  metering  replacement of  consumer,  No  power
complaints team,  new connection  trace and  activate,  Street light undergrounding  cabling  and
maintenance.
s Managing  Project activities & and  executes project work  plans,  monitoring,  &
implementing  measures to  meet changing  needs and  requirements
2.   Six  month  worked  in  BSES Rajdhani Power  Ltd  (Reliance Energy  Ltd),  New Delhi
as an  O&M Engineer.
s
Maintenance & breakdown  team management consumer  complaints rectification
s Billing  of  area wise part by  using  SAP and  SMART2K software
KEY FUNCTIONAL AREAS
s Schedule & resource finalization  with  project team
s Monitoring  the requirements of the project site & keeping  coordination  with  site
management team for  information  exchange & required  action.
s Participating  in  project review meetings for tracking  project progress
s Overall planning,  scheduling,  monitoring  and  management of  project including  works
scheduling,  monitoring  progress of  work  to  ensure timely  completion  without any  cost and
time overrun.
PROJECT EXECUTED
s Over 250  Distribution  transformers LT network  up  to  consumer  energy  meter is
undergrounded  within  one year in  Agra city  (Uttar  Pradesh).
s Many  11  KV Feeder  separation  work  is executed  O/H and  Undergrounded.
s Large no  transformer  old  LT network  is changed  with  new ABC/Dog/Weasel
conductor as per  load
s 33KV network  is routed  over  10000  meter  O/h  or  underground  or  changed  conductor
ACADEMIC & TECHNICAL QUALIFICATION
Degree in  Electrical & Electronics Engineering
s Anand  Engineering  College,  Agra (UPTU,Lucknow)    69.06% in  2010
s 12th  (PCM) Obtained  79.2%  marks in  2005
s 10th  (Science)  Obtained  70.5%  marks in  2003
1. Presently  working  with  Helplab  Healthcare (P) Ltd.,  in  Delhi as a administrator and
marketing  Head  with  \u0022Abacalife Healthcare\u0022,  at New Delhi,  Since July  \u002220012.\u0022
1.A. Handling  all the documentation  work,  like letter drafting  emailing  etc.
1.B. Handling  payment follows up  to  all over India customer.  Even  it is consignee or it is a
distributor.
1.C. Take a follow up  through  all over the field  force what a sale is coming  from market.
1.D. Handing  the enquiry  which  is comes through  the customer of  all over India Like
Making  party  for the company  and  all over  the correspondence work.
Over  one years working  with  Marketing  Division  of  Sarabhai Chemicals generic division,  in
Delhi as Administrator  and  marketing  with  \u0022Vinayak  Remedies Limited\u0022,  at New Delhi,  Since
'2010
1.E. Handling  all the documentation  work,  like letter  drafting  emailing  etc.
1.F. Handling  payment follows up  to  all over India customer.  Even  it is consignee or it is a
distributor.
1.G. Take a follow up  through  all over the field  force what a sale is coming  from market.
D. Handling  statuary  Forms from Sales Tax  Department,  like `C',  `F' form on  quarterly  /
monthly  basis.
2. Over  one years working  with  Cipla Ltd.,  in  Delhi as C&F Manager  handling  \u0022Cipla
Generics Division\u0022,  at New Delhi,  Since '2009
1.H. Handling  the warehouse at Delhi,  my  work  is Stock  arrange,  all the computer  work,  like
letter  drafting  emailing,  Offline Invoicing,  stock  entry  etc.
1.I. Handing  Cash  all other  managerial decision  behalf  of Company.
C.  Handling  transportation  for goods sent Delhi to  our  other depot in  all over  India.
D.  Handling  all A/c work  like Vat Return,  maintain  company  a/c books ledger,  entry  of
daily  expense voucher.
E. Issuing  statuary  Forms from Sales Tax  Department,  like `C',  `F' form on  quarterly  /
monthly  basis.
2. Over  five Years working  with  Intervet India Pvt.  Ltd.,  in  Delhi as C& F Manager
handling  with  \u0022Animal Health  and  FMCG Division\u0022 Since '2005
A. Online Invoicing  and  Handing  Stock  management and  MIS Report.
B. Emailing  and  Drafting  of  customers related  correspondence work  as per  company
requirement.
C. Handing  Cash  all other  managerial decision  behalf  of Company.
D. Handling  all voucher writing,  preparation  of  Vat Return,  and  daily  expense voucher.
E. Handling  Inventory  of goods in  all over  India.
F. Issuing  statuary  Forms Sales Tax  Department,  like `F' form on  quarterly  / monthly  basis.
OTHER  QUALIFICATION:
Expert in  Basic Computer  operation  skill including  MS Word,  Excel,  Outlook,  Tally.
s Responsible for  overseeing  and  guiding  technician  & labor  in  producing  concrete
mixture in  compliance with  safety  standards and  technical applications.
s Handle the tasks of  reviewing  and  providing  input and  guidance related  activities
deliverables and  inspection.
s Perform responsibilities like data gathering  and  analysis including  input in  the project
scope and  design.
s Assigned  the tasks of ensuring  that the requirements of  the project are met by
consulting  with  the subject matter expert.
s Responsible for  assisting  in  design  and  equipment selection  based  on  availability  and
cost effectiveness.
s Play  active role in  project reviews,  project meetings,  hazard  identification,
maintainability,  hazard  analysis,  operability,  model reviews,  and  commissioning.
\u0022Project coordinator\u0022,  NETLINK SOFTWARE SOLUTION PRIVATE LTD,  Bhopal,
M.P (Jan2011    July  2012).
s Attend  clients meetings and  assist with  determination  of  project requirements.
s Prepare project organization  and  communication  harts.  Assist the PM in  the drafting
and  issuance of  project proposals,  tenders,  budgets and  expenditures.
s
Track  the progress and  quality  of  work  being  performed  by  design  discipline.
s Ensue clients needs are met in  a timely  and  cost effective manner.
s Effectively  and  accurately  communicate relevant project information  to  the client and
project team.
s Communicate ideas for improving  company  processes with  positive and  constructive
attitude,  keep  PM and  others informed  about project status and  issues.
Page 1  of  3
\u0022O.M.C.R Executive\u0022,  BHARTI INFRATEL LTD,  (Partner  Bharti Airtel) Patna,  Bihar
(October  2012    Present).
s Monitoring  various alarms of sites in  Bihar  circle thru  citrix  and  escalate the same to
technicians,  cluster  in  charge,  zonal manager,  infra managers and  O&M heads.
s Maintaining  excel sheet of  sites along  with  base station  controller,  base controller
frequency,  site id,  down  time and  restored  time.
s Review issue related  to  power  and  follows the escalation  table within  40  minutes.
INDUSTRIAL VISITS
Hindustan  Photo  Films,  Ooty.
Bharat Heavy  Engineering  Limited,  Bangalore.
National Thermal Power  Corporation,  Ranchi.
Steel Authority  of  India Limited,  Bokaro.
CURRENT ENGAGEMENT (From Aug  1999)
Joining  Time : Asst.  Engineer (Projects)
Current Position  : Manager  (Project)
Organisation : PSL Group  -  Leading  Industrial house in  infrastructure sector
of  Oil,  Gas and  Water,  Flagship  Company  namely  PSL Limited  Involved  in  manufacture of
SAW (Spiral)  steel pipes & anti corrosive coating  thereof  for OIL,  GAS & WATER Sectors.
Vendor  development & Material / Spares Procurement as per  site & project
requirement.
Managing  the outdoor  activity  schedules with  constant tie-ups with  vendor  and
implementing  product quality  promotional strategies.
Coordination  with  Fabrication  erection  and  commissioning  of  new equipments /parts
related  to  pipe mill and  anti corrosion  coating  plant time to  time as per  project requirement.
Planning  of  Man  Power  and  Equipments as per  project site requirements,  with
constant tie-ups.
Look  after  Technical responsibilities related  to  Project Sites assigned  by  Top
Management,  time to  time.
PREVIOUS EXPERIENCE (Sep.  1996  TO July  1999)
Designation : Jr.  Engineer  (Insp.)
Organisation  : Belliss India Ltd.,  A well known  Pioneer  Company  engage in  the field  of
steam turbine,  manufacturing,  Having  technical collaboration  with  Rolls Royce Power
Engineering  Ltd.,  England,  Company  has major  share in  the field  of manufacturing  & supply
of  steam turbine in  process industries,  Up  to  10MW.
I  was responsible for  different type of quality  checks at various stage of
manufacturing  & production  work  of  steam turbine.
Visited  many  different industries to  finalize the space and  location  required  for
turbine and  accessories installation  before shifting  from work  place to  client place.
I  was associated  in  fabrication,  erection  and  commissioning  of  turbine as per  design
and  drawing  requirement.
Responsible for  test running,  and  commissioning  of  turbines before handing  over  to
clients.
Notice period
30  days,  Ready  for  relocation,
Curently  working  as a IT Recruiter  on  Sanguine Technologies from june 2012  to  Till date
Involved  in  Permanent & Contractual staffing.
Identifying  the potential candidates through  sources like Database,  Job  portals,
Reference,  etc.
Initial screening  of the resumes as per  the requirements / telephonic screening,  briefing
the candidates about the job  profile,  salary  package,  organization,  etc
Short-listing,  scheduling  the short listed  candidates and  interview co-ordinations.
Interview follow-ups with  the Clients and  follow-ups with  the candidates.
Developing  and  maintaining  of database on  the basis of immediate and  future
requirement.
Follow up  with  candidate till joining  & after.
Maintaining  resume database,  trackers and  reports.
Skills Sourced:
Microsoft Technologies: ASP,  ASP.NET,  VB,  VB.NET,  C#,  SharePoint.
E-commerce/Internet: Java,  J2ee,  Webservices,  Weblogic,  Websphere,  Struts,  Hibernate,
Swing,  Servlets,  Oracle,  ATG
Posting  on  different sites
Currently  working  with  HCL Infosystem Ltd.  Noida as a Desktop  support Engineer since
30/May-2010  to  till date.
Working  with  as a Desktop  support Engineer  in  highly  professional environment at a
client site HCL Technologies BPO services Ltd.  Responsible to  rectify  the problems related  to
Hardware,  System and  Network,  which  include the network  more than  3000  systems.
Configuring  and  troubleshooting  the Microsoft outlook.
Troubleshooting  Hardware & Software rerated  problems.
Call escalations through  HP OPENVIEW.
System ghosting  though  LAN & HDD by  using  Norton  Ghost Software.
OS installations (win  XP,  win  vista & 7,W8).
Ghosting  by  using  Norton  Ghost application.
Setup  and  configuration  of  Software & Hardware in  BPO industries.
Performance monitoring  and  troubleshooting  include network  connectivity  problems.
Installation  of  Print devices (Network  & local)  on  Desktop.
Co-ordination  with  venders for support.
Completed  BSC  IT from PTU Janaldhar2009  with  first Division.
Fertilizers Experience
Experienced  in  terms of  monitoring  the safety  policies and  procedures at all levels of
construction  of DAP Building  and  Bagging  Plant.
Construction  Experience
Screen  House,  Railway  Siding,  PMC,  RMC,  New Substation  and  also  roads and
drainages.
Vessel Experience
PA-DAY TANK,  SCRUBBER,  GRANULATOR DRYER,  COOLER  DRUM and
STAG.
Road  Safety
NH-59  ROAD BETWEEN GUNTUR  AND VISAKHAPATNAM.
PREVIOUS ORGANIZATION:
Worked  as Safety  Officer  in  HARI  HARA CONSTRUCTIONS PVT LTD,
VISAKHAPATNAM.
Work  site: Ramky  Infrastructures Ltd,  Hyderabad.
Location: Kothaguda.
Project: Ramky  Infrastructure.
Duration: September 2008  to  May  2010.
Client: RAMKY INFRASTUCTURE LTD.
Construction  Experience
Experienced  in  safety  in  terms of  high  raised  buildings (Both  Commercial &
Domestic).
s 4  Years and  6  Months of experience in  different sectors in  Safety  Department.
s Worked  as Safety  Officer in  HARI  HARA CONSTRUCTIONS PVT LTD,
VISAKHAPATNAM from September 2008  to  May  2010.
s Employed  as Safety  Officer  since June 2010  to  November  2012  with  VIJAY
NIRMAN COMPANY PVT LTD,  VISAKHAPATNAM,  C/o  CIL,  Kakinada.
CONSTRUCTION EXPERIENCE:
Well experienced  in  looking  after  the site affairs like camp  installation,  making
arrangements to  the employees in  terms of  accommodation  and  food.
Inspection  of  site equipment including  machineries,  tools,  first aid  kit etc.,
Well experienced  and  confident in  maintaining  discipline among  the employees at
camps and  site.
In  charge and  responsible for  placing  barricades and  suitable sign  boards and  warning
boards at all required  sites.
Well experienced  in  terms of giving  induction  training  to  all new employees at site.
EXPERIENCED AS A SAFETY OFFICER IN TERMS OF:
1. Site safety  induction.
2. Implementation  of  safety  policies and  procedures at all levels of  construction.
3. Conducting  safety  inspections and  meetings at regular intervals.
4. Documented  training  in  Fire and  Industrial safety.
5. Trained  in  First Aid.
s Adhering  to  the work  permit systems and  monitoring  the working  conditions
providing  safe access / egress to  the employees at all work  sites,  maintaining  good
housekeeping,  first aid  procedures wherever  required,  developing  good  attitude and
accountability  for  each  and  every  employee etc.
s Familiarized  with  electrical safety,  safety  related  to  handling  and  using  of  compressed
gas cylinders,  maintenance of  absolute safety  at hot works.  Assigning  suitable personal
protective equipment to  all the employees respectively.
DETAILS OF EXPERIENCE:
1. In  this tenure of  4  years & 6  months I  was assigned  responsibility  as a safety  officer in
the above mentioned  company.  We as a safety  team inducted  safety  for  the first time at our
work  sites.
s I  individually  maintained  absolute safety  in  my  particular  construction  areas,  where
hazardous work  like excavations,  scaffolds,  load  lifting  works etc.,  were involved.
s I  was appreciated  several times for  performing  safety  programs like training  to  the
employees in  regard  to
Usage of  personal protective equipment.
Proper record  keeping.
2. I  have good  experience in  special safety  program like job  hazard  analysis,  hazard
communications,  risk  assessments,  safety  inspections,  safety  audits and  also  accident
investigation  reports etc.,
3. Familiarized  with  First Aid,  electrical safety,  road  safety,  work  permits advanced  fire
fighting  systems,  safe handling  of  compressed  gas cylinders etc.,
Obtaining  ZERO ACCIDENT PERFORMANCE is my  goal.
s Knowledge of Basic Computer  Microsoft Office & Internet.
s Knowledge of Manual Accounting  (Billing,  Cash  Book,  Day  Book,  Journal Books,
Voucher Pads,  Stock  Register  etc.)  In  Hindi & English.
s Knowledge of Accounting  Software (Compaq,  Busy  & Tally).
s Knowledge of Computer  Accounting  (Tally  4.5,  5.4,  6.3,  7.2,  8.2  ERP 9  Release 3.319
with  VAT,  TDS,  Excise & Service Tax) from Tally  Academy.
s One year Diploma in  Financial Accounting  from Agarwal Institute of Professional
Accounting  (Certificate from Tally  Academy  in  Bangalore).
s TCP test passed  from Tally  Academy.
s Presently  working  with  M/s Rayban  Foods Private Limited,  HAPUR as an  Assistant
Manager  - Accounts since 1st April,  2012  to  till date.
s 3  Years 6  Months experience with  M/s Gunjan  Garg  & Company,  HAPUR  as an
Assistant Manager -  Accounts from 1st Sept,  2008  to  31st March,  2012.
s
Preparation  & Finalization  of  Accounts.
s Balance Sheet Final.
s Arrange Audit of  Accounts.
s Bank  Reconciliation.
s Preparation  of  TDS.
s Monthly  VAT Return  & online e-filling
s Annual Return  & Sales Tax  Cases Final
s Maintain  of  Excise Register.
s Voucher Entry  & Stock  Maintain  with  Manufacturing.
s Accounts Maintain  with  (6R,  9R  & Commission  Base).
s
Accounts Maintain  of Trust.
Individual Traits:
s Self-motivated,  thrive in  high-energy  environment.
s Education  and  work  experience to  have knowledge and  value.
s Independent self-starter,  able to  priorities and  resolve problem.
s Adaptability  and  flexibility.
B.E.  (Bachelor  of  Engineering)  in  Electrical & Electronics from Vinayaka Mission's
Research  Foundation,  Salem Tamilnadu,  with  an  aggregate of  61%,  Year 2007-  2011.
s Completed  training  in  P.T.P.S (PATRATU THERMAL POWER  STATION) Patratu,
for 30  days.
s Completed  training  at J.S.E.B (JHARKHAND STATE ELECTRICITY BOARD)
33/11  KV P/S/S Ormanjhi,  Ranchi,  Jharkhand  for 15  days.
Enjoy  working  under  pressure
Organization: TAG Corporation,  Chennai
Duration: 8  months
Designation: Electrical maintenance
Organization: INDIC  EMS ELECTRONICS PVT LTD,  BENGALURU
Designation: Quality  engineer
Duration: November  2011  September  2012
Job  Responsibilities as Electrical maintenance:
S Maintenance and  operation  in  high  voltage installation.
S
To  handle the machinery  motors,  welding  machine compressor,  bending  machine,
cutting  machine,  drilling  machine,  grinding  machine,  punching  machine press.
S To  maintenance the AC  generator.
S EB-Power  reading  for everyday.
S To  follow-up  the everyday  complaints and  priority  basis.
S To  maintain  daily  reports and  report to  my  supervisor.
Job  Responsibilities as Incoming  Quality  Engineer:
S Ensuring  that processes needed  for the quality  management system are established,
implemented,  controlled  and  maintained.
S To  develop  the workforce on  Product specifications and  practices so  that effectiveness
and  efficiency  can  be enhanced  for handling  existing  and  new products.
S To  prepare Quality  System Procedures and  all the other relevant quality  documents as per
Product and  Process specifications.
S To  ensure all the ISO documents are properly  revised  and  initiated  before issuing  to  the
concern  stages.
S
Achieving  organizational goals - Brainstorming  with  management to  determine future
direction  and  growth.
Developed  Web  Pages
Implement the designing
Connectivity  to  the data base
Conducted  the Unit Tests
Coding
Extra-Curriculum Activities:
QUALIFICATION INSTITUTE/COLLEGE UNIVERSITY MONTH & YEAR PERCENTAGE Microsoft Certified  System Administrator (MCSA) -- -- Feb,  Aug
2011
-- JCHNPP Jetking,  Nashik Jetking,  Nashik Jan  2008 76.40% Cert.  Course In  Computer  Hardware Infocomm Computers,  Nashik Maharashtra Business Training  Board Feb
2007
`A' Grade Cert.  For Core Competence In  Computing NIIT,  Deolali NIIT June 2003 84.00%
PROJECT WORK
s MCM PROJECT WORK: - Blood  Bank  Management System
[Application  Software] (Jankalyan  Blood  Bank,  Nashik).
s JETKING PROJECT WORK :-
SEM I: -  Flashing  running  lights
Duration: -  2  weeks
Conclusion:-  To  provide flashing  running  lights on  the highways in  order  to  give a signal for
sharp  curve and  avoid  the accident at night time.
SEM II: -  Wireless Networking
Duration:-  2  weeks
Conclusion: -  To  know about different wireless technologies that is IR,  Bluetooth,  RF,  Laser
available for  transferring  data,  devices used  for  Wireless Networking,  advantages over  wired
network,  standards used  for  Wireless Networking.
1. Organization  : - Netconnect India Pvt.  Ltd  - April 2012  to  till date
Designation  :-  System Administrator
Project :-  RFID based  cylinder  tracking  system
Client :-  IBM - HPCL
Installation  and  administration  of Windows 2003  Server.
Installation,  configuration  and  administration  of  VMware Server.
Installation  and  configuration  of third  party  middleware software on  VMware Server.
Installation  and  configuration  of IBM WebSphere Application  Server  v6.1.
Installation  and  configuration  of IBM HTTP Server.
Installation  and  configuration  of IBM's DB2  database.
Installation  and  configuration  of Trend  Micro  Antivirus on  server  and  regularly  updating
the client machines in  order to  create virus free environment.
Taking  backup  of  data on  Tape Library.
Trouble shooting  software,  hardware and  network  related  issues.
2.
Organization  : - IMSI India Pvt.  Ltd  - May  2011  to  April 2012.
Designation  :-  Data Center  Operator
Project :-  RFID based  cylinder  tracking  system
Client :-  IBM - HPCL
Taking  backup  of  data on  Tape Library.
Installation  of  RFID reader  and  antenna and  tuning  it for  optimum readability  of  RFID
tags.
Trouble shooting  LF card  controller  related  issues.
Trouble shooting  software,  hardware and  network  related  issues.
3. IIPS (EBEL),  Nashik  -  1  May  2010  to  April 2011.
Designation  :-  System Administrator
Handle and  administer VSAT based  technology.
Installation  and  configuration  of Windows 2003  Server.
Configuring  and  maintaining  Active Directory.
Creating  and  managing  users,  groups,  computer  accounts and  their policies,  manage file
and  share permissions.
Trouble shooting  software and  hardware related  issues of  desktop  and  laptop  systems.
Maintaining  computer  peripheral audit.
4. ICFAI  National College,  Nashik  -  18  April 2008  to  30  April 2010.
Designation  :-  System Administrator
Installation  and  configuration  of Windows 2003  Server,  Active Directory.
Creating  and  managing  a network  of  50  PC's and  other  network  resources like printers,
scanner,  switches,  routers.
Installation  and  configuration  of Anti virus and  updating  it on  regular intervals,  in  order
to  provide virus free environment.
Creating  and  managing  users,  groups,  computer  accounts and  their policies,  manage file
and  share permissions.
Trouble-shooting  software,  hardware and  network  related  issues of  270  student's laptop.
Installation,  configuration  and  administration  of  Wi-Fi modem and  provide web  access to
students on  time.
Developed  new machines and  participated  in  designing  process of mechanical
Device (CAD,CAM,UNI  GRAPHICS)
Supervised  the installation  maintains of newly  installed  equipment proper  function  of
Machines and  mechanical equipment
Expertise in  computer  designed  soft wear  for preparing  draft and  concept of  new product
Developed  testing  procedures to  verify  functionally  of machine product to  meet the client
Requirement
Technical Quality  Exposure
Mechanical Softwear  Package   Uni-Graphices (CRISP BHOPAL) ,  MS Office
Mechanical seminar
Attending  Vibration  Analysis in  (CRISP BHOPAL)
Attending  Pneumatic Conversation  System in  (CRISP BHOPAL)
1.  Name of  Employer : Net Ambit,  T.  Nagar
Designation  : Telecaller
Experience : 6  months
2.  Name of  Employer : Wheels India (Travels),  Guindy.
Designation  : Admin  assistant
Experience : 12  months
3.  Name of  Employer : Anand  & Madhan  Chartered  Accountants,  Adyar
Page 2  of  2
Designation : Auditor  Trainee
Experience : 8  months
Process : Accounts and  Maintenance
s Entering  data in  Tally.
s Payroll processing
F  0
B  7
Six  week  Training  in  BHEL Haridwar On  CNC Machine.
F  0
B  7
2  Weeks Training  on  Professional Behaviour Development from MIET,  Meerut.
F  0
B  7
One Week  Training  on  ISO TS: 16946: 2002  Standards.
F  0
B  7
45  days training  on  Industrial Automation  from Soltech  New Delhi.
Educational Qualification Professional:
B.Tech  in  Electronics and  Communication  Engineering  with  First Division  from MIT MEERUT
Approved  by  AICTE,  Delhi and  Affiliated  to  GBTU,  Lucknow in  July  2011.
Teaching: In  school and  personal coaching  center
Presently  Working  as Trainee engg.  In  Mayur  Global Private Ltd  jaipur
North  East Frontier Indian  Railways (4th  June`12-23rd  June'12  (20  Days))
Project Name: Acquire the knowledge of  manufacturing,
Maintenance and  repairing  of  carriage,  bogie & wagon
Examination University Month/Year Percentage Honor  Received B.E. Pune University Jun-2013 62.9 First Class T.E. Pune University Nov-  2012 53.26 Second  Class S.E. Pune University Nov-2011 55.00 Higher  Second  Class F.E. Pune University Nov-2010 58.84 Higher  Second  Class

Total Experience: 1  Year  3  month
Company  Name: GKB  HITECH LENSE (P) LTD
Location: Chennai
DESIGNATION: HR  EXECUTIVE (CHENNAI  REGION)
Duration: 1  Year  3  month(May  2012    Till Now)
Recruitment
n Collecting  the requirements from each  department regarding  their  HR  requirement and
updating  them with  the manpower status report at regular  scheduled  intervals.
n Screening  and  short-listing  resumes and  forwarding  the same to  the concerned
department/departments followed  by  scheduling  interviews for the prospective candidates as per
the convenience of the Management.
n Once the selection  process is over,  segregating  the resumes and  filing  them in  the
respective folders if  they  are under hold  or  not considered.
Offer  Letter
n Preparation  of  Offer  Letters depending  on  the CTC agreed  to  by  the management and  the
prospective employee.
n The Offer  Letter  to  be given  to  the selected  candidate.
n
Once the candidate confirms his joining,  an  Appointment Letter  shall be issued  which  is
duly  signed  by  the HR Department.
Orientation  for New Employees
n The newly-joined  employee shall be given  orientation  training  regarding  the company
and  the departments,  and  the employee will be accompanied  by  an  HR Team member for  a
formal introduction  to  all the departments.
Salary  Statements
n Collecting  the Attendance Sheets
n Preparing  a consolidation  of working  hours
n
Collecting  applicable deductions of employees from the Accounts Department
n Collecting  mobile deductions from the Accounts Department
n Preparing  Salary  Statements
n Submit the Salary  Statements to  the Accounts Department for payment in  cash  or  through
bank.
ID Cards/Bank  Application/Visiting  Cards
n Collecting  three photographs from the newly-joined  employee; one for the ID card/ one
for Bank  Application/one photo  for  his/her  personal file.
n After getting  the ID card,  the bank  application  with  a copy  of ID card  will be submitted
to  the Accounts Department for  opening  Bank  Accounts.
Monitoring  Attendance
n Attendance of  the employees will be taken  from the Access Machine and  monitored  on  a
twice-a-week  basis,  Late arrivals monitoring
n Overtime monitoring  and  taking  necessary  approval from the department head.
n Monitoring  the Staff  Movement register
Security
n Monitoring  the Security  Guards
n
Maintaining  the attendance and  issues dealing  with  the security  outsourcing  company.
Manpower  Update
n Maintain  and  update the manpower requirement of  the construction  team and  other
related  departments and  send  the necessary  update schedules on  a weekly  basis to  the concerned
heads.
Pantry  /Housekeeping  Materials Control
n Maintain  and  monitor  coffee/tea refreshments and  ordering  the requirements of pantry
and  housekeeping  material as and  when  required.
n Addressing  and  attending  to  complaints regarding  office equipments including  A/C
maintenance etc.
Asset Logging
n Maintain  & monitor the resources and  assets and  of  the company  and  logging  the same as
well as maintaining  a register.
n Issuing  the resources/assets when  a new employee joins the company
n
Recovering  the resources/assets when  employees are leaving  the company
Scheduling  Office Boys
Preparing  the office boys' schedule and  sort out the problems in  Housekeeping
n Monitoring  the daily  schedule for  office boys
Employees Database
n Prepare individual database for the employees
n Prepare individual files for  all the employees at Hyderabad/Bangalore locations
n Update all individual files as and  when  required
n
Coding  the employees as per their  entity  and  department-wise.
Filing  System
n Individual filing  index  for  all the departments
n Maintenance of  files for all the external correspondence
n Maintenance of  files for all inter-office memorandums
Internal Memoranda
n Preparing  and  maintaining  internal memoranda as and  when  required  by  the
Management.
Working  as a Project-  Engineer  in  Rajdeep  Electrical Pvt Ltd  from dated  15
November  2011  to  till dated  in  Indian  Oil co-operation  ltd  ( Jammu  depot)  Jammu.
Company  Profile: REPL provide a complete spectrum of Electrical contracting  service
including  Lump-sum Turnkey  Project work,  Electrical Engineering  Design,  Design-assist,
Value Engineering,  etc.,
Operation  and  Maintenance Annual Contracts in  Electricals,  Instrumentations,  Air
conditioners,  Fire,  etc.,  field,
Energy  Audits in  Electricals,  Thermal,  Cogeneration,  etc.,  field,
Authorised  Service Center  of \u0022Larsen  & Toubro  Limited\u0022 for  entire product of Switchgear  of
L&T.
Project on  Lux  Level Improvement include installation  of High  Mast,  Flood  Light,  Well-
Glass Light & Lighting  Pole).
Objective : Project from inception  through  to  project completion  and  client handover.
1.  Handle the task  of  inspecting  and  troubleshooting  electrical systems and  apparatus
2  Co-ordination  with  M/s IOCL & other  sub  vendor  responsible for Target date work.
3  Receipt of  material at the site.
4.  Preparation  measurement sheet / certificate of  material received  at site.
5.intire execution.
6.Hand  over  to  clint after  submitting  Final Bill.
2.  Worked  as a Project Junior  Engineer  in  Laxmi Engineering  Pvt.  Ltd.(Ahemdabad)  from
15  July  2010  to  November  2011  .
A.GAIL (  Chhainsa compressor  station  ) chainsa ,Faridabad  ,  Haryana   June 2010  to
march  2011.
s 4  Week  Training  at FRICK INDIA ltd  15th  june
31th  july
s 4  Week  Training  at MITSU CAD 15th  june
31  th  july
B.E.(Bachelor  of  Engineering)  in  Electrical & Electronics from Vinayaka Mission's
Research  Foundation,  Salem Tamilnadu,  with  an  aggregate of  61%,  Year 2007-  2011.
s Completed  training  in  P.T.P.S(PATRATU THERMAL POWER  STATION) Patratu,  for
30  days.
s Completed  training  at J.S.E.B(JHARKHAND STATE ELECTRICITY BOARD)
33/11  KV P/S/S Ormanjhi,  Ranchi,  Jharkhand  for 15  days.

TCS E-serve Ltd  (formerly  known  as Citigroup  Global Services Ltd)
March    2011  to  Till date
Designation  Team member
Joined  on  09th  March  2011,  in  the Process carrying  out Accounts Maintenance for
U.K based  Clients of Citigroup  Global Market Ltd  (CGML),  London.
Later  carried  out Accounts Maintenance for U.S based  Clients of  Citigroup  Global
Market Inc (CGMI),  NY.
Account Maintenance function  involved  carrying  out the following  activities:-
s Maintenance of  Trade & Settlement related  information  in  the CGML's Database.
s Carrying  out amendments pertaining  to  the Contact details,  Custodian  changes,
Account changes & other  changes on  daily  basis as specified  by  the Client.
s Carrying  out Bulk  Request sent by  the Client to  ensure that the relevant funds are
being  affected  by  the changes specified  by  the Client.
s Liaising  with  the various Relationship  Managers at the Citibank  London  & at the
client's end  via E-mail.
Later  carried  out processing  of the Confirmation  Process a part of  Citigroup  Global
Market Ltd  (CGML) Operation.
Processing  in  the Confirmation  Process involved  carrying  out the following  activities:-
s Liaising  with  the various Relationship  Managers at the Citibank  London  & at the
client's end  via E-mail.
Actively  involved  in  UAT activities.
s Active participation  in  various UAT testing  for  different migration.
s Active participation  in  Check  out release.
Notable Achievements
s Successfully  completed  the site COB  testing  for August 2012.
s Served  as a Team member  of the CGML team which  was awarded  \u0022Champions
League Award\u0022 for the month  of  June 2012.
s Actively  involved  in  Fun  at Work  Committee
Participated  in  Drawing  Competition
Participated  in  Rangoli Competition
Past Experience
CMC  Ltd.
From -  13thJanuary  2010  to  12th  January  2011
Designation  -  Data Analyst (Accounts dept.)
Joined  on  August 2010,  in  the project Earning  Estimate for  Bloomberg.
Earning  Estimate project involved  following  activities.
s Worked  on  the financial statement and  analyzing  Income Statements received  from
the client.
s Tally  the balance sheet received  from the client.
s Analyse the cash  flow statement and  on  Financial ration  for  the furcating  year.
Later  carried  out to  Supply  Chain  Management project.
Supply  Chain  Management involved  following  activities.
s Worked  on  the annual reports received  from the clients.
s Analyze the Analyzing  supply  chain  relationships for  the historic data.
s Analyze time tickers for  the appropriate companies,  which  help  the company  for
managing  and  forecasting  future.
Working  in  M & M Ltd,Nashik  as a Graduate Apprentice Trainee(GAT)  in  Manufacturing
& Quality  Assurance (MQA)  since Last 1  Year.
Animator of  Plant Quality  related  daily  programme Quick  Response Resolution  Team
(QCRT).
Ability  to  do  various concerns analysis of  Vehicle.
Various types of  daily  Quality  Audits on  shop  floor  such  as Process audit,IQ
Audit,Pokayoke audit,Z-Stage audit.
Maintaining  and  updating  the quality  related  documents such  as Control Plan,  PFMEA,
and  Check  sheets.
Maintain  the Process & Product audit observations.
Perused  B.Tech  in  Mechanical Engineering  from Narayanadri institute of science and
technology,Rajampet
s Completed  22  days Vocational Training  at \u0022100%  E.  O.  U.  Plant of Micro  Inks Ltd.,
Vapi\u0022.
s Accounting  Knowledge: Worked  at \u0022R.  R.  Pitalia & Company  (chartered
accountants),  Vapi\u0022,  as an  accountant for  five months.
B.Ed.  from Lingaya's University  Faridabad  in  2010  with  first division.
Basic Knowledge Of Computer  (MS Office,Internet,C+ Etc).
Expert in  Teaching  :
Total five year  teaching  experience from in  following  subjects-
Engineering  Mathematics.
Academic Mathematics.
B.tech,(Electrical & Electronics Engineering)
Bharath  University,  Selaiyur  Chennai-73
(Established  U/S 3  0f UGC Act,1956)
Session-  2009-2013
Company Duration Post CHOICE ELECTRONICE PVT LTD 6  MONTH PRODUCTION ENGINNER
Proficiency  in  Computing  Too1
1.C&C++
2.  JAVA
3.  Plc&Automation in H ydraulic & Pneumatic
4  MS-Office
Personal Strength
s Hard  Working
s Leadership  quality
s Situation  handling  responsibility,
Interested  of area
s
Transmission  Line
s Electrical Machine
s Protection  & Switchgear
Decisive,  Result oriented  Procurement Executive offering  an  experience of  2  years in  IT-Sector
and  1year  in  Manufacturing  Processing  excellent skills summed  up  with  strong  knowledge in
procurement Process,  Costing  supplier Improvement,  Problem solving,  People Soft / ERP
(Purchase Module) and  ingenious problem finder  with  capacities to  lucratively  point out issues
in  early  to  avoid  time/cost expenditures.  Excellent team oriented  individual with  success in
coordinating  efforts within  the internal & external terms to  reach  surpass expectations.
CARRER  OBJECTIVE
To  work  in  a position  of greater  responsibility  and  growth  potential that my  knowledge be best
utilized,  gain  experience and  eventually  assume higher  position.
Corporate : KRIZZ Jewellery  Manufacturer Company
Role : Senior  Executive (Nov  2012  to  till Date)
Work  experience In  Procurement:
s Presently  End  to  end  to  contact details for  all import process
s
Purchase process in  buying  designing  machineries   Accessories and  other  related
products directly  from OEM Vendor's
s Send  the RFQ to  the vendor's for our  requirements,  Once the RFQ received  from our  end
we compare with  our Previous purchase cost for  further  process
s Key  decision  maker in  RFQ process & RFQ is finalized  it goes for  first level approval
s I  release the purchase order  to  the vendor  after  internal approval,  Follow up  with  the
vendors Performa invoice for  payment process.
s All the vendor payment which  happens through  bank  transfer  process
s Importing  goods from European  region  through  EPCG license.
s After  which  my  responsibility  is to  clear  the goods received  and  submit required
documents to  customs or whichever department in-charge
s Also  I  interact with  our  freight forwarders for  clearing  the goods in  time without any
penalties
s Reporting  to  MD once the importing  process is over.
s Monthly  once will visit our factory  for  smooth  operation
Corporate : Cognizant Technology  Solutions India Pvt Ltd
Role : Procurement Coordinator  (Feb  2010  to  Mar 2012)
Work  experience In  Procurement:
s Handled  the Procurement Function  with  respect to  creating  Non  IT related  Purchase/
Work  Orders,  Logistics Coordination  & processing  payments across India.
s Driving  cost saving  procurement initiatives and  working  on  effective cost cutting  areas
on  quality  products,  this benefits our  organization.
s Negotiate the prices with  the preferred  vendor  on  basis of  quality,  pricing  & Warranty  etc
and  submit necessary  recommendation.
s Empanelling  New Vendors to  the Organization.
s
Co-ordinate meetings with  various Supplier  groups to  ensure a smooth  relationship  with
them.
s Releasing  Purchase Orders (PAN India)  for the best quoted  vendors in  People Soft / ERP
(Purchase Module)
s Closely  follow-up  with  Vendors for  delivery  status updating  to  concern  Project Teams.
s Addressing  ADMIN related  queries coming  to  CAR Procurement and  Procurement
ADMIN DLs.
s To  focus and  consistently  report on  Open  Pos.
Invoice Process:
s Handling  Supplier  Queries related  to  payments,  POs.
s To  do  the necessary  follow-ups with  the Finance Team & Tax  Team to  ensure that the
payments are released  on  time.
s Also  working  on  an  Internal Financial tool called  \u0022Vault\u0022 for  processing  payments to  the
Vendor  within  a short span  & thereby  avoiding  paper work  & making  the payments process
effortless
Vendor  Management:
s
Reconciliation  payment related  with  vendors & internal stakeholders.
s Service Delivery,  Supplier  Governance and  Relationship  Management including
Performance Management,  Contract Management,  Matrices and  Dashboard  review for
effectiveness and  documenting  the interactions for  Operational Risk.
s Maintaining  the monthly  MIS for the various Vendors.
Corporate : ITI  Financial Services Limited
Role : Junior Officer   Back  office (Feb  2007    Nov  2008)
Junior  Officer    Back  office Operations
s MCX & NCDEX trade file downloading  process
s Sending  the mail to  Risk  Dept & all branches.
s Securities transfer to  F&O collateral A/C  adjustments for  shortfall clients.
s Collateral Shares transfer  to  Ben  A/c,  & client account (  DP )
s BSE auction  file downloading  from BOLT system & process to  class software
s BSE trade files downloading  from BOLT system & update to  class software.
s
Issue the MCX & NCDEX clients payout (payments)
s Daily  sending  margin  reports (NSE,  BSE,  MCX,  and  NCDEX) to  HO.
s Checking  with  CDSL & NSDL daily  transaction  for client.
s Checking  client shares with  iti DP.
Corporate : Cairn  Energy  India Pty  Limited
Role : Admin  Assistant (Sep  2004    Jan  2007)
Invoice processing
s Supporting  with  finance team for our  vendor  payments credit on  before due dates
s Hotel bills for  the employee.
s Employee Travel bills for  international and  domestic
s Telephone reimbursement bills for office and  staff  residence
s Office canteen  and  snack  bills.
s Office maintaining  electricity  bills and  staff  club  bills.
s
Faxing  reports,  correspondences for  and  on  behalf of  the organization  on  the whole
s Receiving  and  circulating  all the faxes to  various departments in  Cairn
Done internship  at T&AS Engineering,  Hyderabad  on  FPS(Fall Protection  System)
Paper  presentation/Work  Shops
Presented  a paper  on  ;6-Stroke Engine; at MEDHAMILAN 2011  in  Shri Vishnu
Engineering  College for  Women.
Attended  the \u0022Basic Robotics\u0022 workshop  at Andhra University  (Vizag).
Attended  for the AUTO CAD CERTIFICATION PROGRAM by  AUTODESK
Leadership  positions
Member of  the executive body  of  ISTE(Indian  Society  for Technical Education)
student forum.
Conducted  many  events under  ISTE
s Living  Design  Private Ltd,Chennai
May  -2011  to  June 2012
Role-  Sales Executive
s Eco  Dream Properties,  Bangalore
Aug  2012  till present
Role-Marketing  Executive
s Build  the company  profile and  brand  image in  the market
s Continuously  monitor  client satisfaction
s Provide strategic inputs through  proposals based  on  what market demands
s Cold  calling,  Fixing  an  Appointment ,  Second  Level call,  Follow up  with  the clients and
giving  the presentation
Understand  the requirements which  vary  from IT to  non-IT(electronic/mechanical
domain)
Responsible for  sourcing  the correct candidate profile from the portal
Contact the candidate through  telephone and  through  email
Make understand  the client's requirement and  help  the candidates to  apply  for  the job
Negotiate for  a pay  rate source their  resume and  submit to  the client side
Done coordinative talking  and  contacts for  helping  the candidates to  the interview
place
Done coordinative talking  and  contacts to  the candidates and  with  the operation  team
once got hired
Sutherland  Global Services  Dec 10  -  Jul 11
Technical Support Executive:
Was responsible for  supporting  McAfee's Home product of  anti-virus
Responsible for  first level of troubleshooting  the issues ranging  from installation  to
virus updating  to  non  technical issues (payment related)
Method  of  communication  non-voice chat support
CADmarC  Software Pvt.  Ltd.,  Trivandrum Mar 10    Aug  10
CAD Engineer:
Was Responsible for  converting  mechanical engineering  drawings to  3d-model using
Inventor  software and  Vice-versa.
Was Responsible for  composing  some sheet metal drawing  which  was part of  the same
Was Responsible for  modelling  PSLV component from the engineering  drawings
using  CATIA for the client ISRO
A Bottom Up  approach  was used  to  successfully  model the assembly.
Presently  working  as E & I  engineer  in  Jindal steel and  power  limited,  Angul,  Odisha
in  DRI  under  Forays Services and  Construction  Pvt.  Ltd.
Project : DRI  (E&I)
Role : Engineer
Period : April 2012  to  till date.
s Electrical equipments installation  & Erection,  testing,  commissioning  of  electrical
Equipments like MCC,  PCC,  PDB,  MLDB,  VFD panel.
s Having  knowledge of  electrical testing  like Primary  injection  test of  BREAKER,CT
ratio,polarity  test,PT test,Measurement of  bus-bars contact resistance ,TRAFO ratio  test etc.
s
Transformer  Erection,  testing  & commissioning.
s Bus duct erection  testing  & commissioning.
s Handling  of  single line Diagram power  control centres,  Motor control centres and
power  distribution  board.
s Preparation  of  cable schedules,  cables selection  and  cable length  calculation,  glanding
& termination  and  also  installation  of  tray,  earthing  pit & strip  of  both  in  Electrical &
Instrument.
s Loop  checking  of  all field  instruments connected  in  DCS from control room.
s Pre-checking  of  all field  instruments,  package skids & panels in  field.
s Loop  checking  of  all Caution  monitoring  system (CMS)  instruments such  as Vibration
sensors,  Temperature sensors.
s Handled  all documentation  for  pre-commissioning  as preparing  of  markup  loop
drawings,  Termination  drawing  & P&ID's.
s Installations,  Commissioning,  Maintenance of  the following  Field  Instruments
Systems:-
Differential pressure type flow transmitters,  Pressure and  differential pressure transmitters,
Differential and  float type intermediate level transmitters,  Level gauges,  Temperature
transmitters,  Temperature elements like thermocouples and  RTDs,  Vibration  transmitters,
Flow Transmitters,  Cold  Junction  Compensation  Junction  Boxes,  Pressure,  level,  flow and
temperature switches and  valve positioners,  Pneumatic control valves,  ON /OFF valves and
MOVs.
s Handling  Single Line drawings,  Equipment lay  out drawings,  P&ID's, Preparing
testing  reports,  commissioning  reports,  Hook-up  reports at ongoing  Platform
s Also  includes Tubing  work  for  Instruments of all above Systems
Worked  as Supervisor  in  electrical Projects & maintenance at Bhushan  Steel Limited
in  RMHS-II,  Angul,  Odisha under  M/S Shambhu  Singh.
Project : RMHS
Role : Electrical supervisor
Period : December 2007  to  December  2011
s
Electrical equipments installation  like MCC,  PCC,  PDB,  MLDB,  LDB,  PLC.
s Sound  knowledge of  power  & control circuits of MCC,  PCC,  PDB  & PLC  panel.
s Handling  of  single line Diagram power  control centres,  Motor control centres and
power  distribution  board.
s Installation  and  maintenance of conveyer  safety  switches like pull cord,  belt sway,
zero  speed.
s Preparation  of  cable schedules,  cables selection  and  cable length  calculation,  glanding
& termination  and  also  installation  of  tray,  earthing  pit & strip  of  both  in  Electrical &
Instrument.
s Also  maintenance of  electrical equipment motor  both  L.T and  H.T,  transformer.
Certifications & Achievements
s Diploma in  Electrical Engineering  from S.C.T.E & V.T,  Odisha in  2007.
s 10th  in  B.S.E Odisha in  2004.
s Electrical S.C.C  (M.V) Licenses in  Odisha state.
s Working  In  Royal Bank  of  Scotland  (Business Services Private Limited) as a Officer
From July  2011  Till date
s Department: Account Facilitation.
Co    Curricular  Activities
s Worked  with  the Service Quality  Control Group  of  corporate clients as a senior  case
handler.
s Help  Global Corporate Clients maintain  their  accounts held  with  RBS.
s As a member of  the Account Opening  and  Maintenance team,  handling  Current
Account Opening  requests,  handling  signature addition/ deletion/ modification  requests for
RBS Wholesale Corporate clients.
s
Also  handling  services requests to  closure of  corporate accounts,  issuing  credit cards,
removing  credit cards,  Name change and  Address Change.
s Handling  Quality  check  for  the team and  training  the new joiners to  get familiarized
with  the work.
s Frequent contact is also  required  with  the colleagues working  at the Head  Office
(NL)  to  get the work  authorized  / checked.
s Handling  urgent issues and  seeking  an  immediate solution  for the same   Contact
person  for  the counterparts at the Head  Office (The Netherlands) in  case of  any  urgent
issues.
(1)STERLING INFLOW TECHNOLOGY PVT.  Ltd.
VASAI,MUMBAI  (  August 2013  to  30th  November)
Designation  : PRODUCTION SUPERVISOR
Work  details : MANUFACTURING OF HYDRAULIC  DOOR CLOSER OF VARIOUS
LOADS,HYDRAULIC  FLOOR SPRINGS OF VARIOUS LOAD ETC.
(2)SAI-WELD-INDIA (October  2012  to  April 2013)
Boriwali,  Mumbai.
Designation  : DESIGN ENGINEER
Work  details : MANUFACTURING OF PLASMA CNC CUTTING MACHINE.
Currently  working  with  M/s Bharat Energy  Systems,  Visakhapatnam as a Shift Engineer-
Substation  Operations & Maintenance in  HPCL VISAKH REFINERY (1st August 2013  to  Till
date)
Worked  with  M/s Power  Tech  Engineering  Services,  Visakhapatnam as a Shift Engineer-
Substation  O &M in  HPCL VISAKH REFINERY (28th  July  2012  to  31st July  2013)
Worked  with  M/s Sri Kalyani Agro  Products and  Industries Ltd,  TP guddam ,  West
Godavari,  A.P as a junior  Engineer  operations and  Maintenance (7th  june 2008  to  24th  August
2009  )
From Sep'08  to  Date
Non  Ferrous Materials Technology  Development Centre (NFTDC),  Hyderabad,  India.
Project Engineer
Projects & Jobs Handled
Apr'12  to  Date: Reengineering  for  High  Critical Temp  Superconducting  Leads for
IPR.
Generate fabrication  drawings for components.
Handle of  high  vacuum furnaces.
Development of cooling  system for  high  current carriers.
Copper  electroplating  on  SS Pipe.
Vacuum brazing  of  SS Pipes with  OFE copper.
Vacuum soldering  of  Cu  with  braided  copper wires in  High  Vacuum Furnace.
Design  of  the Jigs and  Fixtures for  Vacuum soldering  of high  heat transfer elements
(silver  strips)  inside grooves on  SS 304L Pipe.
Jul'12  to  Date: Development of  Hot Rolling  Mill Isothermal Split Furnace for
NFTDC.
CAD modeling  for  all the interior and  exterior  components.
Feasibility  for  kinetic motion  of  Test sample inside furnace used  as a reference data
for assembly  of  furnace.
Formulation  of the Bills of  Material (BOM)  and  enquiry  with  vendors for quotation/
procurement of  raw material and  Quality  checking  of raw material.
Scheduling  for  machining  of  the components.
Design  for dimensional inspection  gauge of component.
Design  changes in  each  development.
Jul'12  to  Present: Development of  Heat Transfer Elements (Diverter  Target) for  IPR.
Modeling  of  each  component of  assembly  (these are first wall components for  Plasma
by  high  strength  and  high  heat transfer  coefficient).
Design  system for  handling  high  pressure and  high  temperature bonding  of  Tungsten
with  CuCrZr.
Inspection  of  the components in  each  stage.
Development & design  of testing  setup  for  High  Heat Flux.
Aug'10  to  Date: Fuel Injection  & Lubrication  System for  GTRE.
Reverse engineering  and  fabrication  of the Fuel Injection  System.
Disassembly  of existing  system.
Dimensional inspection,  CAD modeling  and  drafting  of  components
Handle 150  of  a total of  460  componenents.
Re-engineering  of  all the components.
Generation  3D Modeling  and  2D drawings for manufacturing
Geometric inspection  with  CMM FARO ARM.
Material characterization  by  using  SEM.
Sep'08  to  Feb'10: Mapping  of  the primitive shapes of Model Building  of  Ship  for
INS
(Description: The main  objective of  this project was to  provide CAD background  models for
all the interior  and  exterior  components of Pipe lines,  equipment for  design  and  planning.
These data was used  as a reference data for  assembling  and  disassembling  of components in
the ship)
Scanning  of  Ship  for  point cloud  data.
Compiling  and  processing  of  the data.
Page 1  of  2
Registration  of point cloud  and  Building  the inner  and  outer  shapes of  ship  in  3D
Model.
Nov'08  to  Dec'09: Molybdenum based  alloys plant for  NFTDC.
Scale-up  of the molybdenum based  alloys plant.
PFD and  P&ID drawings for  Electrolysis process plant.
Calculation  of  the settling  time for  product separation  in  conical bottom separator.
Trouble shooting  in  batch  process of  molybdenum silicate product.
Shift maintenance and  coordination.
Sep'08  to  Feb'09: Regeneration  DM water plant for NFTDC.
2D fabrication  drawing  and  flow diagram for  lines.
Neutralization  of the plant with  caustic and  hydrochloric acid.
Dealing  with  vendors for getting  cat-ions and  anions resins.
Replacement of the process valves.
From Oct'06  to  Aug'08
Sweetech  Engineers,  Hyderabad,  India.
Design  Engineer
Designed  and  developed  venture scrubber for  dust and  fumes collection  in  boilers.
Designed  and  developed  filters for process water recycling.
Prepared  fabrication  drawings of the components.
Prepared  BOM and  handled  material procurement.
Prepared  foundation  drawings,  PFD and  P&ID.
Prepared  operation  manual for  the fumes collection  system.
Commissioned  and  managed  final trials of  fumes collection  system at client site.
From Jun'05  to  Sep'06
Vasant Chemicals Ltd.,  Hyderabad,  India.
Graduate Engineer  Trainee
Involved  in  production  report preparation,  improvement projects,  quality  control and
batch  scheduling  activities.
M/s.  INDIA METER  LIMITED,  CHENNAI.
Designation  : Jr.  Engineer
Nature of  Work  : Testing  Energy  Meter  in  Testing  Department working
assemble section  also.
SREE SAI RAM WIND TECH.PVT.  LTD.,  CHENNAI
Designation : Engineer
Nature of  Work : superviser  in  electrical department,  work  also  wiring
section  in  panel and  Room Wiring.
CURRENT EMPLOYMENT
KOTEC  AUTOMOTIVES SERVICES INDIA PVT.  LTD.
Designation  : Jr.  Engineer
Nature of  Work  : Superviser in  Electrical Department
Profile Institute Description AutoCAD CADD Centre Training  Services,Allahabad Foundation  In  Mechanical CADD C  Language Realtec Computer Eduaction  ,Naini ,  Allahabad C  Programming
DURATION : 4  week
NAME OF THE STREAM COMPANY: Summer  training  in  \u0022BPCL\u0022 (naini ,  Allahabad):
PROJECT TITLE: \u0022Pump  & compressor\u0022
DESCRIPTION: Completed  the summer  internship  at BPCL,naini,allahabad  from 2.07.2012
t0  1.08.2012.  BPCL naini unit deals with  manufacturing  of  Pumps and  Compressors.  My  area
of  training  was manufacturing  of  pumps & compressors part.
FINAL YEAR  PROJECT
PROJECT TITLE : M  ulti Operation  Machine
DESCRIPTION : A machine which  perform three operation  at a time shaping,cutting  and
drilling.
Fresher
s Programming  & Operating  Knowledge of  CNC  m/c :
HMC  8  Axis Bed  and  Floor type m/c MP7,  MP5,  TS5
VTL & VMC  type m/c.
Special purpose m/c (RACK MILLING).
CNC  Programming  in  SIEMENS,  FANUC  and  MAZAK operating  system.
s Calibration  of  CNC machine,  Micrometer,  Vernier  Caliper,  Height Gauge,  In-side
micrometer.
s CNC  Machine Programming& operating,  Drawing  study,  measurement,  Inspection,
Set-up  knowledge,  shop  supervision.
s 5S Activity,  TPM Activity  Membership.
COMPUTING: -
s Working  knowledge of  CAD Software's like AutoCAD 2011  2d  & 3d  Modeling  at
Khodiyar  Cad  Center  V.V.Nagar.
s Working  knowledge of  Microsoft Word,  Excel,  and  the Internet.
AREA OF INTEREST: - Mechanical Engineering,  Production,  Design,  Maintenance.
LANGUAGES: - I  am able to  Read,  Write and  Speak  Gujarati,  Hindi and  English.
Yours Sincerely
Two  years experience in  design  and  development in  VLSI  Programming.
Company  Name: Currently  Working  as Spiro  Solutions Pvt.  Ltd  Chennai.
Duration: Jan  2012  till date
Designation: VLSI  Programmer
Working  as a Verilog  and  VHDL developer.
Prepared  design  documents and  solution  document.
Direct interaction  with  clients.
B.TECH COMPLETED FROM QUANTUM SCHOOL OF TECNOLOGY,  ROORKEE
Knowledge and  understanding  like Welding,  Catia
Exposure of understanding  the functionality  of  the machines like Milling,  Lathe.
Proficient in  self adaptation  within  a dynamic environment.
An  effective communication  with  strong  interpersonal and  analytical skills.
Self starter  and  able to  share my  strengths and  knowledge.
Working  as Junior Data Base Administrator  at DIHM&CT, La jpat Nagar New Delhi since 6th
August 2012  to  till date
Maintenance different diversified  field  like Software Development,  Web  Development and
Software Management and  related  to  Student Records.
Worked  as an  Assistant Programmer  at Genetics and  Pediatrics Department at LNH,  New Delhi
from 1st July  -2011  to  31st July- 2012.
Worked  as a Assistant Programmer  at DOEACC  Center  Chandigarh,  Branch  Office,  New Delhi
(Posted  at MAMC,  Delhi)  9th  June 2009  to  08th  June 2011.
January  2006 MWH Global,  Pune,  India
to  present Senior  Environmental Engineer
I  have been  involved  in  the following  programs whilst working  with  MWH Global Pune office,
Optimise   Thames water Programme   Team Lead
Prepare WBS for  wastewater  network  and  storm water network  model build  from GIS data and
solution  modelling  and  design  of  flooding  schemes,  CSO and  dual manholes.
Involved  in  the project scope review and  technical reviews at each  stage till the design  goes to
construction.  Provide solution  for flooding  schemes and  UID schemes.
4D Programme   Team Lead
Modeling  and  design  of a sewer network  to  estimate flows arriving  at wastewater  treatment
works.  Preparation  of WBS for  the jobs and  responsible for  delivery  of  the projects.
San  Diego  Data Conversion    Client MWH USA -QA/QC  Manager    Co-ordinator
QA/QC  of  the GIS Data conversion  from As-builts of  storm water  drainage system.  There were
more than  7000  drawings which  were needed  to  be digitized  and  attributed  in  GIS software
ArcGIS.  I  was responsible for  the overall quality  of  the deliverables.
Hydraulic Modeling  Projects   Client MWH USA -  Team Leader-  Co-ordinator
Model build  and  verification  of  Collection  system for city  of Atlanta   Client City  of  Atlanta
Building  of  model from GIS data for  the city  of  Atlanta.  Verify  the model from the meter data
and  provide solution  for  sewer incapacity.
United  Utilities (UK) Model Maintenance study-  Project Team Leader-  Client MWH UK
This study  involve preparation  of performance data tables for 200  drainages areas from verified
and  solutions hydraulic models.
Computational Fluid  Dynamics (CFD)  Projects: Client MWH USA
Almeda west Portal Pipe blending-  Client SFPUC,  USA
The study  involve determining  length  of  blending  pipeline to  meet water  quality  objectives for
TDS and  residual chlorine under  different flow and  chemical feed  scenarios
OnSlow Pump  Station    Client MWH UK
The study  involve determining  the best possible location  of  the screen  return  pipe,  which  will
minimize recirculation  of  the particles through  the storm pump
Software used  for  CFD
Gambit and  Fluent
Flow 3D
Hydraulic Modeling  Projects   Client MWH UK
Preparing  hydraulic models of  complex  Sewerage Networks for UK.  Verifying  the sewerage
network  models against measured  storms using  software such  as Infoworks/Hydroworks,  data
manager  and  MapInfo.
September 2004  MEA Group  Inc,  Lakewood  Ranch,  FL USA
to  May  2005 Project Engineer
Evaluate water  quality  and  develop  a Best Management Practices Manual for  airside water
management in  Florida
June 2004  RHT Engineering  Inc.,  Lehigh  Acres,  FL,  USA
to  August 2004 Project Engineer
Design  of  Storm water Management System
Preparation  of  Storm water  Management Permit
Preparation  of  Environmental Resource and  Water  use Permit
Review City  of  Cape Coral SWM plans
Site design,  utility  design,  site layout,  groundwater  modeling  and  soil analysis
August 2003  New Mexico  Institute of Mining  and  Technology,  Socorro,
to  May  2004  New Mexico,  USA
Environmental Engineering  Department
Research  Assistant
Introduction  to  CFD by  Fluent India Pvt Ltd
Attended  Dale Carnegie's \u0022Confidence and  Communication\u0022 two  day  workshop
Attended  Dale Carnagie's \u0022Building  High  Performance Teams\u0022 two  days workshop
Interpersonal skills from Smart Art Chrysalis
Technical writing  workshop  by  Technowrites Inc.
Time Management program from Smart Art Chrysalis
6.1 years of experience in the field of software testing, currently working as a  Test Engineer  with
WMS Gaming solutions India  pvt. Ltd., Pune.
Graduate in Electronics and communications engineering from ICFAI University in year of 2007.
Solid expertise in manual testing for projects during all phases, familiar with the life cycle and different
phases, requirements in a project and performing end to end Testing responsibility.
Working extensively on Functional, System, Integration and Regression Testing assignments.
Having 4.5 years of working experience with Healthcare Industry/US Healthcare industry.
Well versed with Healthcare Industry/EHR Standards such as HIPAA for data  security, HL7 for
interoperability and ICD10.
Having good knowledge of PBM  and Healthcare insurance Industry esp. claim processing and plan
creations in AS400 environment.
Currently working and having good knowledge of Casino Gaming Industry, spec. testing Slot machines/
EGM/VLT for Class II specific environment.
Skilled in good team work,  independent functioning, taking up new  challenges & profitable for the
company, planning and execution of ideas.
An excellent communicator with exceptional team building and interpersonal skills.
WORK  EXPERIENCE (73 Months)
Designation Organization Duration Work Field
Test Engineer WMS Gaming solutions 20th Jun'12   Till date IT-Software
Test Specialist IBM  India Pvt. Ltd. 3rd Dec'09   8th Jun'12 IT-Software
Software Engineer Satyam Computer
Services Pvt.  Ltd
29 Oct'07   2nd Dec'09 IT-Software
1) WMS Gaming solution  India  Pvt. Ltd.
Duration:  20th Jun'12   Till date
As a Team member,  Major responsibilities during this tenure are:
Understanding requirement, writing Test cases, review  and execution of Test cases.
To  test all major functionalities of game
Starting from loading it to  the EGM, running and
testing it using Slot Accounting System (SAS), OPTOS and GSL Monitor tool.
Verify accounting and game play features.
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
Project Summary
WMS Gaming is a manufacturer of slot machines,  video lottery terminals and software to  help
casinos manage their gaming operations. The company is based in Waukegan, Illinois.
Project's requirement is to test all the functionalities of Class II based themes.
1) IBM India  Pvt. Ltd.
Duration:  3rd Dec'09   8th Jun'12
RxClaim project had several modules, releases in every 2 months. Worked on more than 8 releases as a
Module Lead/Team  member, Major responsibilities during this tenure were:
Understanding requirement, estimation, task allocation,  status reporting.
Creating Test case scenarios, creating setups, writing Test cases, review and execution of
Test cases.
Responsible for the accurate processing and completion of medical claims,  includes
creating/processing claims and plan setups.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System Integration, smoke,
Regression Testing  and review  of deliverables
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
Project Summary
Healthcare industry products (drugs) are subsidized by insurance companies and services
companies like CVS CAREMARK, etc  through different schemes (plans) which provide benefits.
Health card is provided by the Health Insurance Company to  each member. A member goes to a
prescriber, to get prescription for drugs. Member then goes to a pharmacy and purchases the
drugs and then claims for the drugs purchased.  Pharmacy submits a claim to Caremark for the
member purchased drugs. The claim process begins when a  member goes to  a  pharmacy and
purchases the prescribed drugs. The pharmacy submits a  claim using the member's information
and BIN/Process or Control/Group Number (BPG) information. The claim is routed to  the switching
company or \u0022Switch\u0022 via  the BPG. The switch then determines which PROCESSOR should process
the claim. RxCLAIM  application uses the BPG  to  identify the claim  and begins eligibility validations
and the benefit plan for coverage. Once all the information has been verified, RxCLAIM
application will send a  message back to the pharmacy that communicates a paid or rejected
claim.
For its globalization, application was kept compliant with global health standards like HIPPA (for
data  security).
Project 2:  WGS Transition and Transformation    Process Renovation
Platform:  Windows XP
Technology:  Mainframes
Role:  Team Member
Front End:  Mainframes
Client:  Wellpoint, USA.
Duration:  3rd Mar'12   8th Jun'12
WGS- Process Renovation project had several modules, releases in every month. Worked on 2 releases as
a  Team member, Major responsibilities during this tenure were:
Understanding requirement, Creating Test case scenarios,  creating setups, writing Test
cases, review and execution of Test cases.
Responsible for the accurate processing and completion of medical claims,  includes
creating/processing claims and setups.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System Integration,
Regression Testing  and review  of deliverables
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
2) Satyam Computer Services Pvt. Ltd
Duration:  29 Oct'07   2nd Dec'09
Project 1:  Electronic Health  Record
Platform:  Windows XP
Language:  C#
Technology:  .NET
Role:  Tester
Front End:  ASP.NET
Back End:  SQL Server 2005
Client:  Emergency Management and Research  Institute, Hyderabad
Creating Test case scenarios, creating setups, writing Test cases, review and execution of
Test cases.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System, Integration, smoke
and Regression Testing and review  of deliverables
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
Meeting with Clients
Project Summary
EHR is web portal that stores the each and every health information of a patient from cradle to
grave. Users of this portal are patient,  doctor, Insurance provider, pharmacies, and laboratories.
Through this portal, a  fresh patient signs up for his user id and password. With his user id and
password he logs in to the portal and enters his personal details, medical history, family history,
medication (current/past), therapies, etc. The same process follows for doctor for signing up.
When doctor logs in, he searches for a patient. After the completion of search the all the details
entered by patient are available to the doctor (if allowed by patient).  Doctor can create an
Episode for this patient, under that episode;  he has got a  provision of creating Visits and events.
This portal also gives facility of order management where in doctor can place order for patient
and laboratories after doing the order, enters result through the same portal.
For its globalization, application was kept compliant with global health standards like HL7
(for interoperability), HIPAA (for data  security).
Project 2:  DB Independent Framework
Platform:  Windows XP
Language:  C#
Technology:  .NET
Role:  Tester
Front End:  ASP.NET
Back End:  SQL Server 2005
Clients:  Emergency Management and Research Institute, Hyderabad.
Health Management and Research  Institute, Hyderabad.
Write and execute SQL queries.
Creating Test case scenarios, creating setups, writing Test cases, review and execution of
Test cases.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System, Integration, smoke
and Regression Testing and review  of deliverables
Meeting with Clients
Project Summary
DB Independent Framework provides an abstraction to interact with databases without specifying
specific   Data  Source in application code. Data  Provider specific   methods are decoupled from
application code.
*  Strong  interpersonal,  analytical and  communication  skills
*  Adaptable to  job  challenges and  changes.
*  Confident,  self-learning  and  hard  working
*  Strong  interpersonal,  analytical and  communication  skills
*  Adaptable to  job  challenges and  changes.
*  Confident,  self-learning  and  hard  working
: Worked  as a Project Trainee in  MotherSonSumi InfoTech  & Designs Ltd
(MIND InfoTech) Noida  Since Feb-2005  to  Aug-2005
SOFTWARE SKILLS: Operating  Systems:
MS-DOS,  UNIX,  Windows NT,  98/2000
Packages:
MS Office 2000
Programming  Language:
Visual basic6.0,  VB.NET,  C,  C++
Web  Technologies:
HTML,  DHTML,  Java  Script
ASP
RDBMS:
MS-SQL Server2000,  Oracle8i
Reporting  Tool:
Seagate Crystal Report8.0
GUI:
MS-Visual Studio  Enterprise6.0
Text pad,  Edit plus
CURRICULAM VITAE
PAGE 1
TRAINING & SELF-DEVELOPMENT:
Course Description Duration Year
M.C.A.  Final Year (6th Semester) Training  at MothersonSumi InfoTech &
Designs  Ltd (MIND InfoTech) B-7  Sector-7  Noida.
6  months From
Feb-2005  to
Aug-2005
July, 2003 to till date
Vanguard info Solutions PVT LTD
Bangalore
Business  analyst
/Professional
Having  1+ year of experience  in Software development, design and  implementation
as a programmer.
Creating  Dynamic/Interactive web  pages using  Internet Tools.
Good Analytical and  Communicational skills.
Motivated  to learn new technologies and can work either in a team environment
Involved in JavaScript functions for client side  Validations
Coding of Application Components and deploying
Functionality testing  for the  overall system.
Project # 2
Title : Health Tracking System
Duration : Sep  2005   Still
Environment : Java 2.0, JDBC, JSP, Web  Logic, Oracle
Operating  System : Windows NT
Team Size : 4
Description:  An Internet based  application to help  the  people  who are  suffering f rom chronic
diseases. For the first time  the  user has to register with the  past health record. The data,
which has been entered  by the patient, will be  shown in the  form  of graph to the  doctor. The
panel of doctors will discuss the  health condition of the  patient; suggestions of the  panel are
made  available  to the  patient. One  of the  features of the  site  is the student's forum, where
they can have  discussions with the  experts. Day to day changes in the  field o f Medicine  is
reported  to the registered  users. The  site  also has the facility to order the  medicines and
health magazines online. It also gives elaborate  description of Diet, yoga, Stress, Fitness and
its benefits.
Involved in Designing HTML Forms
Involved in various functions for client side  Validations
Coding of Application Components and deploying
Name of  Exam. Year Of
Passing
School/College Board/University Percentage
10Th 1998 GHS  Bangalore K S  E E Board 60%
PUC (PCMB) 2000
Ujjval vidyalaya Bangalore  Dept. of PU Education 61%
B.E (  Info. Science) 2005 B T L I  T, Bangalore VTU, Belgaum 70.4%
A qualified B.E (Computer Science) from RGPV University with  1 Year of experience in Java
Technologies. Presently working with GnixInfosoft as Java Programmer. Have successfully
completed projects based on  JAVA & Oracle. Excellent presentation, analytical  & debugging
Since  Jun'05 with GnixInfosoft Pvt Ltd, Noida as Java Programmer.
Presently working  as a \u0022Solutions  Developer\u0022 for Tata  Technologies  Pvt
Ltd,  Pune from Nov 2004 Till Date.
Worked for E-biz India  Pvt Ltd,  Pune from  8th December 2003 till Oct 30th
2004.
Software  Development & Testing
A. Project:
Cataract Surgery Network  (CSN)
Client:
Bausch & Lo mb, India
(http://www.bausch.com )
Tools/Languages/Database/OS Used:
ASP.Net, Oracle  8i, C#
Software  Development & Testing
Software  Development & Testing
Software  Development
Over two years eight months  of experience in CDMA  & GS M
technologies.
July2005  to till date
Company: ESSAR TELECOM.
Location: Bhubaneswar (Orissa  Circle).
Designation: Executive(RF).
Job profile:  Responsible for RF survey,RF
planning,mapping of various  sites  in Orissa
Nov 2004  to  july 2005
Company: Global TeleServices Ltd.
Location: Bhubaneswar (Orissa  Circle).
Designation: RF Engineer .
Vendor : MOTOROLA
Client  : TataTeleServices,Bhubaneswar,Orissa
Tools: Agilent  E6473B,Mapinfo,Invex,Drive Test Tool Tems
4.1.1
Responsible for all RF  optimization  work  -
audit,S.C.F.T,loaded,unloaded drivetest.
Responsible for VSWR testing with  the help of Bird
meter.
Responsible for BTS site survey.
Responsible for BTS I&C for more than 50 sites.
Responsible for BTS(4812T) Standalone Testing,
Commissioning.
Responsible for integration for BTS sites  with CBSC.
Responsible for managing external alarms  like
equipment as  well as  shelter.
Responsible for ATP of cell sites.
Nov. 2002  to  Oct. 2004
Company: OSPS
Location: Ahamedabad (Gujurat Circle).
Designation: BSS Engineer .
Vendor : Lucent
Client  : TataTeleServices, Ahamedabad.
Responsible for BTS site survey.
Responsible for BTS I&C .
Responsible for integration for BTS sites  with CBSC.
Responsible for BTS(Modcell 3.0) Standalone Testing,
Commissioning.
Responsible for managing external alarms  like
equipment as  well as  shelter.
Responsible for ATP of cell sites.
Responsible for daily  performance report.
Software Experiences:
Project #1
Company  : Vimal software devlopement
center,Bhubaneswar,Orissa
Client : Florate Solution
Project : Quiz  Project for the Institute in  Visual Baic  6.0.
Description : This  project  is  designed for the General
Knowledge test for the students. It has  two  levels.
In the first level the user is  getting choices  to
answer the question  whereas in  the next  level they
have to  input  the answer in  the inputs
Project #2
Company :  Imgenex,Nayapally,Bhubaneswar,Orissa
Client : Imgenex
Project : Creation of its own  website i.e
www.imgenex.com designed in
PHP and MySql
Project #3
Company :  National Informatic  Center
Client : Planning&co-ordination dept,Govt  of Orissa
Project : Performance evaluation  of 20point program.
Description :  Using VisualBasic6.0&SqlServer7.0 objects  to
retrieve database objects and manipulate the
database.
Having  1+ year of experience  in Software development, design and  implementation
as a programmer.
Creating  Dynamic/Interactive web  pages using  Internet Tools.
Good Analytical and  Communicational skills.
Motivated  to learn new technologies and can work either in a team environment
Involved in JavaScript functions for client side  Validations
Coding of Application Components and deploying
Functionality testing  for the  overall system.
Project # 2
Title : Health Tracking System
Duration : Sep  2005   Still
Environment : Java 2.0, JDBC, JSP, Web  Logic, Oracle
Operating  System : Windows NT
Team Size : 4
Description:  An Internet based  application to help  the  people  who are  suffering f rom chronic
diseases. For the first time  the  user has to register with the  past health record. The data,
which has been entered  by the patient, will be  shown in the  form  of graph to the  doctor. The
panel of doctors will discuss the  health condition of the  patient; suggestions of the  panel are
made  available  to the  patient. One  of the  features of the  site  is the student's forum, where
they can have  discussions with the  experts. Day to day changes in the  field o f Medicine  is
reported  to the registered  users. The  site  also has the facility to order the  medicines and
health magazines online. It also gives elaborate  description of Diet, yoga, Stress, Fitness and
its benefits.
Involved in Designing HTML Forms
Involved in various functions for client side  Validations
Coding of Application Components and deploying
In  this project we demonstrated  a method  of using  Global Positioning  System and  Global
system for Mobile Communication  together i.e.  Global Positioning  System with  GSM.
We have used  the GPS receiver for receiving  the data or information  about the position,
speed  and  various other parameters of an  object from the GPS satellites.  Received  data is
processed  and  converted  into  simplified  format by  using  AVR micro  controller which
then  data is send  by  SMS interfacing  F bus of mobile with  micro  controller and  the same
is displayed  on  LCD screen.  The position  is also  transmitted  to  the serial com port of a
personal computer through  an  RS-232  cable.
Personal Profile
Date of  Birth  : 10.06.1982
Father's name : Mr.  Ayyempillai
Mother's name : Mrs.  A.Lakshmi
Gender  : Male
Marital Status : Single
Languages Known  : English,  Tamil.
Personal traits:
Confidence and  ability  to  learn  fast and  contribute.
Believe in  team work  and  good  team player  and  can  easily  fit into  any  team.
Flexible enough  to  pick  up  new skills,  ideas and  simulate personal and  professional
growth.
Enjoys meeting  new challenges well adapts to  new situations.
Working  for  GKB  Hitch Lenses Pvt  Ltd as Technical Support Engineer from January  2005
to  till date.
1. Maintenance of  companies network  (LAN).
2.
Maintenance of  clients systems.
3. Setting  Of LAB's Of  South  India..
4. And  Giving  A Remote Technical support to  South  India Using  a
Softwares.
Worked  as Customer  Support Engineer  in  SigmaZ  Computer Services.
(Authorized HP (Hewlett  and Packard)  Dealer),
Gomes House,  2nd floor,  Altinho  Road,  Panjim  - Goa  from June 2003  to  December  2004
Responsibilities :  1)  Maintenance of  Hardware & Networking  of 45computers,
5  printers in  the Office of  the V.M Salgaonkar Law College
Miramar -  Goa
2)  Maintenance of  Hardware & Networking  of 80computers,  in  the
Travel pack (UK Based Traveling  Agency)  Panjim -  Goa
Used  ODBC for connecting  to the  back end  database  SQL Server.
Involved in the  complete  life  cycle  of the  project.
Writing JSP code  for different modules
Involved  in Analysis, Design, Development and  Implementation.
Project #2 Medinova Management System (MMS)
Client Medinova Hospital, Bangalore
Duration Oct 2004 to Apr 2005
Team Size 6
Role Team Member
Environment JAVA/J2EE (JSP,Servlets,JDBC,EJB),  Oracle 8i ,  PL/SQL
Description
This project will automate the daily operations of a hospital. The project
keeps track of the staff and patient (in-patient, out-patient) details. It also  takes care of the
ward, medical, invoice and the doctor's appointment details. The system  generates the daily
ward availability, the status of the operation theaters and ICU. The system also generates
invoice, patient wise invoice, stock availability and staff shift schedule for every patient.
Project #3 CHR-MS
Client Chezlaurent Hotels  and Resorts  International, Chennai
Duration Feb 2004 to Aug 2004
Team Size 6
Role Team Member
Environment JAVA/J2EE  (JSP,Servlets),  Oracle 9i,  PL/SQL
Description
The CHR-MS project will automate the manual and legacy  operations  of
Chezlaurent Hotels  & Resorts  International. The project will keep track  of guest database, room
reservations, cancellations, check-ins, check-outs, room service, weekly  shift scheduling of
employees, finance and reports.
Project #4 Surgical Store's Management System
Client Modern Enterprises, Mumbai
Duration Sep 2003 to Jan 2004
Team Size 5
Role Team Member
Environment JAVA/J2EE ,Oracle 9i,  PL/SQL
Description
This  software is  used to maintain the transactions  of a Surgical equipment store
that sells  the hospital and surgical equipments  to doctors, hospitals, medical stores, Labs, etc. It
allows  the user to take the order, provide the customer: the order voucher, and the invoice when the
order is  completed. It is  also helpful to maintain the stock  details  along with the details  of goods
sender and can generate the required reports.
Project #5 College Monitoring System
Client Jasmine Women's  College of Arts, Commerce and Science, Pune.
Duration Jan 2003 to Aug 2003
Team Size 5
Role Team Member
Environment JAVA/J2EE ,  Oracle 9i,  PL/SQL
Description
The College Monitoring System (CMS) is developed for automating
the complete operations of an Degree College. The project is composed of three major
modules namely Student, Lecturer  and  Other Staff. The Student module deals with
maintaining information  about students admission, fees, attendance, exams, transfer of
student, etc. The Lecturer  module deals with the details of lecturer, which includes the
personal details, subject details, attendance details, salary details, performance details.
Finally the Other  Staff module includes the details of the non-teaching staff like lab
instructors, librarians, clerks, attainders, peons, etc.
CMS provides  variety  of reports  like lecturer's  personal time-table, class  wise time-
table, results  of the students  class-wise and personal. Lecturer's  performance report can be
generated automatically  based on the feedback  given by  the students. Salary  slip of teaching and
non-teaching staff can be generated.
Project #6 Library Management System (LMS)
Client GIT, Belgaum
Duration Sep 2002 to Dec  2002
Team Size 4
Role Team Member
Environment JAVA/J2EE ,Oracle 9i,  PL/SQL
Description
LMS is designed for  advanced library system that provides robust
access over network. Each item, worker and administrator is assigned a unique ID number. It
is fully capable of managing library items such as books, CDs, tapes, as well as any other
kind of material even  with more than one copy of each. Each item type can have a distinct
borrowing condition. For example CDs have different circulation time than books. Each  item
has a specific location in the library to be easily found.
LMS generates  various  reports  like details  of all books/CDs/tapes  issued, details  of
books/CDs/tapes  issued to a particular student or staff. Author-wise and title-wise list of books.
Details  of the books  available in the library.
I  am an  Oracle9i Certified Professional (DBA track) having  3  years 9  months
of  experience of  which  2  years 7  months is in  the software field  involving  analysis,
design,  development and  implementation  of  database systems using  Oracle 8i/9i.  I  have
also  worked  onsite for  creation  of  database,  connectivity  with  front end,  backup  &
recovery  implementation  both  online and  offline,  database and  application  tuning  and
application  system monitoring.  I  have undertaken  various projects from inception  and
brought them to  successful completion  in  time,  where I also  had  exposure of  client
interaction  at all levels and  managing  relationships with  them.  I believe in  strong  work
ethics and  willingness to  work  hard  to  achieve employer  objectives.
F  0
D  C
Currently  working  as Database Administrator  with  Ambuja Cement Eastern  Ltd.
(  Duration  : August 2005    Till Date ).
F  0
D  C
Worked  as Software Engineer  with  System Solution  Technology,  Kolkata.
(  Duration  : May  2003    July  2005  ).
F  0
D  C
Took  leave for pursuing  further studies-  M.E.  in  Electronics & Tele-Communication
(with  specialization  in  Computer  Engineering) from Jadavpur  University,  Kolkata
(  Duration  : August 2001    March  2003  ).
F  0
D  C
Worked  as Trainee Engineer  with  Seven  Hills Opticommunication  Pvt.  Ltd.,  Kolkata.
(  Duration  : June 2000    July  2001  ).
Areas Of Work
Developed  and  tuned  application  queries.
Experience in  installations,  backups and  recoveries and  performance tuning.
Maintain  documentation  to  identify  issues and  record  actions and  resolutions.
Conduct onsite training  on  Oracle9i for  new users and  system administrators.
Technical Experience
Operating  Systems
F  0
D  C
DOS ,  Windows 98/2000/NT
Languages
F  0
D  C
C,  SQL,  PL/SQL
RDBMS
F  0
D  C
Oracle 8i/9i
Front  End Tools
F  0
D  C
Developer  2000  Forms 6i
F  0
D  C
Master of  Engineering in  Electronics & Tele-Communication  (with  specialization
in  Computer  Engineering) with  72.43%  (First class) from Jadavpur University,
Kolkata  (West Bengal),  India in  2003.
F  0
D  C
Bachelor of  Engineering in  Electronics & Communication  with  64.72%  (1ST Class )
from Bharathidasan University,  Trichy  (Tamil Nadu),  India in  2000.
F  0
D  C
Passed  I.S.C Board (10+2  )  with  78.5%  from Don  Bosco  School,  Liluah.  (W.B)  in  1995.
F  0
D  C
Passed  I.C.S.E.  Board ( 10th Standard  ) with  78.2%  from Don  Bosco  School,  Liluah.  (W.B)
in  1993.
Oracle9i Certified Professional (DBA track)  from  Oracle Corporation,  U.S.A.
Professional Associations :
Member of Oracle Technology  Network
Work  experience of 6  months at Precision  Powers Products (I)  Pvt Ltd,  Aurangabad
Work  involved:
In  process inspection  of MCB Manufacturing
Final Dispatch  Inspection
Analysis of  daily  rejection
Work  related  to  ISO documentation
Requirement gathering  , analysis & desi gn
LANGUAGES : C, C++ ,C#
DATABASE : DBMS, ORACLE 8i
SUBJECT : DATA  STRUCTURE ,OPERATING  SYSTEM
ACHIEVEMENTS  AND  EXTRA-CURRICULAR  ACTIVITIES:
1) Represented O.U.A.T  twice in East-Zone-Badminton
Championship.
2) Represented O.U.A.T once in  All  India Agricultural  Meet
3) Runners up in  Ranchi  Zone Badminton  Championship.
4) First in N.C.L Zone Badminton  Championship
5) Runners up in  Interschool Football  Tournament .
6) Stood First in  Badminton( Mens' double) in the college .
7) Mathematics OLYMPIAD certificate .
ONE YEAR of experience as  a Project Trainee in Super Computer Education And Research
Center (SERC) of Indian  Institute of Science (IISc), Bangalore.
Presently  doing Unix System Testing On Job Training in Infics Solutions Pvt. Limited, Mattikere
Bangalore.
Academic Performance
Qualification Period Grade (%) University/Board
B.E (Computer Science) 2004 71.91 A.P.S College of Engineering  (V.T.U)
II P.U.C 2000 66.65
PCM-75
Pre-University  Board (KAR)
S.S.L.C 1998 85.28 SSLC Board (KAR)
Worked  as a trainee programmer for CYS SYSTEMS for period  of six  months in  the
platform of DOTNET application.  (That  is an  contract  basic job) This made me to  learn
many  things as per my  technical part.
Now I am working  in the SoftTech Global Solutions.  Here I am working  as a  dot net
programmer
Worked  as a trainee programmer for CYS SYSTEMS for period  of six  months in  the
platform of DOTNET application.  (That  is an  contract  basic job) This made me to  learn
many  things as per my  technical part.
Now I am working  in the SoftTech Global Solutions.  Here I am working  as a  dot net
programmer
Name Of Organization : Working in Galaxy Weblinks Ltd.. (indore)
(Formally known as FXBytes Technologies Pvt. Ltd)
Duration of employment : From June 2005  Till Date
This  is  a website which provides  the information and
products  to  the
people about the happening car accessories  available in
India at the
cheapest rates. People can come to  the site and provides
their
vehicle details  with the budget they want to spend on
their vehicle,
the site automatically generates  some packages  according
to  their
expenditure at  a very less  time and efforts. So  that they
can save
their precious time and in this fast moving life.
Role :   Coding the functionality.
Tools : Java, JSP, Tomcat, and Mysql ,  Java Script, HTML
http://www.friendfinderscript.com/
Project Name : Friend Finder Script website development
Duration :
3  Months
Team size : 2
Synopsis : Site is use to find the friends on the net according to your  given  specification
create own  network of friends send message to their friends ,receive messages
and communicate with them. Also find friend according to their  characteristics
and sun sign. Site contain number of feature like user can create their own
address book in that address book user can add  their contacts with full detail
and can retrieve at any time. Site also has a feature through which webmaster
can take code of this site and it can it on their own site
Role :   Coding  the functionality.
Tools : Jakarta-Tomcat, Java, JSP, and Mysql
Project Name : Article Manager
Duration : 2.5 Months
Team size : 2
Synopsis : Article Manager is a web based Article Management Software. Any
webmaster
can set up the software once, configure the templates, and then use the
web-
based content management system  to  update your site from  any web
browser in
the world. Whether  you  need to add new article, remove article, upload
images,
or, change the formatting, the software lets you do it quickly and without
unnecessary mistakes. You  can  customize the look and feel of Article
Manager
to match any site design.
Role :   Designing Interface.
Coding  the functionality.
Tools : Tomcat 5.x, JSP, and Mysql ,  Java Script, HTML
Project Name : E-tutorial
Duration : 2 Months
Team size : 1
Synopsis : This is a module for the betterment of the tutorial provided on the
internet. It is based on j2ee page centric model and also contains the
facilities to create a new  tutorial, which is handled by Admin and this
tutorial  is automatically available for the user of the site. It also provides
the latest FAQ and References for the given tutorial and the administrator
performs the modification.
Role :   Designing Interface.
Coding  the functionality
Tools : Java, MYSQL, JavaScript, Jsp, Tomcat 5.02
Project Name : Service Contract Management System.
(work  as a partial fulfilment of MCA 6th  sem in  J2EE)
Duration : 3 Months
Team size : 2
Synopsis : SCM is a web based diagnosis system, provides treatment and solutions of
Provider and customer's problems to manage and handle the contract and the
services provided by the provider to a customer  with respect to a product. It
also provides other additional information, related to
product,customer,manufacturer etc.
Role :   Designing Interface.
Coding  the functionality.
Tools : JSP, Servlets, Jakarta-tomcat, JavaScript
Project Name : Bidding  Management System
Duration : 2 Months
Team size : 2
Synopsis : To provide interface to Bidders and Project Service requesters.
Role :   Designing Interface.
Coding  the functionality.
Tools : JSP,
Java Script,  HTML,  MySql
Other Assignment:
Clone of www.getafreelancer.com
Ticket Support System
www.cardecoreindia.com
www.displayarticle.com
conversion of a site www.hala.com from jsp to php(Still working)
1.
CURRENTLY working with l&t automation ,navi mumbai
2.
In i2i media (previously matrix communication)  ,
marol,Andheri (E),Mumbai.
(From 5th June,2000 To 18th Nov ).
Profile: - worked  on a site maintenance  & LA N n/w.
Trainee  engg.
3.
Worked  in BPL Telecom Pvt Ltd ,
Dadar (E),Mumbai.
(From 24th December,2001 To 8th June,2002 ).
Profile: - worked  as Technical Engg.
Perform  servicing  of EPABX  system.
Training  at Mahindra  & Mahindra  LTD M.I.D.C Area,  Hingna Road,  Nagpur (Maharastra).
From  15-06-04  To  31-06-04.
Project Traning  at Instrumental Electronics M.I.D.C Phase Two  Dombivli (East) Thane
(Maharashtra).  From  1-09-2004  To  31-02-2005.
Doing  academic Project in  CMC  limited  (a TATA enterprise)  and  worked  as a
project trainee for  5  months.
Won  a Proficiency  award  in  first semester  of  MCA
Academic Project done in  Pearl Beverages Company  Limited  and  worked  as a
project trainee for  3  months.
Educational  Profile
Academics University Percentage Batch
MCA Acharya  Nagarjuna
University
80 2003-2006
(pursuing)
Bachelor of Computer
Science
Acharya  Nagarjuna
University
70 2000    2003
Intermediate
Board of Intermediate
Education
70 1998    2000
S.S.C Board of Secondary
Education
70 1997  1998
Skills  set
Languages : C,  C++,  COBOL,  PASCAL
1
Server Side Programming: Java,  VB.net
RDBMS : Oracle,  MS-Access
Web  Languages : HTML,  Java Script,  XML
GUI  : Visual Basic
Operating  Systems : Windows,  DOS,  UNIX,  LINUX.
Internet Technologies :  HTML,  DHTML,  XML,  SERVLETS,  JSP
Testing Tools  : Win  Runner, SQA Robot, Load Runner,
Silk  Test
Academic Project(pursuing)
Duration:  5  Months
Title of  the Project:  Software Project Management Tool
Client: CMC  Limited  (A TATA Enterprise),  Hyderabad.
Team  Size: 3.
Software: Java
Description:  Our  project aims at recording  and  tracking  various
parameters that influence software project development
process and  helps the management at various stages of the
product development.  This tool makes the organization  to
commemorate all the activities of  the project.
Project
Duration:  2  Months
Title of  the Project:  College Management
Client: TJPS College,  Guntur.
Team  Size: 3.
Software: FOXPRO
Description:  Our  project aims at recording  and  tracking  various
parameters that influence software project development
process and  helps the management at various stages of the
product development.  This tool makes the organization  to
commemorate all the activities of  the project.
Project
2
Duration:  3  Months
Title of  the Project:  Office Management
Client: Pearl Beverages Company  Limited,  Guntur.
Team  Size: 3.
Software: VB,  Oracle
Description:  Our  project aims at updating  the system which  is previously
doing  their  work  in  MS Office
Extra    Curricular Activities
Compeering  for  programs conducted  by  the college.
Participated  and  won  prizes in  debates and  elocution  competitions in  college.
Strengths
Supervisory  capabilities.
Reliable under stress.
Capable to  take additional responsibilities.
Willingness to  learn.
Able to  get along  with  team,  Self  learner & Result oriented.
Good  public relations.
Personal Profile
Father's Name : C.Narendra Mohan
Date of  Birth : 08-08-83
Marital Status : Single
Nationality
: Indian
Languages Known : English,  Hindi,  Telugu.
Hobbies : Music,  Sports,  Browsing,  Traveling.
3
Contact  Address
Flat no:302,  G-15,
Siddhartha sarada Apts.,
Madura Nagar,
Yousuf  Guda,
Hyderabad-500038
C.Nandana
Working  as Web Application Developer in  SREEGA TECHNOLOGIES Pvt.  Ltd.,
Banjara Hills,Hyderabad  from Jun  2004  to  till date.
Project profile:
#  Project 1
Title : Net Trade
Client : Decent Inventory  Warehouse
Duration : Sepatember 2004  to  March  2005
Description : Trade is an  on-line shopping  where any  Customer is durable can  be purchased
under one roof.  Main  page will provide some information  about the shop  and  links to  go  to
different item  pages.  In  item related  pages different company  products and  those rates will be
given,  the servlet engine will  dynamically  generate these html pages.  Customer can  select the
number of items going  through  all required  pages.  The selected  items will  be added  to  his
baggage automatically.  Customer can  see his baggage by  clicking  a button,  He can  also  change
the quantity  or delete the selected  items from his baggage.  After finishing  his shopping  he should
required  to  fill up  the details form  (if new  Customer) so  that the items will  be delivered  to  his
home.
Roles & Responsibilities:
Actively  involved  in  Analysis of the System  Requirements Specifications
Involved  in  Servlet Programming.
Involved  in  Business components programming
Involved  in  Client-side scripting.
Software : JSP1.1,  JavaScript,  Servlets
DBMS : Oracle 8i
Application Server : Weblogic 7.0
#Project  2
Title : Library  Management
Client : RajaMahendra College of Engineering
Duration : March  2005  to  July  2005
Description : This is mainly  for maintaining  library  information  to  students as well as staff.
In  this students can  get information  about the books through  various locations i.e.,  from different
computer labs.  From that they  can  get information  about available books in  library.  There is a
facility  is that they  can  register required  books from that  location.  This can  also  provides
information  about  the expiring  of books date.  From this they  can  also  know  the details of
journals.
Roles & Responsibilities:
Actively  involved  in  Analysis of the System  Requirements Specifications
Involved  in  Servlet Programming.
Involved  in  Business components programming
Involved  in  Client-side scripting.
Software : Sevlet,jsp,  JSP1.1,  JavaScript,  JRE1.3
DBMS : Oracle 8i
Application Server : Weblogic 7.0
#Project 3
Title : A New Way  of Learning
Client : Rainbow  Technical  Education
Duration : July  2005  to  November 2005
Description : This site is for a technical  educational institution.  This site will serve as
a visual teaching  aid  for their students.  Here every  student is given  a unique id  thru  which  he/
she can  access the site.  The home page consist  description  of the organizations profile and
some links.  Once the student  id  is validated,  he is provided  with  different  course structures
and  the number of sessions.  In  each  session  the student  is provided  with  material pertaining  to
that course.  Once the student  finishes studying  the course he can  go  for an  online test where
he has to  select an  option  for each  question.  After the completion  of the test,  he can  see his
score and  grade.  Apart  from  this,  the coordinator of this site is provided  with  a separate page
where he can  add  a new  course,  the course material,  questions for test and  answers to  them.
My  Role:
Involved  in  Analysis of Requirement  Specification.
Involved  in  coding  of JSP.
Involved  in  Client-side scripting.
Software : Servlets,  JavaScript,  JRE1.3
DBMS : Oracle 8i
Web Server : Tomcat  5
Doing  academic Project in  CMC  limited  (a TATA enterprise)  and  worked  as a
project trainee for  5  months.
Won  a Proficiency  award  in  first semester  of  MCA
Academic Project done in  Pearl Beverages Company  Limited  and  worked  as a
project trainee for  3  months.
Educational  Profile
Academics University Percentage Batch
MCA Acharya  Nagarjuna
University
80 2003-2006
(pursuing)
Bachelor of Computer
Science
Acharya  Nagarjuna
University
70 2000    2003
Intermediate
Board of Intermediate
Education
70 1998    2000
S.S.C Board of Secondary
Education
70 1997  1998
Skills  set
1
Languages : C,  C++,  COBOL,  PASCAL
Server Side Programming: Java,  VB.net
RDBMS : Oracle,  MS-Access
Web  Languages : HTML,  Java Script,  XML
GUI  : Visual Basic
Operating  Systems : Windows,  DOS,  UNIX,  LINUX.
Internet Technologies :  HTML,  DHTML,  XML,  SERVLETS,  JSP
Testing Tools  : Win  Runner, SQA Robot, Load Runner,
Silk  Test
Academic Project(pursuing)
Duration:  5  Months
Title of  the Project:  Software Project Management Tool
Client: CMC  Limited  (A TATA Enterprise),  Hyderabad.
Team  Size: 3.
Software: Java
Description:  Our  project aims at recording  and  tracking  various
parameters that influence software project development
process and  helps the management at various stages of the
product development.  This tool makes the organization  to
commemorate all the activities of  the project.
Project
Duration:  2  Months
Title of  the Project:  College Management
Client: TJPS College,  Guntur.
Team  Size: 3.
Software: FOXPRO
Description:  Our  project aims at recording  and  tracking  various
parameters that influence software project development
process and  helps the management at various stages of the
product development.  This tool makes the organization  to
commemorate all the activities of  the project.
2
Project
Duration:  3  Months
Title of  the Project:  Office Management
Client: Pearl Beverages Company  Limited,  Guntur.
Team  Size: 3.
Software: VB,  Oracle
Description:  Our  project aims at updating  the system which  is previously
doing  their  work  in  MS Office
Extra    Curricular Activities
Compeering  for  programs conducted  by  the college.
Participated  and  won  prizes in  debates and  elocution  competitions in  college.
Strengths
Supervisory  capabilities.
Reliable under stress.
Capable to  take additional responsibilities.
Willingness to  learn.
Able to  get along  with  team,  Self  learner & Result oriented.
Good  public relations.
Personal Profile
Father's Name : C.Narendra Mohan
Date of  Birth : 08-08-83
Marital Status : Single
Nationality
: Indian
Languages Known : English,  Hindi,  Telugu.
Hobbies : Music,  Sports,  Browsing,  Traveling.
3
Contact  Address
Flat no:302,  G-15,
Siddhartha sarada Apts.,
Madura Nagar,
Yousuf  Guda,
Hyderabad-500038
C.Nandana
1.  Member Technical team  Vision Infotech Pvt.  Ltd Bangalore
sep  2005    Till date )
Job profile: -
involved  in  coding  of  the project entitled  Project Tracking  Management  sys.
Project Description: -
PTMS is web-based  tool that aims at tracking  the status of  the project.
Main  of  PTMS is to  provide information  about the project d
etails,  task  details,  and  project
date
and  help  the project leaders to  smoothly  track  and  monitor  the other  project activities.
Technology  used: -
J2EE (Servlets and  JSP's)
2.  Internship  Sun Microsystems India  Pvt.  Ltd.  Bangalore ( Apr 2005  - Aug  2005  )
1
.  Programming  Languages :
C , C++, VB 6.0 .
2
.  Data  Bases :
Oracle 8i , MS-Access  , MS-SQL 2000
3
.  Operating  Systems :
Windows-98/2000/XP , Unix  .
4
.  Scripting  Languages :
HTML , ASP,; PHP : Hypertext Preprocessor ;
PROJECT PROFILE  :
(1)
Web  Based  Information System for CRM(  Cold  Rolling  Mill)  Complex  .
Project Objective Web based Information System for CRM(Cold Rolling Mill) Complex  .
Organization ESSAR STEEL(CRM Automation) Hazira,Gujrat .
Period 30th March to 30th July  .
Description
Level 2 Systems  are supposed to keep all the data regarding
production of various  types  and grades  of material on the various
lines  (CGL1,CRM1,PKL1,PKL2) in the CRM Complex  . This  data
comprises  of production data regarding individual Coil e.g. Start and
End time of a coil on the line , the kind of raw material , the kind of
expected output raw material and the actual raw material produced
based on various  parameters  / constraints  of the running production
line .
All this  raw data needs  to be converted into meaningful information ,
so that it could be further analyzed for optimizing the line to give
better productivity  and best quality  over a period of time .
Solution Environment Front End : ; PHP : Hypertext Preprocessor ;
Back  End : MS SQL Server 2000 .
(2)
On Line Telephone Billing  System .
Project Objective On Line Telephone Billing System .
Description Online billing system has  been implemented at telephone exchange. The
project facilitates  both administrator and user ends. Administrator end is
equipped with \u0022User entry\u0022, \u0022Consumption and Billing\u0022 and \u0022Payment\u0022
modules. User end is  sub-moduled using \u0022Personal details\u0022, \u0022Billing
information\u0022 and \u0022On-line billing\u0022 activities. Both Administrator and User
modules  use the same user data base. The user data is  validated
through inbuilt constraint and securities.
Solution Environment Front End : ; ASP : Active Server Pages  ;
Back  End : Oracle 8i .
(3)
Electricity Billing  System .
Project Objective Electricity  Billing System .
Description The system works  to generate the electricity  bills. The area covered are
consumer registration device installation getting meter readings,
generate bills  and payments.
Solution Environment Front End : VB 6.0 .
Back  End : MS-Access  .
I have been working in ESSAR Infotech Limited , Hazira Surat as  a software developer & learning
SAP/ABAP4.
One year experience as Computer  Faculity  in  NIIT@SCHOOL,  Amalapuram.
One year experience as Programmer  in  BIRLA GLOBAL INFOTECH
SERVICES PRIVATE  LIMITED,  Hyderabad.
Qualification:  -
D.C.A (Diploma in  computer applications)  from NIIT.
B.Sc (Physics & Computers)  from Andhra University  in  March  2003.
Intermediate (Maths,  Physics,  Chemistry)  form the Board  Of  Intermediate in  2000.
S.S.C  Board  of  Secondary  School of Education  in1998.
Software profile:
Microsoft Technologies : C#.NET,  VB.NET,  ADO.NET.
Packages : MS-Office,  HTML,  SQL 2000  server.
Languages : C,  C++.
Operating  systems : MS-DOS,  Windows.
Generating  the required Reports.
As a  Developer Involved in Coding,  Unit Testing.
Involved  in  developing  various Screens and  implemented  input data
Validation  for  each  screen  using  C#.  NET.
Involved  in  Writing  Stored Procedures.
Currently  pursing  the two  year  post graduation  course Master of
Business Administration (MBA)  with  specialization  as a field  of  Marketing  & HR
from Hindustan  Institute of  Management & Computer  Studies,  Farah,  Mathura,
affiliated  to  U.P.  Technical University,  Lucknow.  (Batch    2004-2006)
Done the Two  month  duration  summer  training  in  SURYA FOODS
AND AGRO Ltd.(Pryagold) on the topic MARKET SHARE  OF FRUIT JUICE
AND FRUIT DRINKS.
INDUSTRY VISIT:
Visited  \u0022Goa  Hitech Optico  Lab  Pvt.  India  Ltd.\u0022 During  industrial
tour organized  by  HIMCS to  Goa.
Computer Science  Engineer having  1 year of experience in design and  development of
Software  Applications in VB, COM/DCOM, .Net, XML at Cyber Infoservices (P)  Ltd, New
Delhi.
Organization Designation Duration
Cyber Infoservices(P)  Ltd  Software  Developer Dec  2004   Nov 2005

Project Handled
I am  looking for a  challenging opportunity in the field of information technology and
computer science. My aim is to be a  part of a result oriented, highly successful team  in
implementing innovative ideas in tune with quality standards and current technologies.
1 Year of experience as a Software Engineer in Megatrendz  on J2ME.
Worked efficiently as an individual as well as a  team member on various projects
and am adaptable to situations.
Working as Software Engineer from September/2005 till date.
Company :
Megatrendz
35th `C' Cross 4th `T' Block,
Jayanagar,East End Main Road,
Bangalore-560069
Project Name:  X'Mas Humbugs
Description
It is X'mas eve. and humbugs are bent upon dampening the X'mas spirit by
foiling Santa's plan of delivering his X'mas goodies on time.You have to  make sure the
gifts, are distributed into four corners.Guide through the maze using the bell before time
runs out.Avoid Humbugs as they knock the gifts off the cart.The fate of X'mas is in our
hands.
Roles  and Responsibility
Coding of Application for the part of Developers Role.
Project Name:  OMAMASNEMESIS
Description
AS a reputed Sniper of the Elite U.S. Marine Corps you have been assigned to
this mission.There were reports that Omama  and his loyal men are hiding in Zaidistan
under protection of a terrorist state.Intelligence reports suggests he has created clones of
himself,so  we may never know  if he is dead or alive.You were dropped off into  his hide
out.Your mission is to  kill world's most wanted man and his honchos.
Roles and Responsibility
Coding of Application for the part of Developers Role.
Project Name:  BlackjackNatacha
Description
To  change the background images as cash in hand increases.You have $ 500 at the
start of the game.The background changes at a  time when you reach $650,$800,
$950,$1100,$1350,$1500.
Each player starts with two cards. one of Natacha's  cards is hidden till you
`stand'. Face cards are worth 10.Aces are worth 1 or 11 whichever makes a better
hand.You must beat Natacha's hand without going over 20.To `HIT' is to  ask for
another card ,to `STAND' is to  hold your current total and end your turn.'Double'
is a `HIT' with `STAND' ,the bet is doubled and you get one more card and you
stand automatically..Natacha  will hit until his cards total 17 or higher.If you go
over 21,you will bust and Natacha  wins.
Roles  and Responsibility
Coding of Application for the part of Developers Role.
Project Name:  StripBricksElita
Description
Complete the different stages of the game to  show images from `Elita'.It is an
exciting action game.It is fully based on bricks.The complexity of the game will be in
increasing order according to the levels.You have to  clear fifty different levels to win
the game.As much as you will break the bricks the background image will be in front
of you.After -fter the breaking of all bricks you will enter in the next level.
Roles  and Responsibility
Coding of Application for the part of Developers Role.
With nearly one year of  experience in areas  of PHP,Java Script,HTML
Having developed extensive interest  and command over the above-mentioned
areas  and with my  past  experience I  am confident to do justice for the above
fields.  I  shall  be thankful and graceful to your good selves,  if  you could provide
me an opportunity  to work  in your esteemed organization.
From July  2002till  now  IT Trainee at  IEG, Hyderabad.
Bachelor of Technology in Computer Science & Engineering.
Pursuing Cisco Certified Network Associate(CCNA) from one of the
prometric  centre of Cisco Networking Academy.  And have completed 3
Semester out of 4.
Underwent 4    week training at Bharat Sanchar Nigam Limited
(BSNL),  Lucknow in \u0022GSM  (Global System For Mobiles)\u0022.
Underwent 4    week training at Creative Computers,  Gorakhpur in
\u0022Computer Assembling & Trouble shooting\u0022.
SEMINARS
Delivered a presentation/lecture on EDGE (Enhance Data for
Global Evaluation).
Delivered a presentation/lecture on GSM Networks.
EXTRA CURRICULLAR  ACTIVITIES
Was a  member of the Event Management Committee in the Inter
College Festival (SPARSH).
Was a member of School Hockey Team and played matches at
District level .
Won several Prizes in Inter College Festivals.
Worked as  Developer in \u0022Hard ` n  Soft (Infotech
Services  Pvt. Ltd.)\u0022 Surat.
Project No 1:  INV (Inventory  Management  System for Vipul
Textile)
Client:  Vipul Sarees, Surat
Place: Hard `n  Soft  Infotech Pvt Ltd., Surat
Software Used:  VB, Crystal Report, MS Sql Server 2000.
Duration:  August 2005 to Jan  2006
Description:  INV is  inventory  control system for Vipul Sarees. It is
divided in  few modules i.e. Purchasing (Cash  as  well as  Credit),
Storage (Lot  wise and Mixed), Processing (White wash, Coloring,
Embrowding), Cutting (It is  depend on designing of Sarees),
Packaging (Cartoon, Poly  Bags).
Training Profile:
Have been completed  6  month training
successfully in  \u0022Infoseek Software Systems\u0022, Indira  Nagar,
Lucknow. The training synopsis  is  as below:
Project No 2:  Nidan
Client:  Pulmonic Hospital and Chest Center,
Rajnagar, Ghaziabad.
Place:  Infoseek Software Systems, Lucknow
Software Used
Visual Basic 6.0, Oracle 8i.
Duration: Jan 2005  to July 2005
Description:  Nidan  is  a  Hospital Record system in which
user can maintain all records of Doctors and Patient.  It also
give all the Lab Test Results  and their Description for every
patient. It also  maintain all records for inpatient and
outside patient's Description prescribe by Doctors.
Project  No.  3:  Online Examination
Client:  Sahara  Arts and Management Academy,
Lucknow.
Place:  Sahara  Arts and Management Academy,
Lucknow.
Software Used
Visual Basic 6.0, Oracle 8i.
Duration: Jan 2004  to April 2004.
Description:
This  system  is developed with an  objective to test the
students  with their reflexes in particular topic and also
grade the  study on the basis of result of students. In this
project objective  type questions are created  which  contains
randomization to avoid  coherent cheating. The software
maintains and produces  the report of individual students as
well as  a  detail report including  all students.
Master of Computer Applications (M.C.A) with  68%
marks  from SAHARA ARTS & MANAGEMENT ACADEMY,
Lucknow, affiliated to  Uttar Pradesh  Technical University
(2002-2005).
P.G.D.C.A. passed in 2002 from U.P.College, Varanasi.
Organisation : Novell Software Development(I) Pvt.  (I) Ltd.,  Bangalore
Duration : 6  months
Designation : Contract Employee
Technologies :  JAVA,  JSP,  Directory  Services (eDirectory),  XML,  HTML
DNS Export  Migration Tool
DNS Export Configuration  and  Data is the new task  in  DNS-iManager  plug-in  that helps
customers in  migrating  DNS services from NetWare to  SLES.  DNS Export functionality,
targeted  at DNS Administrators,  will be implemented  as a new task  in  DNS-iManager
plug-in.resides on  all the machines in  the network  and  interfaces with  the audited
services.
There are two  types of files in  DNS server,  zone db  files and  configuration  file that need
to  be exported  from eDirectory.  Each  and  every  zone has a separate database file.  In
NetWare,  the configuration  and  zone data are stored  in  eDirectory  as well as in  file if  the
FT is ON while in  SLES these information  need  to  be stored  in  a flat file format and  that
files should  be exported.
One of  the top  priorities in  designing  Novell Open  Enterprise Server (OES) was to  ensure
that new OES components,  running  on  either  NetWare or  Linux,  can  be introduced  into
an  existing  network  environment without disrupting  any  of the products and  services that
are in  place.  It was also  deemed  important that there be a clear  migration  path  for moving
existing  products or  services and  related  data onto  the OES platform.
Currently working  with Phenomena  Software Solutions Pvt ltd, Hyderabad, India
since  March 2005 as Jr Software Engineer.
1.2 Years programming  Experience  in Microsoft DotNet.
Currently working  in a team  for developing  a webapplication using ASP.NET,C#,Ms
Sql Server2000 and Javascript.
Done  2 projects in DotNet.
Wrote  and  analyzed  software  programs in C#.
Technical Skill sets
Languages  : C#,C++, C, JavaScript
Web tools : ASP.Net, ADO.NET, HTML
Operating System :  Windows98, Windows2000Server, Windows XP
Database :  MS  SQL SERVER2000, MS  Access and  Oracle  9i
GUI :  VB.NET
Having 3 Plus Years of  experience in the field of  IT focusing on Software Application
Testing.
Well acquainted with the Software Development Life cycle
Extensive experience of preparing and executing Test Cases  based on Business
requirements  and technical  specifications.
Involved in Manual  testing and AutomatedTesting of applications  on Windows
Environment.
Hands  on proficiency  in Automated Tools  WinRunner and QTP.
Experience on different types  of tests  viz.,  Black Box, System and Regression Testing.
Involved in usability  testing and Database testing.
Performed Functionality,  Regression, Data Driven Tests.
Good Knowledge in LoadRunner and SILK Test
Good at  Manual and Automated Testing for both Web and Client/Server applications.
Strong analytical,problem solving skills  and presentation skills
Quick  learner and excellent team player, ability  to meet tight  deadlines  and working under
pressure.
Working as  a Test Engineer in
Opusasia Technologies Pvt
Ltd.,
Hyderabad from Aug'2002 to till  Date.
Opusasia
is  ISO 9001 certified company. At Opus  SW-CMM level-4 implementation is  currently
underway.
URL's: www.opusasia.com
Smoke testing and System Testing which includes  Functionality  Testing.
Involved in writing test cases  for manual  testing .
Involved in Preparing automation test scripts  in vb script language.
Reexecution of  vb script Regression testing
Manual and automation test cases  checking and execution.
Export and Import data to Database
Involved in Functional  testing Database testing
Record defects  in defect tracking system
Project #2
Title : Inventory,  Paymoney and Accounting
Client : Beckman inc., USA
Technologies  used : Java,  Jsp and Servlets,Tomcat 4.1
Testing Environment : Manual Testing and WinRunner
Database : Oracle 9i
Duration : 6 months
Application Overview:
The website is  focused on providing solutions  to the company,  which wants  to
make use of online marketing. It  is  beneficial  for the company,  which does  online marketing for
their own products  as  well  as  the products,  bought from different vendors. The customer has  to
register first  and do online shopping.  He can pay  the amount through credit card, check  with the
option of  paying at  the time of  delivery. Which plays  a vital role in taking the orders  and sending
invoices  to the customers. The site keeps  track  of the supply  and demand of  the goods  and
gives  alert messages  for the respective goods  to the client.
Preparing and documenting the Test  Conditions  and Test  Cases  manual  testing.
Involved in writing test cases  and Executing the Test Cases  .
Involved in Preparing and Executing the automation test scripts
Export and Import data to Database.
Record defects  in defect tracking system.
Responsible for Functionality  Testing, Regression Testing and Database testing.
Project #3
Project Title : e-BANKING CUSTOMER SERVICE
Client  : Genisys  Software& IT enabled services
Technologies  used : ASP.Net,IIS server
Testing  Environment :  Manual Testing,Test
Director
Role : Test Engineer
Databases : SQL Server 2000
Duration : 8 months
Application Overview:
The eBanking-Customer Service is  focused on providing some basic  services  to the bank
customers  through online. The eBanking Customer srevices  provides  the services  like balance
Enquiry,Account  Statement, Cheque Book  Request, Fund Transfer and an option to change the
password. The eBanking-Customer Service maintain data about the users, like who are the
users  logged into the eBanking and what type of services  they  are using across  various  time
slots.
Smoke testing and System Testing which includes  Functionality  Testing.
Involved in writing test cases  for manual  testing.
Involved in Regression testing,  Functional testing and Database testing .
Manual test cases  checking and execution.
Execute all  assigned test  cases
Posting defects  in defect tracking system
Project  #4
Title : Support Center
Client : Opusasia Technologies
Testing Environment : Manual Testing,  Winrunner
Software used : Java, Jsp and Oracle 8.0
Role : Junior Test Engineer.
Duration : 5 months
Application Overview:
It is  a Proprietary  tool for Opusasia Technologies. Which will provide complete
environment  for managing its  client Requirements, Reported Bugs  and Enhancements.  It will
maintain the status  of Client, Analyst,  Developer and Release Team statuses  for each
requirement.  This  project has  the Facility  of  tracking the bugs  with all  the required facilities.
Testing leads  and project Leads  can view  the over all  report  of  the bugs, which is
graphically  represented at any  point  of  time.
Responsible for AdhocTesting, Functional Testing Regression Testing.
Writing Test Cases  for Responsible Module
Involved in writing test cases  for Automation and manual testing.
Execute all  assigned test  cases
Record defects  in defect tracking system
Project #5
Tiltle : e-Learning.
Client : APSCH  E
Technologies  used : Java, Jsp, and Servlets.
Testing Environment : Manual Testing.
Role : Junior Test  Engineer.
Duration : 5 months
Database : Oracle 8.0
URL's  : www.apsche.org
Application Overview:
The Andhra Pradesh State Council  of  Higher Education,  the first of  its  kind in the Country,  set  up
as  per the recommendations  of the National  Education Policy  1986,  is  primarily  a coordinating
and liaisoning body  between the University  Grants  Commission, the State Government and the
Universities.  To conduct entrance examinations  Graduate Employability  Test  for admission to
institutions  of higher education and render advice on admissions.
This  is  extensively  involved in designing and developing web based Learning System.
Smoke Testing testing which includes  Functionality  Testing.
Involved in writing test cases  for manual  testing.
Involved in Black  Box  Testing and Regression Testing.
Manual Test  Cases  were created to validate Functionality
Execute all  assigned test  cases
Record defects  in defect tracking system
B.Tech  with  Ist  Division  in  2005  from  U.P.Tech  University
Currently  Working  on Project MobiFuzion.
Description:- The objective of the project is perform video  calling  through mobile device(as video
chatting  through messenger) using  J2ME platform.
Backend:- SQL SERVER-2000
Java  Platform:- J2ee,J2me
Application Server:-Weblogic 8.1
Page
1
of2
Project Title : \u0022Mobile Banking  Simulation\u0022
Brief Overview  of Project:
This  project  is  the simulation of Mobile Banking that is  currently  running .The objective is  to
make the banking scalable,web-enabled and accessible through mobile phones.In this  project
MIDlet provides  user interface to client  and servlet  on bank  server access  the unique pin code
validates  it and send the account information from database to the client.
Backend :  SQLServer2000
Java platforms  :  J2ME,J2EE
Project Title:
\u0022 Online Examination in Java
\u0022.
Brief Overview  of Project:
The objective of our project  is  to implement  software so that we can conduct a exam with
multiple candidates  simultaneously. In this  exam each candidates  get the 20 questions
randomly. Candidates  can also check  their marks  after attempting 20 questions  of their exam.
I have played an important role in this  project  during working with my  seniors.
2+ year of work experience in developing applications using Java, J2EE, Web
Technologies  and RDBMS.
Have experience in developing and implementing various client server and
Internet applications.
S No Designation Employer Duration
1. Junior Software
Engineer.
SDC  Technologies,
Banglore
15 march - till date
Academics:
Bachelor of Technology, Computer Science, From Lal Bahadur Shastri
College of Engineering, Kasaragod -Kannur University,  Kerala,  India during 2000
to 2004 and scored 70.1%.
12 (AISSCE,  CBSE),  From Jawahar Navodaya Vidyalaya, Kasaragod, Kerala,
India during 1998 to 1999 and scored 72.4%.
10 (AISSE, CBSE), From Jawahar Navodaya Vidyalaya,  Kasaragod, Kerala,
India during 1996 to 1997 and scored 80.4%.
Proficiency: -
Operating Systems : Windows,  Linux
Languages : Java, C,  C++
Technologies : J2ee (HTML, CSS,  XML,  JSP,  Servlets, EJB)
Frameworks : MVC  FrameWork, LifeRay  3.6.1
Web Server : Jakarta Tomcat, Jboss-Tomcat
Packages : Visual Basic  6.0
Database : MySQL, MS Access.
Worked  on the  live site  http://www.humonline.com  and  needed  to make new and  modify
the  existing  modules as per requirement. As well as updating  the  site  too was also included
in my work.
Worked as  a  Software Engineer (.NET Platform) in Modulus  Systems,  Delhi for 5
months.
Projects undertaken in the company:
Photo Site:  It is a website  having  Photo Gallery in it made  in ASP.Net having  SQL Server as
its database.
Role:  Team Member.
In this website  http://photogallery.m6.net/home.aspx a photo gallery is there  in which
images, videos, flash, games, text articles are uploaded, downloaded  and  rated  too.
Icomm Tele:  It is a website  of Icomm Tele  Division company, Delhi, made  in Html and ASP.Net.
Role:  Team Member.
Maiden Voyage:  It is a website  for an Immigration Consultants, US  Based, made in ASP.Net
and SQL Server as its database.
Role:  Team Member
In this website  http://www.maidenvoyage.info there  is are  two dynamic  forms which have
interaction with the database.
Pragati Packaging:  It is a website  for a Packaging  Company, Faridabad, made in ASP.Net
and SQL Server as its database.
Role:  Team Member
In this website  http://pragatipac.com.23.m6.net there  is one dynamic  form which has
interaction with the database.
IP University:  It is a website  for Indraprastha University, Delhi made  in ASP and  SQL Server
as its database.
Role:  Team Member
In this website  http://www.ipuniversity.com , I  was involved in updating  certain modules and
adding  new modules like  Placement module, etc.
Ripple soft  Private limited,  Bhubaneswar.
Dealing  with  computer  peripherals and  also  computer applications of different
brands.
Working  as customer  Support engineer providing  all the support to  customer
regarding  software installation  and  maintainance.
Currently  working as  a Software Consultant for Adira Technologies  ., Bangalore from
October 2003 to till date.
Involving in Coding Server pages  using JSP.
Performing Unit Testing.
Client :  MHIS (CHAMPAGNE), U.K
Environment : JDK 1.4, JSP, Servlets, Tomcat, Oracle 8i
Role : Software Engineer
Project#2:
NetBooker
Dallas-based Pegasus  Solutions, Inc. (NASDAQ: PEGS) is  a leading global provider of
hotel reservations-related services  and technology. The NetBooker booking engine enables  Web sites
to connect directly  to hotel reservation systems  for online reservations. NetBooker is  a hosted, online
Internet engine for hotel and travel portal companies  that operate their own Web sites. NetBooker
helps  hotels  and travel portals  manage reservations  while they  add revenue, save on distribution
costs, promote their brand, market properties, communicate with customers  and build direct
relationships  with them. This  system contains  2 different modules  like IBE (Internet Booking Engine)
and PCC ( Product Configuration and Control).In this  IBE there are several modules  is  available like
Availability  Search, Make a Reservation, Web Profile, Iternitery  Builder.
Involved in Coding Server pages  using JSP.
Developed Java files  using the core language functionality.
Performed Unit Testing.
Page  2  of 5
Page 2  of 3
Client : (PEGS)
Pegasus  Solutions, USA.
Environment : JDK 1.4, JSP, JDBC, Tomcat, Oracle 8i
Role : Programmer
Page  3  of 5
Presently  working  as a Software Test Engineer in  Primaccess Technologies,
Hyderabad  from Jan  2006.
Worked  as Software Test Engineer in  Qualhub  Solutions Pvt.Ltd,  Hyderabad  from
Aug  2004  to  Dec 2005.
Involved  in  manual testing
Preparation  of Test  cases and  executed  the test cases.
Responsible for applying  the Functionality  test.
Reviewing  the System and  Integration  Test Results
#2  Project  : Sales Force Automation (SFA)
Client : City  Online Services Ltd,  India
Environment : ASP,  JavaScript,  VBScript,  HTML,  Photoshop5.5,  Oracle9i
Team  Size :  4
Duration : 6  Months
Description:
Your sales force is probably  the group  of employees least likely  to  be at their desks--
in  fact,  many  of them  might not  even  have an  allocated  desk.  Mostly,  they're on  the road,  bringing
in  business.  But  to  do  that,  they  need  real-time information  when  they're face-to-face with  the
customer:  information  on  what they're selling,  to  whom and  for how much.  They  also  need  the
latest information  on  progress of a prospective deal,  plus the ability  to  tap  in  to  their boss's
schedule if a higher-level contact  needs to  be made,  or to  close a sale and  generate the paperwork
on  the spot for the customer to  sign.  Mobilizing  your sales force automation  solution  can  deliver
all that  and  more,  providing  them with  immediate access to  the latest:
Customer history
Product specifications
Pricing  and  availability
Terms and  conditions
Competitive information
Involved  in  manual testing
Preparation  of Test  cases and  executed  the test cases.
Responsible for applying  the Functionality  test.
Reviewing  the System and  Integration  Test Results.
#3
Project : Industrial  Management Information System
Client : Bhagiradha Chemicals and  Industries Ltd.
Environment :  VB,  Oracle8
Team  Size :  3
Duration : 5  Months
Description:
There are many  ways that  Management  Information  System can  help  an  organization.
First,  an  organization's operating  costs and  time consumption  can  be reduced.  This system has the
following  modules:  System Administration  (It has a provision  to  create new  departments),
Production  Planning  (In  this module,  the planning  department  can  prepare production  plans for
the items to  be manufactured  by  the individual production  departments.),  Quality  Analysis (In  this
module the quality  of the finished  product is tested  by  quality  department  and  is finally  approved
for marketing.),  Sales and  marketing  (This module contains the details of the orders and  goods
purchased  by  the customers.) The system  consolidates other software applications like MS-
Project,  MS Excel,  MS Word  into  a simple system.
Prepared  the test  cases and  executed  the test cases.
Responsible for applying  the Functionality  test.
Reviewing  the System and  Integration  Test Results.
Applying  the Usability  Testing  Techniques to  Test  Application.
#4  Project  : Signup Server
Client :
Veda Online Services Ltd
Environment  : Asp,  Html,  Javascrpit,  Vbscript,MS-Access
Team  Size : 3
Duration  :  4  Months
Description:
This is useful in  online signup  of dialup  accounts and  managing  the accounts of the
customers (Giving  them  the details of their accounts,  time they  browsed.) using  Shiva Access
manager,  which  is showing  the current users of the dialup,  services and  their data flow  through
the router.
Responsible for applying  the Functionality  tests.
Prepared  the test  cases and  involved  in  executing  the test  cases.
Applying  the Usability  Testing  Techniques to  Test Application.
Tracking  the defects using  Defect tracking  system.
Position:  Mobile Testing Engineer
Duration:  February (2005)   Current day
Organization:  International Testing System Pvt Ltd.  (Subsidiary of  NSTL)
Job Profile: P erform Black  Box  testing,  write and send reports  on certification to developers
of  their Mobile Applications  that were submitted.  Application is tested  on various  Mobile
handsets  (CDMA/GSM) and on different environments.
Environment:  BREW
Tools  Used:  BREW Apploader, Emulator, REX, BREW MIF Editor
Applications:  Sudoku Zen,  Casper in Midnight Mission,  Tom  & Je rry,  Asteroids, Bartender etc.
Applications under test are downloaded on to the  BREW AppManager of the  CDMA
handset (Motorola T720, Curitel CDM 8600, etc)  via BREW AppLoader.The  application is explored
completely like  functionality, user interface  graphics, data storage  and other parameters against
the  application specification document and  test case. The  Test case is studied, entered  and
reported  accordingly. Application is also tested  on computer by loading  to BREW Emulator.
Environment:  Symbian
Tools:  FExplorer, Low Memory, Memory card  reader/writer, Bluetooth Dongle, GPRS
Applications:  Audible  Players, DSS, Virus Guard, Mighty Phone, Kodak Pictures, m-mobile etc.
These  applications are  submitted  for higher end  mobile phones such as series 60(Nokia
6600, 6630, Sony Ericsson P900, etc)  and above  that use  Symbian OS. The  application is
browsed  and checked to see  if it works as specified and  noted  if any errors and/or issues, in the
Symbian test case. FExplorer tool is used  to browse  the  phone  for the  memory usage  and
location path of the application. Low Memory tool is used  to make  sure  that the  application does
not behave abnormally when handset memory is full or low.
Environment:  Java/Vodafone
Tools:  GPRS
Applications:  Save  Kenny, Tetris, Bloktonik, Slot Tree, 3D-Capone  Casino, Moto GP3, Fasttrack
etc.
The  submitted  application is tested  on the  specified m obile  handsets that support java
applications. Firstly, OTA test is done  i.e., to check  that the application downloads over the  air
and installs onto the  handset successfully. Later, the application is tested  on its functionality,
user interface, language, connectivity, interruption and  so on similar to how an end  user would.
The  test case web  site  for the  submitted  application is updated  with the  observations found  on
the  testing process and  then it's reported.
Position:  Technical Support Representative
Duration:  November 2004   January 2005
Organization:  SCICOM (For NOKIA)
Job Profile: Delighting N OKIA customers over the  phone  by answering  their queries on NOKIA handset
and on latest happening  such as sponsors/advertisements by NOKIA.
Having  about 1  year of professional  experience in  Software Development  and  Support in  C,  C++
& UNIX.
Worked  with  Accenture Services Pvt ltd,  Bangalore  as Programmer since June 1st
2005    till date.
From 1st June 2005  Till date
Software Engineer   Accenture Service Pvt ltd.  Bangalore
Design
Coding
Bug  Fixes
Component  Testing.
Verification  and  Regression  Testing
Main Project
REGIONAL ORDERING SYSTEM (ROS)
Employer : Accenture Services Pvt  Ltd,  Bangalore
Domain : Telecom,
Client : AT&T, Be llSouth
Operating  System : Solaris 2.x
Coding/Debugging  Tool : C  ++ / Sun  Workshop
Role : Team Member
Team Size : 10
Description
The product ROS provides the client,  Small Business,  Medium Business or  a Large
Business,  a straightforward,  functional interface to  support the creation  and  modification
of  regional service orders.  ROS allows different Order  Types for Telephone Connection
to  the user,  like Creation  of  Account to  the New User,  Change of  Type or  Disconnect the
Service.  This ROS application  is used  by  the Customer  Representatives.
Involved  in  Design
Coding
Component Test
Regression  Test
REPORTS MANAGER AND DAILY MAINTENANCE
Employer : Accenture Services Pvt  Ltd,  Bangalore
Domain : Telecom,
Client : AT&T, Be llSouth
Operating  System : Solaris 2.x
Language/Database : Shell Scripting  / Informix
Role : Team Member
Team Size : 2
Description
Reports Manager  allows users to  retrieve data related  to  customer  negotiations processed
using  ROS from the Reports and  Statistics database.  This information  is retrieved  from
the database based  on  a SOCS Operator ID (or  Office)  and  a date parameter  selected  by
the user.
Daily  Maintenance is best described  as a component that automates nearly  all of  the
processes to  run  while business is closed  which  reduces network  traffic during  peak
hours.  Daily  Maintenance performs Moves the refreshed  reference data from the MVS
mainframe to  the central file servers,  Processes data to  a format that ROS understands,
Runs a nightly  process to  distribute all new reference data from the master  servers to  the
business office servers,  Processes the Status Mechanism component's log  files to  provide
the data records required  by  the Reports and  Statistics component,  daily  ROS status
reports to  specified  members of  the project.
Involved  in  Design.
Coding
Component Testing
2+ Years of  Experience in  Manual testing  and  Automation  testing  using  Mercury
Interactive's Win  Runner.
Experience in  Manual and  Automation  tests for  Web  application  developed  using
Java,  J2EE Technologies.
Experience in  System Testing,  Functional Testing  & GUI  Testing.
Preparing  Test Case and  Defect Report for  Projects.
Experience in  Defect Report and  Tracking  tool.
Potency:
Profound  in  using  Testing  Tools   Win Runner 7.0,  Test  Director 7.0
Thorough  understanding  of  SDLC testing  Lifecycle.
Knowledge of QTP & Load  runner.
Working  as a Testing  Engineer for  Dallas Technology  Pvt.Ltd.  Sep  2004  To  Till date
Working  as a Testing  Engineer for  Hi Solve Software Ltd.Aug  03  to  Sep  04
Academic Chronicle:
Bachelor  of  Engineering  in  Computer Science Engineering  from REC Bhalki,  Affiliated
to  VTU University,  securing  Distinction  (70.0%)  in  2003.
Presently working as a Software Programmer at E-Star software Solutions,
Hyderabad since Feb 04.
Present  Organization :  OTS Solutions  , Gurgaon  (INDIA)
Work  Duration :  February
2004
To  till date
Designation : QA Engineer
QA Certifications :
Six  Sigma (Green Belt) , CSTE & ISTQB ( Status : pending with  high severity  )
Present  Organization :  OTS Solutions  , Gurgaon  (INDIA)
Work  Duration :  February
2004
To  till date
Designation : QA Engineer
QA Certifications :
Six  Sigma (Green Belt) , CSTE & ISTQB ( Status : pending with  high severity  )
B.Tech  in  Mechanical Engg
NDT Level II (RT)
More than  Four  years as Piping  and  QA/QC Engineer  in  Oil and  Gas Sectors,  which
includes:
Piping,
Pressure Vessels,
Skid  and  other Structures,
Tankages
(1) Currently  working  as Mechanical & QA/QC  Engineer  with  Al-Ghanim
International General Trading  Co.  Kuwait
.()2
Worked  as QA/QC Engineer  for  Punj  Lloyd Ltd,  India from June 2003.to
August 2005
.()3
Worked  as QA/QC  Engineer  for Expo  Gas Containers Ltd Mumbai,  India from
May  2002  to  May  2003
.()4
Worked  as Mechanical Shift Engineer  for  ANS Construction Ltd ,  New Delhi,
India from march  2001  to  march  2002
SUMMARY OF EXPERIENCE:
Develop  Quality  Control Plan,  Inspection  and  Test Plan,  Preparation  of  WPS,  PQR,
Welder's Qualification  Record,  Witness Procedure and  Welder's Qualification  Test for
Various Materials.
Liaise with  Clients on  Quality  issues.  Conduct Visual and  NDT Inspection,  Witness
Hydrotest,  Inspection  of Products to  ensure compliance with  Drawings and  Client's
Specifications.  Preparation  of  Inspection  Reports and  Punch  List.
Familiar  with  International Codes i.e ASME Section  IX,  ASME Section  V,  ANSI B31.3
etc
Operating  System : MS DOS,  WINDOWS 95/98/ME.
Languages : FORTRAN,  BASIC,  C.
Internet Applications : HTML,  Front Page.
Design  Software : AutoCAD2000
Company Name  : Transcend Technologies,Chennai.
Designation : Software Programmer from the period from 10  th Aug 2003 to till date.
Current Project : Working for the most esteemed project Online monitoring system.
Responsibilities : POC & Provide the migration strategy and Co-ordinate with the onsite team and
the client for the further enhancement and support.
Softwares : Java, Rmi,Swing,JFC
Company Name  : Palpap Ichinichi Software International Pvt Ltd,Chennai.
Designation : Trainee Programmer  from Dec  `01 to June '02.
Project : Mail Server
Project #1:
Project Name Online Monitoring System
Organization Transcend Technologies
Project Description An Online Monitoring System,  which controls the other system from the
system itself by using the commands like shut down, restart, copy, cut, find files etc. It is
used to controlling the system from the server.
Hardware Intel based servers and desktops
Software Operating System  Windows 2000
Languages  JAVA
Server  Remote Method Invocation (RMI).
Role Played
Employer : Polaris Software  Lab  Ltd, Chennai
Designation : Associate  Consultant
Employment Period : Feb  2005 to till date
Role : It involves development and  testing  in
CaclsWeb.
Employer: D.S  Infotech PVT  Ltd, Hyderabad.
Designation : Software Engineer
Employment Period : June 2003 to Feb  2005
Role : It involves development in Sales Tax
Statement and  Inventory System and  e-care  Services.
Education:
B.Tech in Computer Science  &   Engineering  from JNTU in 2003 with 73.58%
(Vignans  Engineering College, Vadlamudi)
Intermediate  from Excel Junior College, Guntur in 1999 with 92%.
S.S.C from SMT  KS  MPL High School, Guntur in 1997 with 84%.
Technical Skills:
Operating  Systems : Windows 9X/2000
Languages : Java, C and  C++
Web  Technologies : JDBC, Servlets, JSP, JavaScript, HTML.
XML Technologies : XML
App  Servers : BEA Weblogic 8.1, Tomcat
Web  Servers : Iplanet Web Server
Databases : Oracle  8i/9i
Involved  to collect the  Project Requirements
Participating  in the  design part of the  project.
Involved  in designing  part of the  JSP and  HTML pages as UI(User Interface).
Involved  in Coding  and  testing  the  package.
Project#2 :
Title Losses And Assets of  The State Bank  Of  India
Client College  Level Practice  Project.
Company Case  Study Project in B.Sc. Final Year.
Duration January 2005   April 2005
Environment C Language  with Functions,Structres &
Pointers.
Description
: The  Project is used to calculate the  total losses and  assets of the  Bank
and give  the  accurate  information of the customer's details . So, my project can give  the
position of a customer's maturity date  of the  loan or account. All this logic is implemented
by using  pointers , file concepts and  Structures of the  C Language.
Involved to collect the  Project Requirements
Participating  in the  design part of the  project.
Siddhi  Infotek, Pune, India Aug-2005-Till  Date
Development work  in .NET(ASP.NET,  C#)
Project Description in brief:
Financial  Brokery System (FBS) is  a Web Based Brokery System. It provides  real-time
information about Account  management, Stock  management and much more.  FBS provide
higher levels  of service to customers  and brokers. FBS improves  critical transaction
management
Design and write an n-tier application on .NET platform.
Development of  components  that represent business  logic.
Master  In  Computer Science with  80  % in  aggregate,  completed  in  2005.
Bachelor In  Computer  Science with  67  % in  aggregate,  completed  in  2002.
1.
Presently working for HSBC Electronic Data Processing India Pvt.
Ltd.  (Kolkata), as Assistant Manager-Operations. Presently
involved with the migration of a process from US to  the Kolkata
center.
Joined on 4th August  2003.
Previously,  handled teams for Collections outbound and inbound teams.
The work entailed:  -
Managing and motivating a team of 10-12 Processing Executives  to achieve organizational
Presently  working with, Ample Technologies,Bangalore as
Software Engineer (Aug 2005  Till Date)
Name of the Organization :Analog  Systems
Desgination  :Programmer.
Worked  with  :Java,  J2EE,  Oracle 8i ,VB6,MS Access
PROJECTS #1:
Title : Teacher Acounting Information System
Client :Uttaranchal Government
Duration : May2005-TillDate
Software :
Apache Tomcat 5.0,  Jsp,  Beans,  Oracle8i
Team Size :  Three
Role : Team Member
Description
To  utilize the technology  available and  the resources to  the
maximum this application  \u0022Teacher Accounting  Information  System\u0022 is a web  enabled  so  that  any  teacher
(state) in  any  corner of the world  has an  access to  his Accounting  details.
This Project is divided  into  three different modules Employee Code Wise details,Super User,  Teacher
Locator.  in  Employee Code Details This module enables any  employee to  have a clear cut idea about  his
Pay  slip,  Pay  Bill  Register Report,  Income Tax  Report.
In  Super User-This modules is designed  basically  for High  Authorities to  have an  idea of Fund  Treasury
Transaction  for each  Treasury  as well as the complete state as a whole.
In  Teacher Locator- This module is designed  in  such  a way  that a user who  possess the minimum  or no
details about a particular teacher can  even  have the complete official details of the person  the user is
interested  in.
Contribution:
As a Team Member,  responsible for
Program  documentation  and  Coding  using  jsp,  beans and  Oracle8i.
PROJECTS #2:
Title :
ON  LINE JOB
Client : ThickContact Consultant
Duration
: Sep2004-Apr2005
Software :
Apache Tomcat 5.0,  Jsp,  Beans,  JavaScript,  Oracle8i
Team Size :  Three
Role : Team Member
Description :
The project  has two  parts,  Job  seekers and  Employers,  In
Employer part  the company  needs to  register itself along  with  the type and  level of the company,  employee
strength  and  the branches available across the world.  Then  periodically  according  to  the requirement the
company  will  give the advertisement  of the jobs available along  with  the job  profile and  the years of
experience they  need.  And  in  the next part of the jobsite the jobseeker also  has to  register himself along
with  his resume.  And  can  search  the jobs available in  the website according  to  his profile.  And  can  apply  the
jobs online.
Contribution:
As a  Team Member,  responsible for
Program  documentation  and  Coding  using  jsp,  beans and  Oracle8i.
PROJECTS #3:
Title :
Pension Monitoring  System
Client : Treasury  Department Uttaranchal  Government
Duration
: Jan2004-Aug  2004
Software :
VB6.0,  MS Access,  Crystal Report7
. Team Size :  Five
Role : Team Member
Description :
Due to  the problems like distribution  of pension  that was faced  by
Department of Treasury  it  was unavoidable for the Department to  have a system that can  handle their
problems more efficiently.
The objective of the system i.e Pension  Monitoring  System (PMS) is to  establish  a well managed  the cases
more accurately  and  efficiently,  process information  much  faster than  existing  and  can  therefore to  increase
the flow of work  and  timely  availability  of information  was inevitable.
Contribution:
As  a  Team Member, responsible for
Program  documentation  and  Coding  using  VB,  MS Access
Nil
Configuration and  maintaining of Routers, Switches, Hubs,Configuration of Routing,  protocols like
RIP,IGRP,EIGRP and  OSPF.
Establishing  WAN, Connecting, Configuring,  WAN devices,Implementing,Configure a nd Maintain
ISDN Lines, Leased ines.
Routing,Switching, Trunking, Pruning, IP addressing, Subnetting.
Monitoring  the  network  and  manage all the  systems, thus provide  proven support over the
servers and desktops.
I  have a comprehensive 1+ years  of work experience in System/Networking  Support.
Period  of Employment : December 2004   till date
Designation :Network Support Analyst
Organization :
Tranquil solutions pvt  Ltd.,  Bangalor
CAREER  TRACK
Tranquil solutions pvt  Ltd.,  Bangalore
Tranquil is a technology services and  outsourcing  company. Committed  to delivering
innovation, Tranquil collaborates with its clients to help them become high-performance
businesses and  governments. With deep  industry and  business process expertise, broad
global resources and  a proven track record, Tranquil can mobilize the  right people, skills and
technologies to help  clients improve  their performance.
As  Network  Analyst
Work  Profile:-
Configuration and  maintaining of Routers, Switches, Hubs, Configuration of Routing
protocols like  RIP,IGRP,EIGRP and  OSPF,Establishing  WAN, Connecting, Configuring WAN
devices,Implementing,Configure and  Maintain ISDN Lines, Leased Lines,Routing,
Switching, Trunking, Pruning, IP addressing, Subnetting.
Establishing  LAN , Connecting, and  configuring LAN devices, providing  1st level
support
to home  users and  corporate users for hardware, software  & netw orking.
Managing  Printing, Sharing, Securing and  Accessing Files and  Folders, Creating and
Configuring N etwork and  Dial-up  Connections,
Securing  and  Accessing  Files and  Folders,
Creating  and Configuring N etwork and Dial-up  Connections .Managing  Remote  Access.
Current Employer : Aventail  Info Tech Pvt. Ltd, Bangalore.
Duration : Since nov 2004 .
Designation : Software Engineer.
Aventail Info Tech:
Aventail  is a product based company and new features are added to the
EX-1500 SSL VPN product for  every release.
Good Conceptual  knowledge in network security, VPN and networking.
Exposure to debugger-Gdb.
Exposure to Security Products.
Praised and rewarded for doing  good  job  in EPC.
Title : End  Point  Control.
Role :
QA.
Company : Aventail  Info tech.
Product : SSL VPN.
Description :
EPC Security allows the organizations to differentiate access based on end point security .i.e. It detects,
protect and authorizes the right level of access for the user's environment.  EPC capabilities are provided
by the Aventail Policy Zones, Device Interrogation and Data  Protection. Aventail Policy Zones differentiates
access based on the end point security. Device Interrogation allows organizations to look for/detect
applications, anti-virus, personal firewall,   Windows Registry Key, Windows Domain and files. Data
Protection agents-ACC (ensures nothing data left behind data on the end device),  ASD (provides a secure
encrypted Virtual Environment for accessing data) are deployed based on the end-point security and
overall trust of the access point.
Application Interoperability:
Setup  the  windows 2003  domain  with  Domain  controllers,  Active  Directory,  Exchange  Server 2003.  Was  involved  in
testing  OWA application  with  different  backed  configurations like Basic,  NTLM.  Also  tested  the  SSO  feature  of the
product.
- Wrote Test  Plan  for this application  testing.
- Performed  Compatibility  testing  of  the  application  with  the  product
SSO feature
Performed I18N testing for  OWA application
- Automated  the  entire test plan
B.E.  In  Electronics and  Instrumentation
Have strong  programming  skill in  Mainframe
Having  elementary  knowledge of  Computer Hardware
Comprehensive knowledge of  various technologies used  in  present communication
systems.
An  effective communicator  with  excellent relationship  management skills coupled
with  demonstrated  inter-personal and  analytical skills.
IT SKILL SET
Worked from Jan 2005  to  July  2005  with Universal Construction Equipment
& sale s Corporation,  pune as Sales & Se rvice engineer.
Did summer training at HINDUSTAN AERONAUTICS  LTD.,  KANPUR from 16-May to 25-
June,2005 on the following project :
Improvement of communicaton system in Dornier-228 aircraft.
Extracurricular
Volunteer of SYMPOSIUM 2005 , and  Kashi Yatra in 2004, 20005.
Presented  model in Technex in 2004 at IT-BHU.
Presented  a project model on \u0022FM Communication System\u0022 in All India
Science Exhibition organized  by Kendriya Vidyalaya Sangathan
Contributed  towards setting  up of
Electronics-Lab  of  Electronics Society
(Model Development Centre).
Hobbies:  Solving  puzzles, listening  music
Tools/Others optical fiber communication  - - -
LANGUAGE c ,c++ proficient 2005  -
OS windows 98  2000  NT and  XP proficient 2005  -
TELECOM gprs cdma fdma - - -
IT Projects
As Project Leader for HUMAN BASE INC. on  WEB MOBILE from January  2005  - February  2005
Team Size: 3
Location: BANGALORE
Profile: BANKING THOROUGH WAP ENABLED MOBILE PHONES USING
OPERATING SYSTEM: LINUX,  PLATFORM: J2ME
Role: TEAM LEADER
Skill used : None
Objective (Target Job) Tech  support executive Authorisation  to  work  in  the following  countries: India
Desired  Job  Type Permanent
Having 2 years  of experience in Manual and Automated testing using Mercury Win  Runner for
testing Client/Server and Web based applications. Having knowledge in the performance
evaluation tool  Load Runner and Management tool  Test Director. I have done Functional,
Stress and Regression testing. Having good judgment and communication skills  required for
reporting and prioritizing software bugs  in conjunction with the Development team. I am a Quick
Learner with excellent analysis, problem solving skills, can adapt to new technologies  quickly  and
an excellent team player.
Organization : KAMTECH, Bangalore
Designation : Test Engineer
Duration : September 2003 to till date
Involved in preparation and execution of Test Cases.
Executed Functional, Regression Testing.
Verified Boundary  Value Analysis  (BVA).
Analyzed actual versus  the expected results  using TSL Scripts.
Verified all Links, Data Fields, and User Interface as  per specification.
Reported defects  through Ms  Excel.
3. Project Name : Telecom Value Added System
Client Mahanagar  Telephone Nigam Ltd.,
Organization KAMTEC, Bangalore
Team size 5
Duration Nov  2004 To May  2005
Role Team Member.
Environment Software: VB6
Testing Approach: Manual Testing
Databases: Oracle 8,
O/S: Windows  2000
Description:
This  project aimed to bring online single windowing concept for the operations  in the Mahanagar
Telephone Nigam Limited. The operations  include Online Compliant Registration, Shifting
Registration, and New Subscriber Registration. The entire operations  includes  Basic  Telephony, WLL
Garuda (Wireless  in Local Loop), Mobile  Dolphin Services
The major part of the project includes  the communication of the Servers  present in different parts  of
Mumbai and make the billing online so that the customer can pay  the bill at any  part of Mumbai. The
Integration of Servers  not only  solves  the problem of bill collection but also gives  the customers  more
sophistication for complaints, New Registration and all other activities  related with Billing.
Involved in Preparation and Execution of Test Cases.
Executed Functional Testing.
Boundary  value Analysis  (BVA) checked.
Verified Edit box, Date fields  and User Interface
Reported defects  through Ms  Excel.
Page
2
of
4 Muthuraja
2. Project Name: Purple Management Information System.
Client Purple InfoTech Ltd.,
Organization KAMTEC, Bangalore
Team size 5
Duration May  2004 To Oct 2004
Role Team Member.
Environment Software: Visual Basic
Testing Approach: Manual Testing
Databases: Oracle 8,
O/S: Windows  2000
Description:
This  project focused to collect and process  distributed management information from various
branches  of the PURPLE INFOTECH PVT. LTD. The management information includes, Sales,
Payments, Remittance, Quotations, Purchase Orders, Performa Invoice, Stock  Details  and Invoice
details. This  is  achieved by  setting up co-location server with Purple-MIS Software. This  project helps
to bring more Management information and forecasting. This  project has  the capability  of showing
and making print outs  of all possible Reports.
Involved in Preparation and Execution of Test Cases.
Executed Functional Testing.
Verified Edit box, Date fields  and User Interface.
Reported defects  through Ms  Excel.
1. Project Name : Ex-Campus.
Client Midas Group of College
Organization KAMTEC, Bangalore
Team size 5
Duration Oct 2004 To Apr 2005
Role Team Member.
Environment Software: Visual Basic
Testing Approach: Manual Testing
Databases: Oracle 8,
O/S: Windows  2000
Description:
The mission of the product is  to make the whole campus  into a single network. From this  package
students  can interact with staffs  and with management and vice-versa from intranet technology.
The main feature of this  project is  \u0022Discussion Forum\u0022 and \u0022File Manager\u0022.
Page
3
of
4 Muthuraja
Involved in execution of Test Cases.
Executed Functional Testing.
Boundary  value Analysis  (BVA) checked
Reporting bugs  and managing bug status  using Ms  Excel
Analysis and understanding of the project requirements
Data flow Dialog.
Coding and Testing
System Analysis and implementation
Documentation
With  3+ years of  experience in  IT industry,  I  have involved  myself in  all phases of
Software Development Life Cycle and  took  utmost initiatives in  learning  methods to
enhance software development process and  project management.
Worked  Extensively  in  Informatica and  Oracle 8x/9i.
Versatile team player as well as an  independent contributor.  Possesses excellent
communication  skills,  industrious and  result oriented
Responsible for writing  Stored  Procedures and  creating  triggers.
Responsible for coding and  unit testing.
Participated  in Team Reviews.
Title#1 Transaction Manager
Client State Bank of India
Role
Development and  Testing
Team Size 4
Duration July 2002 to Nov 2002
Software Environment PRO*C, Oracle8.1.6
Description
The project  involved  integrating  all  the branches of State Bank  of India for online banking.  The
Transaction  Manager receives day-to-day  transactions like applying  for a new account,  transferring
money  from  one account  to  another,  balance enquiry,  chequebook  request etc.,  through
www.onlinesbi.com and  it will process.  My  role is involved  to  develop  the request-processing  module.
Responsible  for writing  stored  procedures.
Participated  in Team Reviews.
Responsible  in Unit testing.
M.C.A from Maharishi Dayanand University.
Certification in Software Testing from WebTekLabs Pvt.Ltd. (IBM  Partners, Delhi)
Manual Testing of software applications  using  black  box  testing,  exploratory  testing,
Regression  testing  techniques.
Exposure on:
Rational Suits: Rational Robot,  Rational Test Manager,  Rational Administrator.
Mercury  Tools : Test Director,  Win  Runner,  Load  Runner
Knowledge of SDLC,  STLC and  RUP (Rational Unified  Process).
Testing  Process (Effort Estimation,  Test Plan,  Designing  Test Cases,  Test Execution,
Bug  Reports)
Knowledge of Website Testing (Black  Box  Testing,  Lookablity  and  Usability
Testing)
Making  Reusable scripts through  automated  testing  tool.
Installation  and  UnInstallation  Testing.
Identification  of Bugs through  Black-box  Testing and  Bugs reporting  in  bug  tracking
system.
As  a Test Engineer Trainee my
Responsibilities  are:
Testing  GUI and  Web  based  applications  manually  and  using  automated  testing  tools.
Designing  and  execution  of Test cases.
Functional,  usability  and  Integration  Testing.
Identification  of Bugs through  Black-box  Testing  and  Bugs reporting  in  bug  tracking  system.
Conducting  Regression  testing.
Preparation  of initial test plan
Generating  Test Cases for
Functional Testing
Look  & Feel Testing
Executing  Test Cases
Prepared  the Test scripts for different modules  and  run  the scripts.
Preparing  Bug  Report
Professional Experience
WAN Technologies,  Rohtak
Wan  Technologies is  a software services company  providing  integrated  performance management solutions  to
various institutions  and  companies.
Duration:
Nov  2004  to  Sept.2005
Designation
: Software test Engineer
Project: Book Mangement  System
Team  Size:
Four
This project acts a tool for effectively  managing  all the information  related  to  the issue of books  in
the university.  This  software helps the university  to  generate an  up-to-date report of the books issued,
fines,catalogs etc.  Using  this  software the university  can  maintain  accurate records of the books.
Responsibilities :
Designing  Test Cases
Performing  Exploratory  testing,  functional testing,  Usability  Testing  ,
Project: Human Resource Mangement System
Team  Size:
Six
This project manages  all the information  related  to  the human  resource in  an  organization.  This
software helps the human  resource department to  maintain  information  like consultants ,  location  information,
Qualification  information  of candidates and  other informations like Department,  Designation,  Skill and  Status.
Responsibilities :
Designing  Test Cases
Performing  Exploratory  testing,  functional testing,  Usability  Testing  ,
Working  as a Software Engineer at Marshal Microware Pvt.  Ltd.,  Pune from August 2005  to  till
the date.
Worked  as a Software Trainee Engineer at Marshal Microware Pvt.  Ltd.,  Pune from January  2005
to  August 2005.
Project  Profile :-
Project #1:
Title : Employee Record  Application
Language : VC++ 6.0
OS : Symbian  OS,  Windows 2000  Professional
Platform : Nokia Series  60  V1.9
Duration : 3  Months
Team Size : 2
Description : This project is aimed  to  create and  maintain  the employee record
with  current salary,  position  and  other details.
Place : Marshal Microware Pvt.  Ltd.
Project #2:
Title : Finger Print Identification  to  Mark  Attendance
Platform and Languages : Windows 2000  Professional,  VC++
Team Size : 4
Duration : 6  months
Description :
The project \u0022Finger Print Identification  to  Mark  Attendance\u0022 is
based  on  the concept of identifying  an  employee and  marking  his attendance.  It requires the employees  to
scan  their thumb  impression,  which  is  than  match  which  the one store in  the data base.  It stores the
information  of all employees,  their daily  attendance,  record  of leaves taken  and  shows  their payment slip
of the previous months.
Place : Marshal Microware Pvt.  Ltd.
Project #3:
Title : Developing  and  Implementing  Viruses & Antivirus
Platform and Languages : Windows 98,  C++,  C
Duration : 3  months
Team Size : 4
Description : This project aim is to  change the signature of exe file.  For
altering  the exe file we had  to  get the signature of exe file,  so  that it may  get infected.  To  bring  it in  default
signature file,  first search  all the corrupted  file and  again  change the signature of infected  file.
Place : Marshal Microware Pvt.  Ltd.
Project #4:
Title
Inventory  Control and  Management System
.  OS : Windows 2000  Professional
Team Size : 4
Duration : 6  Months
Front End : Visual Basic 6.0
Back End : Oracle 8
Description : The project was  developed  with  the aim to  cater to  the
needs of software company  regarding  the rent and  sale of machine parts.
Place : Amaresh  Infra Devlopers Pvt.  Ltd.
Currently working as a engineer in PRESICION ELECTRONICS LTD. NOIDA since August
2004.
Testing & Troubleshooting of PCM 30 Multiplexers
Demonstration of all  issues pertaining to Radio, Antenna, Power  Supply, Multiplexing
Equipment and structured cabling in  the Field
Isolation of the fault in  telecom Networks.
Work in  RF Propagation and Microwave Theory and User  Interfaces .
The Installation  & Commissioning of the system in  the field.
PROJECT:  PST-34M  RADIO RELAY System Under  Development for  Indian Army
This project is being developed for  Indian army for  better  communication in  Modern  battle
Field. Data rate is in this Radio is 34 Mbps. It can be remotely configured though Ethernet
Port . It also uses optical  communication  because Indoor  unit is kept 2 km away from the
Outdoor  unit and Antenna.
No. of Team Members 5

Working  as a freelancer (having  project from N.I.I,  New Delhi)
Current Employer : Aventail  Info Tech Pvt. Ltd, Bangalore.
Duration : Since nov 2004 .
Designation : Software Engineer.
Aventail Info Tech:
Aventail  is a product based company and new features are added to the
EX-1500 SSL VPN product for  every release.
Good Conceptual  knowledge in network security, VPN and networking.
Exposure to debugger-Gdb.
Exposure to Security Products.
Praised and rewarded for doing  good  job  in EPC.
Title : End  Point  Control.
Role :
QA.
Company : Aventail  Info tech.
Product : SSL VPN.
Description :
EPC Security allows the organizations to differentiate access based on end point security .i.e. It detects,
protect and authorizes the right level of access for the user's environment.  EPC capabilities are provided
by the Aventail Policy Zones, Device Interrogation and Data  Protection. Aventail Policy Zones differentiates
access based on the end point security. Device Interrogation allows organizations to look for/detect
applications, anti-virus, personal firewall,   Windows Registry Key, Windows Domain and files. Data
Protection agents-ACC (ensures nothing data left behind data on the end device),  ASD (provides a secure
encrypted Virtual Environment for accessing data) are deployed based on the end-point security and
overall trust of the access point.
Application Interoperability:
Setup  the  windows 2003  domain  with  Domain  controllers,  Active  Directory,  Exchange  Server 2003.  Was  involved  in
testing  OWA application  with  different  backed  configurations like Basic,  NTLM.  Also  tested  the  SSO  feature  of the
product.
- Wrote Test  Plan  for this application  testing.
- Performed  Compatibility  testing  of  the  application  with  the  product
SSO feature
Performed I18N testing for  OWA application
- Automated  the  entire test plan
Flight Reservation System
Confidential
Java,  JSP,  EJB's,  XML,  Oracle 8,  Websphere 5.1, Crystal
Reporting.
Manual Testing & WinRunner
6
Junior Test Engineer.
It is an organization having  many branches in all over India.
This organization mainly deals with Air Ticketing  for both in
domestic  and interactive  flights, it keeps in track of all the
operations dealt with to-and-from journey, and  modification
required  when a new flight id  added, cancelled. Organization is
fully equipped  with modern facilities of ticketing; it maintains
the  records in a form of reports.
This project has following  modules:
Reservations/Cancellations:
This module  deals with information about reservation and
cancellation of the  tickets.
Flights:
This module  deals with information of the  flights.
Passengers:
This module  deals with details of the passengers.
Addition/Deletion of  the Flights:
It shows complete  details about the  flights have added  or
deleted.
Reports:
This module  generates the  reports.
As a Junior Tester Involved  in
Generating  and executing  test cases as per test plans.
Execution of test cases manually.
Involved in functional testing, integration testing,
regression testing  and  system  testing.
Designed  the  GUI  Checklist for the  application.
Prepared  Documentation of the application.
Created  the  required  database  tables with relevant fields and  there characteristics as
per the  design specifications.
Created  Stored  Procedures and  Other database  entities as required.
Project#2:
Title : Manufacturing  Process Of Soap And  Case Study Of Fat Splitting.
Description : This process is used  to get crude fatty acid  and glycerin for
commercial usage  and  fatty acid  is further used  in the
preparation of soap.
Organization :  Jocil Ltd.
Project#3
Title : Diagnostic Center Management System.
Description : DCMS  provides newer facilities, and  bring  different jobs onto one  platform.
The  purpose of the present system  is to computerize  all the units of Diagnostic  Center,
providing  the  user with a user-friendly menu driven interface. Stores each patient's report in
a separate  database  tables.
Environment  :  JSP, Oracle and  Windows 98
Role :
Understanding  and  Usage of high-level requirements.
Involved  in  circuit designing  and  testing.
2)  Digital Thermometer
Organizer : B.U.I.E,  West Bengal University  Of Technology.
Team members : 3
Software : Circuit Maker.
Description :
The main  objective of  the project is to  design  a system which  display  the
temperature reading  by  Seven  Segment display.
If it is placed  in  any  environment then  the Thermometer  can  change its reading  time by
time,  ascending  to  change of temperature.
The system consists power  section,  temperatures transducing  & tunner  section,  Analog  to
Digital converter section,  Binary  to  BCD conversion  section  & Display  section.
Involved  in  circuit,  testing  and  implementation.
Training  Details:
Mobile,  WLL & Tr ansmission
Mobile,  WLL & Transmission  at Bharat sanchar Nigam Limited,  Bankura,  West
Bengal.
Main  object of  the project is to  get an  overview of the GSM system and
philosophy  behind  its design.  Wire less local loop  (WLL) is a generic term for an
access system that uses a wire less link  to  connect subscribers to  their local
exchange in  place of conventional copper cable.
This involves CDMA,  TDMA,  FDMA technologies.
mondal.arindam@rediffmail.com
M.C.A from Nagarjuna University  in  2005 with 78.0%
B.Sc.,[cs]  from Nagarjuna University  in  2001  with  75.2%
Intermediate from Board  of Intermediate
Education,  AP in  1998  with  78.0%
S.S.C from Board  Of Secondary
Education,  AP in  1996  with  77.5%
Masters Diploma in Computer Applications (MDCA)  from Indian Centre
For International Business.
CWC from NIIT.
:  Marketing research project on\u0022 To identify and understand the
concept of prolonged diseases. \u0022The project involved designing
questionnaire,  meeting the doctors and getting relevant information from
them,  analyzing data on SPSS (a market research software) and submitting
the final r eport to the Market Research Department of the company.
Company
: Prudential ICICI AMC,  Jaipur (winter project)
Duration:  1st October  31st nov.2005
:  \u0022Investment Behaviour & analytical study of Mutual Funds
and marketing of Service Industries Fund\u0022 The job responsibilities
included generating leads (finding prospects) for
NFO (New  Fund Offer) of Prudential  ICICI AMC i.e. \u0022Services Industries
Fund\u0022,  telling customers benefits of investing in the NFO and finally
generates sales.
ARYAN INFOTECH (SOFTWARE),  Sakinaka-Andheri,  Mumbai.
At present  working as (from  1st june-2004)
WEB  DESIGNER
Creating  web  layouts & Coding  it to  html.
Receiving  Info.through  the mails.  & modifying  site according  to  their  requirement.
Creating  site & updating  it independently.
http://panelized-housing-manufacturer.com/
http://marinas-for-sale.net/
http://satellite-tv-dish-network.net/
http://working-capital.net/
http://www.freedombulldogs.com/
http://www.prospectivesystems.com/
http://www.rapidlistings.com/
http://www.universityoasis.com/
http://www.crossnetinc.com/
http://www.AdamLelandHomes.com
http://www.sanmiguelallende.com
http://www.pioneerrussia.com/
http://www.templatecracker.com/index.php (some web  layouts created  by  me are online for
sale ---- ---see the left side of  the page,  below members login  ,  in  web  template search  ,  as
designer select \u0022 iss_Gita \u0022 & click  on  \u0022search\u0022 button
working  on  many  other  projects.
HORANADA SANGATHI(YRLY DIRECTORY),  Andheri-Sakinaka,  Mumbai.
Worked for 2Yrs as
WEBSITE DESIGNER
Solving  customer problems.
Receiving  Info.through  the mails.  & modifying  site according  to  their  requirement.
Creating  site & updating  it independently.
http://www.hellokannadiga.com/
SK COMPUTER SERVICES,  Dahisar [E],  Mumbai.
Worked for six  mths as
WEBSITE DESIGNER
Solving  customer problems.
Collecting  Info.  from customers regarding  site.
Creating  sites independently.
Handling  networks (NT).
SYSCON TECHNOLOGIES,  Kandivali [E],  Mumbai.
Worked for one year as
Office Administrative
Verification  of  cash  on  daily  basis & Handling  petty  cash.
Calculation  of  interest and  interest rates.
Checking  sales and  purchase bills.
SOFT PLUS COMPUTER INSTITUTE,  Prabhadevi ,  Mumbai.
Worked as computer instructor for 1  year & 2  mths.
Responsibility  of the whole institute
Promotion  and  awareness of  the institute
SALARY
F  0
3  E
Present : 10,000/- Expected  : 15,000/-
Organization Duration
RDSO LUCKNOW: - Card Report Generation (Minor
Project ) Using Visual Basic  .Back  end:- Access
6weeks
1.2  years of  experience in  Software Analysis,  Design,  Development,  Testing  & Implementation  of various
applications .
Expertise (ASP.Net using  VB.Net ,C#  ,  Xml,  Web  Services),  ASP,  SQL Server,  ,MySql
Good  management,  analytical,  interpersonal skills.
S No From To Organization Designation Role
1 August 2005 Till date Digital Hub
India Pvt.  Ltd.
Programmer Developer
2 January  2005 July  2005 Maven
Solutions Pvt.
Ltd.
Software
Developer
Developer
Analysis of  requirement specification  and  Database design  using  MySql.
Coding  of  all Module. Code was developed  in  ASP.Net technologies
Testing  and  implementation.
Bug  fixing  and  maintenance.
Project  2 World Wide Family
Client  Name Maven  Solutions ,Chandigarh
Environment ASP.Net,  MySql,  Windows XP
Team  Size 3
Role Developer.
Duration 3  Months.
Coding  of  all Module. Code was developed  in  ASP.Net technologies
Analysis of  requirement specification  and  Database design  using  MySql.
Developed  Reports.  Code was developed  in  Microsoft technologies with  ASP.Net and  Crystal
Reports.
Testing  and  implementation.
Bug  fixing  and  maintenance
Project  3 l9tel
Client  Name Digital Hub  Iindia ,  Delhi
Environment ASP,  MySql ,Windows XP
Team  Size 3
Role Developer
Duration 3  Months.
Analysis of  requirement specification  and  Database design  using  SqlServer2000
Coding  of  all Module. Code was developed  in  ASP technologies
Testing  and  implementation.
Bug  fixing  and  maintenance
Fixed  bugs and  provided  live support.
Project  4
l9exchange
Client  Name Digital Hub  Iindia ,  Delhi
Environment ASP,ASP.NET,MySql,  Windows XP
Team  Size 3
Role Developer
Duration 2  months and  Continue
Coding  of  all Module. Code was developed  in  ASP.Net technologies
Analysis of  requirement specification  and  Database design  using  SQL Server
Testing  and  implementation.
Fixed  bugs and  provided  live support.
Project  5 Humen Resource Development
Client  Name Acadmic Project For  B.G.I.M.T,  Sangrur(Pb.)
Environment ASP.Net,  SqlServer2000,  Windows XP
Team  Size 5
Role Developer
Duration 5  months
Developed  Application.  Code was developed  in  ASP.Net technologies with  the database in  SqlServer
Testing  and  implementation.
Bug  fixing  and  maintenance
Documentation
1.2  years of  experience in  Software Analysis,  Design,  Development,  Testing  & Implementation  of various
applications .
Expertise (ASP.Net using  VB.Net ,C#  ,  Xml,  Web  Services),  ASP,  SQL Server,  ,MySql
Good  management,  analytical,  interpersonal skills.
S No From To Organization Designation Role
1 August 2005 Till date Digital Hub
India Pvt.  Ltd.
Programmer Developer
2 January  2005 July  2005 Maven
Solutions Pvt.
Ltd.
Software
Developer
Developer
Analysis of  requirement specification  and  Database design  using  MySql.
Coding  of  all Module. Code was developed  in  ASP.Net technologies
Testing  and  implementation.
Bug  fixing  and  maintenance.
Project  2 World Wide Family
Client  Name Maven  Solutions ,Chandigarh
Environment ASP.Net,  MySql,  Windows XP
Team  Size 3
Role Developer.
Duration 3  Months.
Coding  of  all Module. Code was developed  in  ASP.Net technologies
Analysis of  requirement specification  and  Database design  using  MySql.
Developed  Reports.  Code was developed  in  Microsoft technologies with  ASP.Net and  Crystal
Reports.
Testing  and  implementation.
Bug  fixing  and  maintenance
Project  3 l9tel
Client  Name Digital Hub  Iindia ,  Delhi
Environment ASP,  MySql ,Windows XP
Team  Size 3
Role Developer
Duration 3  Months.
Analysis of  requirement specification  and  Database design  using  SqlServer2000
Coding  of  all Module. Code was developed  in  ASP technologies
Testing  and  implementation.
Bug  fixing  and  maintenance
Fixed  bugs and  provided  live support.
Project  4
l9exchange
Client  Name Digital Hub  Iindia ,  Delhi
Environment ASP,ASP.NET,MySql,  Windows XP
Team  Size 3
Role Developer
Duration 2  months and  Continue
Coding  of  all Module. Code was developed  in  ASP.Net technologies
Analysis of  requirement specification  and  Database design  using  SQL Server
Testing  and  implementation.
Fixed  bugs and  provided  live support.
Project  5 Humen Resource Development
Client  Name Acadmic Project For  B.G.I.M.T,  Sangrur(Pb.)
Environment ASP.Net,  SqlServer2000,  Windows XP
Team  Size 5
Role Developer
Duration 5  months
Developed  Application.  Code was developed  in  ASP.Net technologies with  the database in  SqlServer
Testing  and  implementation.
Bug  fixing  and  maintenance
Documentation
1.
Working as  a Software Engineer with  Gnix Info Soft, Noida, as  a  Team
Member in  the Software Development  team in  the Web Development
domain since Dec, 2004 to till date.
2.
Also worked as  a  Web Designer in InterMesh IndiaMart since Aug,
2004 to Nov  2004.
Worked as  team member in  Development  phases.
Developed the server side programming using JSP and Servlets
Total work experience : 8 months
Currently working  as Software Developer in Converging Concepts  and
Solutions  (Bangalore) on dot net framework from 7th June 2005 to till
date.
Worked as  a Software Tester in Manchyspo Technologies  from Mar, 2005 to Oct, 2005.
Technical  Exposure:
Testing Tools : Win Runner, Load Runner, Test Director.
Operating System : Windows  9x/NT/2000 Server/Professional.
Languages  : C
Internet Tools : HTML.
Databases  : MS-Access.
Overall Summary:
Good exposure to SDLC, Manual Testing and in Automation Testing tools.
Ability  to Designing and Executing the Test Cases based on business  requirements
and Technical Requirements.
Knowledge of Software Configuration Management.
Experience in different types  of tests  like Black Box, Integration, System,
Regression and  Functionality testing.
Ability  to communicate effectively  with development team members  regarding
product issues  and concerns.
Involved in testing the application against different browsers  Netscape Navigator,
Internet Explorer
Tested broken links.
Tested different modules  and their functionalities
Analyzed system requirement specification and Developed test cases  to cover the
module.
Performed manual testing of each module and responsible for writing and executing the
test cases  for integration  testing.
Performed Regression Testing, Functional Testing using WinRunner
CAREER  DESTINY
Bangalore Aug  05  -  Till date
Designation:  Account Manager
Roles and Responsibilities:
Managing  core accounts (clients)  which  are responsible for  team revenues.
Maintain a sound  rapport with the  clients, by helping them hire  best talented
Candidates.
Recruiting the best talent from various sources for the  clients Requirements.
Sourcing  Profiles through various modes like  References, Existing  database,
Job  Portals, Hunting, etc.
Scheduling  interviews with candidates and follow-up  with clients.
Conducting  and Coordinating the Interview Events of the  Clients.
Screening  the  candidates through interviews.
Mapping  client requirements with candidate  profiles through a structured
screening
Srikanta
HM C
process, Prepare resumes for presentation to clients, Coach Candidates
through the client interview process.
Conduct all stages of the  recruiting  process including phone  screens, personal
interviews, etc.
Complete end  to  end  solution  for recruitment process with  allotted  clients.
CROSSFIELDS MARKETING PVT.  LTD.
Bangalore
July  04    July  05
Designation:  Marketing  Executive
Roles and Responsibilities:
Active member  in  the team of  around  5  sales professionals and  cover  entire
Bangalore Region  for sales of  Water  purifiers cum dispensery
Responsible for  Key  Accounts Management and  handle customer  issues &
grievances.
Drive business development with  Government Agencies,  Corporate and  other
Institutions.
Handle distribution  network  & achieve sales target; In-charge of  appointment /
removal / addition  of  distributors to  enhance effective coverage
Responsible for  Generating  Leads through  Cold  calls everyday.
Being  a part of Lion  share in  branch  revenue.
Drive market penetration  in  domestic segment by  focused  direct marketing,  plan
and  implement promotional campaigns suiting  the customer  segments in  the local
market
Monitor  competition  and  report strategies & recommendations to  the
Management.
PROJECTS /ASSIGNMENTS ACCOMPLISHED:
M.B.A
1.
A Project Report on  Opinions of  Areca  Traders Problems in  Shimoga City.
2.  A Study  on  Training  & Development at Visvesvaraya  Iron & Steel Plant,
Bhadravathi.
Srikanta
HM C
B.B.M
A Study  on  Consumer  Attitude Towards Different Brands of  Refrigerators With
Special Reference to  Videocon Refrigerators in  Shimoga.
MCA: - Appearing  in final year in the  session 2005-06 from G.G.D. University,
Bilaspur.
1st Year MCA   63%
2nd Year MCA - 66%
BCA: - Passed in the  year 2000-03 from G.G.D. University, Bilaspur.
1st Year BCA    67%
2nd Year BCA  - 62%
3rd Year BCA    68%
Persuade  .NET training from  Times Technology, Bangalore.
Worked with the Architecture of the Processor  and different DSP
processes.
Worked with both Hardware and software for different algorithms.
Used LPC coding method to code the transmission of signals
Involved in writing specs  for  design and code.
Languages:  C, Assembly  Language, HTML etc.
Tools:  Mat lab, Texas  Instruments  Code Composer Studio.
DSP:  TMS320C5x, TMS320C54x.
Have got  around 6  months of experience in
developing projects  using .net language based on SDLC
Concepts.
Transcend Technology Orbit (till Date) as  a Programmer.
2
Language Known  : Visual Basic,  C,  C++(Basics)
Operating  System : windows 98/NT/2000/XP
DBMS : SQL Server,  MS-Access
January  2004    till date
Working  as a Project Engineer at SlasHome Technologies,  Technopark  Campus,  Trivandrum
1.  Project    Parser Development
Position  : Project Engineer
Team Size : 2
Abstract:  Developing  a parser that will convert Fortran  programs to  C++ codes.
Involved  in  the testing  and  re-design  of the parser to  check  if all the constructs are handled  in
the parser.
The parser  is compiled  in  Lex  utility  to  generate the F2P and  P2C++ executables.
The parser  converts the F90  programs to  pseudocodes using  the F2P executable.
Pseudocodes are then  converted  to  C++ programs using  the P2C++ executable.
2.  Project    xRender
Position  : Project Engineer
Team Size : 4
Abstract:  Deploying  of  content delivery  system for mobile devices based  on  Intel
platform.  Target applications include gaming  and  mobile computing  devices.
Deploying  of XScale based  GTK port against a uClibc library.
Developing  of  content delivery  agent for macromedia shockwave format.
Ported  Simple Direct Layer to  ARM based  prototype hardware.
Deploying  of Mesa for openGL compatibility.
3.  Project    uLinx
Position  : Project Engineer
Team size  : 3
Abstract:  Was involved  in  the design,  development and  integration  phases.
Tasks included  porting  GTK libs against uClibc.
Implemented  an  uClibcbusybox  based  optimized  root file system for  SA1100
based  handheld.
Got the entire file system with  graphics working  in  under  3MB  space with
compatibility  with  the older  applications based  on  GTK+1.2.
Deployed  frame buffer based  X Server for the Strong  ARM processor with  touch  screen
capabilities.
Deployed  an  embedded  mobile browser.
4.  Project  - RF Transmission and Reception of  Pressure Sensor Data
Position  : Project Engineer  Trainee
Team size : 2
Abstract:  Was involved  in  the development of  Embedded  Wireless application  for  a
Pressure Sensor.
The Pressure sensor  senses the atmospheric pressure and  gives its voltage equivalent in
millivolts,  which  is then  amplified  to  volts using  a voltage amplifier  and  is given  as input
to  RF transmission  operating  at 433  MHZ.  The amplified  voltage is then  converted  to
digital value and  is transmitted  by  interfacing  the AT86RF211  RF transceiver  with  the
ATmega8  AVR microcontroller.  This value is received  at a certain  distance displayed  at a
computer  and  stored  in  EEPROM of  receiver  microcontroller  for  future manipulations.
Organization: Nation Thermal Power Corporation, Rihand Nagar (U.P.)
Duration: Jun'04- Jul'04
Review: Developed the software \u0022Pay Roll Management System\u0022 in visual basic  (6.0).
Organization: Nation Thermal Power Corporation, Rihand Nagar (U.P.)
Duration: Jun'03   Jul'03
Review:  Gained knowledge of INGRES database.
Worked  as a Software Tester  in  Manchyspo  Technologies,  Chennai from May
2005  to  Oct 2005.
Worked  as a Science Teacher  in  IQRA public School,  Azamgarh  (UP) from July
2002  to  April 2005.
Technical  Exposure:
Testing Tools : Win Runner, Load Runner, Test Director.
Operating System : Windows  9x/NT/2000 Server/Professional.
Languages  : C, PL/SQL
Internet Tools : MS Word, MS Excel, HTML.
Databases  : MS-Access.
Technical  Summary:
Good exposure to SDLC, Manual Testing and in Automation Testing tools.
Ability  to Designing and Executing the Test Cases based on business  requirements
and Technical Requirements.
Knowledge of Software Configuration Management.
Experience in different types  of tests  like Black Box, Integration, System,
Regression and  Functionality testing.
Ability  to communicate effectively  with development team members  regarding
product issues  and concerns.
Involved in testing the application against different browsers  Netscape Navigator,
Internet Explorer
Tested broken links.
Tested different modules  and their functionalities
Facilitated the learning of Biology in High School (10th)
students.
Fluent in  Written  and spoken  in English. Easily handle to 30-40
students  in single class.
Utilized a variety  of pupil learning techniques, including
discovery  laboratories, error analysis, demonstrations,
debates, simulations, and molecular model building.
Introduced students  to the Internet  to research  class  topics
and interact  with  other students.
Devised an incentive method to optimize group learning.
Improved a  laboratory  procedure and recommended that  it
replace the standard procedure.
Actively  participated in  team meetings  on  test  design  and
alternative assessment.
Identified, counseled, and sought  assistance for a  student with
a  possible learning disability.
Analyzed system requirement specification and Developed test cases  to cover the
module.
Performed manual testing of each module and responsible for writing and executing the
test cases  for integration  testing.
Performed Regression Testing, Functional Testing using WinRunner
(1) Joined  \u0022Gujarat Nylons Ltd.\u0022 (Subsidiary  of  Gujarat State Fertilizer Corp.) at Kosamba,
Gujarat in  1989  as \u0022Graduate Trainee\u0022.  Approximately  one year experience in  erection  &
commissioning  activities of  various mechanical equipments.
(2) Joined  \u0022OIL & Natural Gas Corporation  Ltd.  (ONGC)\u0022 as an  \u0022Assistant Executive
Engineer,  (Mech.)\u0022 and  was posted  at the offshore \u0022Sour gas processing  platform\u0022.
Approximately  six  years experience in  the routine,  breakdown  and  preventive
maintenance of  rotary,  reciprocating  and  static equipments,  planning  of  inventories and
other day  to  day  plant maintenance.
(3) Transferred  to  western  onshore region,  joined  \u0022Central Workshop\u0022 in  May'1996.
Approximately  three months experience in  overhauling  of  oil production  equipments and
drilling  rigs.
(4) Transferred  to  \u0022Major Projects department  of  Engineering  & Cons truction Division\u0022
and  was involved  in  project management and  monitoring  of Insitu-Combustion  Project at
Balol (M)  from August'1996  to  March'98.  Approximately  two  years experience in
project planning,  management and  monitoring.
(5) Transferred  to  \u0022Onshore Design Group\u0022 in  March  98  and  working  as mechanical design
engineer  till date.  Approximately  seven  years experience in  design,  engineering,  project
costing,  technical bid  package preparation,  detail engineering,  etc.
Details of  Experience:
(1) Presently posted  at \u0022Onshore Design  Group\u0022 of  ONGC  at Baroda and  working  as
\u0022Mechanical Design  Engineer\u0022 till date.  The Onshore Design  Group  provides in  house
engineering  for  the design  and  construction  of various onshore facilities & pipelines.  It
has been  a constant endeavour  of  this group  to  plan  and  engineer  onshore facilities in  line
with  stipulation  of DGMS,  OISD,  various Indian  & International standards as well as
good  engineering  practices,  in  order to  exploit the onshore potential of  hydrocarbon  at
Page 2  of  5
optimum cost but with  utmost stress on  safety  and  quality.  The Onshore Design  Group
attempts to  realize these efforts by  constantly  reviewing  and  revising  the design
philosophy  adopted  in  the design  and  development of  various onshore facilities.
Job  responsibilities are as follows:
(a)  Preparation of  Technical Job Specifications / Engineering  Drawings / Plot
Plan / Equipment Layouts / P&ID's / Engineering  Datasheets / other
documents in line with API,  ASME,  ANSI,  ASTM,  BIS,  BS,  related to
respective mechanical equipment (rotating  & stat ic)  for various new as well as
ongoing  projects.
(b)  Prepared technical document  for construction of fixed roof  crude oil storage
tanks.
(c) Site visits for Work  Assessment,  Data collection  and  Coordination.
(d)  Working  with  other  reputed  consultants as and  when  required.
(e) Providing  assistance to  Asset / Operation  group  during  execution  of  the project.
(f) Review of  mechanical related  documents of various projects under  execution
during  detailed  engineering.
(g)  Coordination  of  various other activities related  to  the projects.
(h)  Actively  involved  in  the preparation  of Design  Manual,  Standard  Format,  etc.  for
Technical Bid  Package.
(i) Engineering  Coordinator  for  several projects for preparation  of  Technical Bid
Packages,  which  involves preparation  of  the following  documents and  review/
monitoring  during  detailed  engineering:
(i) Process Package,  Scope of  work,  Line Schedule,  Inst.  Schedule,  P&ID's, et c.
(ii)  Mechanical,  Piping  and  Fire Protection  System
(v)  Civil
(vi)  Electrical
(vii)  Instrumentation
(viii)  Coordination  with  the Indenter,  etc.
(ix)  Project Cost Estimation  of  all the upcoming  projects
(x)  Attending  Pre-Bid  Conferences and  replying  to  bidder's queries.
(xi)  Carrying  out Technical Bid  Evaluations of bids.
(2) Posted  at Major Projects Section  of  Engineering  & Construction  Division  and  was
involved  in  the following  activities of  Insitu-Combustion  Project at Balol (M).
(a) Project Management
(b)  Project Monitoring
(c) Documentation  and  Billing
(d)  Project Review Meetings
(e) 72  Hours Performance Test Run  of  Major  Equipments
(f) Site Visits during  Execution
(g)  Pre-Commissioning  & Commissioning
Page 3  of  5
(3) Posted  at Central Workshop,  Baroda and  was involved  in  the following  activities.
(a)  Complete overhauling  of  production equipments such as pumps,  engines,  etc.
(b)  Complete overhauling  of mobile drilling  rigs consisting  of  Allison transmission,
hoses,  hydraulic system,  diesel engines,  mast,  etc.
(c) Inventory  and stores.
(4) Posted  at the offshore Sour Gas Processing  platform of  ONGC  located  90  km of  offshore
Bombay  on  14  days ON/OFF shift duty  pattern  after  joining  \u0022OIL & Natural Gas
Corporation  Ltd.  (ONGC)\u0022 in  1990  as an  \u0022Assistant Executive Engineer,  (Mech.)\u0022.
During  the tenure at offshore platform,  worked  exhaustively  with  the systems including
vibration  monitoring,  conditioning  monitoring,  failure analysis,  preventive / routine /
breakdown  maintenance and  major  overhauling  of  centrifugal & reciprocating  pumps,
centrifugal & reciprocating  compressors,  gas turbines,  diesel engines,  etc.
(i)  Major facilities at  this process gas complex:
()a Gas Cooling  System
()b  Gas Dehydration  System
()c Oil & Condensate Stabilization
()d  Oil,  Condensate & Gas Metering
()e Associated  Gas Compression
()f Low Pressure Gas Compression
()g  Power  Generation
()h  H2S & Gas Detection  System
()i Fire Detection  & Suppression  System
()j Personal Survival & Safety  System.
(ii)  Job on the platform was as follows:
(a) Associating  the maintenance department,  ensuring  24  hrs.  availability  of
mechanical equipments.
(b)  Supervising  & carrying  out preventive maintenance of  all mechanical
equipments.
(c)  Supervising  & managing  day-to-day  work.
(d)  Carrying  out schedule maintenance of  machines.
(e) Doing  major  overhauling  or  breakdown  maintenance of  equipment,  if  required
either  independently  or  along  with  the vendor's representative.
(f) Making  spares part requirement of the equipments.
(g)  Making  daily,  weekly  & monthly  schedule charts for  all machines.
(iii)  Following  were the machines dealt  with:
(a) Dual Fuel Gas Turbines for  Power  Generation.
(b)  Reciprocating  Air Compressors for  Process & Instrument Air.
(c) Centrifugal pumps for pumping  coolant water.
Page 4  of  5
(d)  Reciprocating  pumps for  pumping  condensate and  glycol.
(e) Associated  gas centrifugal compressors for  compressing  sweet gas.
(f) Centrifugal vertical turbine pumps for  lifting  seawater  & also  fire fighting
purpose.
(g)  Emergency  Generator  & Diesel Engines.
(h)  Telescopic boom cranes & pedestal cranes.
(i) Refrigeration  & Air  Conditioning  Plant.
(5) Joined  \u0022Gujarat Nylons Ltd.\u0022,  a subsidiary  of \u0022Gujarat State Fertilizer Co,\u0022 in  1989  as
\u0022Graduate Engineer  Trainee\u0022 and  worked  there for  one year,  the company  was in  erection
& commissioning  stage.  It was to  produce Nylon  Textile yarn  from a byproduct of
\u0022GSFC\u0022 i.e caprolactum.  I  worked  there in  the utility  department and  looked  after  the
installation  of various mechanical equipment related  to  (i)  Air  compressing  system and
(ii)  Air  Conditioning  system,  (iii) Air Drying  and  (iv) Steam generating  system,  (v)
Cooling  towers etc.
Computer Literacy  & Pr oficiency:
(1) Office automation  packages: MS Office (Word,  Excel,  PowerPoint,  etc.)
(2) Piping  & Plant Modeling: AutoCAD,  Plant Flow,  Auto  Pipe
(3) Tank  Designing  and  Costing  Softwares.
Training  Programmes / Courses Attended:
(1) Piping  Technology  -  GRAMYA,  Baroda
(2) Piping  Engineering  -  IIT,  Powai-Bombay
(3) Piping  Design  program (ASME B  31.3)  - GRAMYA,  Baroda
(4) Design  of  Tanks and  Process Piping  -  EIL,  New Delhi
(5) Costing  for  Engineers -  ICWAI,  New Delhi
(6) Contract Management - RTI,  Ahmedabad
(7) Interface Management for  the Engineers -  ONGC  Academy,  Dehradun
(8) ISO 9001  2000,  Baroda
(9) Business Process Re-Engineering  & Benchmarking  -  MDI,  Gurgaon
(10) Personal safety  & survival craft training  course,  Bombay  & Safety  Cell at Platform
(11) SAP   SAP India,  Gandhinagar
(SHEHZAD KHAN)
Worked  as Academic Consultant  in  Biomedical Engineering  Department,  University
College of Engineering,  Osmania University,  Hyderabad  from  August'04  to  June'05.
Pursued  a course in  \u0022System Programming  in  Linux,Network,  RTOS and  Embedded  Systems
Programming\u0022 at Depik  Sytems Pvt Ltd,  SR Nagar,  Hyderabad.  The course includes
Advanced  C and  Data Structures,  Linux  Programming,  Network  Programming  and  RTOS
programming.
Develop high performance web applications using  JAVA / J2EE
technology  architecture.  Involve in all phases of Software Developing  Life Cycle.
Responsibility  include maintain web applications of  Unitek software and change
them according  to  the clients request.
Project: Online Portal Services-Unitekportal (Aug2005    Nov2005)
Work Locations: Unitek software,  Aluva,  Ernakulam
Environment: Environment: HW: Intel P4,  AMD athlone Based
SW: Windows xp/2000,  J2SDK1.4  and higher,  J2EE1.4,  TOMCAT 5,
For  the last couple of months  working as  a IT Associate for  Institute for
Electronics  Governance (IEG).
PROFESSIONAL SKILL SET :
Programming Languages : C, Java (core)
Database : PostgreSQL
Web Technologies : HTML
Scripting Languages : PHP, JavaScript
Operating Systems: :  Linux, Windows
Programmer (Consultant) August  2005  -  Present
AIM   Architecture Integration Management
CampSite Reservation System
Coded  Java and  HTML programs for  CampKeeper  Application,  which  contains
Campsite Reservation,  Cancellation,  Campsite maintenance,  Payment and  Reports.
Designed  user interfaces for CampKeeper  Application.
Unit tested  the Java & HTML programs and  created  unit test results.
Technologies: J2EE (Servlet),  HTML,  JavaScript,  Tomcat Server.
M.Tech Project
MObile Business ENGINE (MOB-ENGINE):
MOB-ENGINE is designed  to  control and  access any  sort of  files residing  in  a computer
through  a mobile phone.
MOB-ENGINE is having  the capability  to  start and  shut down  a computer  remotely.
MOB-ENGINE is having  the capability  to  start and  close down  any  application  (Media
Player,  Calculator and  so  on)  from a remote location.
MOB-ENGINE can  perform all kind  of file operations (Read,  Write,  Create,  Delete,
Rename,  Copy,  Zip,  UnZip  and  so  on).
Designed  and  Developed  the MOB-ENGINE in  nine months.
Technologies: J2EE,  J2ME,  Tomcat Server.
B.E Projects
Remote Monitoring  System (RMS):
RMS monitors and  controls the function  of  the remote system.
RMS is designed  such  a way  that the remote system and  the local system are connected
together  by  parallel port.
Security  is extended  by  encryption  and  decryption  methodology  during  the data
transmission.
Designed  and  Developed  the RMS system in  three months.
Technologies: C,  MS-Dos.
Virus SCANner  (VSCAN):
VSCAN utility  is designed  to  detect all sort of viruses and  powered  to  delete the boot
viruses on  the spot.
PATTERN MATCHING technique is implemented  in  VSCAN utility  to  scan  the boot
viruses.
Designed  and  Developed  the VSCAN utility  in  two  months.
SAP BW Consultant
Around  3  years experience in  SAP.
Having  precise expertise in  understanding  the R/3  System.
10  months of exp  in  ABAP/  4  Programming
Excellent team player with  excellent interpersonal and  communication  skills
Set up  procedure for extracting  R/3  data for Sales Order,  Delivery,  Billing  Document in  Sales and
Distribution  using  LO-Cockpit.
AP BW Consultant
Venkat
Setup  the Statistical  Setup  for the LO-Cockpit and  used  the V3  Update for Delta Management.
Loaded  Data into  the ODS Object  before transporting  the data into  the IC.
Created  Transfer Rules & Update Rules.
Maintained  Info  Cube,  Update Rules and  Creation  of Info  Package and  scheduling  the data into  the Data
Targets.
Involved  in  Info  Cube maintenance i.e.,  Compression,  Roll-up.
Extracting  Master & Transaction  Data using  Generic Data Sources from  OLTP.
Uploaded  Transaction  Data from  the Flat File as the Source System.
Involved  in  escalating  high-prioritized  tickets regarding  extractions,  Performance Issues and  also  load
failures.
Monitoring  of Info  packages and  analyzing  the reasons for frequent  failures of Info  packages.
Maintaining  Reconciliation's to  verify  the data in  SAP R3  and  SAP BW are same or not after the data loads.
Project #2:
Company :
AGS India,  Hyderabad
Client : Office Max  (Implementation)
Environment : SAP BW 3.0B,  SAP R/3  4.6C
Period : FEB 2004    March  2005.
Team  Size : 8.
Role : BW Consultant
Extracted  data from  LO Cockpit Data sources.
Created  and  maintained  data sources at SAP OLTP source and  extracted  data into  Info  cubes
after creating  transfer rules,  info  packages and  update rules.
Uploaded  master and  transactional  data from files and  SAP as the OLTP source.  Worked
extensively  on  administration  workbench  (RSA1).  Customized  Info  Objects,  Info  Sources and
Info  Cubes
Experience With  Business Content as well as Creating  Info  sources,  Info  objects,  Info  cubes,
ODS Objects,  Transfer/update rules.
Extracted  Data From Generic Data Sources Using  Transparent Tables.
Extracting  data from  R/3  and  Flat files,  Creating  Info  Packages,  Event Scheduling,  Monitor
settings.
Created  and  maintained  data sources at SAP OLTP source and  extracted  data into  Info  cubes
after creating  transfer rules,  info  packages and  update rules.
Setup  Flat  file extraction  for legacy  data,  Assigning  Data Sources to  the Info  Source,  Defining
Transfer Structure,  and  Metadata maintenance for the Info  Source and  source system.
Configuring  Metadata in  the Administration  Workbench  for replication  and  Updating  of Data
Source from the source system.
Project #  1
AP BW Consultant
Venkat
Company :
YASH TECHNOLOGIES,  Hyderabad
Client : Bristol  Meyers Squibb
Environment : SAP R/3  4.6C
Period : April 2003    Jan  2004.
Team  Size : 6.
Role : Technical consultant (ABAP)
Client : Bristol  Meyers Squibb
Description:.  Bristol-Myers Squibb  Canada is a pharmaceutical and  related  care products company  whose
mission  is to  extend  and  enhance human  life.  With  nearly  80  years in  Canada,  Bristol-Myers Squibb  Canada
is positioned  to  be a leading  contributor to  Canada's global  reputation  in  the health  and  pharmaceutical
business
Create an  interactive report  for displaying  customer information.  Based  on  the selection  mode the
corresponding  customer bank  details are listed  such  that  the line selected  in  the basic list  was visible along
with  the second  list.
Developed  reports for stock  transfer orders (Multiple Purchase requisitions to  single stock  transfer order),
Contract  Manufacturing,  Bill of material  reports,  General postings,  and  Sales order adjustments.
Developed  the outstanding  purchase orders report  based  on  the business groups and  acknowledgement date
using  the ALV (ABAP list  viewer functionality) for the list  in  grid  display.
Created  report to  compute and  display  the list  of outstanding  orders by  ship-to- party  or sold-to-party.
Created  a Report to  display  a list  of Purchase Requisitions with  details like MRP Controller,
Release Date and  Unit of Measure along  with  standard  details.
Designed  and  developed  a report to  list the purchase order quantity  for statistical delivery  date which
gives the cumulative totals for the plants,  material group,  factory  which  were entered  in  the selection
criteria.
AP BW Consultant
Performed positive testing and negative testing
Involved in writing test cases
Performed functional  and Regression  testing
Involved in weekly reviews and In preparation  of Bug report
Name : E-Consulting
Client : E-Skill  Technologies, Chennai
Role : Team Member
Front End : VB 6.0, ASP, SQL server
Back End : Oracle
Environment : Windows NT, XP, 2000, 98
Testing Tool  : Manual  Testing
Duration  : 6 Months
Description
E-Consulting is an Application used to  maintain the consulting details right from Client Details, Client's
requirements, Candidates details, Matching the candidates, Scheduling for  the interviews and Payments. The
application  provides the user  the search engine, which  is useful  to get the details of Clients and their  requirement
and Candidates that matches for  the requirement. This application also provides as a mail  server  application
through which  the mails from and to the clients and candidates can be accessed easily.
Designed test cases for  Manual  testing
Involved in Functional  and Regression Testing
Involved in writing test cases
Performed functional  and Regression  testing
Involved in weekly reviews and In preparation  of Bug report
Name : AVAGAMAN
Client : Ash Infosystem, Chennai
Role : Team Member
Front End : VB 6.0, ASP, SQL server
Back End : Oracle
Environment: Windows NT, XP, 2000, 98
Testing Tool  : Manual  Testing
Duration  : 4 Months
Description
AVAGAMAN is a software product developed by Ash  Infosystem for  official letter  management for CPRI (Central
Power Research Institute).This project automates the process of tracking both
incoming and outgoing letters for  an  organization. There are three sub systems like
Administrator, letter  tracking, Report framework etc.
Designed test cases for  Manual  testing
Involved in writing test cases
Report Bug.
Develop Automation  and Manual  tests.
Having  around 2 Yrs Experience in Manual Testing  with knowledge of using
Automation Tools.
Preparing  Test Cases and  Bug  Reports.
Functional, Performance and  System testing.
Preparation of Status Reports, Issue  Metrics preparation.
Good knowledge  of the  Software  Development Life  Cycle  (SDLC) and  STLC.
Organization Designation Duration
Precise Technologies Chennai Software  Test Engineer May 2004   Till Date
Industrial Training Bhabha Atomic Research  Center,  Mumbai
Duration 45  Days,  June to  July  2004
Description During  my  training  period  I  have design  a personal computer  based
programmer  for  AT89C51/C52/C1051/C2051  microcontroller.
The programmer  will perform all the microcontroller
function  including  code read  ,  code write ,  chip  erase ,  signature bit
read  and  lock  bit write.
Industrial Training Rajasthan  Atomic Power Plant,  Rawatbhata
Duration 30  Days,  May  2003  to  June 2003
Description During  my  training  period  I have got knowledge about Reactor  and
components like Calandria,  Coolant Channel,  Primary  Heat Transfer
System,  Channel Temperature Monitoring  System etc.
Industrial Training Instrumentation  Ltd.,  Kota (Rajasthan)
Duration 45  Days,  June to  July  2004
Description During  my  training  period  I  have got knowledge about
\u0022Telecommunication\u0022.
Industrial Training M.L.V.Textile & Engineering  College,  Bhilwara
Duration 30  Days,  May  2003  to  June 2003
Description During  my  training  period  I have got knowledge about ''Image
Compression  and  Writing  Reports with  Latex\u0022.
:  6  months of experience on  ASP in  Ingenious tech,  Sangavi (currently  working)
Academic Statistic
Pursuing MCA 3rd Year (6th Semister-2005) in  HVPM  Amravati University,
Amravati with 60%.
B.Sc. (2000-2003) from Shivaji Science College, Amravati with  58.20%
HSSC (1998-2000) from Shivaji Science College, Amravati with 63.00%
SSC (1997-1998) from Smarth  High school, Amravati with  74.40%
.  August  2004  To  December 2005
Worked with  Software Development  Center  of POLAR  INDUSTRIES LTD.
As  Software  Engineer Trainee.
January  2006 To Till  Date
Working with  Dharampal  Premchand  Limited AS  \u0022  Software  Engineer\u0022
1+ Year  Experience in  Software Development using  VB6.0,Sql Server 2000,  Crystal Reports.
Worked  with  Gandhi Infotech Pvt.  Ltd.(GIPL) Rohini Delhi as Software Developer  from
January  2005  to  June 2005.
Currently  Working  with
dwon technologies
New Delhi  as Software Developer Since July  2005.
Software Skills:
Microsoft  Technologies Visual Basic 6.0,  .Net(ASP,  C#)
Languages C/C++ ,Core Java ,JSP,  Servlets
Operating  System DOS,  Windows 98,2000,XP
Database SQL Server,  Oracle 9i,  MS Access
Web Tools HTML,  Java script
Packages Crystal Reports 9
Working  as a group  leader  in  TWCPA division,  ICICI Bank.
Six  Months in  the DRM Office Jhansi (U.P.) as a trainee.
Six  Months in  the BHEL Jhansi (U.P.)  as a trainee.
Professional Qualifications:
(2002) M.I.S.T.  (Master  of  Information  Science & Technology)  from Bundelkhand
University,  Jhansi (U.P.)  with  First Division.
(2000) B.C.A.  (Bachelor  in  Computer Application)  from Makhanlal Chaturvadi Rastriya
Patrakarita University,  Bhopal.  (M.P.)  with  First Division.
Projects during College
8085 simulator & Graphical calendar in `C'.
Doskey  command in C using TSR.
Mini Piano in C
8085 Kit in C++
Screen Saver in C for Dos
On screen Keyboard Display  for C
School Period Management Using C++.
4 bit ALU & 8 Bit Shift Register in VHDL.
Mouse Multiplexing using AT89C51 as  a controlling device.
LCD interfacing with 8085 kit using 8255 PPI.
Signal Generator Using 8085, D/A0808.
Parallel Data Transfer B/W Two 8085 Kits.
Remote controller robotic  car using AT89C51 as  controlling Device
Snake & ladder game in VB.
2004-2005 Rockwell Automation  India
Ltd. Shahibabad, U.P.
Engineering Solution
Done Cement Vertical Raw Mill Automation At Orissa Cement Ltd.
Using CLX-LM55 (upgraded version of PLC) controller, 1771 Series
I/O Cards, C, Functional Block  Diagram and Ladder Logic  for
programming and Rsview 32 SCADA (HMI), having 13 PID loops  to
control the process.
Team size: 1
Role: Network  Design, Programming, HMI Designing,
Testing
Done Nixon Steel & Power Ltd Automation Using CLX-LM55
(upgraded version of PLC) controller, Flex  I/O Cards, c, FBD, Ladder
Logic  for programming and Rsview 32 SCADA (HMI), having 6 PID
loops  to control the temp of the KILN in control.
Team size: 1
Role: Network  Design, Programming, HMI Designing,
Testing
Done Navdurga Fuel Pvt. Ltd. Steel Plant Automation Using PLC-5
(Hot Back  UP), Flex  I/O Cards, C, FBD and Ladder Logic  for
programming and Rsview 32 SCADA (HMI) Having 3 PID loops  for
the control of KILN temp.
Team size: 1
Role: Network  Design, Programming, HMI Designing,
Testing
Written Software for DM-Plant At- IOCL- Panipat
Team size: 2
Role: Programming
Network  upgradation of OCL India Ltd. From DH+ to Ethernet
Team size: 1
Role: Network  design, Proposal preparation, Presentation,
Execution
DG Shop Automation
Team size: 1
Role: Network  design, Proposal preparation, Presentation,
Execution
June 2003-Dec.
2003 C-Dot (Pusa
Road) Delhi
Trainee
Worked on live project of CDOT named as  \u0022Control Room Expert
System\u0022 of solving the problems  in there Exchanges  using
Front Hand: VB 6.0 Back  Hand: Microsoft Access
Team Size: 7
Role: Core Programming
ADDITIONAL
Done VHDL Training in our college
PROFESSIONAL
Having  Two+ years of experience  in developing  Web
Application using  Java  Technologies.
Good development experience  in Servlets, JSP, JDBC, EJB, XML.
Good Experience  and  exposure to Relational databases like
Oracle, MySQL.
Good Knowledge in BEA Weblogic, JBoss 3.2.1, Tomcat 5.1
Servers.
Sound  Knowledge  in OOPs concepts.
Ability to work in-group as well as independently.
Capability to adapt and  learn new technologies.
Designing the web  pages to link all the modules and  give user a
common interface  to the  application.
Implementing  the  search algorithms in Java.
Implemented  the queries in Oracle.
Personal Strength
Affirmative
Allegiant
Assiduous
Able event organizer
Academic strength
Programming  in  C,  C++.
Puzzle solving.
Vocabulary  building.
CAREER OBJECTTIVE
To  contribute in  a professional environment where my  communication  skills and
technical skills,  coupled  with  a sincere desire to  learn,  will make duties more productive
and  result   oriented  aligning  with  the company's objectives.
Presently  working  in  HP as an  SUPPORT EXECUTIVE in  Bangalore-Electronic
City under the project STC-NMST (Network  Management System for  Transport).
ACADEMIC PROJECT IN POST GRADUATION(6  Months):
\u0022MACHINE  FILE MANAGEMENT SYSTEM\u0022- using  Java  for maintain the
files on Machine Building  department  at Titan Industries Limited,  Hosur.
\u0022EXECUTIVE MANAGEMENT SERVICES\u0022-using  Java  for make easy
transactions between  customer and  company  at Mansoft Microsystems,  Bangalore.
A management graduate  with over 3 years of experience  in sales and  marketing.
Currently working  as Territory sales Incharge  in Madura Coats Limited.
Demonstrated  abilities of handling  channel sales.
Proficiently handled  the  sales in Delhi and  Haryana.
Resourceful in collecting market information for the development of business strategies
and co-ordinating  new product development efforts.
Excellent communication, interpersonal skills and  the ability to motivate  team members.
Duration : December 2002 till date
Organisation  : Madura Coats Limited
Location : Delhi Depot.
Growth Path
Joined  as Sales Representative  in Handicrafts December 2002   February 2004
Shifted  to Sales Rep. in Consumer Threads Division March 2004   December 2004
Promoted as Territory Sales Incharge  January 2005 - Till date
Organisation : Sahara India Limited, Lucknow
Project Title : 1. Cosmetics scenario in Lucknow market.
2. Upcoming  trends of direct marketing
Project description : Studied customer awareness in cosmetics and  their purchasing
pattern, the  popular brands and  their market share. The
various modes of shopping  used  by the  customer and  the
upcoming  trends of direct marketing.
1.
Name Of Organization : Panse AutoComps Pvt.  Ltd  ,  Pune.
2.
Designation : Manufacturing  Engineer
3.
Durration : 21  Months
4.
Customers: Tata Motors ,  Bajaj ,  TataJohnson  & Control ,M&M.
5.
- Production  ,  Planning  and  Quality  Control.
- Preparing  and  submitting  Business Planning  ,  OEE Report ,Rejection  Analysis ,PPM .
- Man  ,  Machine ,  Material Management .
COMPANY:  SIEMENS
DEPARTMENT: TRX
EXPERIENCE:  5  months
POST:  Worked  as an  \u0022Application Scripting  Analyst\u0022-ASA
Proficient in programming  with Java, JSP and Servlets.
1.6 Years of Experience  in design and  development of Java Based  Applications
and Component software  using  JDBC, Servlets, JSP, HTML.
Involved in Design and  Development of applications. Worked  extensively in
Windows 2000, Windows XP, Weblogic 8.0, Tomcat 4.1 ,JDBC, and  JSP .
Ability to co-ordinate with the team.
Self-motivated  and willing  to contribute.
Possess good  interpersonal and  communication skills
Working as a software  Developer in HAL(Hindustan Aeronoticals
Limited),Bangalore  from June  2005 to till date on Contract based.
Worked  as a Programmer in NTPC(National Thermal Power Corporation Govt
Of  India  Ltd from April 2004 to May 2005.
Construction of jsp  code. Involved  in Database design related  to the  modules
assigned  for me.
Project #2  :
Sales  and Inventory Management
System
Client :  HAL(Hindustan Aeronautics Limited).
Environment : Windows2000,JAVA,AWT,JDBC,ORACLE8i.
Duration : August 2004 to May 2005
Role :  Developer
Description :
This project was developed  to automate the  process of all the  transactions that
take  place  like  purchase of the  goods from the suppliers. Maintenance of the stock
selling  of the  goods to the customers. It also keeps track of all the  details regarding
the  suppliers and  customer like the payments made the balance  and  about the
goods.The  software `s main objective was to assist the  management in preparing the
reports ,it has the  option to print various reports like  stock report, customer bill and
the  price  list of all items.
Construction of java code. Involved  in Database  design related to the modules
assigned  for me.
Project #3 :  DAILY PLANT MAINTANENCE
Client : NTPC(  National Thermal Power Corporation)
Environment :  JDBC, JSP,ORACLE 6.0.
Duration : October 2003 to feb  2004
Role :  Developer
Description :
The  Objective  of this Project is to develop  software  that helps in problem
encountering  report submition by the NTPC employees to the  Administrator . athe
administrator there  by assigns the problems to respective  engineers gives the  time
period  for completion. Engineers after clearing  the  problem checks out the status as
completed  or pending  . Reports are  generated  according to day-wise, month-
wise,week-wise  .The software  maintains the details of the  employees under various
sections and departments, machinery parts available, location of the  faults occurred.
Construction of jsp  code
Involved in Database  design related  to the  modules assigned for me
Project #4 :  (RICE MILLERS  INFORMATION & TRANSACTION SYSTEM)
Client :  Rice Millers  Association,  WARANGAL,INDIA
Environment :  Developer 2000  ,ORACLE 8.0.
Duration :  4months
Role :  Developer
Description :
Rice  Millers Information and  Transaction System is the  means by which the  Govt
measures the  total production of rice in various districts .It maintains list of millers
under that godown and align targets to dump rice  bags according  to the  type  of rice
and the season. govt issues certain targets to districts .Tokens are  issued  to the
millers mentioning  the maturity date. Fine  is imposed is they jump  the  maturity
dates.
The  database  maintains the  godowns list, tokens issued  to the  millers, date of
issue, maturity period  of tokens, type of rice ie Karif or Rabi according  to the  season.
Targets that the  govt issued. Details of the millers, salaries, wages etc. It is flexible
enough to update  the  Millers details at any point of time.
Construction of coding and  unit testing
Involved in Database  design related  to the  modules assigned for me
Presently working as Web Administrator in ICRISAT (International Crops -
Research Institute for the Semi-Arid Tropics) Hyderabad. Since April  2005
to Till  date
Worked as a Programmer for Peanut Collaborative Research Support
Program(PCRSP),University Of Georgia, USA from December 2004 to April
2005
During this period of my experience I  am Involved in developing web applications
in ASP,ColdFusion,HTML,JavaScript,VBScript.  Ia m involved in installing the SQL
Server and administering the webserver-IIS
Administration of Intranet and Internet websites : The ICRISAT Internet and
Intranet sites has to be constantly updated and monitered for its
perfomance.  The site has to be checked for any broken links or missing
files in the web pages
Web Applications Monitoring: There are many online applications running
on
Internet & In tranet which are database driven.
File Uploading & Da tabase Uploading: In order to provide the latest
information to the users files need to be uploaded using FTP and databases
need to be updated in the Database servers using SQLSERVER  2000.
Currently  working  with  MODAK COMPUTERS,  NEW DELHI as a S/W Test
Engineer since January  2005  till date.
Career Profile Summary
Overall 14+ months of  work  experience in  software Industry  since January  2005.  My
current functional experience lies in  the field  of  automated  testing  using  the
automation  tools such  as mercury  Win  Runner,  Test Director,  and  knowledge of  Load
Runner.
Software Testing  Skill  Set
A) Manual Testing
1)  Writing  and  Executing  Test Cases
2)  Knowledge of  writing  Test Plans
3)  Bug  reporting  and  tracking
4)  Testing  Strategies and  types of  testing
5)  Knowledge of  CMM Models and  ISO Standards
6)  Knowledge of  SDLC  and  STLC
Project  Management  and bug  tracking  tool:  Test  Director 7.2
B)  Automated Testing
1)  Generating  and  editing  Test scripts
2)  Functional,  GUI and  Regression  Testing  using  Win  Runner  7.0
3)  Knowledge of  Load  Runner 7.5
Technical  Skill  Set
Testing  and QA Testing,  Bug  Tracking,  Test  Case Preparation and Execution
Languages C/C++,  TSL,VB
Operating  Systems Worked with Windows9X,  Windows XP and Windows 2000
Database MS Access
Application Software
MSOffice Applications
Web-Based Technology  Html
Project Done
Software Test august'05  -  Till Date
MODAK  COMPUTERS,  New  Delhi
OBFUSCATING COMMUNICATION  SYSTEM,  New Delhi,  India
It is based  on  the technique Steganography,  the art and  science of  hiding  information  by
embedding  messages with  in  other,  seemingly  harmless messages.  It works by  replacing
bits of useless or unused  data in  regular  computer files ( such  as graphics,  sound,  text,
HTML,  or even  floppy  disks)  with  bits of different,  invisible information.  This hidden
information  can  be plain  text,  cipher  text or  even  images.
Role & Re sponsibilities
Software Tester
Involved  in  testing  of  all modules
Black Box  testing
Developed test cases to  cover overall quality  assurance
Performed Manual Testing
as well automated  using  automated  test tool
Environment :  VB 6.0,  SQL Server 2000,  Windows 2000
Software Tester January'05    June'05
MODAK  COMPUTERS,  New  Delhi
AMS
AMS is developed  for GEMS,  New Delhi.  This package is for  the enterprise-wide
computerization  of the plant,  which  includes the modules for  Administration,  Company
procedures,  managing  library  functions (updating  the database of  library  of  the same
company) and  Upload  files.
Role & Re sponsibilities
Performed Manual Testing
Black Box  testing
Developed test cases to  cover overall quality  assurance
Reviewed manual methods to  design and executed test  cases
Created and maintained orderly  test  results and status reports
Environment : ASP,  SQL Server 2000,  Crystal Report.
BE,  Computer  Science from M.D University,  Rohtak  ,  with  aggregate of  73.3%
Jan'04   Dec'04 Direct Link
(India) Pvt. Ltd.
Project Trainee/Software Engineer, Bangalore,
India.
Changed the Database of the existing project
\u0022RESUMER\u0022  from Ms Access to SQL Server and MySQL
along connectivity with VC++.
Designed and Created Whole Database in Oracle8i for the
same project \u0022RESUMER\u0022.
Develops and maintains system documentation for
implementations.
Feb'05    May'05  TQM  Consultancy
Pvt. Ltd.
Technical Associate Nayapalli,
Bhubaneshware.
My work was involved in giving training to the developers
for new  project as well  giving training to the clients once
software has been developed.
I was also involved in Designing, Creating and Developing
the Database in SQL Server,  Oracle9i  for Projects at the
Organization like \u0022DISS\u0022  & in-house Software.  I  was
undertaken training of VB.Net too & implementing as
require.
June'05-Tilldate Dellsys Softtech
Pvt. Ltd.
Technical Associate Infocity,
Bhubaneswar.
Mainly my work involved in giving training to the
developers for new  project as well giving training to the
clients once software has been developed.  Also giving
presentation for our products.
According to requirements I  do manual testing as well as
technical writing too.
Right now I am involved with a project \u0022Material
Management\u0022  which is in VB.Net as front end and SQL
Server as back end.
Currently  working  as Software programmer  at GIT Software pvt.  Ltd.  in  Chennai from
May  2005  to  till now.
1.8  years of  experience in  Software Design/development
Experience in  application  software development using  Java 2.0,  JDBC,  JSP,
Servlets and  EJB,  XML
Good  exposure to  struts framework  and  tag  libraries for  J2EE based  development
Good  database understanding  and  having  experience in  Oracle
Career Profile
Organization
: DCSSP Pvt Ltd
Duration
: Jun  2004-  till date
Fresher
Pursuing Master in Computer Application (64.4%till 5TH Sem.) from
U P Technical  University, Lucknow in Havard Institute Of Management &
Technology (Greater  Noida).
B.Tech in Electronics & Communication from U.P.  Technical  University,
Lucknow  (U.P.), 67  %( aggregate), RGEC,  Meerut.
LANGUAGE  SKILLS:  ENGLISH, HINDI
In BSNL Telecom Factory Mumbai in 2004
2 Years Experience  :
Worked with DOEACC Society (An
Autonomous  Body of  Department
of  Information Technology, Ministry of  Communications  & IT,  engaged in
carrying out HR  Development Activities  in the area  of  Information,
Electronics  & Communication Technology (IECT)
) as Data Entry
Operator on  Contract  Basis for a period  of 6 months i.e. from
March 2004 to  September 17, 2004.
Besides Data Entry  job, following  responsibilities were also
assigned:
Record  Keeping
To coordinate  Viva arrangements for  A Level  students
Arrangements regarding  students' Certificates despatch
Presently  working with M/s Solar Print Process  Pvt. Ltd., Okhla,
New Delhi, as
Computer Operator Cum  Data  Entry Operator Cum  Library
Manager of Jobs since October 2004.
Besides Data Entry job, following  responsibilities have been
assigned:
To take  data backup  from PCs & Mac's in  CD's, DVD's & Make
Library  of backup CD's, DVD's.
To meet/interact  with clients for  various activities
To draft  day to  day correspondence  relating  to various
activities of
the  Organisation
Over  12 years of extensive experience in managing the entire business operations as a profit centre in diversified
industries. Possesses strong business acumen with the ability to execute a wide range of sales and marketing
strategies to establish  market presence and increase revenues and profitability. A proactive leader  and planner  with
expertise in  account management and pre-sales efforts and skills in, competitor/ market analysis and target
marketing. Key Strength Areas  are:
Strategic Marketing Corporate  Planning & Stra tegic Alliances
Sales and Marketing/ International Marketing Key Account  Management
Network Development  and Channel Management Creating/Launching Brand Awareness
Programs
Product Life Cycle Management New Product Opportunity Research  & Introduction
Market Communication and Planning Industrial  Relations/ Team Management
Marketing Intelligence Organizing/Conducting Training
Manufacturing / Logistics/ Sourcing Operations Public  Speaking
Since  April 2001 with M/s S.R. Engineers   as TERRITORY SALES HEAD for Mumbai
The company is engaged in marketing of Maintenance products, systems and services for  manufacturing industries.
It is also in the business of outsourcing, marketing, and application  of world-class technologies in waterproofing and
Water Resistant Paints. S.R  Engineers also provides end to end customized solutions for  maintenance of Screw and
Reciprocating compressors.
Accountable for managing the entire gamut  of business operations, including, strategic planning,
formulating policies, financial operations, manufacturing, sourcing, quality, dispatch, logistics,
business development, brand management, client  servicing , Project  Execution and  Labour
Management  for the waterproofing b usiness and Industrial Maintenance  products business.
Distinction of achieving  a sales turnover  of Rs 11 lacs of a total  turnover  of Rs. 23 lacs for  FY  2004   2005.
Current year expected to double my sales turnover  to 23 lacs
Currently managing a team of 4 sales Engineer  and 1 Technical  Service Engineer.
Identified, studied and analyzed waterproofing and painting problems /requirements of the customer  and then
presented the same to the customer  through detailed Study reports, and CAD drawings
Successfully introduced polymer  based waterproofing systems based on  Silane   Siloxanes (sourced from Dow
Corning, US), Acrylate polymers (BASF   Germany) and Thermoplastic  Acrylic  Resins (ICI, UK  and Rohm & Hass
US).
Introduced a system specific   approach. That is after analyzing and based on  the findings of the \u0022site status\u0022
and the perceived requirements of the customer
Instrumental  in bagging major  orders from TATA Steel  viz a viz competition from Goodlass Nerolac.
Successfully launched the Exterior  Paint \u0022Palladium\u0022 and actively involved in  the installation of the complete
painting system.
Significantly designed marketing materials such as brochures, presentation material, etc, as a part of brand
building and market development effort.
Instrumental  in providing the customer  with  a technology driven end-to-end solution for  waterproofing and
Painting. This included manufacturing our  own products, executing the applications and offering post
application  maintenance of the site in the waterproofing and paint industry.
Introduced a unique post warranty Annual  Maintenance Scheme for  our  existent customers, thereby bagging 2
major  projects worth more than  1.25 lacs each, besides other  smaller  projects.
Successfully marketed a range of Industrial  Maintenance products sourced from Wurth  (Germany) and CVC
(India) to a wide range of corporate customers like Tata Steel, Tata Motors, Mahindra & Mahindra, Exide
Batteries etc.
Opened trade channel  partners for  providing technical  services and retailing of Industrial  Maintenance
products.
Initiated a co   branding exercise with  Exide Batteries on  behalf of one of our  principals   CVC.
Opened a new and nascent market for  Water  based degreasers and cleaners for  the manufacturing sector,
replacing traditional  and conventional  petroleum based cleaners like diesel  and kerosene.
Sep'1998 Mar'2001 with ICI  India Ltd. (Acrylics Division) as  Sales officer (Western region)
The company is engaged in the business of commodity chemicals, such as Methyl  Metha Acrylate (MMA), Metha
Acrylic  Acid (MAA), other  specialty Metha Acrylates (SPMA) and Poly Methyl  Metha Acrylates (PMMA, targeting the
Paint and Resin  manufacturers, Coating Industry and the Plastic  Industr
y.
Accountable for managing the sales and marketing operations for  promoting various commodity chemicals in
the assigned territories such  as Maharashtra, Gujarat, Madhya Pradesh, Pune Ahmedabad, Indore, Nagpur, etc.
Instrumental  in initiating a trade network for  the commodity chemicals.
Actively involved un  assisting prospective customers to upgrade to  Acrylic  based systems
Increased the sales volume of 3MT, 5MT  and 1MT/ month  in each region respectively from zero sales.
Increased the sales volume from to 100 MT through  the trade segment in Mumbai  from 10 MT, thereby
achieving the sales volume of Rs. 1 crore
Increased the MMA and MAA sales volume to 45MT and 50MT per  month  from 7 MT and 3 MT  in the trade
segment
Actively participated in  All  India Plastic  Manufacturer  (AIPMA) sponsored seminars and delivered speeches on
emerging technologies in  the field of Acrylics. Was awarded a memento for  this in the year  1999.
Oct'1996-Aug'1998 with Jenson & Ni cholson  (India) Ltd. Mumbai as Sales Representative
The company is one of the 5 major  Paint manufacturers in  the country, engaged in the business interests in the
Decorative and Powder Coating and Industrial  Coatings Business.
Accountable for  managing the sales and marketing operations for  promoting the concept of Insta   Color  and
opening new Insta color  Centers in  the assigned territories of Dombivali  to Karjat, Kalyan  to Kasara, Murbad,
Bhiwandi, and Pen in the Thane and Raigad districts of Maharashtra through channel  sales.
Distinction of increasing the sales from 2000 liters to 7000 liters per  month viz a viz the tough competition-
Asian Paints.
Successfully established and set up one Insta color center  in Dombivali, with  a proven track record of increasing
the sales of premium emulsions from 250 liters per  month to  530 liters.
Conducted regular painter  meets and architects meet for  the successful  launch of new products on  the Insta
Color  System viz: Insta Distemper, Insta color  base coat (primer) and Insta color  Pearl  Luster  brands.
Commenced career with M/s Midpoint Software (India) Limited. As Sales Executive (May' 1993
Sep'1996)
The company is engaged in the manufacturing of anti    virus solutions
Accountable for  direct selling of \u0022Check   Mate\u0022 anti    virus software to end users in Mumbai  market
Company: Infosys Technologies Limited
Designation: Software Engineer  (Nov 2003   till  date).
Analysis of the Existing System in  New Jersey, Pennysylvania and Delaware areas.
Responsible for  handling All  Incident Requests.
Estimation and design  of the Proposed Work.
Understanding client requirements and providing functional  insights for  incorporating client's
requirement in  Mainframes.
Coding, Code Review, Creating Test Strategy & Testing. Testing involves both  Unit & Integration
Testing.
2. Verizon   Suppy Chain System.
Verizon  has some core logistics systems -  CAPRI, MMIS, GTEAMS and VISION which  are Tier  I applications. A
variety of order-entry subsystems and warehouse support systems surround the core system   these are
called tier  II and tier  III  subsystems. The team provides maintenance support and production support for
these Tier  II and III systems.
Period : Feb 2004   Aug 2005
Work Description  : This project involves Maintenance & Production  Support for  the Tier  II &
III systems.
Responsible for  handling All  Incident Requests.
Testing of the new functionality in case of implementing changes.
Testing and documentation all  new type of requests for  future reference.
Understanding client requirements and providing functional  insights for  incorporating client's
requirement in  Mainframes.
Prepare system test strategies and test plans. Create test data and testing environments and
undertake system testing and documentation of end results.
Responsible for  Configuration M anagement & Defect Prevention Activities.
3.
Infosys   Banking Automation  System.
This project was developed as a part of training. This Online banking application  has provision  to perform
basic  banking transactions like creating a new account, crediting and debiting account etc. User  will  be
provided with  a welcome screen  which will  have different options. User  can  select desired option and
continue with  the transaction. If the transaction ends successfully all the data will  be stored to the database.
Period : Nov 2003   Jan 2004
Work Description  : This project is basically to  automate the daily banking activities.
Involved in Analysis, Design, Coding & Testing.
Responsible for  Configuration M anagement Activities.
Diploma in Multimedia from Arena Multimedia (Div. of Aptech), Chandigarh.
Having Total 1.6 year of Experience in IT Industry, involved in software development
using .Net Technologies, SQL Server.
Escribe Solutions  India (Pvt) Ltd- Chennai
Post Graduate Diploma  in Chemo-Informatics (2004-05) (A Distance Learning
Programme of  Jamia Hamdard  University,  New Delhi)  Result Awaited.
Seminar Presentation:
Delivered  Seminar  Lecture on  the Topic (\u0022A Kinetic Study of the reaction of  NO2
with HI over the temperature range 278  to  333K\u0022) on  13  Feb  2005  at the
Seminar Lecture Theatre of Chemistry  Deptt.  A.M.U,  Aligarh.
1. Treselle Software (P) Ltd, Bangalore
Client :  American Meadia Incorporation
Designation : Oracle DBA
Duration :  23-Nov-2005 to Till Date
2. Jamsab Computer Pvt. Ltd. (Gujarat  InfoTech Ltd.), Ahmedabad
Current Functional Area  :  IT-Software/DATABASE
Sub-Functional Area :  Database  Administration
( Murtuja  Khokhar)
Client :  ECI  (Election Commission of India)
Designation : System Supervisor
Duration :  01-Mar-2004 to 31-Jul-2005
Front-end :  VB 6.0
Back-end :  Oracle  8.
Reports  :  Crystal Reports 8.5, Developer 2000
Collaborated at District Collector's Office, for  implementing and managing the Elector's Data for  ECI's
(Election  Commission of India) Handling of two  different project named SCROLL (System for  Computerized
Electoral  Roll) and EPIC (Electors photo  Identity Card) Managed the Elector's data for  entire district.
Converting Oracle database data into MS Access, Designing and producing D2K  Reports, Customization  of
EPIC software using Visual  Basic  6.0 and ORACLE Forms 5.0, providing support to  the vendor  for  proper
implementation  of the EPIC (Elector  Photo Identity Card). Managed and troubleshooting of Windows NT based
network of more then 20 computers at District Collector's Office. Communicate with Collector  & Dy. Collector
Election  for  required regular  report.
Project Completed
SCROLL (System For Computerized Electoral Roll)
Duration 1 Year 5 Months
Technologies/Platform Visual  Basic  6.0 and ORACLE Forms 5.0,Oracle ,PL/SQL
Description This System Maintain Parliamentary and assembly Electors
Details.
Role PL/SQL Development and  Database  Administration
EPIC (Electors  Photo Identity Card)
Duration 1 Year 5 Months
Technologies/Platform Visual  Basic  6.0 and ORACLE Forms 5.0,Oracle ,PL/SQL
Description This System Maintain the District Level  Electors Photo  Identity
Card System.
Role PL/SQL Development and  Database  Administration
GENESYS (General Elections  Information System)
Duration 1 Year 5 Months
Technologies/Platform Visual  Basic  6.0 and ORACLE Forms 5.0,Oracle ,PL/SQL
Description This System Maintain Assembly and Parliamentary Election
Information.
Role PL/SQL Development and  Database  Administration
Library Management  System
Duration 6 Months
Technologies/Platform Visual Basic  6.0,Access
( Murtuja  Khokhar)
Description This application was developed  for Lang Library,
Rajkot.The application maintains master tables that
have  details about books, daily transactions, members.
All database  operation can be done  and  saved  back to
the  database. All necessary reports were  generated
using data report.
Role Development
Team Size 2
Store Management  System
Duration 6 Months
Technologies/Platform Visual Basic  6.0,Access
Description This application was developed  for Departmental store.
The  application maintains master tables that have
details about Inventory, daily transactions, and
customers. All database operation can be  done and
saved  back to the database. All necessary reports were
generated using  data report.
Role Development
Team Size 2
Work register Information System
Duration 4 Months
Technologies/Platform ASP 3.0,Oracle  8.0,PL/SQL
Description The  WRIS provides the  facility to manage  the  ongoing
projects of BSNL as well manage  their assets. It consists
of following  modules.
Works module.
Assets module.
Admin module.
Reporting  module.
Workstation module
Role Analysis, Design, Development
Team Size 4
1. Working  as Sr. Account Manager   IT with One of the Best Consultants at Bangalore  from Feb
2005 to till Date.
2. From Aug '2004 to Feb 2005 as  a Response Executive with Infomedia India Ltd
.,
Bangalore.

Project Handled
I am  looking for a  challenging opportunity in the field of information technology and
computer science. My aim is to be a  part of a result oriented, highly successful team  in
implementing innovative ideas in tune with quality standards and current technologies.
1 Year of experience as a Software Engineer in Megatrendz  on J2ME.
Worked efficiently as an individual as well as a  team member on various projects
and am adaptable to situations.
Working as Software Engineer from September/2005 till date.
Company :
Megatrendz
35th `C' Cross 4th `T' Block,
Jayanagar,East End Main Road,
Bangalore-560069
Project Name:  X'Mas Humbugs
Description
It is X'mas eve. and humbugs are bent upon dampening the X'mas spirit by
foiling Santa's plan of delivering his X'mas goodies on time.You have to  make sure the
gifts, are distributed into four corners.Guide through the maze using the bell before time
runs out.Avoid Humbugs as they knock the gifts off the cart.The fate of X'mas is in our
hands.
Roles  and Responsibility
Coding of Application for the part of Developers Role.
Project Name:  OMAMASNEMESIS
Description
AS a reputed Sniper of the Elite U.S. Marine Corps you have been assigned to
this mission.There were reports that Omama  and his loyal men are hiding in Zaidistan
under protection of a terrorist state.Intelligence reports suggests he has created clones of
himself,so  we may never know  if he is dead or alive.You were dropped off into  his hide
out.Your mission is to  kill world's most wanted man and his honchos.
Roles and Responsibility
Coding of Application for the part of Developers Role.
Project Name:  BlackjackNatacha
Description
To  change the background images as cash in hand increases.You have $ 500 at the
start of the game.The background changes at a  time when you reach $650,$800,
$950,$1100,$1350,$1500.
Each player starts with two cards. one of Natacha's  cards is hidden till you
`stand'. Face cards are worth 10.Aces are worth 1 or 11 whichever makes a better
hand.You must beat Natacha's hand without going over 20.To `HIT' is to  ask for
another card ,to `STAND' is to  hold your current total and end your turn.'Double'
is a `HIT' with `STAND' ,the bet is doubled and you get one more card and you
stand automatically..Natacha  will hit until his cards total 17 or higher.If you go
over 21,you will bust and Natacha  wins.
Roles  and Responsibility
Coding of Application for the part of Developers Role.
Project Name:  StripBricksElita
Description
Complete the different stages of the game to  show images from `Elita'.It is an
exciting action game.It is fully based on bricks.The complexity of the game will be in
increasing order according to the levels.You have to  clear fifty different levels to win
the game.As much as you will break the bricks the background image will be in front
of you.After -fter the breaking of all bricks you will enter in the next level.
Roles  and Responsibility
Coding of Application for the part of Developers Role.
Working  with  Power Software Business Solutions,  Bangalore  as Software
Test Engineer since February  2005.
Professional  Competency:
My  experience in  the IT industry  over the past 1.1  years has enabled  me to  achieve the
following  skills:
Strong  knowledge on  manual  testing.
Involved  in  development of test cases and  analyzing  the test reports.
Has expertise in  test case design,  test  case execution  and  defect  management.
Sound  understanding  of Project  Development life style.
Having  good  interpersonal  skills and  zeal to  learn  new things
Having  the knowledge of automation  tools like WinRunner,  Test Director and
Loadrunner.
Good  knowledge of Quality  Assurance process.
Strong  but realistic belief in  own  capabilities and  ideas,  exhibiting  a ;can do; attitude
& seeing  problems as ;solvable;.
Maintain  a positive attitude in  the face of changes in  work  assignments or conditions.
Professional  Qualifications
Master of Computer Applications with  First  Class at an  Average of 72% from  Christ
College,  Bangalore University,  Karnataka.
Organization : ACS of India  Ltd.,  Bangalore.
Designation : Production Control  Associate
Period :  Aug  2005  to  till date
Total Years Of Experience : 8th AUG 2005  to  Till date.
IBM Mainframe Skills
VS-COBOL II,  JCL,  VSAM,  CICS,  DB2,  CA 7,  CA11,  ZEKE
OPERATING  SYSTEMS
MVS/ESA on ES/9000  IBM 3090,  UNIX,  MS DOS.
Project Profile
1.  ACS OF INDIA,  BANGALORE
Clients :  1.  SIRVA
2.  NORTHWESTERN MEMORIAL HOSPITAL
3.INGERSOLL RAND
4.ANTHAM CENTRAL
Period :  AUG
2005  to  till  date
Environment :
JCL,  CA7,  CA11,  Service center,  ZEKE
Description of  module :  ACS
(Affiliated  Computer services) serves multiple Businesses
with  data center Infrastructure Services,  delivering
Information  Technology  Services,  Expertise and
Productivity  to  enable ACS Business growth  globally.
Project  Description :  This Project gives support to  the data center  of  the
INDAINAPOLIS,  USA,  Affiliated  Computer
Services.  Currently  this project provides support
for SIRVA which  provides relocation  solutions,
Ingersoll-Rand  solutions provider with  powerful
brands and  Northwestern  Memorial which  deals
with  solutions for Health  Services.  The offshore
does the maintenance of  problems,  enhancement
work  and  also  provide 12  x  7  Production  Support,
production  monitoring  of  the systems being
maintained  by  ACS,  Bangalore.
Role and Responsibilities as a  Team Member,  involved :
Fixing  the job  abends based  on  the severity  of the job
Communicating  with  the onsite personnel  in  case of escalation..
Also  we provide the production  monitoring  of Different LPARS.
Ensure  all the  online  regions are  up  on time.
Ensure  the  timely completion of the  batch cycles as per the  schedule.
Undergone an internship hosted by Novell Inc. Bangalore under its
programme called the NOSIP (Novell Open  Source Internship Programme).
Project  name : Beagle (On  Linux)
Project  Duration  :  Feb 2005 to  June 2005
Technical Summary
Languages  C, C++, UNIX, Visual Basic  6.0.
Database Oracle 8.
Operating Systems  Linux (Novell Linux  Desktop),
MS-Windows.
Tools
Special Software Barcode Software (Self-Developed),
Some File system  Utilities.
Study on CDMA, SIP (Session  Initiation
Protocol),
Bluetooth  protocols  & stacks,
Symbian OS,
Barcode Design  & Development.
Front-end Development
Components  Deployment over the server
40 days  training from Quality Software System, Faridabad from June 2004 to  July 2004
40 days  training from  EscoSoft Technologies pvt. Ltd., Faridabad from  June2005 to July 2005
Languages:  C,  BASIC,  HTML.
Operating  Systems:  Windows 9x,  Windows 2000/XP,  MS-DOS,  LINUX.
Hardware:  Assembling-Dissembling  of  computers.
Networking:  LAN-WAN configuration
Industrial Training:
1.. B.O.C,  Jamshedpur
Studies of  different types of transducers and  their  calibration.
2.  Tata  Steel Jamshedpur:
PLC Modification  & Installation  of ultrasonic level sensor.
Sep 2003  to  till date : Working  as a Testing  Engineer  in  Softech  Global Solutions
(P) Ltd.,  Chennai.
April 2001  to  Aug  2003: Working  as a Technical  Executives in  Industrial Specialty
Chemicals ,  Chennai.
Sep2001  to  March2001: Working  as a Marketing  Executives in  Advent Fabrication
Industrial Project ,  Chennai.
Project Title : Corporate Information Management
Client : FALcon  solutions,us
Role : Team Engineer.
Team Size : 6
Testing  Tools : WinRunner7.0
Duration : March2005-Aug2005  (6Months)
Environment : VB 6.0,  ASP.NET with  SQL Server.
Description:
The Corporate Information  management Project is composed  of Four Major
Modules namely  Training  Management,  Marketing  Management,  Administration  and
Financial Management.  The Training  Management module deals with  Maintaining
information  about students,  faculties,  Batches,  Courses,  Training  aids,  Infrastructure,
Computers,  Peripherals.  Maintaining  information  about  Staffs like Personnel Management,
Skill  Sets,  Timings,  Weekly  Shift Schedules,  Salary  Details,  Incentives &   Allowances,
Appraisals,  Leave and  Transfers.  The Administration  Module deals with  Maintenance of
Faculty  Load  Charts,  Student  Attendance,  Weekly  Shift Schedule for Staffs,  Course
Allocations,  Classroom  Allocations,  Login  Id  creation  for students,  Issuing  ID  Cards for the
students,  Maintaining  reservations &   Cancellations for the Night Lab,  etc..  The Financial
Management  deals with  maintaining  data about  collection,  billing,  expenses,  conveyance,
invoices,  Cash/Cheque transactions,  Fine Amount Collection  and  Internal Rate of Return.
Preparation  of test cases
Integration  Testing,  System Testing,  Regression  Testing
Creation  of Test Logs based  on  the Requirements.
Defect tracking  and  reporting.Interaction  with  developers regarding  project  related
issues.
TITLE : TOURS PARADISE
Client : Son eva  flush ,  maldives
ROLE : Team  Member
ENVIRONMENT : Visual Basic 6.0,  SQL Server 8i
TESTING TOOL :  Win  runner7.0,  Test Director 6.0.
Duration : Sep2004-March2005(seven  months)
Description:
The project  will keep  track  of the vehicle details,  booking  and  route details.  The
system  must generate the ticket  and  the day-wise collection  report.  This system includes all
the details of Booking,  route,  Ticket charges,  Travel  agent,  vehicle master the details are
stored  in  database.  Before traveling  a ticket  must be booked..  The origin  and  destination  of
travel  must  be selectable from drop  down  list boxes.  On  entering  the number of persons who
are traveling,  the amount must be calculated  automatically.  The details are stored  in  the route
table.  When  entering  the vehicle master data,  the Veh  .no  must  be automatically  generated.
The type of the vehicles are the options whether Deluxe A/C,  Airbus The reports that  are to  be
printed  are the ticket and  the day-wise report.
Understanding  of Business Requirements and  Functional Specification
Preparation  of Data guidelines .Preparation  of High  Level Test  Conditions
Test case Execution
Defect  Logging  in  Test Director.  Final Report Preparation.
Project Title : ERP
Client :  Acalliz Enterprise.,  U.S
Role : Test  Member
Tools Used :  WinRunner 7.0  and  Test Director6.0.
Duration :  April2004  - Sep2004  (6  months)
Environment : Visual Basic 6.0,  SQL Server,  Windows 2000/NT 4.0/98,
Description
Enterprise Resource Planning  is used  to  manage the resource to  the fullest extend.
The integrated  features of the kit  are General Ledger,  Accounts Receivable,  Accounts
Payable,  Purchase Orders,  Sales Orders,  Back  Orders,  Quotations Billing,  Cash  Management,
Audit Trail,  Tracking,  Customer Data Management,  Supplier Data Management,  Chart  of
Accounts,  Instant  Statements,  Statistics,  Inventory  Control,  Sales Planning,  Sales History,
Timely  payment control,  Payment  advice,  Multiple Locations,  Multiple Countries,  Multi User
Real-time processing  Data compatible with  office applications and  Multi lingual support.
Role & Responsibilities
As a Testing  Engineer involved  in
Prepared  Test Cases,  Specifying  what  is the input  & expected  value
Conducted  GUI Testing,  Functional Testing  & Re gression  Testing
Participated  in  both  Manual and  Automated  testing
Automation  of the test cases for regression  testing  using  Winrunner,  Bugreport
generation
Title : Insurance Claim Process Management System
Role : Test  Member
Testing  Tools  : WinRunner7.0,  Test Director6.0.
Duration : Sep  2003  Mar2004  (6Months)
Environment  : Java,  JSP,  JavaScript1.1,  HTML,  Oracle 7.0
Description:
This is a product for insurance and  financial services organization.  This is a
core claim processing  system.  It is an  intranet  application  which  helps in  intake of claims,
claims processing,  performing  financial transaction  and  workflow  management.  Using  this
product  insurance companies can  reduce the cost  involved  in  application  maintenance,  make
the application  portable,  easy  data entry  operation,  easy  navigation  and  quicker access to
information  and  improves productivity.The modules involved  in  this product  are file,  claim,
office maintenance,  activity  notes,  diary  module,  billing  and  financials.
Preparation  of test cases
Integration  Testing  and  System  Testing.
Creation  of Test Logs based  on  the Requirements.
Defect tracking  and  reporting.
Worked as a Developer  in Abhik InfoTech (p) Ltd  Jabalpur MP.
Duration
Aug 2001-  March 2002
Abhik InfoTech (p) Ltd  Jabalpur (MP) is a global  software service company and an institute that provide
different courses to  the people. The company has constantly provided superior  technology, marked with continuous
innovations. The mission  is to provide state-of-art solution  and integrate them with the client.
Technical Exposure:
Host Platforms WINDOWS (XP/NT/2000), MS-DOS.
Languages C, C++, JAVA, J2EE.
Web Application Server  Tomcat 5.5.
Server  Side Concepts JSP, Servlet,  struts.
IDE Eclipse.
Database ORACLE, mysql.
GUI Visual  Basic  6.0.
Miscellaneous Software Development Life Cycle, Database Concepts.
Project Profile:
#1
Industrial Training Project:  2005
Project  name : Development of Portal  Website www.HotDeals.com
Organisation : Miracle Corporate solutions Pvt. Ltd., Noida (UP).
Team Size : 10
Module : Store Category and Deals Management.
Duration  : Jan 2005-May-2005
Roles&Responsibility Active member, involved in Design, Development and implementation  of code.
Environment  Java, Jsp, struts, mysql, Tomcat5.5, WindowsXP
Languages  Known  : C,C++,  Java
GUI  Tool : Visual Basic 6.0
Operating  System : Windows,  MS-DOS,  Unix,  Linux
Web Designing  : HTML,ASP
Backend  :  MS-Access,SQL Server,  Oracle 9i
Presently  working  in  BSES Rajdhani(  On  contract basis)  as a coordinator of  Quality
control team of Meter Management Group  in  M.M.P(  Meter  Modernization  Project)
department.
My  job  profile includes;
Convincing  consumers to  install Energy-Meters at their  premises and  also  solve
their  problems.
Supervising  the installation  and  quality  checking  of the Energy-Meters.
Coordinating  the Engineers and  Contractors involved  in  the process and  to  make
the progress chart of  day  by  day  installation.
Continuing  Certificate Course in  Embedded System  Designing  at  University  Of
Pune.
Project on-
Washing  Machine Control using  8xC51RD2  microcontroller
Using  Keil software on  SPJT  terminal.
Msc.  in Electronics from Sambalpur  University,  Jyoti Vihar,  Orissa with
61.42% in 2005.
The  present study is based  on the  data collected  from the  formal system (Municipal
Corporation)  of Kurnool city. Attempts are  made  to study regarding  the  management
activities concerned with solid  waste management of kurnool municipal
corporation.The  average  quantity of solid  waste  produced  in kurnool per day is
measured in metric  tones.Physical and  Chemical characteristics and average  density
of the  solid waste are  found  as per standard  methods. Garbage  houses may be
provided in the  areas where huge  quantity of solid  waste  is being  generated.Covering
of waste  at all stages of storage, collection and  transportation may be planned.
EXTRACURICULLAR  ACTIVITIES
Participated  as a volunteer in the  Technical Exhibition.
Participated  in the  workshop(AICTE sponsored  program on ENVIRONMENT
AND  POLLUTION AWARENESS)
Involved in development.
Entire functionality  testing.
Involved in support activities  during implementation.
Graduation MASTER OF SCIENCE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY (MS-IT)
University ManonmaniamSundaranar University, May  2004, Tirunelveli,
TamilNadu.
Graduation BACHELOR OF SCIENCE IN ELECTRONICS (B.Sc)
University ManonmaniamSundaranar University, May  2002, Tirunelveli,
TamilNadu.
Father's  Name G.Murugan
Date of Birth 14th May  1981
Marital Status Single
Nationality Indian
Permanent Address M.Gomathi Sankar,
A213, South Extension Road,
N.G.O.\u0022A\u0022 Colony,
Tirunelveli-627007.
Tamil Nadu, India.
Ph: +91-462-2552300
Worked as  a Technician Apprentice in Personnel Department, Administration Section of
National  Mineral Development  Corporation Limited (A Govt. of  India Undertaking),  Masab
Tank, Hyderabad for a period of  one year from July, 2002 to July, 2003.  The work  includes  the
preparation of Purchase orders, circulars, notices, passing of  bills  etc.
Did a marketing research on FMCG  product  in MMRC and also participated in the product
launch.
This  project was  meant to demonstrate the implementation of semaphores  and FIFO's, the IPC channels
of UNIX and field-lock. It deals  with centralized and decentralized database management and on-line transaction
processing of records  in savings  bank  application software.
In decentralized case, field-lock  and semaphores  have been used.
In centralized, the client-server module is  used where the client establishes  connections  with the server for all the
transactions. Server is  the daemon process  that interacts  with the database file and updates  the records  during on-line
transaction. The client establishes  connections  with the server through IPC channels  of UNIX such as  Message Queues,
FIFO's  and Shared Memory.
Summer Training  / Industrial Training  :
Name of the Organization / Institution Job Description / Duration /Period
From (MM/YY) To
(MM/YY)
TATA-STEEL,  JAMESHEDPUR,(AT-
S.N.T.I) JHARKHAND
Reduction of inventory  by  using
SAP & Steel making  process in
various shops at ES-Deptt.
31st May
2004
20th July
2004
2+ years of software industry  experience.
Expert  skills on  JAVA and  J2EE.
Versatile and  valuable contributor able to  work  as a team member and  as a leader.
Ability  to  prioritize when  presented  with  multiple tasks.
Educational Synopsis
Master of Computer Applications (MCA) from Periyar University  with 75.8%
(Distinction) in May  2002.
Bachelor of Computer Science (B.Sc.,) from Madras University  with 72%  in Apr 1999.
HSC  from State Board with 71%  in Mar 1996.
SSLC  from State Board with 73%  in Apr 1994.
Career Profile
Working  as a Software Engineer in  SanSoft Solutions,  Chennai from Aug  2003  - Till  Date.
Worked  as a Trainer Cum Developer in  GenexSoft Solutions,  Tirupur from Dec 2002  - June
2003.
Having  2  years of experience on  Java technologies (Java,  Servlets,  JSP,  JDBC,  Java Beans
& Struts).
Working  as a  Software Engineer in e-Wings Solutions in Hyderabad from Apr'
2004  to  till date.
Involved  in  developing  Servlets,  java beans and  JSP's for storing  a particular project  details.
Provision  for adding  and  modifying  the material  supplied  to  a particular site using  JSP.
Provision  is provided  adding  a unique project  name for a new  project.
Security  aspect  is taken  care every  time with  login  name and  password.
Handled  the client side validations for every  form.
MLM
Role : Programmer
Client :  Mohan
Pharmaceuticals Pvt.  Ltd,  Hyderabad
Software :  JSP,  JDBC,  Oracle & NetbeansIDE.
Duration :  Jan'05  to  Aug'05
Description
This project  deals with  Multi Level Marketing  Structure.  Every  Customer has number of Associates.
Each  Associate has two  Down  Line Associates.  It also  accounts information  of that  Associate,  who  is the
working  below  for that  associates and  how many  levels he completed  to  get proper amount from the
company  as commission.
The company  will decide how  the associates are working,  how  many  levels they  completed  and  etc...
It mainly  deals with  Tree Structure MIS.
Design  of Front End  using  JSP.
Involved  in  coding  to  store the customer details.
Business Logic for  Account
2
Generating  reports for  the specified  customer's profile.
HR
Project : HRPLUS
Company  : DATASOFT Development  India Pvt Ltd.
Software : JSP,  JDBC,  HTML,  Java Beans,Oracle & NetbeansIDE
Duration : Jun'04  to  Dec'04
Description:
The project goal  is to  develop  the complete web  enabled  solution  for the Human  Resources Management
of an  IT firm.  The project includes five main  modules namely  the Recruitment Procedure,  Exam-module,
Personnel Information  System,  HR Management and  Payroll.  Interested  candidates seeking  for the job  can
upload  their resume by  browsing  the site.  The uploading  of resume,  collecting  the basic information  of the
candidate will be taken  care by  the Recruitment  Procedure module.  After scrutiny  of the candidates is
done,  candidate is allowed  to  take the online Exam.  The other three modules include maintaining  the
personnel information  like his passport  details,  previous work  experience,  details regarding  his
employment  and  salary  etc.
Involved  in  developing  java beans and  JSP's for Profile,  Pass Port,  Skill,  Experience and
Qualification,  Recruitment module and  Interview  records of the HR module.
Provision  for adding,  deleting  and  modifying  all the skill sets of the candidates at a later stage
using  JSP.
Online Exam was developed  using  Java Applet and  Servlets.
Security  aspect  is taken  care for login  and  password.
Generating  reports of the profile.
1.
Dell International services
Oct `2004   Till date
Position: Team lead
2.
BEA Systems Inc.
May 2004   Oct `2004
Position: Senior Configuration/ Build/ Release Engineer
PAGE 1
3.
UTStarcom, Inc.
April `2002   April 2004
Position: Senior Configuration/ Build/Release  Engineer
4.
Future Software Limited  (SEI  CMM Level 5 & PC MM Level 3)
Feb  '2001   April `2002
Position: Senior Software  Engineer
5.
Indian Institute  of Technology (IITM), Tenet Group
Jan '1998 -  Jan '2001
Position: Software  Engineer
Project Wise Details:  Build and Configuration Management
1.
Get new features, bug fixes and  updated code  from all
the  developers. Compile/build/deploy updated code  till
no errors.
2.
Make  the  Release  Package / Installer.
3.
Make  Release note.
4.
Release  Package/ Installer to Production.
5.
Scripting  for Automation Build  / Deploy process.
6.
Troubleshooting  for all applications.
Team Size: 4
Environment:
Window XP,
Rational Clearcase
Tool
ANT1.5.3,  Install  Anywhere 5.5.1,IIS, Tandem
Languages:
Java,
weblogic  8.1
Script
Shell,
XML, MS   DOS BATCH File
1.
Get new features, bug fixes and  updated code  from all
the  developers. Compile/build updated  code till no
errors.
2.
Make  the  Release  Package / Installer.
3.
Make  Release note.
4.
Package  Deployments to QA.
5.
run the  test for QA engineer
6.
Release  Package  to System test and  Client.
Team Size: 1
Environment: Window 2000,  Linux, perforce, Rational  Clearcase, SQL Server  2000
Tool Install  Anywhere 5.5.1, Jbuilder8, ANT1.5.3
Languages: EJB, J2EE, jdk1, Java Server  Pages
Script PERL, Shell, XML, MS   DOS BATCH File
1.
Get new features, bug fixes and  updated code  from all
the  developers. Compile/build updated  code till no
errors.
2.
Make  the  Release  Package / Installer.
3.
Make  Release note.
4.
Package  Deployments to QA.
5.
Release  Package  to System test and  Client.
6.
Troubleshooting
Team Size: 1
Environment: Window XP, AdventNet WebNMS4, Jbuilder9, Rational  Clear  case
Tool Install  Shield Multiplatform 5.0, Install  Anywhere 5.5.1
Languages: Java2 (j2sdk1.4.0)
Script MS   DOS BATCH File, CGI/PERL, shell  Script
Project: Netman 2000 Installer
Client: UTStarcom Inc
Period: April `2002   Oct 2002
Description: Netman 2000 is a software  system  that serves as an element
management system  or a network  management system for
UTStarcom's access products. Netman 2000 intends to be  a
distributed  network management system with more  flexible
architecture  for future  expansion. It provides more  functionality
and fancier user interface compared  with that of Netman 4.0. It
was designed  in such a way that it might be easily ported to
WEB interface, that is, user can use  a WEB browser to manage
the  access network.
1.
Get new features, bug fixes and  updated code  from
all the developers. Compile/build  updated code  till
no errors.
PAGE 1
2.
Make  the  Release  Package / Installer.
3.
Make  Release note.
4.
Package  Deployments to QA.
5.
Release  Package  to System test and  Client.
6.
Troubleshooting
Team Size: 1
Environment: Window 2000 , AdventNet WebNMS 4 , Rational  Clear  case
Tool Install  Shield Professional  6.1
Languages: VC++
Script MS   DOS BATCH File, CGI/PERL, shell  Script
NMS/EMS  Projects
CygNet data transmission  behavior  using PERL scripts.
Installation  and demonstration for  visitors. Demonstration  of
CygNet at International  Trade Fair  (1999) held in New Delhi.
Q/A testing of all  the modules in the project.
Studying for  the new version  of CygNet.
Customization  of CygNet Release 120 for  Satyam Infoway.
(Chennai) & NIOT(National  Institute Ocean  Technology,
(Chennai) .
Development of Mosaic  Views in java.
Team Size: 20
Environment:
AdventNet WebNMS 4, CVS, Linux RH6.0, WINDOWS 95,  Jbuilder7
Languages: C++, Java 1.2, perl
Protocol SNMP, TCP/IP
PAGE 1
Project: CygPlan120 - Access Network Installation  Planning Tool
Client: Worldtel, Indian  Institute of Technology, Tenet Group, Chennai
Period: 01/1998 -  05/1999
Description: CygPlan is a graphical  installation  and planning tool  that is used
to  plan an access network for  a given  region. It has two parts. The
Excel  spreadsheets and the GUI. The spreadsheets perform
computations, the results of which are stored in  CygData -  the
database. The GUI based front-end can  be used to generate a map of
network elements for  a given region.
Position: Module Leader
Design  of System requirement specification.
Analysis of designing & structuring the Database.
Coding and module specific t esting.
Implementation of the software on client place.
Team Size: 6
Environment: AdventNet WebNMS 4, CVS, WINDOWS 95
Languages: VB 6.0, ODBC, Open  GL, MS   Excel
Protocol SNMP, TCP/IP
Hitendra
Hitendra Singh Solanki
Configuration Management  Group
PG Diploma (2006) in  system and  database administration  from CDAC,  Noida.
B.Tech  (2005)  (Electronics and  Communication) from
GRAPHIC ERA INSTITUTE OF TECHNOLOGY,
Dehradun  (Affiliated  to  H.N.B.GARHWAL UNIVERSITY,  SRINAGAR)
with  an  aggregate of  65%  marks.
Can take  independent responsibility as well as ability to lead, contribute  and  be  a
Productive team member.
Having  creative  problem solving, quick and  independent learning  skills.
Flexible  committed  individual  with excellent communication and  aiming to specialize
in developing  and design the  IT solutions for various domains.
Academic Chronicle:
Qualification Institution Board/University Year of
Passing
Percentage
M.C.A M.I.C.T,Khammam,
Andra Pradesh
Kakatiya University 2005 72%
B.Com
(CompApp)
S.S.R.J.C & De gree
College,Khammam,
Andra Pradesh.
Kakatiya University 2002 55%
Intermediate
Nayabazar Govt Jr
College,Khammam,
AndraPradesh.
Board  Of Intermediate 1999 47.3%
S.S.C
ShanthiNagar  School,
Khammam,
AndraPradesh.
Board  Of Secondary
Education(SSC)
1997 48%
Business  case:
Project Title: DUITS  (Driving  Under Influence o f Tracking  System)
Client:  Delaware  (US)  Office  of Highway Safety (OHS), Delaware  (US)
Department of Motor Vehicle  (DMV).
Duration:  Sep'05   till date.
Technologies  Used:
Languages : Java, Servlets, JSP and  HTML
Server : IBM Web  Sphere
Editor : Edit Plus
Database : Oracle 10g
Description:
The  Department of Safety and  Homeland Security, Office  of Highway Safety
(OHS), Delaware, is responsible  for the  operation of the DUI  program, which operates
through State and  non-state  agencies. The purpose  of the  DUI  Tracking  System is to
track a client from  the time  of conviction through the  duration of their treatment and
subsequent completion. Program delivery is achieved  through one  intake  office
(DERP)  and  multiple  DUI  providers, which are  located  through out the  state. The  state
agencies, which include  OHS, DMV, Courts all resource  this information within the  DUI
Tracking System. All information collected  and  shared  through out the  treatment
process is contained  in the  DUI  Tracking System.
Business  case:
Project Title: OSBRL (One-Stop  Business Registration and  Licensing)
Client:  Delaware  (US)  Dept., of Technology and  Information (DDTI),
Government Information Center (GIC), Department Of Revenue  (DOR)  and
Department Of Labor (DOL).
Duration:  Feb'05 - Sep'05.
Technologies  Used:
Languages : Java, Servlets, JSP and  HTML
Server : IBM Web  Sphere
Editor : Edit Plus
Database : Oracle 10g
Description:
The  purpose of the  One-Stop is to replace  the  current business-registration
and licensing  processes with a web-enabled  application that would  improve and
simplify the current multiple agency business registration process. The  organization
applying  for license is classified   into Profit and  Non-Profit Organizations, in which
Profit organizations have to purchase  license, while the Non-Profit organizations have
the  option of registering  the  business but not applying  for the  license, as it is not
mandatory for them. The organizations with employers have  to pay the
Unemployment Compensation to the Department of Labor (DOL)  through the
Unemployment Insurance registration. Registration is required  so that Unemployment
Insurance taxes may be collected  to fund  the  payment of unemployment insurance
benefits. The  application provides a record  of an employer's insurance  information for
the  Office  of Workers' Compensation.
Currently  doing  Part-time job  as faculty  in  college.
Currently  working with RM-InfoTech Noida based software company(8 month java exp)
Get 6 Month's  project Training from ViseshInfosystem Delhi for fulfillment of M.C.A. Degree.
My  knowledge is  backed up with Master in Computer application.
Have good understanding of SDLC process. With strong written and verbal communication skills.
Master of Computer Application (MCA)  Rajiv  Gandhi Tech. University  Bhopal in 2004 With 67%.
Working as SoftwareEngineer for Flash  Infotech  Pvt.  Ltd.,
(From Aug'03  to  till date)
Involved  in  Design  and  implementation
Technical study  of  SIP Protocol
Technical study  of  RTSP and  SIP architecture
Involved  in  coding
Project#2
Title : Voice Processing  for  PV9024E Packet VoX PBX Gateway
Team size : 4
Platform : Linux
Language used : C,Assembly
Description:
PV9024E Packet VoX PBX Gateway  is a data communication  system based  on  IP
technology.  Packet VoX PBX provides an  interface that enables existing  PSTN lines aide
devices to  be used  transparently  with  VoIP core packet transport network.Gateway
extracts voice samples from T1  E1  lines and  converts them to  a packetized  user
information  stream for  transport over  IP.  It performs CAS,  management functions,
playing  tones,  announcements and  applying  signaling  towards the PSTN.
S.Sarada
E-mail:rssm_01@yahoo.com
Software Engr.
Cont:+91-9880353540
Involved  Voice Processing  module
Participated  in  coding
Technical study  of  megaco  and  H.323
Project#3
Title : SSM(SIP SERVER  MODULE)
Team size : 6
Platform : Unix
Protocols used : SIP
Description:
SIP server  Module is a general-purpose stack,which  can  be deployed  along  with
the any  user  application.  SIP stack  is divided  into  different logical modules or functional
layers,which  are further  divided  into  different sub  modules for  establishing  multimedia
sessions,  SSM basically  is RFC3261  compliant.So  it supports almost all the parameters
& methods available in  RFC3261.Also  SSM HANDLES THE DIFFERENT Class5
features like CFU,CFNA,CFB,CT & CW in  this phase.
Go  through  architecture of  SSM
Technical study  of  Sip  protocol
Involved  in  Project report generation
Pursuing NCFM  (derivatives  market) from National Stock  Exchange of
India, chennai
Worked with PRABHUDAS LILLADHER Pvt. Ltd Gwalior (M.P)
JOB PROFILE- Assistant  Broker and Advisor for 1 year
Projects  Under Taken
ICICI Prudential- Selling of New NFO  (New Fund Offer)
KOTAK Securities- Selling of New ELSS (Equity  link  saving
scheme)
Awards  & Achievements
Won  2nd prize in  Stock  War competition- conducted by  Asean  B-
school
B- certification  N ational Service Scheme (NSS)
Merit in  Stock  Quiz    conducted by  Karvy  Consultancy  Gwalior
Interest
B.E
(Information Technology), Utkal  University,
Bhubaneswar
Page
1
of 2 Page
2
of 2
TRAINING
ORACLE 8i,  Oracle Forms,  Reports in 3rd Semester in Orissa Computer
Application Center (OCAC)  ,  Bhubaneswar.
DOT NET in 5th Semester in OCAC.
PROJECT1 :  PAYROLL SYSTEM
DURATION  :  3  months
ROLE  :  Designing,Coding
TEAMSIZE  : 7
ENVIRONMENT :  .NET
OPERATING  SYSTEM  :  Windows 2000
DESCRIPTION  :This  project shows the menu drive  program  of
employee
Routine activity in  a  company using .NET
concept.
Automating  the various activities  carried  out in a payroll system  such
as open  new employee,list of employee,see indivisual
employee,employee salary change,salary slip,edit employee.
Creating  database objects  like Tables,Indexes and Views.writing of
stored  procedure and function package database triggers.
Designing and developing using  .NET framework.
Project2 : CHAT MODULE
Project  description : This  software we have done in a small or mid size organization for distribution
of  information among the host/client.client  attached to this  chat module can communicate with
each other through local area network.software deals  with the communicationbetween the client-
server,client-clientand server-client  applications.the steps  are involved in this  are
Activate the server.the client can get connected to serverthrough login
by username and password.a new user can be logged by registration.
Message can be typedin the dialog box  and can be send by send
option.The server can views  all its clients  on the list box and client can
also  view active clients  listed in the list box.Lastly exit by dis
connecting the server.
Created database objects  like Tables,Indexes  and Views.Writing of stored
procedures  and Function,Packages,database triggers.
Designing and developing ASP.NET  and COM  components.
Page
3
of 2
One and  half years  of experience in  the filed  of production,  which  includes  assembly,
testing,  Quality  assurance and  final inspection.
A) One year apprentice training at Bharat Electronics  Ltd,  Bangalore.
Worked  in Low power  equipment  and  digital  communication departments.
Involved  in  module level testing,  trouble shooting  and  quality  assurance process
of VHF communication  equipments  and  FAX  machines
B)  Worked  at Austrian Technology  & System tech,  Mysore as contract
trainee for  six  months.
Involved  in  production,  quality  assurance,  testing  and  final  inspection  of
PCB manufacturing  process.
Educational  Qualification:  Three years  Diploma in  Electronics  & Communication
Engg  from Technical Board  of  Karnataka.
Employer : Sharma Industries  Pvt. Ltd.
Role : System Administrator.
Duration : Five Months.
Current  Employer  : NDS Infoserve
Role : Software Developer(On  VB and  Oracle)
Duration : One Month
2001  -2005  B.E  -EEE 76%(first class  with distinction) from
P.S.R engg.  College
(Affiliated  to  ANNA UNIVERSITY)
2000  -2001  XII  Std  (10  +2) (79.33%) from  Govt.hr.secondary  school,
Kallamanaickerpatti.
1998  - 1999  X Std  (10th)  (78.4%) from  Govt.hr.secondary  School,
Kallamanaickerpatti.
Working  Experience: Working  experience of 6.  2  months  in  oracle
(sql.plsql) and  dotnet technologies.
Current Employer: CMC Ltd,  Kolkata
Domain Experience: Under gone Domain  Training  in  Insurance for the
Gensys-Configrator (India's  First Insurance software developed  by  CMC
Ltd.) Kolkata
Training on \u0022TELECOM AND  NETWORK  PROGRAMMING\u0022  (Development and Testing)
in SUN  iTECH  Telecom & Academy, Chennai.
Linux  Operating System
Socket Level  Programming
Understanding  Requirement from SRS.
Creating  Test Cases.
Review of Test Cases
Execute  test cases as per plan
Report bugs using  bug  tracking  tool.
Responsible for Regression Testing,  Functionality testing.
I  had worked as  a Network  & Hardware Engineer in Rushahh Systems  Pvt.  Ltd., Ahmedabad,
Gujarat,  India. [11-06-2000 TO 15-02-2002]
I  had worked as  a Customer Support Engineer in Nigam Technology  Pvt.  Ltd.  Ahmedabad,
Gujarat,  India. [1-6-2003 TO  10-6-2005]
I have worked as  a Network  Engineer in WIPRO InfoTech Ltd. Work  for GOVERNMENT OF GUJARAT
VIDHANSABHA. GANDHINAGAR [10-6-2005 TO Still Date]
Working  as engineer  in  GE-IIC (INDIA INNOVATION CENTRE) since November  2005  to
till date.
Worked  as a junior  CAD engineer in  e-mug  technologies pvt  Ltd.,  Hyderabad,  since
August 2003  to  November 2005.
Having  around  2  years of experience in  software development using  Sun  Java Technologies.
Major  expertise lies in  Java,  J2EE  (Servlets,  JSP & Jakarta Stru ts),  Tomcat  5.0,
WebLogic 8.1  & Or acle 8i.
Ability  to  interact with  end  users,  self-motivated  and  quick  learner with  good  communication
ValueSoft  Technologies Pvt.  Ltd.,  Bangalore (Software Engineer)  From May  2004  to  till date.
Project  Summary
Project  Name :  E    Organization
Client : PREMIER  Instruments and  Controls Ltd  (  Pricol )
Duration  : September  '05  to  till date.
Software : JSP,  Servlets,  Oracle,  Eclipse.
Web  Server : Tomcat 5.0.28.
Description : E   Organization  is a client-server  application  (can  be extended  to  a web
application).  The System helps the organizations like : Corporate,  Institutions and  Industries.  It helps
the organizations maintaining  their  data properly,  which  were stored  in  ledger  all these days.  It is
aiming  at the overall improvement of  the organizations productivity  and  in  turn  their  Business.  It
supports various business activities.  It mainly  helps the Management team increasing  their  business
with  lot of  statistics details and  some Forecasting  Information.  It helps the quick  accessibility  of
information  for  valid  users.  It enhances the communications within  the organizations.  It brings up  lot
of  automations within  the system.  It helps a better Finance management.
Roles : As a Developer,  I  am responsible for  the following:
Responsible for  designing  and  coding  the components using  Struts Framework.
Involve in  developing  Payroll and  Finance Module.
In  Development and  code testing.
Project  Name :  Knowledge Base Management  System
Client : BankOne Corporation,  USA.
Duration : 7  months
Software : JSP,  Servlet,  JavaScript,  Oracle,  Eclipse.
Web  Server : Tomcat 4.0.1.
Description : The project facilitates the employees in  the organization  with  the information
related  to  search,  forums,  FAQs,  Contacts etc.  when  an  employee enters search  for  a criteria,  he gets
links to  all the associated  information.  When  an  employee wants to  post a question,  he can  do  so  by
registering  himself  and  then  entering  into  the forums section.  He can  get the answer  for  the question  in
forums where the answer  cans be provided  by  any  of  the employees of  the organization.  Similarly  all
the frequently  asked  questions and  contacts etc.  are maintained.
Roles : As a Developer,  I  was responsible for the following:
Responsible for  coding  JSP pages and  for  Servlet coding.
Establishing  database connection  and  Design.
In  Development and  code testing.
Project  Name  :  PAS (Production Accounting  System)
Client : Precession  Machine and  Auto  Component Ltd.,  Chennai.
Duration : 6  months
Software : JSP,Servlet,JavaScript ,Oracle.
Web  Server : Tomcat 4.0.1.
Description : The basic objective of  Precession  Machine and  Auto  Component (PMAC)  is to
develop  a traditional Production  Accounting  System with  the primary  focus for  facilitating  maximum
utilization  of  Machines and  at the same time tracking  timeliness of deliveries and  quality  of
components.  As a secondary  objective,  the system generates data on  employee hours,  normal,  OT and
incentive,  for  being  fed  into  the payroll system for  calculation  of  wages and  incentives.
Roles  As a Developer,  I was responsible for the following:
Responsible for  coding  in  complex  Business Logics using  JSP.
Responsibilities included  collecting  necessary  details from the client.
Development,  testing  and  Implementation.
Working  as a Programmer  at General Computers of India Pvt.  Ltd.  During  the year  2004  till
date from the month  June 2004
Coding  and  Manual testing  preparing  test cases on  the Lab,Radiology  and
EMR  modules and  providing  support from India to  the Implementing  team
and  the client place
Project #3:
Title: Payroll
Company  : General Computers Of  India Pvt.  Ltd.
Client : Ford  and  Adventnet
Software Used  : VB 6.0  and  MS Sql server2000
Team Size: A team size of  6  members
Description This project  has been designed to  main the pay  details of  the
employees of  Ford and AdventNet  and the other Loans ,Medical Reimbursement  details
and the various other allowances.The monthly  allowance applications for
reiembursements and the various other loans are handled in ASP for intranet.
Responsibilities Coding  and  ManualTesting  the Module
Project #4
Title: Inventory
Company  : General Computers Of  India Pvt.  Ltd.
Client : Shamanur  Sugars
Software Used  : VB  6.0  and  MS Sql server2000
Team Size: A team size of 6  members
Description This project has been  designed  to  maintain  the inventory  which  is the
stock  and  the consumption  of  the goods of  the company
Responsibilities Coding  and  ManualTesting  the Module
Worked as a Project Trainee at CMC Ltd., Kolkata from March 2005 to June
2005.
Completed Master of Computer Application (MCA) from Krupajal Computer
Academy  (Session:  - 2002  2005) affiliated to Utkal  University, Bhubaneswar
with 75%.
Completed a part-time training programme titled Certificate Course in VB.Net
from CMC  Ltd, Kolkata.
Completed a part-time training programme titled Certificate Course in Oracle 8i
with Developer 2000 from CMC  Ltd, Kolkata.
Work  experience of  1+  Years  in  ASP.NET,  ADO.net, SQL Server 7.0,  Oracle 9i  and  PL/SQL functioning  as  a
Software Developer  in  a CMMi5 company.
1) DEVELOPMENT  AND TESTING OF DIFFERENT  UNDERWRITING MODULES USING GENERAL
INSURANCE CONFIGURATOR PRODUCT DEFINITION TOOL FOR ICICI LOMBARD INSURANCE
COMPANY.
(At  Present  Working on this  Project)
Company : CMC LIMITED, KOLKATA, MUMBAI (CMMi 5)
Project Basic
Functionalities
: General  Insurance  Configurator  is  a suite of  components  that  satisfies  the need of  a
comprehensive  insurance  system.  Configurator has  been developed as  a product,  with  its
entire  suite  of components  serving  the  comprehensive  needs  of  a typical  insurance
organization,  or  as  individual  components  catering  to specific  organizational  needs.  These
Configurator  components  can be easily  ported  to platforms  of  choice and /  or  customized to
suit  as  the specific  business  practices  and  rules  of  an  insurance organization.
Configurator  has  a product  definition engine component  that  allows  the  users  to rapidly  define
new  insurance  products,  make changes  to existing products,  and establish  rules  that  govern
these products' behavior.
Specific  responsibilities  comprised  the following:  -
Involved  In Analysis  of  Client's  Requirement.
Involved  In Developing And Modifying Various  Insurance Products
Involved  In Various  Report  Generation according to  Client's  requirements
-  Testing  of  Application Software.
Team  Size : Worked in  a group of  30  Persons.
Role  : Developer
Duration : Currently  working  over it.
Responsibilities : Working as  a Programmer,  Analysis  and  Coding of  the above  mentioned system.
Software's : Implemented by  taking  Front-end tool  as  ASP .Net  and  Back-end tool  as  ORACLE  9i
2) Online Shopping Cart(Total 3 sites)
Company : MassoftInd, KOLKATA
Project Basic :
Functionalities
www.furniturescope.com ,Oregon bookstore, advanced color lighting. Those are The
Sites  for online shopping which Displays  many  products  category  wise and user can
choose and buy  online.
Role  : Whole responsibility  of requirement analysis, designing, developing, testing,
modifying of the sites.
Responsibilities : Working as  a Programmer,  Analysis,  Designing,  and  Coding of  the above  mentioned system.
Software's : Implemented by  taking  Front-end tool  as  ASP.net,  Back-end tool  as  SQL Server  2000.
3) Attendance Monitoring System
Company : Globsyn Technology, KOLKATA
Project Basic
Functionalities
: Keeps  track  of the employee's  attendance and gives  day-to-day  weekly  and monthly
reports  for individual, department wise and all employees.
Role  : Whole responsibility  of requirement analysis, designing, developing, testing,
modifying of the sites.
Responsibilities : Working as  a Programmer,  Analysis,  Designing,  and  Coding of  the above  mentioned system
in a  two member  team.
Software's : Implemented by  taking  Front-end tool  as  ASP.net,  Back-end tool  as  SQL Server  2000.
SN Informatics Pvt. Ltd.,
Date:  September 2002   December 2005.
Position: Software Engineer
Associated with projects such as:
1
Hospital Management  System for  Narayana Hrudayalaya, Bangalore.
Distribution Management  System  for  Intel  Book Distributors, Bangalore.
Fleet  Management  System  for  SN Constructions, Bangalore.
Pharmacy Module for  Narayana Hrudayalaya, Bangalore.
Material and Resource  Planning for  Narayana Hrudayalaya, Bangalore.
SN_ECG for  Narayana Hrudayalaya Tele-Medicine Project, Bangalore and NMC Group of
Hospitals Abu  Dhabi, UAE.
Interfacing  of Medical Equipments for  Narayana Hrudayalaya, Bangalore
SN_DICOM for  Narayana Hrudayalaya, Tele-Medicine Project, Bangalore
I am working in GIT- Incorporated for the past  1 year and 1 month from Jan2005 till
Feb2006,  mainly  in the field of client-server networking application development based
on Linux.
Technology/Protocols : AAA, RADIUS, LDAP,
TCP and UDP Socket programming,
ASN.1 encoding
Programming Languages : C
Operating Systems : Linux  (2.4 kernel)
Tools : GDB,  GNU make, CVS.
Transitioning  of the  campaign and  FTE planning  as per the work load  in key
deliverables.
Managing  a team of 300+ associates with 16 team leaders.
Taking weekly review with Team leaders.
Daily/Weekly reporting  to Senior Manager/ Directors.
Weekly performance  review with site  directors from Hewlett Packard.
Monthly performance  and  R&R meetings with AVP operations.
Attend transition calls and  performance  conference  calls bi-weekly.
Quality calibration with client.
Making preventive and  corrective  action plan to deal with errors.
Sanctioning leaves taking  buffer and  peak seating  into consideration.
Coordinating  with training  team  for new batch and refresher on floor trainings.
Coordination with HR  recruitment team for requisition of advisors for the  campaign.
Skip  level meetings with associates.
Worked as  a  Sr.Technical Team Leader for 1.6  yrs
The  general conspectus of the job  includes managing  a team of 20 agents. A
synopsis would  be handling  various queries of the  team, looking  after training  and
coaching  requirements, motivation and  the  growth of individuals along with
successful realization of client and  organization goals.
Headed  a team of agents providing  desktop support and  then moved  on to lead  a
portable team.
Briefing   all the  account associates on the  given metrics from the  client and  make
them understand  the  new process flow.
Took customer escalations on a regular basis.
Conducted  individual and  collective coaching  sessions of the  associates after regular
intervals based  on internal, customer and  client feedback.
Daily/Weekly reporting  to Manager.
Attend the calibration session bi-weekly, do joint monitoring  with the client and
discuss process issues with the client.
Represent in the weekly operations call with the  client.
Attend Quarterly Business Review, talk  about the  overall performance  of the  site  in
the  particular product line, take feedback from the  client and  consequently start
working  on it.
Handling  company's internal LAN network comprising of 12 systems.
Responsible for maintaining company's Internet network and  dealing  with day-to-day
troubleshooting  and research.
Responsible for installation and  troubleshooting  of systems at client end.
EDUCATIONAL PROFILE
Completed Bachelor's degree from M.D. University, Rohtak.
Pursuing Post Graduation Diploma  in Business  Administration from Symboisis.
PROFESSIONAL
Microsoft Certified System Engineer (MCSE 2000)
A+ Certified
Servicing  Compaq  Consumer Products Certified.
Working  as a Software Developer  at Scarab[inida] Pvt Ltd.  (  www.scarabindia.com ) since
from June 2005
Team  Leader  (Savings  Account)  with ICICI Bank  Ltd, Greater  Noida.
Bharti Cellular  Ltd. (Airtel)
Worked  with WORLDWIDE INFOSYSTEMS  (M) SDN.  BHD. In Kuala Lumpur (An
MSC.Status ISO  9001Company) as Pre  Sales Consultant from December 2003
to January 2006.
Nature of Job:
Delivered  hundreds of software  product presentations at conferences and
professional meetings to the  potential clients
Direct technical / business needs assessments via detailed  interviewing process.
Wrote  persuasive  RFP responses, clearly expressing  our product capabilities and
defining how those  products meet client needs
Presented  a clear choice  of business solutions to client for evaluation.
Helped  other team  members to close  the  deals.
Involved in different strategic marketing  campaigns, which Increased  sales
volume.
Developed  loyal customer base and  increased  sales volume  through personal
attention to the  client.
Worked  with APEX New Delhi as Sr. Engineer Marketing  from May 2001 to
November 2003.
Nature of Job:
Worked  as a member of a team  of marketing  professionals involved in the
business development of the  organization. Made  different marketing  plans and
their execution in order to achieve  the  sales targets with the  help  of team
members.
To identify and  target the  potential market segment to promote the  software  sales
as a reseller of DELCAM PLC. U.K. Performed  sales and developed  strategic
marketing  campaigns.
Made  hundred  of team sales calls, presentations and trade show appearances
during  a period  of increasing  traction, promoting  products fielding questions, and
cultivating  trust and  working  relationships
Worked  with Auto Desk  Inc. USA's Collaborated Organization CADD  centre New
Delhi as Marketing  Engineer from May 2000 to April 2001.
Nature of Job:-
To enhance  the business by making  new Clients in CAD/CAM software  sales,
training and  projects.
Completed MMM (Masters of Marketing  Management)  from Pondicherry University
(A central University)  in the  year 2003.
Have  done B.Tech (MECHANICAL)  from Jamia Millia Islamia (New Delhi)  in the
year 2000.
COMPUTER  LITERACY:
Working Knowledge of  DOS  MS Office Windows  98,  2000,  XP
Auto CAD  2002,  PRO  E 2000i,  Powershape & Powermill of  DELCAM,
PRIMAVERA PROJECT PLANNER  (P3)
M V Goud is a Graduate,  Microsoft Certified Systems Engineer (MCSE) and
Cisco Certified Network Associate (CCNA) with above 8  years of IT
Experience. Executed Network related projects in different companies and he
has wide technical expertise in Microsoft Based Client/Server Operating
Systems,  Back Office Servers and WAN Implementations/Support.
Worked in Multiple Projects that includes Large Scale LANs and WANs
Implementation/Support,  extensively worked on TCP/IP based networks
Strong knowledge of Mail  Servers, Data Base Servers,  Cisco Routers and
Switches. Specialized in Implementing Corporate Networks right from
Desktop Roll-out to Mail Server Configuration and Securely Integrating the
Private Network with the Internet.
Yash Technologies  Pvt  Ltd, INDIA
Sr.  Network Engineer
August 2004  Till Date
Employer :  Samtech Infonet , Singapore
Client :  Metro Cash &   Carry Development Company Pte. Ltd,
SINGAPORE
Systems Engineer
August 2003-July2004
DUNCAN  INFOTECH, INDIA
Network Engineer
January 2000  July2003
SP Software (Pvt) Ltd, INDIA
Customer Support Engineer
May 1997  to December 1999
Sr.Network Engineer-Yash  Technologies:
The Primary objectives :
Forecasting on IT infrastructure requirements,  workforce Management,
Capacity & Financial Management,  Vendor Management and strategy.
Primarily responsible for network monitoring,  Designing and
administration
Installation,  configuration, Operation and Maintenance of LAN.
Identify  & anchor process improvement initiatives,  System security
initiatives, technology deployments and its relevance/adoptability in
organization,  customer visits & Audits.
Setting up and monitoring quality goals and metrics,  ensuring Service
Continuity Management, setting training needs.
Management of Network,  System and User support both at the
Development Center and BPO.
Member of the Web site design team.
Designed attractive and flexible user interface using Dream weaver with JavaScript validations.
Testing and implementation.
2. Quantum Web site
Quantum International Pvt. Ltd   Delhi.
Software
Front end - JSP
Middle tier  :  Java  Bean,  Java Mail
Back end - Mysql
Platform - Linux (7) Server   Apache and Tomcat,  sendmail-8.12.5-7
Role Database  design, Coding, Developing, Testing and implementation.
Team Size 3
This project aims to  develop the network marketing business of the company and increase number of
distributors. Site has been divided into  three parts. Normal visitors, Members (distributor of the company)
and Administration part. Member section (http://www.quantumindia.net) has new products list, product
price list, member's rank, genealogy report, order form, Circular, Archives and more information. Entire site
can be controlled through administration section (http://www.quantumindia.net/quantumadmin). Public
web site's color, font style and size can be easily changed through admin section. Company Internal
employees can be chatted using chat module with out Internet connection. Private Chat, Public  Chat,
Permanent Login, Guest Login and Font and the Color made effective on one side of a  client will be
reflected on the other users linked with him.
Member of the design team.
Member of database design team.
Designed attractive and flexible user interface using Dreamweaver with JavaScript validations.
Testing and implementation.
Quantum International Pvt.  Ltd. is a  Multi Level Marketing Company. The company is having its software
Integrated Management Information  System (IMIS). Which is totally an ERP based application
software in Oracle 8i and Developer. The company is having different branches and consignee agents in
all over India  and they are having different Software. Providing technical support to branches and
consignees and sending them the scripts to  implement the required changes in the databases as well as
reports.
3. Luis Delivery System Software
Front end - JSP
Middle tier  :  Java  Bean
Back end - Mysql
Role Database  design, Coding, Developing, Testing and implementation.
Team Size 2
This project aims the day-to-day Cargo business of the company and increase number of customers. Site
has been divided into two parts. Members (Driver/employee working for the company) and Administration
part owner of the company. Two types of order can be there FCL (Full Container) and LCL (Low container
i.e. Half container).  Before beginning of trip or completion of the trip based on delivery (FCL/LCL) form are
made in which all the details has to be filled regarding pickup point & time, date and destination point
(date, time) and the items (taken in cargo) and its quantity taken in the cargo then accordingly bill with
charges of the driver is displayed. Order can be in either Open or closed state.
Member of the design team.
Member of database design team.
Designed attractive and flexible user interface using Dream weaver with JavaScript validations.
Testing and implementation.
4. Online Shopping
Software
Front end - Servlets
Middle tier  :  Java  Bean
Back end   MS Access
Role Coding, Testing and implementation.
Team Size 5
Member of the design team.
Testing and implementation.
Professional
Bachelor of Software System Course from G.G.S.I.P University (Four Year Degree Course) with 73%
marks,  passed out in 2004
Completed Oracle9i-Database Administration Fundamentals (Production-as a  part of Oracle Workforce
Development Program at NIIT Delhi).
Worked as  Computer  Operator  in Net World Net caf for  2 years.
Company : Micromen Systems & Software Pvt. Ltd, Chennai
Duration : June 2005 to Till Date
Designation : Finance Executive
Maintaining Accounts
Handling Bank  Work  and Petty  Cash
Handling Receivables  & Payables
Cash Flow Projection
Payroll
Page 1 of 3
Maintenance of MIS on Executive wise sales  Vs  Target
AMC Letters
Company : Manas Dash & Co, Bhubaneswar
Duration : July 2004 to March  2005
Designation : Paid  Staff
Planning & conducting Audit.
Preparation of Audit Report
Interaction with Management
Company : Koraput Farmers' Association  ( KFA )
Duration : June 2002 to June 2004
Designation : Accountant.
Preparation of Financial Statements,
Maintenance of Books  of Accounts,
Preparing Annual Audit Report,
Interaction with Auditors
Company : A. V. Devan  & Co, Chennai
Duration : August 2000 to May 2002
Designation : Article Clerk.
Planning & conducting Audit.
Preparation of Audit Report.
Interaction with Management.
Sun certified Certification in J2SE1.4 from NIIT ,
Bangalore.
Sun certified Certification in Web Component (Jsp &
Servlet) from  NIIT, Bangalore.
Web  application development  certification from NIIT,
Bangalore.
Engagement  Overview
Life Cycle for Risk Management System June 2005 - Dec. 2005
Application Server :  Web Logic 8.1
Organization
: Mimics east  Pvt. Ltd. (Hyderabad)
Client
WATLOW  ELECTRIC CO.  USA
Tem  Size
: 4
Role
: Developer
Environment
: JSP,  Servlet,  EJB,  Struts & Windows 2000,  SQL Server  2000
F  0  6  E
1
Includes overall planning, co-ordination,  control and
reporting of all  cost related aspects of the company.
F  0  6  E
1
Identify,  develop,  improve and better usage of companies
cost management system.
F  0  6  E
1
Defining of organization policies and building up
processes for the implementation of the same
F  0  6  E
1
Developing different systems to automate process to
increase efficiency and reduce expenses on various
elements of cost.
F  0  6  E
1
Preparation of cost models which will enable top
management for the decision making.
F  0  6  E
1
Renegotiating with the vendors and developing supply
chain management.
F  0  6  E
1
Preparation of cost budgets
May '01  to July'
04 Kota
k Mahindra Bank Ltd.
Senior Manager - Group Internal Audit
F  0  6  E
1
Internal  audit of Kotak Mahindra Group of companies.
F  0  6  E
1
Includes audit of different divisions of Kotak Mahindra
Bank Ltd.
F  0  6  E
1
Preparation of Risk based Audit plan and ensure execution
and compliance of the same.
F  0  6  E
1
To evaluate risk and suggest risk mitigation of different
products and systems.
F  0  6  E
1
Developing \u0022Alert Monitoring System\u0022  for Bank.
F  0  6  E
1
Rating of Branches based on adherence to policies and
procedures set by bank, Profitability, inherent risk etc.
F  0  6  E
1
Assignment basis internal audit of other group companies.
May `00    May '01
Kotak Mahindra  Finance Ltd.
Assistant  Manager - Corporate Credit Department
F  0  6  E
1
Credit appraisals of corporate finance and Technology,
Media and Telecommunication (TMT) sectors proposals.
F  0  6  E
1
Monitor scenario across industries and generate industry
reports to provide inputs for evolving dynamic  credit policy.
F  0  6  E
1
Generate MIS and credit bulletin covering key portfolio
information to enable monitoring portfolio level  risks.
Articleship
July '96    July `99
C.  B. Nakarani & Co., Thane
F  0  6  E
1
Varied exposure in Income tax and Tax Audits, Bank
branch audits.
F  0  6  E
1
Preparation of working capital forecast, Projected Trading
and Profit & Loss A/c,  Project Report for the purpose of
securing loan from banks.
Career Foundation
Chartered Accountant 1996
1999
F  0  6  E
1
Institute of Chartered Accountants of India,  New  Delhi.
F  0  6  E
1
Secured 42nd Rank in Final C.A. held in November 1999.
Cost
Accountant 1993
- 1996
F  0  6  E
1
Institute of Cost and Works Accountant, Kolkatta
F  0  6  E
1
Certificate of Merit in Final I.C.W.A.I  held in December
1996.
Bachelor of Commerce
1993  -1996
F  0  6  E
1
R. A.  Podar College of Commerce & Economics,  Matunga
Mumbai.
F  0  6  E
1
Undertook specialisation in Accounts & Auditing with
Elements of Operational  Research
and
Computer Applications
as optional  papers.
(1994  JUN-....
Presently  working  as Zonal Manager  (Karnataka Region) at  M/s Shriram
Transport  Finance Company  Ltd,  Zonal Office,  one of  India's leading  NBFC' having
turnover  of  Rs.6,  000  crores,  which  is also  an  associate of  Citicorp  Finance (India) Ltd  and
UTI Bank  Ltd.  Shriram's major area of  operation  in  Karnataka is hire-purchase,  lease
financing  for  HCV and  LCV's.
Job  responsibilities are mainly  in  the areas of Advances disbursements,  Credit
Evaluation,  Accounts and  administration,  financial management and  Delegation  and  reporting
From Dec  2002   Jul 203   Software  engineer and  tester in Streamline
Technologies, Bhilai, C.G
Aug  2003 - till date    Software  Tester in Tulip  Soft Corporation, Hyderabad
Pursuing  MBA from IILM Academy  Of Higher Learning,  Jaipur.
Secured first Division in MBA part1,  64%.  Campus (Batch 2004-2006)
Company  : - ICICI Prudential life insurance,  Jaipur.
Duration : -
Two Months.
Project Title : - Understanding the profile and recruiting of  Advisor.
Industrial Exposure
Company: -
Parle G,  Sanganeria  Mills,  NIMRANA.
Visited month: - February.
Presently  working  in Doomshell as a  marketing  executive (Web  Development Company,  since- 2004  )
1  year marketing  and designing  experience in Best Solutions (Web  Development Company,  2002-2003)
Having  more than 4  year experience as a  L.I.C Advisor.
Two  Month experience working  with PCL out bound call center in Gurgaon.  ( customer care Executive )
ProSoft Consultant Software  Developer Sep. 2005  till date Nasik
Dove Infotech Software  Engineer Dec. 2004  Sep. 2005 Navi Mumbai
ProSoft AutoSolution Jan 2006  till date
Software Developer: ProSoft Consultant
Briefs: Finance and Inventory  system for Automobiles  Industry. The Project involved inventory
related solutions  for the Automobiles  industry. It is  an intranet-based system. The effective
communication between the departments, such as  Spare Sales, Cash Counter & Service Center.
Role: Responsible for the modules  Spare  Sale module, Cash Counter module, and
administrative levels  report analysis  & design & development.
Technologies Used: Java (JDK1.4), Swing, Applet, Html, MS- Access  and Windows  2000
Team Size: 4
Photon Control Sep 2005  Dec.2006
Software Developer: ProSoft Consultant
Briefs: Inventory  & Management system for Mechanical Industry. The Project involved inventory
related solutions  for the Mechanical industry.
Role: Responsible for the modules  Masters, and transactions.
Technologies Used: Java (JDK1.4), Swing, Applet, Html, MS- Access  and Windows  2000
Team Size: 4
rasad S. Kothawade
A Post Graduation Level Training  and Project
Dove-Soft December 2005  May 2005
Trainee Engineer: Dove InfoTech.
Briefs: Finance and Inventory  system for Diamond and Jewelry  Industry. The Project involved
complete accounting and inventory  related solutions  for the Diamond industry. Accounting
package is  a financial management solution that delivers  the value of the financial processes  by
enhancing data availability, financial controls  and comprehensive financial reporting. The System
having the
Integrated  manufacturing  and  accounting  modules  to cater  to all  functions  of  jewelry
business.Modular  approach  to maximize productivity  and  control,  User-friendly  Graphical  User  Interface
(GUI) with  complete mouse and keyboard support,
Multiple security  levels  to protect data from
unauthorized access.
Role: Responsible Team Member in Financial Module, Financial Reports  and Inventory  Reports.
Team Size: 7
Technologies Used: Windows 2000  server,  JDK1.5,  JSP,  JavaScript and  MS SQL Server
Dia-Jewel June 2005  Sep.2005
Employer: Dove InfoTech Pvt. Ltd.
Briefs: Finance and Inventory  system for Diamond and Jewelry  Industry. The Project involved
complete accounting and inventory  related solutions  for the Diamond industry. Accounting
package is  a financial management solution that delivers  the value of the financial processes  by
enhancing data availability, financial controls  and comprehensive financial reporting. The System
having the integrated
manufacturing and  accounting modules  to Barcode  Support  for  Jewelry  Sale,  MIS
Reports  for  Statistical  Analysis  Modular  approach  to  maximize productivity  and control
Role: Responsible Team Member for Inventory  module, Warehouse module, MIS Reports,
Financial Reports.
Team Size: 7
Technologies Used:
Windows  2000 server, JDK1.5, JSP, JavaScript and MS SQL Server
Presently  working  for  Vajra Solutions
1)  SQL Reporting  Services (VAJRA SOLUTIONS)
S/W: VB.NET,  SQL Server 2000  and  SQL Server  Reporting  services.
Designed  a reporting  solution  by  importing  data from third  party  ISP web  host/Database
host into  the in-house SQL Server database,  Wrote SQL Stored  procedures that generates
and  summarizes data,  used  SQL Reporting  services and  created  reports that are scheduled
to  be delivered  weekly.  Managed  SQL reporting  services administration  via Reporting
services web  interface.
2)  RZIM Zacharias International Ministries (Olive
Technology
S/W: VB.NET
1of 3
This project is done on  VB.net ,  using  back  end  Access database and  it is totally
windows based  application  .It contains two  types of  databased  connection  ,  one with
Access Database located  on  the same system which  updates every  week  the main  server
located  in  Chennai (SQL server database is used).
The project contained  accounts,  members ,  library  ,  issue register  ,  return  register
goals ,  assets ,  stocks and  stock  maintenance.
3)  Inventory  Control System (CMC)
S/W:  C#  .NET
Designed  and  developed  an  automated  inventory  system that can  be used  to  store
the transaction,  product details,  and  issue purchase orders.  Various reports have been
generated  to  help  the users allowing  the restaurant customers to  use the information
online.  The process involves,  two  parts.
4)  E-Restaurant (CMC)
S/W:  Java,  Webserver2.0.servlets,  JDBC,  and Oracle 8 .  Designed  and  coded
the entire system that deals with  not only  automating  the restaurants information  but also
Restaurant owner has to  register with  e-restaurant.com in  order to  provide his facilities to
the registered  users.  This facility  includes Menu  maintenance,  Catering,  Room booking,
Profile Updating.
Customer  has to  register  with  e-restaurant.com.  Each  registered  user can  access
the facilities provided  by  the registered  Restaurants such  as,  selecting  the Menu  item,
ordering.  Users can  search  for  the restaurant information  through  SEARCH
RESTAURANT or  by  FAVOURITE SEARCH
Coding
Documentation
Functional Testing
Regression Testing
#2. Project Name : Students  Attendance System
Platform  : Win 2000
Summary : `Students  Attendance System' This  application is  an
attendance register. There are options  for adding, editing, updating and deleting the
student, class, subject and daily  attendance information, also for getting attendance
report. All tests  are written and executed manually  to check  the functionality  of buttons,
options, runtime message windows  etc  and to find the faults.
Writing & Executing Test Cases
Functional Testing
#3 . Project Name : Library  Manager .
Platform : Win 2000
Summary :`Library  Manager' is  a complete Solution of All Library  related
work..It has  various  Features  such as  Printing Reports, Checking for Books  not deposited
in time, Fine Control over Students  etc. We can Add details  of Students,Staff members
and transaction done by  them.Also information of Books, Magazines  and Newspapers  like
purchase or issue or deposit information can be maintained.
Writing & Executing Test Cases.
Functional Testing.
Working  as a Software Developer in  Java  application  for  \u0022Hykin Software
Solutions \u0022,  Chennai,  from Dec 2004 to  till date.
B.Tech  Information Technology with  76.2% at Krishnasamy  College of
Engineering  and  Technology  (affiliated  to  Anna University),  Cuddalore.
Grade : First  class with Distinction Year  of  Achievement : 2005
Having  2 years experience  of Software  development .
Expertise  in development using  Core Java, Java Swings, JDBC, Socket
Programming.
Participated  in complete  SDLC.
Involved in requirement analysis & tech nical design.
Having  good exposure  of unit testing.
National Institute of Science  Technology and  Development Studies, New Delhi as
Software  Engineer from March 2005 to Till Date
System Exposure:
Operating  Systems : Windows 9x/2000/XP, DOS  6.2, LINUX, UNIX
Languages : C, C++, Java, Visual Basic  6.0, SQL.
Database  : JDBC,DB2 and  MS-Access 97/2000,.
Internet Technologies : HTML, DHTML, JavaScript, Java and  Networking,
Java Swings,Multithreading,Servlets,Applets.
Editors : TextPad.
Other Technologies : Computer Architecture.
Application Designed  in two phases
First Phase  involves migration of CMIE,Capital Line, IBID  database  into one
main database
Data Modeling  & Desi gn of main central database.
Validation of Data.
Second phase  involves defining   relationship  between previously used
databases (CMIE,Capital Line, IBID  )and  provided  one  common frontend for
data extraction using  Core  java, Java Swings, JDBC.
Involved in Implementation & ma intenance  of project.
2.  Analysis  of  Indian Patenting Activity in International & Domestic Patent
system:  Contemporary Scenario
Client :  Indian Patent Office
Environment :Java Swings,JDBC,Windows XP, MS  Access2000.
Team Size : 4
Role  : Developer
Duration : Jan'2004 to February'05.
Downloading  the  data available  on Internet.
Processing  of data into a form that extracted  the  relevant fields by using
Bibexcel.
Developing  Application to transfer the formatted  data into tabular form  in
Access.
Validation of Data
Providing  user friendly Interface  for categorized  retrieval of patents for the
easy reference  e.g. Retrieval on the basis of Patent number, Sectors, Sub
sectors, IPC codes etc.
Educational Projects:
1.  Network Address  Translation (NAT) Router
Client : Banasthali Vidyapith Rajasthan
Environment : Java, Java Swings, JDBC, Java Networking, and Linux.
Team Size : 4
Role  : Developer
Duration : Jan `03   April'03
Description:
Developed  a GUI  based  Router Simulation Program in JAVA for demonstrating  the
basic types of address Translation mechanism handled  by an actual NAT router in real
world. The  various translation Static Address translations,  mechanisms simulated
are  Dynamic Address  translation and Overloading. This involves the
management of Address translation database  using  JDBC, GUI  development using
JAVA SWINGS. The  network connectivity was implemented using  JAVA Sockets
API's.
National Institute of Science  Technology and  Development Studies, New Delhi
as Software  Trainee  from Jan 2004 to February 2005.
Operating  systems
Data Communication & Netw orks
Software  Engineering
Computer Architecture  & Or ganization
Data Structures
Microprocessors & Mi crocomputer Applications
DBMS
Compiler Design
Seminar Delivered:
Delivered  a seminar entitled  \u0022NATURAL LANGUAGE PROCESSING\u0022 at AIM & AC T  of
Banasthali Vidyapith, Rajasthan.
To  gather  requirements for business process.
To  build  automated  interface based  on  Web  Services using  JSP,
Windows & SQL Server.
The Project  :  The aim of  this project was to  implement a shopping  cart for the
client of  the ATS InfoTech  Pvt.  Ltd  using  the J2EE technology  (JSP
and  JAVA).
The shopping  cart we created  provides transient storage to  hold
any  number  of  items selected  by  user.  It provides the functionality  to
add  items,  remove items,  and  change the quantity  of  an  item in  the
cart.
Special Software : Windows Server  2000,  JSP,  Java.
Web Server : J2EE Server.
Database :  SQL Server-2000.
Work Location : ATS InfoTech  Pvt.  Ltd.,  Pune
B.E.PROJECT:
Title :  Rice Mill Automation System.
Period :  8  Months
The Project  :  The Project basically  deals with  the automation  of  a rice mill.  It
can  be seen  as a small relational management system.  The goal of
the project is to  support people and  systems working  together in
effectively,  efficiently  and  innovative manner.
The software consists of  different modules such  as a Account,
Production,  Purchase,  Sales etc.  which  together  represents the
transactions and  information  Flow within  the organization.  The
software is developed  as a client-server  application  which  enables to
maintain  scope of the project according  to  the different users.
It provides easy  to  use visual interfaces binding  different
processes together  and  creates a user-friendly  workflow model.
Technology  Used :  Java,  JavaScript,  JDBC.,  MySQL.
Servers :  Tomcat,  MySQL.
PAPERS AND CONTESTS:
Viruses & Hack ers: Presented  at Bharati Vidyapeeth's College of  Engg.,  Kolhapur.
Company : FIDELITY INVESTMENTS,KVH,BANGALORE
Job : NETWORK ENGINEER
Experinece : 2+  months
Having  5  months of experience in  QA department,  worked  as a QA member in  XSYSYS
TECHNOLOGIES which  is a mnc based  belguim company,  located  in  electronic city.
Visualized  the procedures in  to  flow diagram using  microsoft visio  6.0.  worked
on  iso  9001-2000  and  bsw 7799  standards.
YEAR COURSE DIVISION UNIVERSITY
2004  DNIIT IST NIIT
(Software Engg.
Diploma)
2005  PGDBA Perusing  PGDBA from SYMBIOSIS
CENTER  FOR  DISTANCE LEARNING
Will be doing  specialization  in  FINANCE
WORK EXPERIENCE:-
Worked  3  months in  CENTURION BANK OF PUNJAB,  handled  front-end
operations & ATM department.(Worked  in  FINNACLE)
AREAS WHERE  I WORKED IN CENTURIUN BANK OF PUNJAB
ACCOUNT OPENING-  Saving,  Current,  Partnership,  Propertership.
OPENING OF FIXED DEPOSITS
ATM DEPARTMENT-  Debit cards,  cards renewal,  lost cards,  Pin  number,  stuck
cards.
INWARD RETURN
OUTWARD RETURN
HIGH VALUE LODGING
CHARGES (Shadow charges,  Refund  charges,  Return  charges)
TRANSFER  OF CHEQUES
MAKING DRAFTS (Delhi & Outside Delhi)
PASSBOOK PRINTING
STATEMENT PRINTING
CUSTOMER QUERIES
PHONE QUERIES
MAINTAING ALL THE FILE WORK
MAINTAING COUREIR  REGISTER(Inward  & Outward)
Worked  3  months in  NIIT as MIS Trainee.
AREAS OF PROFESSIONAL INTEREST:-
Management Information  Services
Back  Office Operations
Financial Operations
Institute/Organisation Nature of  work
Creative computer education Centre manager cum  faculty
To  manage the centre and do  the
Administrative related work also
Worked as a  faculty  giving  training  in
Wordstar,  Lotus,  Windows 95,
Ms office 97,  Foxpro
Duration 6  months
Maharashtra  institute of  computer
Education (  M.I.C.E.) Worked as a  faculty  /marketing
Executive
Duration 3  months
National Education Societies National
Computer Centre (N.E.S.)
Worked as a  Faculty  & Hard ware support
Engineer
SVB's Pharmacy  College
Duration
Working  as Centre Co-ordinator & Le cturer
in the I.T.  subject  and also  as a  hardware
engineer & was also  appointed as External
Examiner by  the University  of Mumbai.
3  years
Hardware experience Done assembling  of  machines and worked on
Lan settings,  installation and trouble shooting.
SITEL India  LTD Worked as a  Customer Support Professional
for the DELL process.
Accenture Presently  working  as a  Senior Customer
Support  Professional for SBC yahoo  DSL.
One Year work  Experience as  Office Assistant in Sky  Net World Wide Express  Chandigarh.
One Year work  Experience as  Hardware Engineer in Indo-Info System Pvt. Ltd in Chandigarh.
Six  months  work  experience as  a Web Developer in Staller Solution In Chandigarh.
Currently  working as  a Test Engineer in Integrated System Management Gurgaon.
Professional Qualifications
MCA M. D. University  Rohtak  (Haryana) in 2004.
PGDCA M. D. University  Rohtak  (Haryana) in 2002.
Computer  Hardware Diploma in Computer Hardware from SSIOS Chandigarh.
Certification: -
Certification in Software Testing  Undergone two months  software testing training (manual
and automated tools) in WebTek  Labs  Pvt. Ltd. (IBM Partners, Naraina New Delhi).
Operating  System : MS WINDOWS 98,  WINDOWS XP.
Languages : C, C++, PL/SQL, HTML.
Microsoft  Technologies :  VB 6.0.
DBMS Packages :  ORACLE 8i,  Access.
Presently pursuing MCA  from Guru  Jambheswar  University, Hisar. Adept at using various
programming languages, technologies and tools.
A dynamic  go-getter  and quick learner  with ability to work under  pressure and meet deadlines.
Excellent analytical, logical, good written and verbal  communication  skills.

OCTOBER-2004 to Till Date @  Advanced Network Technologies Pvt. Ltd,
BANGALORE.
Organisation Delhi Metro Rail Corporation Ltd.
Designation Network  Engineer
Job Type Contractual
Period 4th September 2002 to till date
Managing the overall administration of LAN & WAN system
Commissioning network  equipments, computer, hardware devices  routers
switches  and softwares, ensuring maximum up time.
ERP SAP (R/3) Administration
Installing & configuring AD, DNS, DHCP, Proxy  & Fi rewall etc.
Preventive maintenance of network  & data communication hardware and
software environment.
Organisation Apex  Computers
Designation Resident Engineer
Period 18th March to 29th August 2002
Jai Ganesha Namah  Om Namah  Shiyav  Jai Garib  Nawaj
1/2
Installation, troubleshooting & administration of windows  98/ME/NT
Maintenance and troubleshooting of Hardware devices.
Cisco Certified Network  Associates  (C.C.N.A.)  from Institute of
Networking & Technology
Microsoft Certified System  Engineer (M.C.S.E) from Institute of
Networking & Technology
One year  Hardware Diploma Course form Jet King
Working as a Tester in Quick  Sort India  Pvt Limited from April2005 to  till date
5.Project Name:  V-Care Trichology
Description of  the Project:
This project is done  for a hair institute.
Link:  www.vcaretrichlogy.com
Roles And  Responsibilities:
Design of small animations in Photoshop.
Preparing  Test Cases.
Testing  for both Unit Testing  & lo ad  testing.
Testing  the  Functionalities.
Preparation of Test Log  after Execution of Tests.
Preparation of Interim Test Report.
Development tools:
Environment:  Adobe  Photoshop, Flash, and  WINXP.
Testing  Tools: Unit & Lo ad Testing.
Duration:  1 month
5.Project Name:  Quick  Track
Description of  the Project:
Quick Track is a product that will automate the processing  of the  E-Publishing
department. There  will be  a no. of processes involved  in the  department once  all the
process are  over it comes to the administrator who sends to the  client. There  are
many reports created. All the  reports can be  generated  based  on date  ranges.
Roles And  Responsibilities:
Preparing  Test Cases.
Testing  the  screens for Regression, Unit testing & lo ad  testing.
Testing  the  Functionalities.
Preparation of Test Log  after Execution of Tests.
Preparation of Interim Test Report.
Development tools:
Environment:  Asp.net, C#. SqlServer
Testing  Tools: Unit & Lo ad Testing, Regression Testing
Duration:  2 month
1.Project Name:  Bank  Re-Conciliation
Description of  the Project:
This project mainly deals with cash income  and  outflow and the loan provided
by the  firm to its employees and the firm's loans etc. this project will help  the
accountant in maintaining the records easily and  can track the records
Roles And  Responsibilities:
Design and development of screens using  Vb.net
Preparing  Test Cases
Testing  for both Manual & Un it Testing
Testing  the  Functionalities
Preparation of Test Log  after Execution of Tests
Development tools:
Environment: Vb.net, SQL server
Testing  Tools: Manual & Un it testing.
Duration:  1 month
2.Project Name:  Production Status
Description of  the Project:
It is used  to track the  individual employees per day's work and  it is also used
to create reports.
Roles And  Responsibilities:
Design and development of screens using  Visual Basic 6.0.
Design of Database in MS-Access
Preparing  Test Cases
Testing  for both Regression & Unit Testing.
Testing  the  Functionalities
Preparation of Test Log  after Execution of Tests
Preparation of Interim Test Report.
Development tools:
Environment: Vb6.0, MS-Access, WINXP.
Testing  Tools: Regression & Un it testing.
Duration:  2 month
3.Project Name:  Document Count
Description of  the Project:
This project is done  in order to automize  the  file   transfer from servers to
their sub  servers.
Roles and Responsibilities:
Design and development of screens using  Visual Basic 6.0
To integrate  the  server with five o ther servers.
Testing  for both Regression & Load  Testing.
Testing  the  Functionalities.
Development tools:
Environment: Vb6.0, MS-Access, WINXP.
Testing  Tools: Load  & Re gression Testing.
Duration:  1 month
4.Project Name:  Copy Editing  Staff P erformance Monitor
Description of  the Project:
This project provides provision to generate  Staff Performance  Reports based
on a particular day, between two given dates, month-wise. This helps the  Copy
Editing  Head  in assigning  targets to each staff based  on their performance.
Roles And  Responsibilities:
Design and development of screens using  Visual Basic 6.0.
Design of Database in MS-Access
Preparing  Test Cases
Testing  for both Regression, Unit Testing  & lo ad  testing.
Testing  the  Functionalities
Preparation of Test Log  after Execution of Tests.
Development tools:
Environment: Vb6.0, MS-Access, WINXP.
Testing  Tools: Unit & Lo ad Testing.
Duration:  2 months
5.Project Name:  KG-Games
Description of  the Project:
This project is done  to a Malaysian school, which is used to teach the  kids in
the  school.
Roles And  Responsibilities:
Design of small animations in Photoshop.
Preparing  Test Cases.
Testing  for both Regression, Unit Testing  & lo ad  testing.
Testing  the  Functionalities.
Preparation of Test Log  after Execution of Tests.
Preparation of Interim Test Report.
Development tools:
Environment:  Adobe  Photoshop, Flash, and  WINXP.
Testing  Tools: Unit & Lo ad Testing.
Duration:  1 month
ADDITIONAL COURSES
Attended implant training  in Nadi Airtechnics, Chennai
Undergoing  Career Development Class in CDFI
Attending  a Diplamo Course  in STC for software  testing.
IMPORTANT RESPONSIBILITIES  HELD
Organizing  committee member of Elixir 2k3
Vice  President Of Elixir 2k4
Organizer Of Department Alumni
Organizer of Various Programmes in the  Department
1  + year  of  experience in  IT field,  having  knowledge in  C,  C++,  RTOS
(VxWorks),  Microcontroller and Embedded applications.
Completed  Industrial oriented  training  on  Real Time Operating  Systems (RTOS)
in  Cranes Software International Ltd.
Experience in  protocols like I2C,  TCP/IP and  L2CAP for Bluetooth.
Exposure to  `Socket Programming' and  `Device Drivers'.
Exposure to  Tornado  2.0  IDE and  Keil uVision  1.3  Simulator.
Total Experience : 1+ Year
Current Employer : Chip  Integration  Technologies (I) Ltd.
Designation : Software Engineer
Date of  Employment : January  2005  to  Till Date
More than one-year experience in Programming of various applications in
Microsoft Technologies.  Extensive knowledge in VB,  ASP and Crystal Reports with
back-end Oracle and SQL Server.  Excellent oral,  analytical  skills and efficient team
player.
From August 2004  to till  date: Programmer in GC Info India, Chennai.
Company : Career Destiny consultancy August 2005  onwards
Role :  Resource Consultant
Description: Briefly,  Career Destiny  is one of  the leading  organizations providing
solutions to  your  staffing  requirements.
An  organization  that caters to  staffing  needs of  leading  companies in  the IT Industry.
The client list includes IBM,  Microsoft,  Lucent Technologies,  Siemens Communication
Systems Limited,  LogicaCMG,  Nokia,  Dell,  H.P.,  Flextronics,  Wipro  Infotech,  HCL
Technologies,  Logica CMG,Philips,Texas Instruments,Sasken,  Planetasia among  other
major  players.
Matching  the profile of the candidates from the existing  data bank  and  short
listing  them as per the requirement.  Sourcing  of  new candidates if  the database is
not sufficient.  Preliminary  interview of  the candidate before sending  them to  the
clients place.
Screening  and  Segregation  of  profiles to  suit the client's requirements.
Interaction  with  the candidates,  briefing  them about the requirement and  to  know
their  willingness.
Preliminary  interview of the candidate before sending  them to  the clients place.
Co-ordinate with  the Candidates for  availability  & interviews.
Follow up  with  the clients on  a daily  basis to  know the interview results/status.
Intimating  the results and  status of  the interview to  the candidates.
Follow up  with  the clients and  the candidates.
Maintenance of  HR information  system like,  client's requirements,  Interviews
Scheduled,  selected,  rejected  candidates.
In-plant training  at BSNL -Karaikudi for  10  days in  the field  of  OFC.
Training  in  Real Image Media Technology-Chennai for 24  days.
PROJECT SUMMARY   PART OF CURRICULUM
Stream  Analyzer
To  Design  the Stream Analyzer  using  compression  format MPEG2  which  reduces the video
file in  the ratio  of 100:1,  so  as reduce the storage capacity  of  the hard  drives and  to  study  the
Frame details of  each  frame
Traffic Light  Control using  Microprocessor 8085
To  design  traffic light control for  the four  way  crossing  using  8085  processor  so  that traffic
signal is controlled  automatically  by  the processor.
SKILLS SETS
Programming  Languages : C,  C++,  JAVA,  ASP,  HTML,  and  VISUAL BASIC.
Back  end  Tools : PL\u005CSQL,  MS-ACCESS.
System Software : WINDOWS 95,  WINDOWS 98,  WINDOWS XP
PROJECTS DONE
PRN COMPUTERS WEBSITE DESIGNING
Front end  -  html & dhtml with  asp
Back  end  - access
Operating  System - Windows XP Professional
Description:
The main  aim of  the project is to  design  the website for  the Computer  Centre
which  includes the details of  the computer  courses and  to  see the result for the student
studying  in  the Computer  Centre.
COMPANY DATABASE MAINTAINANCE
Front end  -  VB 6.0
Back  end  -  access
Operating  System - Windows XP Professional
Description:
The objective of the project is to  design  the Database for  the Computer
Centre which  updates the day-today  activities of  the Company  and  to  generate the
Report when  it is necessary.
Current project:
Library  Management using  ASP.
Working  as project coordinator from May2005  to  till date in  PRN COMPUTERS (Affiliated
to  TCPS INFOTECH INDIA LTD)
17  June 2005-Till date :
Serving as Senior Officer for Investment & Services at ICICI Bank,  Delhi.
Completed Final Semester  project from Aerospace system  private Limited.The application developed
was
Web-Based Transport Management Application.
Developing new range for Asda and Esprit accounts as
per the new  trends and indication.
Sourcing new fabrics and developing new  concepts .
September 2004    November 2005:
Senior Executive Fashion Coordinator in Mira Exim Ltd.,
Noida.
Develop new  range in tune with the trends and indications
of the new season.  Generate new concepts of surface
ornamentation and embroidery ideas.
Exposing onself to international  market through
participation in events like Hiemtextil,  Frankfurt, Germany.
Created customized range for reputed Catalog buyers - Otto
Group (Together,  Freemans,  Grattans), Quelle (Germany and
France), Klingel,  Spiegel,  Boden.
Designing moodboards and presentations of new trends for
the clients.
Sourcing of trims and fabrics, generating embroidery ideas
and construction details for big Retail Buyers   House of
Fraser, French Connection,  Great Plains,  Nicole Farhi,
Anthropologie,  Jacquiline Riu,  T K Max.
Execution of photo shoot of new samples to develop
effective presentation for the prospective clients thereby
facilitating orders.
Dressing up the showroom as per the buyer's specifications.
Maintaining proper records of the showroom samples,  which
include costing.
Getting new artworks of prints developed according to the
market trends.
July 2002    May 2004:
Fashion-Coordinator in Radnik Exports ISO 2002  company,
Okhla,  New  Delhi
Earned a promotion within six months and took up the
responsibility of
Sampling Manager
Handled sampling accounts for buyers like H&M, Lindex,
Indiska,  Gudran,  Debenhams,  Casual  Club, Miss Selfridge,
Butterfly, Next .
Developed range for showroom as per buyers'  indications
and requirements
MUDITA J  AHUJA
Managed the whole sampling department (comprising of
ten tailors,  two masters,  two pattern masters,  five
finishing persons, pressman and two
embroiders)
Costing of samples to ensure production feasibility while
making the samples.
Successfully  managed the records as per the ISO
requirements and maintained sample records for further
queries
Dealt in fabrics like cooton voils,  cambrics, poplins, canvas,
georgets,  mosscrepes,  rayons,  chiffons
Liaisoned with the buyers to be aware of their requirements
and ensure the best of services
I have been able to get a comprehensive understanding of
the techniques involved in the garment construction
Successfully  executed the role of managing and meeting
the expectations of the management and the workers in
my team by  striking a balance between them
June 2001   April 2002:
Joined Graffitti Exports,  Udyog Vihar,  Gurgaon as
Assistant Merchandiser
Learned the basic functioning of an export house
Handled the account of Tom Tailor,  a German company
dealing in casual wear for men, boys and girls
Involved in in-house designing for the showroom
Developed new samples/range as per the buyers
indications
I  Babu,  a MCA professional with  4+ experience in  software industry  primarily  in
the development and  implementation  of  commercial application  as a technical member  in
BrainEye InfoTech Pvt  Ltd,  Bangalore.  I  have worked  extensively  in  technologies such
as Visual Basic,  ASP,  Oracle and  SQL Server; Crystal Reports  Currently  I am upgrading
my  knowledge in  Dot Net technologies.
Organization Designation Duration
BrainEye InfoTech Pvt  Ltd Senior Software Engineer Feb  2004  to  Till Date
BrainEye InfoTech Pvt  Ltd Software Engineer Nov  2001  to  Jan  2004
BrainEye InfoTech Pvt  Ltd Trainee May  2001  to  Oct 2001
eCredit.com India  (pvt) Ltd,  Bangalore from Oct 2004 to Till Date.
Consult Paragon,  Bangalore from Oct 2003  to Sept 2004.
Coded  the  Employee  Module  using  JSP.
Involved  in creation of the Database tables.
Project #2 :  Purchase Request System (PRS) (Jun2005Sept
2005)
Client :  NCSS,  Singapore
Role :  Team Member
Team size :  8
Environment:  Java,  J2EE (SERVLETS,  JSP and JDBC),  and Oracle
Web Server :  Tomcat
Description :  This  is  an intranet-based application for NCSS  employees.  If
any employee wants  to buy any of  material from out side,  He would use our
application.  Here We Identified lot of  workflow and  several interfaces.
Roles and Responsibilities:
Involved in Coding Servlets, JSP & JDBC .
Responsible for implementing  Exception Handling.
Project #:  3 OnlineShipping (Nov 2004-May 2005)
Client :  TravelBritain
Role :  Team Member
Team Size :  6
Environment:  Java,  JSP,  Servlets,  JDBC,  Html,  JavaScript and Oracle
App Server :  Web logic
Description : Online Shipping  is an application, which allows small business or
individual customers to easily create shipments without registration or an account
number. Using this application any Internet user will have  the  ability to browse  rates
and ship  with a credit card. This project will add the ability for process shipments (both
Domestic  and  International)  without the  need to register or have  an account number.
Developed  Servlets and  JSP.
Developed  JavaScript's.
PROJECT #4  :  Report Testing Tool (April 2004 Sept 2004)
Client :  Cendant Mortgage
Role :  Team Member
Team Size :  6
Environment:  H/w:  Intel Pentium O/s:  Windows  '2000 S/w:  Java
Web Server :  Tomcat
Description : The  application test's the  Reports, which are generated  by External
Interfaces Team. The  EI  team generate  reports according  to their requirements, if they
want to test whether the  generated report is corrector not, they use  this tool.
Developed  JSP.
Developed  web  pages as per the  requirements.
PROJECT #5  :  Health insurance (Nov 2003-  march 2004)
Client : ACE INA,  North America
Role :  Team Member.
Team Size : 12
Environment:  H/w:  Intel Pentium O/s:  Windows  '2000
S/w:  Java and J2EE (JSP,  Servlets,  Jdbc) and Oracle
App Server:  Web Logic.
Description:
The  Application provides Underwriting  facility for UW. The  UW's can View, Open
and make  decisions on pending  applications and  New Business Applications. And
the  Application provides for entering  medical lab  results of the  insured. Responsible
for developing  the  Medical Lab  Results Module. Responsible  for writing exhaustive
F  0  B  7
Understanding  the business requirements, functional specifications and  the
application.
F  0  B  7
Preparation  of Test  Data
F  0  B  7
Preparation  and  execution  of Test  Conditions and  Test  Cases
F  0  B  7
Preparation  and  Execution  of Unit Test  Plan
F  0  B  7
Defect Tracking  &  Reporting.
Team Size
1
Project Description Employee Payroll  Management System is state of art Payroll  management solution
handing  all payroll  related  activities in  a simple and  powerful way.  EPMS can  be
configured  to  virtually  meet any  individual's specification.
F  0  B  7
Department details and  employee role (Profile management)
F  0  B  7
Maintain  Loans / Advances and  other Recoveries for pay  calculation
F  0  B  7
De-Activate /  Re-Activate employee temporarily  /  permanently
F  0  B  7
Monthly  Reports like PF statement,  Salary  Transfer Statement  to  Bank,  IT
F  0  B  7
Attended  Report.
Project 2 ERP
Role Test Engineer
F  0  B  7
Raising  Clarifications based  on  the Functional Specification.
F  0  B  7
Preparing  Test  Conditions
F  0  B  7
Executing  Test  Conditions
F  0  B  7
Preparing  Trace ability  Matrix
F  0  B  7
Defect Tracking  &  Reporting
Team Size 1
Project Description  ERP covers the techniques and  concepts employed  for the integrated  management  of
business from the point  of effective usage of resource to  improve the efficiency  of an
enterprise.  It  can  handle unlimited  companies and  an  easy  automatic year-end  closing.
It covers basic bookkeeping,  multi location  inventory,  sales,  purchase,  receivables,
payables,  comprehensive budgeting,  cost center accounting  and  payroll.  Because it
provides a wealth  of information,  the reports helps in  making  timely  decisions.  The
Modules present in  that ERP Package are :
F  0  B  7
Financial Accounts.
F  0  B  7
Sales
F  0  B  7
Inventory
F  0  B  7
Purchase
F  0  B  7
Payroll
F  0  B  7
Distribution
F  0  B  7
Planning
F  0  B  7
Production
S.  Senthil
Positive Traits
F  0  B  7
Flexibility  to  work  under Pressure.
F  0  B  7
Innovative Thinking
F  0  B  7
Good  exposure towards Testing  Methodologies and  Testing  Process.
F  0  B  7
Good  and  Effective Communication  skills and  Self   motivated.
F  0  B  7
Knowledge in  Automation  testing  Tool    Win  Runner.
9 month experience as  Software Developer with Monarch Computers  Pvt. Ltd. (10-05-05
to  till
4 month experience as  Software Engineer with Samo Softwares  Indore. (05-01-05
to  02-05-05).
2 years  of professional experience in software development. Has  been part of entire
SDLC. During my  tenure in IT, have developed specialized end-to-end software for
private firms.
Proficiency  in C, C++, VC++ (MFC)6.0, VB 6.0, HTML.
Good Understanding of OOPS, Oracle.
Worked on Win CE, Windows  NT, Windows  2000, and Windows  9x  ,.
OS : Windows  9x, 2000,CE, Linux
Languages & Software : C, C++, VC++ (MFC)6.0, VB 6.0, HTML
Database : Oracle 8i, MS Access
Development Tools : MS Visual Studio
GUIs : Windows, HTML
# Period Organization Roles
2 Currently
10Months
Sivananda Electronics,Nashik  Jr. Software Engineer (C/C++/VC++(MFC))
1 10Months ePoint Technologies, Nashik C/C++ Programmer
PROJECTS DETAILS:
1.
Company Sivananda Electronics, Nashik
Skill Details : C
Project Name : Automatic PC Based Cable Test System (Dos)
Client / Customer : 1. Finolex  Cables,Silvasa 2.Tirupati Cables, Jaipur
Team Size : 3
Project start date and End  date  : Nov  2004 - Feb 2005
Role : Software Engineer
Responsibility : Involved in the entire development cycle of the project.
Involved in development, designing, coding & designing user
Interface. Creation of dynamic  reports.
age 1  of 4
Details of the Project : The system is  developed for cable manufacturing industry.
Objective of the project was  to test telephone cables  (Jelly  Fill
Cables  20 Pairs  & more than 400m in length) for various  high
and low frequency  parameters  (CR, CM, CUPP, CUPG, CUPS,
ATN, NEXT, FEXT) and to generate & print report that will
show whether the cable meet the specification as  per the Dept.
Of Telecommunication (DOT) standards. The software is
completely  menu driven. Facility  was  provided for calibration of
the system, Creating various  types  of specifications, file
opening & saving and printing. The complete test setup is
controlled by  the computer. No need of microprocessor based
operation. Encryption of specification files  for security  purpose.
The software takes  about 700 reading in 3 minutes.
2.
Company Sivananda Electronics, Nashik
Skill Details : VC++ 6.0,MS Access
Project Name : Automatic PC Based Cable Test System (Windows)
Client / Customer : Ordinance Cables
Team Size : 2
Role : Software Engineer
Responsibility : Involved in the maintenance and making changes as  per the
client requirement.
Details of the Project : The system is  developed for cable manufacturing industry.
Objective of the project was  to test telephone cables  (Jelly  Fill
Cables  100 Pairs  & more than 400m in length) for various  high
and low frequency  parameters  (CR, CM, CUPP, CUPG, CUPS,
ATN, NEXT, FEXT) and to generate & print report that will
show whether the cable meet the specification as  per the Dept.
Of Telecommunication (DOT) standards. The software is  SDI
type with user friendly  graphics. Facility  was  provided for
calibration of the system, Creating various  types  of
specifications, file opening & saving and printing. No need of
microprocessor based operation. This  system is  one of the
monopoly  system developed in India.
3.
Company Sivananda Electronics, Nashik
Skill Details : VC++ 6.0,
Project Name : Automatic C & Tand Bridge
Client / Customer : Crompton Greaves
Team Size : 3
Project start date and End  date  : Mar 2005  April 2005
Role : Software Engineer
Responsibility : Involved in the maintenance and making changes  as  per the
client requirement . Developed the flowchart of the software,
and added a new module(Process  Capability) as  per the
requirements.
Details of the Project : Electrical properties  of H.V. insulating system changes  due to
age and continuous  electrical stress. By  measuring the
electrical properties  such as  Capacitance and Tan Delta it is
possible to ensure the operational reliability  of H.V. insulating
age 2  of 4
system and to avoid costly  breakdowns. The objective of the
system is  to measure Capacitance and Tand Delta of H.V
insulating system such as  power transformer , generators  ,
power capacitors, HT cables  etc.
The software is  dialog based application with VC++ 6.0 as  front
end and MS Access  as  backend database for storing results.
The process capability module consists  plotting & printing a
bar graph called Frequency  of Tan Delta which show how
frequently  the value of Tan Delta came into specified range.
4.
Company ePoint Technologies, Nashik
Skill Details : Borland C++ (Turbo Vision)
Project Name : PCL Card Test
Team Size : 2
Project start date and End  date  : Oct 2003 - Nov  2003
Role : Software Engineer
Responsibility : Involved in the entire development cycle of the project.
Engaged in the implementation and support of the entire
module.
Details of the Project : This  software was  developed for testing various  cards  used in
ePoint. The software is  in Text mode and is  completely  menu
driven. 2 cards  can be tested for their functionlality.
5.
Company ePoint Technologies, Nashik
Skill Details : Borland C++ (Turbo Vision)
Project Name : Reduction Factor Testing of 24 pair cable
Client / Customer : Finolex  Cables, Silvasa
Team Size : 2
Project start date and End  date  : Jan 2004  Mar 2004
Role : Software Engineer
Responsibility : Engaged in the entire development of the system
Details of the Project : The objective of the project is  to test Reduction Factor of 24
pair cable and to generate a report that will show whether the
cable meet the specification as  per standards. Reduction
factor is  ratio of two voltages(Applied voltage & Induced
Voltage) between the two ends  of the cable. The software is  in
text mode & menu driven and facility  for opening, saving,
previewing and printing the test report.
6.
Company ePoint Technologies, Nashik
Skill Details : VC++ 6.0
Project Name : Stator Test System
Client / Customer : Crompton Greaves
Team Size : 3
Project start date and End  date  : June 2004  Aug 2004
Role : Software Engineer
Responsibility : Engaged in the entire development of the system
age 3  of 4
Details of the Project : The objective of the system to test single phase and three
phase coils  and stators. The Software was  FormView
application developed in VC++. The software was  developed
various  parameters  of the coil (Resistanse,IR, ACHV, IR after
HV)
Job Responsibilities Undertaken
Coding, Maintainance, Bug fixing.
Involved in designing and developing business  logic  components.
Managing, administering and troubleshooting Windows  98 domains
Involved in design of the User Interface
Job also involves
Coding & Designing
Software Maintainance
Bug fixing
Basic  testing of programs
Creating DFD, ER and documentation
Creating comprehensive dynamic  help
Optimizing and analysis  of program code
User Requirement Analysis  and Design
Functional Enhancements

Period: May  2004  - date
Employer: Accenture Services
Location: Bangalore
Designation: Software Engineer
Period: July  2003  - April 2004
Employer: Accurate Solutions
Location: Delhi
Designation: MTS
Major Clients
BellSouth  Corporation,  USA
Dell Corporation,  USA.
Detailed Project Profiles
Period: July  2004  - date
Employer: Accenture Services
Project: Bellsouth
Location: Bangalore,  India
Role: Test Analyst.
Team size: 24
Description: This is an  online customer interaction  system developed  for Bellsouth.  The purpose of the system
is to  allow customers to  choose for a Bellsouth  product scheme for an  Asymmetric Digital
Subscriber Line (ADSL).
Billing  is  fundamental to  a successful order for ADSL.  Both  CRM and  Bellsouth  DotNet's MCDB
(Master Customer Database) play  a significant role in  ensuring  that an  order's billing  is  correct
from beginning  to  end.
Responsibilities: Wrote Test Scenarios  and  generated  Test Cases.  Initiated  Execution  of Test Scripts.  Actively
involved  with  Black  Box  Testing  (Functional and  Regression  Testing).  Actively  involved  in  Defect
management.  Actively  involved  with  Peer Reviews,  Walkthroughs  and  Inspections.
Environment: Windows,  Oracle Apps  11i-CRM / Siebel CRM,  SQL plus,  WinRunner/QTP
Period: May  2004    June2004
Employer: Accenture Services
Project: Dell
Location: Bangalore,  India
Role: Testing.
Team size: 5
Description: This is an  online employee billing  system developed  for Accenture employees working  onsite.  The
purpose of the system is to  allow employees  to  submit their weekly  reports relating  to  time and
expenses with  regards to  official work.
Responsibilities: Wrote Test Scenarios  and  generated  Test Cases.  Initiated  Execution  of Test Scripts.  Actively
involved  with  Functional,  Integration  and  Regression  Testing.  Actively  involved  with  Black  Box
Testing.  Actively  involved  with  Peer Reviews,  Walkthroughs and  Inspections.
Rsum:  Varun Bassi
Page
2
of
4
Environment: Windows,  Rational Test Suite,  Oracle 9i
Period: July  2003  - April 2004
Employer: Accurate Solutions
Project: Portal
Location: Delhi,  India
Role: Development and  Testing.
Team size: 4
Description: I was involved  with  the construction  and  maintenance of the company's official web  site.  The
company  is involved  in  providing  various kinds if hardware and  software solutions to  various
clients.
Responsibilities: I was involved  in  the construction  of Web  pages,  Server side programming,  Manual testing  and
Maintenance of the site.  Prepared  test scripts and  performed  white box  and  black  box  testing.
Environment: Java ,  Windows,  HTML
TRAINING COURSES
Year Title Organized By Duration
2004 Rational Test Suite and  Rational Unified  Process Accenture 5  Days
2004 Concepts and  Principles of Software Testing Accenture 2  Days
2004 SQL & PL/SQL Accenture 3  Days
2004 UNIX and  Shell Scripting Accenture 3  Days
2004 WinRunner 7.6 Accenture 1  Day
1.5 years of experience  in System Design, and  Development, implementation of
Software  Applications, Database  Administration, Integrating  new enhancements to
existing  systems. I  have  excellent communication and  analytical skills and  a
demonstrated ability to complete time-sensitive  tasks on schedule.
Presently working  as a Project Trainee Engineer in Kalki Communication
Technologies  Pvt.  Ltd., Bangalore from  november 2005.
Involved in design and  development of web  based  Energy Application Software
using SQL server, VB.NET, and ASP .NET.
Advanced Diploma In Embedded  Technology with Microsoft Certificate
Company : Kalki Communication Technologies Pvt. Ltd.
Duration : Jan 2005 - till date
(www.kalkitech.com)
Position : Project Trainee  Engineer
Fresher
Highest Qualification
MBA/PGDM Information Technology
Institute
Sikkim Manipal University
2nd Highest Qualification
B.Com
Institute
Calcutta University
Resume Upload
Resume Title
amiya cv
Cut paste Resume
i am Amiya Chakraborty. I have no field experience. I have completed Computer Hardware
Engineering from Indian Institute Of Hardware Engineers. Now I am doing MBA (IT) from
Sikkim Manipal University. I have just completed the 1st. semester, now I am in 2nd. Semester.
If I get chance according to my  qualification I will prove my  self as  efficient and hardworking as
Hardware Engineer
REVA fx, Pondicherry Jan-2001 to Present
Recruited to assemble and install  computers with  Operating Systems and Softwares.
Supervised assemble of new Desktop PCs, installation of Software packages and trouble shooting of
errors. Managed with Company's Network and the Server.
1  To design the FRP component according to the Customer Requirement.
To do the solid modeling of the FRP component in Pro-E  or  CatiaV5
To design and draw the machinery, tooling required processing the FRP
components.
To design and draw the mandrels  for  manufacturing FRP shells.
To design and draw the dies  for manufacturing Rubber Products.
To design and draw the pattern for manufacturing of various  Containers
To design and draw various  machinery  to move the FRP Component to one
place of shop floor to another.
To design and draw various  attachments  to CNC Lathe m/c  to process  the FRP
Components.
To prepare Bill of Material to manufacture the designed component.
To prepare Bill of Material of a particular  project before starting the project.
To prepare the Process  Document & Qu ality  Assurance Plan for particular
project before starting a project.
To prepare Costing Sheet of a particular  project after execution of the project.
Company: Compu Patterns, Hyderabad
Position Held: CAD Engineer Dates:  Sep 2004 to Present
During this  time, I am working on several project and for  several clients  like DRDL,
DMDE, etc. I served clients  in a number  of industries  like private, public  and
Defence sectors. I undertook  variety  of roles  on Designing and Drafting of Defence
Drawing. Presently  I am  working for  DRDL, Akash project for Drafting and
maintenance of Missile Drawings.
Bachelor of  Technology (Mechanical)  from  K.I.T.S., Warangal from
Kakatiya University  during Aug/1995 - July/1998.
Diploma in Mechanical Engineering from  S.S.G.P.T College, Zaheerabad
from  Osmania University.
Auto CAD (2000, 2002, 2004, 2005)
CATIA (V5R10): Part Design, Assembly  Design,
Generative Drafting
Pro-E  : Part Design, Assembly  Design
Computers, Traveling, Music  & Casual Reading.
Can work  hard in any  environment, Punctual, Sincere, Optimistic, Strong
sense of responsibility  and Team  Spirit.
Good analytical skill with well developed planning, interpersonal and
Communicational skills
Strong tool design background for  FRP components  of Defence sector.
Name : P.VIJAYABABU
Father's  Name : P.RAJAIAH
Date of Birth : Jan 10th 1973.
Sex : Male
Passport No. : B3398412
Marital Status : Married
State of Domicile : Andhra Pradesh
Nationality : Indian
Worked in dell computers as a  technical support executive for dell laptops for 6
months and in uttara  computers as a  trainee in c ,c++,unix,  for 6  months
Self Evaluation & 0bjective
I am a  logical and analytical individual with a passion  for learning and
can pick  up new concepts  fast. I feel confident o n  my  communication
and interpersonal skills.
Motivated to  work  in challenging and professional environment  with
integrity,
hard work, and with deep care towards  human values.
Motto:
He that seeketh  findeth; and to  him that  knocketh  it shall be opened.
ASHIMA ARORA
1.Worked at DILEEP ENTERPRISES Pune (Duration: 1.5  year)
As Accountant
PROFIL :
Collect Bills From Venders
Cash Widrawl
Back office work
2.Worked at RAM  INFOTECH ( ICICI  BANK LTD. PDC FACTORY) (Duration :8
month)
as a Banking Operation
PROFIL :
Cheque pull out,
Shorting Locationvise & Agrimentvise PDC
3.Currently working at ICICI BANK LTD.( Account & Ta xsetion Group)
as Consultant
An  Electrical engineer with  over  10 years of experience in  telecom operations, planning and
team management in diversified industries. Expertise in  RF  Communication, Satellite
Communication, Microwave  equipment operations etc. A proactive leader  adept in  financial
management (budgeting) and ensuring adherence to the stipulated budget. Proficient in managing
the studio production  facilities and maintenance of telecom equipments. Excellent team building &
troubleshooting skills with  proven  abilities in  planning and managing resources.
Organisational Details
Since  Sep'2000 with Prasar Bharati (Doordarshan) as Assistant  Station Engineer
Key Result Areas
Planning & Bu dgeting
Planning and scheduling activities to  ensure completion of the project within  allocated time and
for  optimising resource utilisation.
Involved in preparing budgets and ensuring adherence to the planned expenses.
Meeting deadlines and Turn  Around Time without compromising quality norms
Operations
Transmission  Optimization   monitoring daily transmission statistics, investigating cause of
outages, trouble-shooting & repair, planning & technical  aspects of transmission  & follow-ups.
Coordinating with the clients through completion of the project.
Managing the day-to-day studio production activities including: equipment maintenance and
purchasing, staffing and scheduling the use of the studio ensuring optimum production quality
of all  projects
People  Management
Developing, managing and monitoring the performance of multi-skilled work force and
conceptualising need-based training programs for  performing maintenance operations.
Designing training modules; evaluating the effectiveness of training programmes by constantly
developing & implementing pre and post assessment tools.
Bausch & Lomb  Eyecare (I) Pvt.  Ltd
Working  as Sr.Exe.Admn  since Sep  2003  till date.
Joined  in  the year 2000  as Front Office Executive and  later on  promoted  as Senior Executive
Administration.
Sourcing  & procuring  traditional,  ethnic,  exclusive product for the retails outlets \u0022Khazana\u0022
Complete documentation.  Planning  & co-ordination  with  stored,  accounts as well as shop
level for the smooth  functioning  of the organization.
Direct interaction  with  the suppliers,  customers.
Market visits & surveys to  update oneself of the current market trends.
Name of  the Institution Duration Name of  the Post
VCOM Computer Education May  2001  to  Jan  2002 Faculty
Christian  Medical College Feb.  2002  to  July  2002 Clerk  Cum Typist
Suryaa Computers Sep.  2002  to  Oct 2004 Faculty  in  Java,  JavaBean,  Servlet,  Jsp,
HTML
Techno  Galaxy From Nov.2004 Developer  in  J2EE  using  Struts,
Hibernate (FW)
Kindly consider my application  and  bestow  me a  chance to  serve in  your esteemed  organization.
Anticipating  you  favourable orders.
Thanking  you Yours truly.
PG Diploma in  Embedded  and  VLSI  Design.
BE Electronics and  Communication  with  71%.
Excellent Knowledge of  C,  C++,  VHDL,  Verilog.
Excellent problem solving  skills.
Well organized  and  easily  meets deadlines.
Six  months experience in  HCL INFOSYSYTEMS PVT.  LTD.,  Noida (U.P.)
Have  7 months of hands-on experience  in JAVA technologies
Currently working  as a JAVA programmer for IT-Curve  Pvt. Ltd., from
August 2005 to till date.
Have  7 months of hands-on experience  in JAVA technologies
Currently working  as a JAVA programmer for IT-Curve  Pvt. Ltd., from
August 2005 to till date.
Working as Senior Software  Engineer in Virmati Software and  Telecommunications Ltd., an
ISO 9001:2000 Certified   Company and  SEI-CMM Level 3 Certified   Company based in
Ahmedabad having branches all over India, from Feb'2002 to till date.  Which is a software
company dealing  with Banking  Projects from  past 25 years, and  several commercial banks
and co-operative  banks are  clients to our company.
Worked  with Santha Informatics Private  Limited  as a Software  Engineer from Sep'2000 to
Dec'2001. Which is a Hyderabad  Based  Software  Company working  with the  projects of
Medical Agencies, Chit Fund  Companies, Educational Institutions and  other Financial Service
Extensively involved  in Implementation of software in different environments like
Novell Netware, Windows 2K/9x and  DOS.
Extensively involved  in support in software  to the  branches involved.
Extensive  training to the Branch people  to the  required  level of working.
Reporting  the  problems arising  after implementation for beta-testing.
Involved in Core-banking software  Solutions developed  by the company.
Coordinating  bug  review meetings to resolves issues.
Documenting the procedures and  problems.
Testing, Trouble shooting  and  Technical Support.
Excellent problem  solving  skills with good interpersonal skills .
Involved as a Implementation Engineer. Implemented the software  in over 50
branches and  given the  Pre-implementation and  post-implementation support,
training to the branches in different locations of Nalgonda & Kh ammam district of
Nagarjuna Grameena Bank.
Analyze and  write  detailed documentation for the banking  staff and  the trainees of
the  company.
Reporting  bugs to the  Company.
WinBanker 3.0
WinBanker Software  is the  Total Automation Software. This includes the  complete  Business
Hours front office Transactions, Supervisor Authorization, Signature  Display, Remittance
Transactions and  various days begin operations and  day end operations, Generation of
Various Backdated Reports as per the  Clients requirement and database  maintenance.
Winbanker has complete  flexibility in correlating  aggregation data to view and  use. It can
correlate  network events to any data in the  database. An intuitive  graphical interface  gives
a variety of users, ranging  from network  operators to customer-service  representatives,
maximum freedom in customizing  event views. Operations Support personal can quickly set
security controls and  can easily define   domains based on service  type, and  customer sets
equipment types.
Clients : AP Raja Rajeshwari Mahila Co-operative Bank,
Eenadu Co-operative  Bank.
Role:  Implementation and  Maintenance  of the  software. And  documenting  process.
Smart Suite:
Description: Smart Suite is a flexible, user friendly and  economical package  developed
by Shantha  Informatics for managing  any Manufacturing  Industry, Hospital, Diagnostic
Center, Chit Funds, and  Financial Services.
This  package is  absolutely:
User-friendly
Integrated Solution For Any Industry/Business Concern
Single  of Multi User Environment
Hierarchical Security Levels
Efficient data backups
Simple to Learn
Simple to Use
Smart Suite  is a package  with unparalleled  features and  one  that's flexible t o adapt
to the  ever-growing  needs of all types of business concerns. It contains the following
modules ......
Stores
Purchase
Quality Control
Sales
HR
Accounts
Akiko  Sherman Infotech India  Pvt.  Ltd.,  New Delhi July  2004    Till Date
System Analyst & Programmer (Application Development)
Conducting  Case / system / Process Study  for project planning,  scoping,
estimation,  tracking.
Implementation  of  project plans within  pre-set budgets and  deadlines.
Team mentoring,  deployment,  monitoring  and  development.
Defining  best practices for project support and  documentation.
Client interaction  for requirement gathering,  system study  & analysis.
Understanding  the technical & functional specifications.
Design,  development,  testing,  troubleshooting  and  debugging  of  the application.
Manage smooth  implementation  and  testing  of  the application  at client location.
Provide post-implementation,  enhancement & maintenance support to  client for
application  / software.
Skill Type Skill Name
Tools/Others Microsoft Visual Studio,  Microsoft Visual Studio  .NET 2003
ASP.NET,  C#.Net,  Web  Services,  Windows Services,ADO.NET
DATABASE MS SQL Server  7/2000,  MS Access 2000,  Oracle 8i
LANGUAGE C,  VB 6.0,  Java (OOPS)
OS Windows XP/ 2000
SERVER  IIS
TOOLS HTML,  DHTML,  ASP,  VBScript,  JavaScript,  VB  6,  UML
M.C.M   Pune University  - 2004
B.Com -  Jammu  University - 2001
H.S.C - Jammu  University - 1998
Interscape Technologies Inc.
July' 2004 - Till Date
(Software Engineer)
Interscape Technologies  specializes  in designing and implementing Enterprise Storage Systems  Architecture
using the latest proven technologies. It implements  highly  redundant end-to-end solutions  that work  with
minimum complexities. Interscape Technology  is  a partner of EMC
Project  Name:
EMC Data Storage Management
Active Role in collection of requirements  from the user and preparing requirement specifications.
Prepared System, Functional and Design Specifications.
Involved in writing scripts, parsers  to load data from different storage data (SAN)
Designed and developed front-end screens  using Dreamweaver MX
Worked in various  types  of transformation like Report generations, PDF creation, MS-Word and MS-
Excel Sheets  formation.
Configured/Administered Apache web server on Linux  platform / Windows  Platform. Configured PHP
and MySQL support for Apache.
Configured/Administered Linux  Server.
Designed database specifications and created  tables.
Environment: PHP, MySQL, Apache Server (Linux  / Windows  Platform)
Project  Name:
Intercape CCRM
Collected requirements  from the user and preparing requirement specifications.
Prepared System, Functional and Design Specifications.
Involved in writing scripts
Involved in Designing and developing front-end screens  using Dreamweaver MX
Worked in various  types  of transformation like Email, MS-Word and MS-Excel Sheets  formation.
Designed database specifications and created  tables.
Environment: PHP 4.3, MySQL , Windows  Platform
Convergys (India)  Pvt Ltd
(Technical Support Engineer) (6 Months)
Description:
Convergys  India is  Customer support company  with provides  all types  of support from Customer care to
Technical Support for High End Computers
Worked in various  technologies  of Microsoft Windows  XP
Setting up local Area networks  ,small office Networks
Tally Solutions Pvt Ltd
(Graduate Trainee)
Description:
Tally  is  a Accounting Software Company  which has  developed the Sofware by  the name Tally.
Project  Name: Tally  Net Client
Prepared System, Functional and Design Specifications.
Involved in writing code
Involved in Designing and developing front-end
Environment: VC++ ,(WIN 32 API), WINDOWS 9.x
Overall around Two  and half  years of  IT experience in  Software Testing.
Software Quality  Assurance and  Testing  with  good  exposure to  the full Software
Testing  Life Cycle and  its phases.
Experience in  Web  Testing  and  Client/Server Application.
Designed,  developed  and  executed  Test Cases.
Involved  in  preparation  of  Test Plan
Involved  in  GUI  Testing,  Regression  Testing,  Integration  Testing  and  Exposure to
Performance Testing.
Involved  in  Functional Testing.
Exposure to  Performance Testing  using  LoadRunner.
Ability  to  understand  Functional Requirements and  Design  Documents.
Automation  of  the Test Scripts with  WinRunner  and  LoadRunner Tools.
Good  interpersonal skills,  committed,  result oriented,  hard  working  with  a quest and
zeal to  learn  new technologies.
Around  2.5  years of software testing  experience as Software Test Engineer,  involved  in
both  manual and  automation  testing.  Able to  work  collaboratively  with  testers,
developers and  other team members in  testing  complex  projects and  in  the overall
enhancement of software product quality.  Excellent organizational and  communication
skills,  both  oral and  written
Technical  Profile
Languages - Exposure to  C,  C++,  JAVA and  Visual Basic,HTML.
Operating  System - Windows 98,  NT 4.0,  2000  and  XP.
RDBMS - Oracle and  MS-SQL Server.
Tools - Win  Runner7.0,  Exposure to  Load  Runner/Test Director,
QTP,  Programming  in  TSL,SilkTest
Domain - Testing  Methodologies,  SDLC  and  TDLC.
Working  as a  Software Test Engineer in Qualiband Technologies,  Nov.2002  to  till
date
Projects  Profile
Project  Title -  Time Sheet Management  System
Client- Qualiband  technologies
Duration- 10  months (continuing).
Role- Team member.
Team  size- 3.
Platform  - Oracle8i and  VB6.
Testing  Tools-  Win  Runner 7.5
Responsibility  - Involved  in  developing  System and  Integration  Test cases
using  Software Requirement Specification.
System Test case execution.
Test reporting.
Designing  of automation  test scenarios.
Regression  Testing.
Tracking  defects till closure .
Description: Time Sheet Management System keeps track  of the employee's daily  activities
project-wise and  activity-wise.  There are two  logins - one for the Administrator and  other for all
the employees.  Each  employee has his own  unique id  to  the TSMS,  where he enters the daily
activities and  man-hour effort.  The employee can  generate a Self-Report of the previous data
between  two  dates.  Suitable security  is provided  to  the data where even  the employee can  change
password.  The TSMS is a good  in-house product useful  for all  the employees of an  organization.
Project  Title - Almanac
Client  - Asra Technologies Pvt Ltd
Duration -  18  Months.
Role -  Team Member
Team  size- 3.
Platform  - Windows NT,  Visual C++
Responsibility  - Involved  in  developing  System Test cases using  Software
Requirement Specification.
System Test case execution.
Test reporting.
Regression  Testing.
Tracking  defects till closure.
Description:  The Almanac project that automates the manual and  legacy  operations of
Asra  technologies pvt Ltd.  This system provides a comprehensive methodology  for
keeping  track  of the employees Work  schedules,  Attendance,  Time sheet entry,  Reports,
etc.  This system provides a comprehensive methodology  for  keeping  track  of  the
employees work  schedules.  The main  functions of  the system are Add/Alter  Employee
demographic details,  Record  Absences,  Record  Planned  Leave.  Record  Flexi-time
Equivalent,  Request Absences Enter weekly  timesheets,  Parameters/Rules set-up  and
upkeep,  View and  Print Reports.
Pursuing MCA(Final  Year) from A.I.C.T.E Approved BabaSaheb BhimRao Ambedker  University (A
Central  University),Vidya Vihar, RaeBareli  Road, Lucknow ,India. [2003-2006]. Percentage up to
Vth Sem 77%.
Completed A.I.C.T.E Approved B.C.A. From Birla Institute Of Technology , Mesra, Ranchi  with
83.10%.[2000-2003].
EDUCATIONAL PROFILE
Completed Intermediate from CBSE Board with 60%  marks in the year  1998.
Completed High  school  from ICSE Board with 72%  marks in  the year  1996.
OTHER PROFESSIONAL CERTIFICATES
Completed the Certificate Training course on  \u0022ORACLE  9i for Programmers &   Database
Administrators\u0022 Held from 17.05.2005   15.07.2005 at the \u0022Indian Institute  of
Technology Kanpur\u0022.
This Project aims the management of  library  in  a systametic
order it helps the librarian  and  guide him in  an  systematic pattern.
MAIN PROJECT:
Project  Name : Drug  Tunneling
Platform : Red  Hat Linux  8
This project  aims to  make good relation between medical
companies and doctors about  all new and old medicines about  the dosage of
chemicals and use of medicine for ,  in brief.and makes good conversation of
Requirements in secure way.
Undergone Training in Real Time Embedded Systems in Cranes  Software
International, Pvt, Ltd, Bangalore.
Oracle Programmer FWL Technologies  Subsidiary  of UK, Pune.
September 2004 till date
FulfillmentSCE freight forwarding system is  a fully  integrated, truly  multi-modal logistics
suite, covering air, land and sea freight operations.
The system is  completely  modular and can operate with either single or multi modal
operations. The system operates  around a central database with browser access  allowing
remote users  to connect via WAN, LAN, intranet or Internet. The system is  scaleable and
reliable, independent volume tests  have had more than 3000 users  processing in excess
of 15,000 jobs  per hour.
The integration of purchase order management, FCL/LCL, a multi-modal, international
and domestic  shipment within one application ensures  that fulfilmentSCE caters  for all
your logistics  requirements.
Quotations  Module
Purchase Order Management Module
Bookings  Module
Load Planning / Carrier Booking Module
Workflow Module
Import
Invoice
EDI
Countable Work :
XF Monitor  Functionality :
Implemented the module which we used to schedule and execute procedure automatically  .
Used DBMS_JOB supplied package.
Data Housekeeping :
Implemented a module to delete the Completed data from the system which is  15 months  old.
Immediately  on  completion  of my  Graduation  in  the year 1985,  I joined  the
BPL
group  at
Bangalore the same year in  August.  The career history  from  the year 1985  to  as on  date is
furnished  under,  along  with  various credentials lamented.
1985    1992:
Joined  as a trainee engineer on  26th Aug' 85  at  Bangalore HQs.
Transferred  to  Chennai  during  July' 87  & took  control of consumer field  operations and
subsequently  elevated  as Branch  Head  of Chennai  North  branch  with  an  employee strength  of 11.
1992    1997:
Transferred  to  Trichy  during  Sep' 92  as the Branch  Manager with  a team of 16  covering  7
districts.  During  the tenure at Trichy,  I appointed  \u002221\u0022 Authorized  trade partners to  cater the
market  load.
Promoted  to  grade \u0022M1\u0022 in  1994.
1997    1998:
Transferred  to  Mumbai  during  Feb' 97  as the Branch  Manager with  a team of 43.
Appointed  two  franchisees to  cater Vashi  & associated  markets at New Mumbai.
Promoted  to  grade \u0022M2\u0022 in  1997.
1998    2001:
Transferred  to  Cochin  Aug' 98  as the \u0022Regional  Head\u0022 covering  14  districts of Kerala with  team
strength  of 73.  Appointed  7  direct  \u0022Customer care\u0022 franchisees.
Promoted  to  grade \u0022M3\u0022 in  1999.
2001:
Transferred  to  Chennai during  Aug' 01  as the \u0022Customer Business Unit Head\u0022 catering  both
Tamilnadu  & Ke rala.
Promoted  to  grade \u0022M4\u0022.
2002: - 2005:
Promoted  as \u0022Asst General  Manager   South\u0022 covering  Andhra Pradesh,  Tamilnadu  and
Pondicherry  & Ke rala.
2005:
Resigned  BPL & shif ted  professional career to  Muscat,  Oman  & joined  the \u0022Al   Futtaim\u0022 group
to  head  Oman  as \u0022Head   Customer Care\u0022.
2006
Due to  domestic reasons,  joined  BPL mobile hand  set  division  as \u0022Head   Customer Care\u0022
operating  from  corporate office,  Bangalore.
Credentials at a  glance .  .  .  .  .
1997:
Trichy  was accorded  the 2nd best  branch  in  the country  during  my  tenure as the \u0022Branch
Customer Retention  Manager\u0022.  Received  award  from the Joint  Managing  Director -
BPL Limited  at  an  impressive function  in  Bangalore.
1999:
Received  award  from Director Marketing to  visit  UK & witness the \u0022World  Cup\u0022 Finals
at Lords for overshooting  my  business target.
Created  a new  business record  in  Kerala's profitability  for March  '99  from an  installed
base of appx  9  Lac units   Population.
Generated  the highest \u0022Annual Maintenance Contracts\u0022 @ 509  no.s during  March' 99.
2000  - 2001:
Exceeded  the previous business record  to  touch  a new figure during  March'2000.
Achieved  the country's highest AMC count @ 1263  during  September.
Once again  created  a new  business record  during  March' 2001.
Recorded  the highest  AMC business at  Rs.  0.79  crores in  the country  during  the year
2000-01    A new  record  in  the history  of the company.
2002  - 2004
April' 02  saw a new record  on  AMCs at  1933  No.s.
June' 03  recorded  the highest AMC @ 3123  No.s &   retained  the No.  1  position  in  the
country.  The zonal turnover @ Rs.  39.01  Lacs was also  the highest  in  the country.
July' 2004  recorded  an  all time high  business exceeding  Rs.68  lacs.
Sep' 2004  created  the highest AMCs in  qty  to  touch  4335  No.s in  the country.
2005
Received  certificate of excellence for \u0022framing  curriculum\u0022 from \u0022His Excellency
Minister of Education\u0022 at  an  impressive govt.  function.
Recorded  43% revenue growth  over the previous year.
AMC business recorded  52% impressive growth  over previous year.
Please note all the above credentials  are documented  & I have received  individual appreciation  letters
from the top  management from time to  time.
Current Job  Profile...
Ensure implementation  of Standard  Operating  procedures of Customer Care.
Network  expansion  to  achieve maximum reach  & penetration.
Responsible for ensuring  CC operations cost within  budget  allocation.
To  integrate the CARE function  & drive Customer delight  across Business verticals.
Responsible for Retentions of all  Customers.
Assuring  post-Sales life cycle management & re lationship  build-out of all customers.
Prudent interface with  Sales for effective Sales & Se rvice Integration.
Key  Dealer Visits   Relationship  Building.
Study  on  Customer Retention  and  arrive at Planned  & Meticulous Solution.
Ensure functioning  of call  center with  respect to  Customer Complaints.
Accredits on \u0022Customer Retention\u0022
I had  always perceived
\u0022The success in any organization depends on its ability to  respond  to  the increasing
customer expectations,  seizing  the growing  market  opportunities,  effectively gathering  vital
information and  acting  quickly upon it\u0022.
This infact  provoked  my team to  initiate various programs on  customer delight  activities &
few are as under,
An  innovative approach  called  \u0022SAYDS    Service at Your Doorstep\u0022 was executed  at
major Cities.  The customers were taken  for a  big  surprise & soon  LG  &   Samsung
followed  in  select  cities.
For the first time in  Kerala,  my team  promoted  AMCs through  chain  stores dealing
with  consumer non-durables & was linked  with  purchases made for redemption
\u0022Instant  & free customer retention\u0022 camps were exercised  at frequent intervals
targeting  the festive seasons.  All  the customer care centers would  execute
simultaneously to  retain  the uniformity across the region.
Region  retains the credit  for holding  the best inventory standards in  the country
without disrupting  the customer retention  needs.  The region  was also  accredited  the
best  in  inventory planning.
Both  Tamilnadu  & Kerala  retains the best  networked  \u0022customer care\u0022 centers in  the
country for highest  reach  in  terms of  installed  base.
Customer retention  profitability recorded  the highest in  the country in  July' 2004.
Working in  Zeetaa Business Solutions, Chennai  in  the post of Associate   Team Member  for  the past one
year.
VLSI from  NI2
Helped  MPSEB in  their  Computer  Section
MPSEB 220  KV line, 1000-Line  Exchange
BSNL in  their  Telephony  Network  & CTO  Compound
DRM Microwave  and  Exchange
F  0
2  E
MCA (I DIV )  from  FIT, Meerut affiliated to U .P technical University, Lucknow with 70% in 2002-2005 batch
A computer science  and  engineering  graduate with over 1 YEAR  of marketing  experience.
Adept at handling  sales and  marketing activities with
skills in  Competitor/market analysis and
targeted marketing.
Significant experience  in SDLC. A keen planner capable  of working in
a team environment. Possess good  communication, presentation, analytical and  problem
solving  skills
Working with Catura Broadband Systems  since July 2005.
Key Result Areas
Responsible for handling  the  sales and  marketing  activities in the  NCR, including
preparation of marketing  plan and designing  of entire  sales process.
Involved in generating  the  target market database, selection of right mix of potential
customers, generating  enquiries, giving  live  demos, negotiating  with the  clients for
securing  order.
Working as a Liaison between the  technical team and  the customers.
Responsible for designing  product brochures, and  other promotional tools, like
selection of promotional media, exhibitions and seminars.
From May 2004 to June 2005 with JK  White Cement as Management Trainee
Key Result Areas
Responsible for handling  the  sales and  marketing  activities in the  Vidarbha region (10
districts)
Involved in generating  enquiries, preparing  offers, participating  in project tenders
floated by prospective  clients and  negotiating  with the clients for securing  the  order.
Developing  marketing  strategies to build consumer preference  and  drive volumes.
Identifying &   networking  with channel partners/ retailers, resulting  in market
penetration & reach.
Providing  technical support to the  client ensuring  maximum customer satisfaction.
1.
Presented  a technical paper at Techno  Triumph  2004,  A National level Students
technical paper  presentation  contest conducted  by  Arkay  College of Engineering
and  Technology.
2.
Secured  first division  in  Microsoft .NET (VB.Net,  ASP.Net,  C#.Net)  exam
conducted  by  small scale industries service institute,  Ministry  of  Industries
(Central Government of India) June-  August-2005.
3.
Attained  advanced  training  for  Visual Basic 6.0  conducted  by  Advanced  Training
Institute,  Ministry  of  Employment (Central Government of  India),  Aug-Sept 2005.
4.
Attained  advanced  training  for  Web  Designing  and  Internet conducted  by
Advanced  Training  Institute,  Ministry  of  Employment & Training,  (Central
Government of India) Sep-2005.
5.
Post Graduate Diploma in  Computer  Application  from NIT Computer  Education
(Regd  No.571,  Government of  A.P)
Presently  Working  as Software Programmer  in  Radixinfo  Pvt.  Ltd.  Hyderabad  from
January-2005  (www.Radix-info.com) .
Worked as  a  Team member  for  this  project.
Designed  LoginPage  and  Homepage.
Designing  and  Clientside  Validations for  Supplier  and  property  Manager  Login
pages.
Designing  and  coding  for  Tenders.
Designing  and  coding  for  Bids.
Designing  and  coding  for  View  Quotations.
Designing  and  coding  for  View  Quotation  Request status.
Designing  and  coding  for  Purchase  order.
Participated  in  unit  testing  of  the  product.
Project  #2:
Project  Title:  Online  Shopping.
Client: Alcatel  Electronics.
Environment:  windows  2003, C#.net,  ASP.net.
Database:  SQLServer2000.
Duration:  February  2005  to July  2005.
Team  size:  3
Description:
The  web  application  is  developed  for online  shopping  which  holds
general  information  about  the  various  products  that  are  marketed  by company  and
allows the  visitors  of  the site  to  see  the  whole  products of  company,and  allow
the  customers  to register  online.When  they  register  they  get  the  URL  link  to
their  mail-id  for  further  shopping.
The  application  consists  of  two  modules:
a.  Customer  Module
b.  Admin  Module
Customer  Module:
Any  anonymous  user  can  browse  the  site  and  see  the  products
gallery  but  for  placing  an order  online,the  user  has  to  register  himself  by
filling  up  registration  form  online.Once  registered  the  customer  can  login  and
select the  item  to  purchase.
Admin  Module:
The admin  with  the  administration  sites  can  access  the
administration  area  of  the application.
Following  are  the  functionalities/sections  that are  provided  to  the
administrator.
Categories:
Add/Edit/View/Delete  Categories
Add/Edit/View/Delete  Products
Reports:
Today's  Orders  Report
Total  Orders  Report
Day  wise  Orders  Report
Customer  wise  Orders  Reports
Pending  Orders  Report.
Worked as  a  Team member  for  this  project.
Designing  and  coding  for  Registration  pages.
Designing  and  coding  for  Products  page  where  a  user  can  add,edit  and  delete
products.
Involved  in  Debugging.
Involved  in  Implementation of  the  project.
Project  #3:  (Academic  Project)
Project  Title:  SwarnaAP
Environment:  windows  2000, VB.net.
Database:  MS-Access.
Duration:  4  months
Team  size:  4
Description:
The  project  ;SwarnaAP; developed  to  ascertain  the  details of  determined
rakes  and  yard  balance  of  SCR  with  transparency and  efficiency.  This  project  is
designed  in  such a  way  that  access  control  is  maintained  by  SCR.  The  automation
automates  the  guard  detection,  rake  and  engine  determination  and  guard  balance
at  any point  of  the  time.  It  analyzes  the  problem  of  the  rake  and  generates  the
failure  of  the  rake.  The  status  of  the  yard  at  any  point  of  the  time  can  be
obtained.
Participated  in  designing  and  coding.
Involved  in  user interaction.
Participated  in  unit  testing  of  the  product.
Presently  Working  as Software Tester  in  Radixinfo  Pvt.  Ltd.  Hyderabad  from
Dec-2004
(www.Radix-info.com)
Having  1+  years  of  IT experience in  Software Testing
Hands on  experience in  preparing  test cases,  executing  test cases,  analyzing
results and  reporting  defects.
Good  knowledge on  Software Development Life Cycle and  Test methodologies.
Comfortable with  Functional,  Regression,  and  Usability  testing.
Responsible for  Testing,  Bug  Reporting,  Documentations,  Maintaining  Test
Results,  reviews,  discussions with  the off-shore product specialists.
Having  good  analytical skills,  quick  and  independent learning  skills.
Ability  to  work  as individual as well as Team member.
Execute functional,  regression  testing
Preparation  and  execution  of  test cases and  generating  test reports
Reporting  and  tracking  the defects with  development team
Project #2:
Title : Equifax  Small Business Exchange (SBX)
Period : Jun2005-Oct2005
Technologies : VB.Net,  ASP.Net
Database : Oracle 8i
Role : Team Member
Team Size : 8
Brief  Summary: Lightbridge uses external data services for  its credit decision  system.
Lightbridge retrieve all of  the Small Business Report data for  the application  from SBX,
summarize the SBX data,  store all of  the data retrieved  from SBX,  and  utilize some
pieces of  the SBX data for automatic decision.  This is implementation  use XML for
System to  System interfacing.
Involves in  Incremental-Integration  and  System Testing.
Writing,  Reviewing  the Test Cases,  and  Execution  of  Test Cases
Handling  defect tracking  process.
Execute functional,  regression  testing
Interacted  with  onsite coordinators for  executing  test plans of  different builds
Project #3:
Title :  Medical   Insurance Claiming  System
Period : Jan2005-May2005
Technologies : .Net,  Oracle 8i and  Crystal Reports 8.0
Role : Team Member
Team Size : 4
Brief  Summary: This software acts as an  Insurance provider  and  Medical service
provider.  This is divided  into  three main  modules Patient Module,  Provider  Module and
Insurance Module.  This is an  on-line system where there will be tie up  with  insurance
providers,  and  the medical service providers,  the clients and  can  use the system by
registering  on  the Internet.  Provision  is given  for  medical service provider  to  do  the
billing  and  all the details are available on  line
Preparation  and  execution  of  test cases and  generating  test reports
Performed  functional testing
Reporting  and  tracking  the defects with  development team
-  Currently  working  in  MIT chrompet as Project Assistant under the project,
Development of Front End  Tools for  Semantic Grid  Services from
September 2005.
-  Worked  as Software Engineer in  Durosys Technologies Solutions from
June 2003  to  July  2005
Operating  System : Linux  Fedora Core3
Languages : JAVA,  C
Internet Technologies : HTML,  JSP
Databases : Oracle10g
Middleware : Globus Toolkit 4.0
Application  Server : Apache Tomcat 5.0.27
Framework : Grid  Sphere Portal Frame Work  2.0.2
Project  1  : MIT chrompet
Title:  Development  of  Front  End Tool For Semantic Grid Services.
Client: C-DAC Banglore
Involved  in  the development of  the Action  classes.
Involved  in  implementing  presentation  logic using  JSP.
Project #2:
Title
\u0022Mind  Tech.  Bug  & Component System\u0022
Organization
HyperSoft Technologies Limited,  karkhana,
Secunderabad.
Synopsis : This application  is designed  and  built for software managers and
quality  assurance staffs that keep  track  of the software defects,
which  are produced  during  the software development life cycle.
Developed  User Interface using  JSP for  various modules.
Developed  Servlets,  Session  Beans,  and  Message Driven  beans using
MVC  Patterns.
Environment :  JDBC,  Servlets,  JSP,  Weblogic 8,  EJB
Windows 2000,  LINUX.
Currently  Working in Kaushik Technologies Pvt. Ltd since August 2003 as
Programmer.
Underwent Technical Apprentice in Engine Factory since July  2002 to July  2003.
Two  years of  software development experience in  the areas of  mobile phone applications.
Good  knowledge of RTOS (LINUX)  ,  Embedded  Systems and  having  strong
programming  skills in  C /C++.  Exposed  to  WAP and  TCP/IP technology.  Well conversant
in  designing,  coding,  testing.
(Sep 2004   Till Date)
Working as  Software Engineer in  Aryaan Solutions.
1.7+ year
of diversified experience in Unix, Finacle Banking Technology. Expertise in design,
development and Unit testing of software in Unix, Finacle Banking Technology.  Working as a
Software Developer and Tester in Infosys Technologies Limited since June,  2004.
Presently a part of 23 member team involved in track 1 module of our software to
our client IDBI.
Scope of the software is to  reconcile, customize and provide the commercial lending
module of Finacle to  IDBI.
Backward reconciliation of 7.2 functionality into 7.0
Customization of application
Testing and Troubleshooting of application functionality
Installation and Application Support
Development of Reports, MIS
Contribution
Designing and Coding for the Interim  LOS screens and database creation.
Testing of the menus developed.
Projects done during training in Infosys Technologies Ltd.
Title  Internet Banking System
Period  20 days
Team Size  8
Front End  Asp.Net using C#. Net
Back End Oracle 8i
Description  This web application keeps track of transactions like opening an account, performing
transactions, editing customers general information etc. This project was a  internal project for
Infosys Technologies Ltd
Contribution  Design and Development
Title  Library Maintenance System
Period  15 days
Team Size  8
Front End  C language
Back End Files
Description  This C application keeps track of transactions like issue date of a  book , returning date of
book , Employee Id of issuer etc. This project was a  internal project for Infosys Technologies
Ltd.
Contribution  Design, Development and Testing
Undergraduate Projects:
IIT-ROORKEE  (Undergraduate)
Title  Compiler Design of 8085
Period  One Semester
Team Size  Two
Language(s)  C ,  Assembly Language Programming
Description  This was an assignment project in 5th semester. I designed a compiler for the microprocessor
language 8085 in C. The input was the `initial allowed address and program of 8085 in
standard mnemonics' and the output was the `opcodes and result at there respective memory
addresses and accumulator value'.
Guidance  Dr. Manoj Mishra (Dept. of Electronics and Computer Engineering), Indian Institute of
Technology Roorkee (IIT-R).
Title  Simulation of Genetic  Algorithm
Period  One month
Team Size  one
Language(s)  C++.
Description  Project was for simulation of Genetic  Algorithm for a  problem  to find shortest path for some
object, which is to move from a source to destination avoiding obstacles on a 2 D plane.  This
was a  single parameter problem. I used the formal bit wise Steady- State Genetic algorithm
Guidance  Dr. Manoj Mishra (Dept. of Electronics and Computer Engineering), Indian Institute of
Technology Roorkee (IIT-R).
Working  as Software Engineer for Accenture Services Pvt  Ltd.
Worked as Project  Trainee for MYM Technologies,  Hyderabad.
Worked  as Technical Team member  was responsible for  Coding  & maintenance.
Responsible for  Unit Testing  of  the assigned  modules.
Responsible for  screen  design  and  program development.
Project  #3:
Title : Traders Network
Software : ASP.NET, VB.NET
Backend : Oracle 8i
Team  size : 8
Role :  Involved  in  designing  and  coding
Worked  as Technical Team member  was responsible for  Coding  & maintenance.
Responsible for  Unit Testing  of  the assigned  modules.
Highly organized, committed and  enthusiastic  software professional with good  project
experience  and  technical skill
Analytically strong  with aptitude  for trouble  shooting  and  problem solving
Good interpersonal, communication and presentation skills
`B' Level Masters Diploma In Computer Application (equivalent to MCA)  from DOEACC
Society, Ministry of IT and  Communication, Govt. of India   2004
Payroll Integrated  System (15/11/2003-15/2/2004)    PICUP,Lucknow
Developed  an application on \u0022PAYROLL INTEGRATED  SYSTEM\u0022 using  Front end  as
Developer2000 and  back  end as Oracle8 at The Pradesiya Industrial and  Investment
Corporation of Uttar Pradesh (PICUP)  Lucknow as the  partial fulfillment for DOEACC
`B' Level' (MCA)  Programmer.
Officers Bar Club  Management System (2001) -  Wession Enterprises, Lucknow
Developed  an application on \u0022Officers Bar Club  Management\u0022 in Visual Basic  and
Oracle  as the  A level project. Working  on this project helped  me  in getting deep
knowledge  of Visual Basic  and  Oracle  and  got to learn many new things like  how to
analyze, design and handle  a project.
Working  in Hi-Tech Telecom  as a sourcing executive  since
02-03-05.  Hi-tech is a  Distributor for Electronic component.
RESPONSIBILITIES  GIVEN:
International Sourcing of Electronic  Components  and Parts.
Negotiating with  supplier and providing Quotes  for sales.
Procurement of Components  /  Parts from selected suppliers.
Feedback  assessment  for the supplied goods from the End
customer.
Sourcing of New suppliers both stockiest and authorized
distributors.
New Vendor verification based on  their performance & Tr ade
The Software Engineer has around  two  years of  extensive experience in  the Information
Technology  Industry  with  a strong  emphasis in  developing  and  maintaining  applications on
Mainframe Technologies using  COBOL,  DB2,  VSAM,  JCL and  CICS.
Working  as a Software engineer  for  Birlasoft  Limited,  Chennai,  Since Sep-2003  to  till
date as an  associate
Training(s)  Attended
QMS (Quality  management system)  -  Birlasoft Ltd.,  -  Chennai.
Six  Sigma Training  (Green  Belt)    Birlasoft Ltd.,  - Chennai.
CMMI awareness training    Birlasoft Ltd    Chennai.
Entire work  environment was based  on  SAP software.
Analyzing  and  Interpreting  between  varies Accounts and  Tax  procedure of  Europe
countries.
In  depth  knowledge of Accounts payable or  Vendor  Payable
Work  profile also  includes verifying  and  finalizing  the Accounts
Troubleshooting  by  means of interacting  with  client's via E-mail
Maintaining  cent percent Turn  Over  Time
Working  for  foreign  Clients based  on  their  local Accounting  specification
I  was also  responsible for  Quality  Control
Bachelor of Computer Application (B.C.A) from  Dr.  B.R.Ambadker University,  Agra With  65%
in  year 2001.
Master of Computer Science (M.Sc.(C.S.)) from B.R.Ambadker University,  Agra with  69% in
year 2004.
F  0
B  7
1 Around  2  years of  Experience in  the IT industry  with  V2  software technologies,  Ban galore from
April 2004  to  till date.
1+years Experience Manual and Automated Testing  using  Test Automation
Tools Win  Runner,  Load  Runner,  and  Test Director,  QTP
Exposure to  design  and  execution  of  test cases and  scenarios.
Exposure to  Functional Testing,  Black  Box  Testing  and  Regression  Testing.
Exposure to  Defect management and  Bug  Reporting  using  Bug-tracking  tools for
Business software's and  Web  applications.
Good  Knowledge to  all stages of  Software Development Life Cycle.
Excellent problem solving  skills with  a strong  technical background  and  good
interpersonal skills.
Quick  learner  and  excellent team player  having  ability  to  meet tight dead  lines
and  work  under  pressure
Exposure on  QTP
Knowledge on  ISO,  CMM and  Six  Sigma Standards.
EDUCATION PROFILE:
Education University/College/School From Year  To Year Percentage
MCA Madras University 2001 2004 72%
BCA Nagarjuna University
1998 2001 70%
At Present working at \u0022GIPL\u0022 as Network Engineer
8th August 2005 Onwards
J
ob Profile   GIPL (Guj  Info Petro Ltd.) is a genesis of a technologically
driven intent of providing world class Internet services to the progressive
genre of Gujarat.  Armed with Category A ISP's License and critical
infrastructure.  It is capable of providing adequate and substantial bandwidth
to the Corporate Customers today.
My job is to maintain the connectivity from our end to the customers.
Also providing online technical support to all the customers whether it is
cable or lease line or fiber or radio networks.  Here I have worked on Windows
& LINUX environments.  I  am also responsible for managing Linux Based
servers like DNS Server, Web server, Backup Server and for cable customer
there is our program with the help of which I can handle bandwidth and all
user records from it, at Gandhinagar NOC.
June 2005   August 2005 At \u0022In2Cable India Ltd.\u0022
Job Profile: In2Cable India Ltd is a Class A ISP with 8 headed all  across INDIA
basically  a  company in to Broadband Internet services. Here I  had work as a
Techno Marketing person,  which includes managing certain areas for any
technical and marketing related activities.
April 2004   June 2005 - At \u0022Devarshi Computer\u0022
Job Profile: Devarshi Computers is a  private computer institute,  I  have
worked there as a Senior Faculty for one and half year. I am also responsible
for managing whole Network.  I am also responsible for over all management
of other staff and their syllabus.
Other Experience:  (while college)
1)
Worked as Data Entry operator on a special project at Reliance
Infocomm Ltd. for 2 months.
2)
Worked as a Visiting Faculty  at \u0022ACT Computer Education\u0022 for six
months.
3)
Worked as Data Entry operator at \u0022Bhavin Computers\u0022 in night shift
for 4  months.
4)
Worked as a Hardware Engineer with \u0022Prakash Peripherals\u0022 for 5-6
months.
Text Resume
Name: KUNAL ASHOKBHAI SONI
Date of Birth:  18th April 1983
Marital Status:  Single
Language known: English,  Hindi  & Gujarati
FUTURE PROJECTIONS:
1.
To be a skilled Security  Professional
2.
To be skilled at Linux Environment
2+ years of experience in the field of information technology, specialized in Software
Testing. Involved in testing of Client/Server and Web based applications.
Domain experience in B2B, Banking and HealthCare.
Extensively  involved in preparing test cases, Manual test execution and Automation test
execution using WinRunner.
Actively  involved in participation of weekly  project status  meetings  with Teammates, Team
Lead and Project Manager.
Organization Mint Technologies
Current Designation Test Engineer
Period Nov'03 to Till date
1 years of hands on experience in Software  Development
Expertise  in PL/SQL programming in Oracle  9.1 and  above
Able  to interact with internal customers
Good  oral communication skills
Strong Analytical & pr oblem solving  skills.
Working  in  Ebiztechnorcts Pvt.  Ltd,  Gwalior (MP) as an  Data Base Administrator
(DBA) about 10  months trainer.and
oracle pl/sql developer
A
REA OF INTEREST:
SQL ,  ORACLE PL/SQL DEVELOPER AND DBA (DATA BASE
ADMINISTRATOR)
carriculum  Projects:
Project Undertaken at E-BIZ TECHNOCRATS Centre,  New Delhi
TITLE: MATRIAL COSTSHEET AUTOMATION GENERATION
Back End
Oracle 9i
Front End
VB 6.0
Operating  System
Win  2000
My  Role
Design,  Debugging,  Testing
Team  Size
3
DESCRIPTION: This Software has full Description  and  all the functionality  of the Cost Management
System And  So  On  This Software has very  flexible report tool and
Query  System.
Project Undertaken at MPCT :
1. TITLE: Hospital Management System
Back End
Oracle 9i
Front End VB 6.0
Operating  System Win  2000
My  Role Design,  Coding,  Debugging,  Testing
Team  Size 2
DESCRIPTION: This Software has full Description  and  all the functionality  of the Hospital Management
System .This Software provide all information  about all staff & all Patient & their room No.  and  Dr.  duty
Details & their shift.  And  So  On  This Software has very  flexible report tool and  Query  System.
2.  TITLE: Payroll System
Tools
C++
Operating  System
Window 98
My  Role
Design,  Debugging,  Testing
Team Size
2
DESCRIPTION: It provides details  of available all the employee of a company,  their basic salary,  all the
incentives,  deductions and  so  on.  It also  keeps the information  about the lone facility,  overtime,  home loan  and  their
effect on  their salary.
Working  as a  Software Engineer in  M/S.  Harshini Software Solution in  Chennai.
Around  2  Years of experience,  expertise in  development of application  programs and
gone through  Coding,  Integration  and  Debugging.
Specialized  in  J2EE (JSP,  Servlets,  JDBC  and  EJB) Web  logic and  Tomcat.
Working  as Customer Support for ICICI  Bank,HITEC CITY.(Since jun'05  to  till date).
Over 13+ years of functional  experience in  accounting  maintenance for various business extensive
practical and  business experiences in  areas such  as non  banking  financial corpo-ration,  stock
market,  paints organizations.
Working  as a SAP FICO  CONSULTANT for last  2years (since December 2003) experience in  GL,
AP,  AR and  Knowledge in  AA and  Controlling.
SAP SKILLS:
Configuration
(General)
Global  settings  and enterprise structure settings  were
configured. Detailed discussions  were held to evaluate various
organizational entities  and their impact on other modules.
Creating of  open and close periods, Field status  variants  and
field status  groups.
Assignment of Document number ranges  for various  Document
types.
Configuring fiscal year variants  with year-dependent periods  for
year-end closing and posting period variants.
General  Ledger
AP / AR
Define Chart of Accounts, Account  Groups, Number ranges  and
General  Ledger for Each SBU wise and company  code.
Creating Master Data, House banks, GL accounts  for bank
accounts  and creation of Reconciliation accounts  for Vendors,
Customers  and Assets  & payment methods  setting for vendors.
Settings  for Automatic  payment  program.
Interest calculation settings  for customers  (AR) and vendors
(AP).
FI-MM Integration
FI-SD  integration
ACADAMIC  QUALIFICATION:
Master degree in  Public Personnel  Management
Bachelor Degree in  Commerce
Presently  working  as a SAP FICO Consultant  in  Jupiter E-com  & Networks Services Pvt Ltd  since
December2003.
Over7.  5  years experience in  Finance and  Accounts related  areas in  Sahara India Financial
Corporation  as an  Accounts Incharge.
2  years experience in  Unique Shares and  Securities as an  Accountant.
3.10  years experience in  Sigma Paints as an  Accountant.
SAP EXPERIENCE:
Working as a SAP FICO  consultant in Jupiter E-com & Networks Services Pvt.  Ltd
Hyderabad since December 2003.
1. Project Details:
Project Name:SAP implementation for JENS
Scope: SD,  MM and FI/CO
Duration Oct 2004  to till  date
JENS Description:
Founded in 2000,  JENS is IT consulting and project execution firm that
provides a complete set of business solutions and Enterprise Resource Planning
SAP related services to public and private sector businesses worldwide. Our
services enable the clients to implement effective business practices and
management metrics through solutions that integrate people,  processes and
technology
JENS secured SAP authorized license for its SAP R/3  software and implemented
for its own operations.
The implementation experience includes the following:
Client Requirements Analysis
Discussing with core team members and documenting the same
Documentation
Project Contribution:
Configuration of FI  organizational elements and assignment to overall
structure.
Configuration of master data,  (GL,  vendor, customer & Asset records).
RAMANA MURTHY
Ramana Murthy Page 2
Configuration of document types, number ranges.
Configuration of foreign exchange rate, tax calculation procedures,
Interest rates.
Configuration of payment terms,  payment methods.
Creation of reconciliation accounts.
Maintain SGL for down payment.
Customizations were done for Chart of Depreciation, Asset class,
Account Determination, Depreciation Areas etc.
Configured Cash Journal.
Configuration of automatic  payment,  house banks and bank accounts.
Configuration of dunning procedure and running dunning program.
Configuration of Depreciation Key and AM Settings.
Configuration of FI-SD & FI-MM integrations.
Controlling:
Setting up of controlling area.
Creation of primary (Both manual & automatic) & secondary cost
elements.
Created Cost centers,  cost center groups.
2. Project Details:
Project Name:  Silicon Designs Implementation
Client  : Silicon Designs (M) Sdn Bhd,  Malaysia
Type  : Support
Duration: Dec, 2003  to Sept,  2004
Description:
Silicon Designs is a company that was incorporated in 2001  with the aim
of providing quality software consultancy and development services.  Silicon
Designs has a  clear objective of providing world class application and
outsourcing solutions with personalized service and with a proven process
driven delivery model.
Support:
Analyzing and providing solutions on the trouble tickets raised by the
client.
RAMANA MURTHY
Ramana Murthy Page 3
Providing functional specs to the technical team for ABAP report changes
and new  Report requirements.
Creating New  Test Scripts and Modifying Existing Test Scripts.
Worked as an Accounts Incharge (AJW-I) in Sahara  India  Financial Corporation from
June1996  to  October 2003.
Work  related  to  Accounts Receivable and  Accounts Payable.
Management  of Bank  Accounts and  Funds Utilization.
Maintenance of Computerized  Accounts.
Preparation  of Financial Reports.
Preparation  of Sundry  Creditors Ledger.
Preparation  of Bank  Reconciliation  Statement.
Preparation  of Cash  and  Bank  Ledgers.
Preparation  of Loans and  Maturities.
Maintenance of General Ledger Accounting.
Preparation  of initial,  renewal and  overhead  commissions of field  workers.
Preparation  of Day  Book.
Handling  of Petty  Cash  Transaction.
Preparation  of Trial Balance and  Every  month  Balance Sheet.
Worked in Unique Shares and Securities as an Accountant From Feb 1994  to  Dec1995
Preparation  of Sundry  Debtors Ledger.
Preparation  of Sundry  Creditors Ledger.
Handling  of Petty  Cash.
Preparation  of Bank  Reconciliation  Statement.
Preparation  of Trial Balance.
Preparation  of Trading,  Profit & Loss Account.
Preparation  of Balance Sheet  etc.,
RAMANA MURTHY
Ramana Murthy Page 4
Worked in Sigma  Paints Ltd as an Accountant From Feb 1990  to  Nov  1993.
Maintenance of Stock  Ledger.
Maintenance of Customer Ledger.
Preparation  of Bank  Reconciliation  Statement.
Preparation  of Debtors Reconciliation  Statement.
Preparation  of Stock  Reconciliation  Statement.
Preparation  of Monthly  Reports.
Dealing  with  maters related  to  Sales Tax  and  Excise Duty.
Maintenance of Excise Tax  gate pass register and  issue of gate passes.
Issuing  of Credit  Notes and  Debit Notes.
Handling  of Petty  Cash,  etc.

Handling the complete Recruitment Life Cycle Sourcing, Short listing the
profiles, Candidate tracking, Follow-ups, HR
Screening, Interview, Salary  negotiations  and joining formalities
Organizing On-line Tests  and coordinating with Technical managers  to
conduct Technical Interviews
Generating Leads, References  from  called up, interviewed candidates
Managing pipeline of selected candidates  so that the hiring of those
persons  can happen as  and when required
Maintaining, Updating the efficient database using Access  and Excel
Sheets
Active participation in formation, implementation of recruitment
procedures, processes, practices
Extensive profile search on Naukri, Monster  &   Jobsahead for  IT and
Telecom  requirements, keeping in mind location constraints, rates, industry
concerns  etc.
Post Recruitment:
Prepare Offer  letter and other  related documents  and send them  to the
selected candidates.
Communicate about the joining formalities  and process  to the prospective
new hire.
Give new hire information to Management.
Touch base with the candidates  till they  join.
Joining & Induction:
Administering the joining papers  to the new joinees.
Personal File creation (Collecting the relevant documents  viz. photographs,
academic  certificates  and experience certificates,
Orientation about the company  and process  in general
Introducing the new joinees  to the respective staff.
Filing the documents  and giving it to the induction team,
1.  Administrating
2.  Cash  handling
3.  Reporting
1.  Administrating
2.  Cash  handling
3.  Reporting
ORGANISATION:
QUEST Pvt. Ltd.  Bangalore
from July-04 to till date.
Solid Modeling of Parts  and Assemblies  using Pro/E wildfire.
Preparing Manufacturing Drawings  and Assembly  Drawings.
As Cad Engineer in Best Software Engineers  Pvt. Ltd. Hyderabad
from Jan-04 to June-04.
TECHNICAL TRAINING:
Post Diploma in Computer Aided Tool Design engineers  cad centre
hyderabad from June-03 to Nov-03.
Installation,  configuration,  administration  of windows 2000  window XP and  2003  operating
systems
Installation  & maintenance of  Software & hardware.
Installation  and  maintenance of  desktop  systems along  with  different peripherals
Installing  PC's with  Linux  and  Windows using  VMWARE.
Managing  and  trouble shooting  WAN and  LAN.
Configuration  and  Management of  Apache Web  server.
Managing  the LAN consisting  of  100  Linux  and  100  Window's machines.
Troubleshooting  LAN problems and  Connectivity  problem of network.
Maintaining  fine tune networking  between  Windows 2000  network  with  mixed  environment
as Windows XP Professional,  Windows 2000  Professional by  Switches
Configuration  and  Maintenance of  Antivirus server.
Experience in  Client/Server  installation  and  configuration  of  multiple platforms and  doing
networking.
Providing  Technical support to  site staff  Online as well as Onsite.
Backups planning  and  implementation.
Goal oriented  professional and  an  effective team player with  good  communication  &
interpersonal skills.
RESPONSIBILTIES
Installing,  Troubleshooting,  Administrating  & Configuring  Various Microsoft Operating
System like Windows 2000  Professional / Server,  Windows 9X/XP,  Windows NT Server &
Workstation.
Emphasis on  client/server software and  hardware set-up,  system administration,  security
implementation,  disaster  prevention  and  recovery.
Explored  Various aspects of network  printing  including  installation,  configuration  and
troubleshooting.
Installing  & Configuring  DNS,  WINS & DHCP.
Maintaining  users/groups of the company,  knowledge of  Active Directory  Structure.
Installation  and  configuration  of internal training  facility  consisting  of  Windows
workstations.
Windows 2000  Server  (Active Directory,  MS SQL Server  2000,  Administration  and
troubleshooting  of  Windows 2000/XP Workstations on  a Windows 2000  Server  including
DHCP,  applying  policies,  etc.).
Implementation  of  Quality  Assurance procedures for  Systems & Network  Administration.
MIC Electronics Limited an  ISO 9001  company,  Hyderabad,  India.
(April `2002  present as a System  Administrator)
Have  2 + Years of experience as Test  Engineer, Client/Server environment and in Web application
development. Extensive experience in ManualTesting ,SDLC.
Presently working in Keartiman Group,coimbatore.
Strong  in Software  Development Life Cycle and Test  Methodologies
Awareness  of CMM models
Involved in Manual  Testing of applications
Good Team player, communication and  negotiation skills
User oriented thinking
Fast learner and ability to operate in a fast moving, team-oriented, collaborative environment
Involved in preparing  Test Case Specifications a nd Test Reports
Familiar with tools  for configuration management
Involved in Functionality, Integration, System and Regression Testing
concepts of Automation Tool Win Runner
Expertise in Problem solving and  Tracking Bug Reports using Bug tracking Tools
Analyzing system requirements  and developing  Test Cases
Involved in Black Box testing including functionality testing
Responsible for Documentation testing & Regression testing after fixing bugs
Involved in GUI Testing and Database Testing
# Customer Service  & Support  Management  (CSSM)
Tools : ASP.Net, C#, XML, SQL  Server
Environment : Windows 2000
Duration : 6  months
Team Size : 6
Role : Test engineer
Responsibilities : Test  Cases, Bug Reports
Description
Customer Service  & Support application enables  our company to forge strong  relationships  and increase customer
satisfaction while simultaneously streamlining  customer service & support operations. This  integrates installation, AMC
and AMC renewal, call  login, call  allocation, call status  updation, and inventory, automatic  response time and  resolution
time calculation at the time of call login based on the scheme. If the call is  not finished with in the period, intimation is
given to top-level  management automatically. All the reports are  customizable.
# Authentication & Authorization (AA)
Tools : ASP, HTML, SQL  Server
Environment : Windows  2000
Duration : 6 months
Team Size : 4
Role : Test engineer
Responsibilities : Test Cases, Bug  Reports
Description
This  is  a robust  role based  Access Control Security Framework. It  provides  secured role based access  within intranet while
providing users  with transparent, Single Sign On (SSO) functionality across multiple applications. Modules  which
constitute  this  framework  are Role Administration, Function Administration, Privilege Administration, Function Privilege
Administration, Role Function Privilege Administration, and Role  Exclusion Administration.
# Intranet Distribution Management System (IDMS)
Tools : ASP, HTML, SQL  Server
Environment : Windows 2000
Duration : 6 months
Team Size : 5
Role : Test  engineer - Trainee
Responsibilities : Test Cases, Bug Reports
Description
The main objective for developing this  Intranet project was  to allow the employees  of organization to View all  customer
profile forms and check for the stock levels. Accept orders for supplying the stock  to customers. Keartiman Agro Industries
(P) Ltd was involved in sale of food  products  such as jams, pickles, squash, mango bars, mango pulp etc. This  project
consist  of web pages  which had various  aspects  of the business process  like Order acceptance forms, Customer profile
forms, Pay slips which gives the flexibility to deal with customers  easily.
I have 1+  year of experience in development  on  java  language.
Worked as  Software Engineer in ITS Wireless Private Limited,
Bangalore. since Jan  2005 to  Mar 2006
a)
Working as a Programmer in IT Software Solutions from Feb  2005 till
1
now.(1 Year)
Responsible for system study, planning, designing, coding, implementation
and Documentation.
Providing  status reports to the  Project Lead.
Project Presentation.
ENGAGEMENT OVERVIEW
Project:  IDE for sendmail configuration
Role:  Design and  Coding
Organization/Location:  IT Computer Solutions.
IDE for sendmail configuration is linking  frontend  and  mailserver.Here  a
configuration assistant for LINUX  is being  developed  and  made  it user friendly for
WINDOWS  os.
Sendmail(Default mail transfer Agent)  accepts mail from  mail user agents & deli ver it
to appropriate mailer as defined by its configuration file.
Sendmail provides with the  \u0022m4\u0022 macro based  configuration file   called
\u0022sendmail.mc\u0022 by default.This allows us to use  more  human comprehensible
configuration constructs.
The  following  items are to be configured   such as sendmail options,aliases,local
domains,Masquerading,Trusted  Users,Address Mapping,Domain routing,handling
hosts,Mail queue  etc.
Software: VB.Net, Java (networking)
OS  :  LINUX,WINDOWS
Project:  GroceryBilling
Role:  Design and  Coding
Organization/Location:  IT COMPUTER  SOLUTIONS.
Grocery Billing is a Billing  system developed  for Grocery Shop  using JAVA and  SQL
server. It maintains the  inventory of a whole  sale  grocery shop  in India. It automates
the  operations such as billing, account maintaining, stock information of various
products of various varieties, price  details of various products. It also involves the  tax
calculation, Brokerage, asset handlings and  other financial activities. It generates
product based  and  time  based  reports.
Project Features:
It automates the  whole  operation of the  grocery shop.
It provides the  overall report functionality for the  shop.
Software:Java ,Java Swing, Java sql, SQL Server 2000
2
Project:Process  In Indian Embassy
Role:  Design and  Coding
Organization/Location:  IT COMPUTER  SOLUTIONS
INDIAN EMBASSY  maintains the details of Indians in that particular foreign country
where we install it.This embassy takes responsibility for all Indians in that particular
country.The  registration for each individual takes place  with appropriate  formalities
& pr oofs.So the  complete record  of each individual can be  retrieved  from database.
Project Features:
It provides an easy way of accessing  all details about the  required personality.
Software: Java ,Java swing,Java sql,MS-ACCESS
Project:  Visa  Management System
Role:  Design and  Coding
Organization/Location:  IT COMPUTER  SOLUTIONS
VISA MANAGEMENT SYSTEM  maintains the  details of the  foreigners in that
Country.The  process here  includes details to visa apply,renewal,cancel,issue.
Details about each candidate is here  in the  database.So easy retrieval of data is
possible.
Software: Java,Java Swing,Java sql, MS  ACCESS
This Project is a new innovative system that provides Remote Administration
services.  The main  aim  of this Project is a client/server application  that helps us to  keep  track  of
the computer,  which  we operate remotely.
Project Title : IMPLEMENTATION  OF NETWORK SECURITY USING IP TABLES.
Language : Shell Scripting  in  Linux.
Team  Size :  Individual.
Duration  : 4  months.
Organization  : Advantage Pro  (p) Ltd.,
This project is used  to  build  the firewall and  Intrusion  Detection  System  (IDS)
for enterprise network  to  filter the unauthorized  packets in  the organization  network  and  to
protect  the Organization  resources from external  threats.  We can  also  hide the private LAN from
Internet.  Firewall and  Intrusion  Detection  System (IDS) meets this challenge with  the industry
leading  network  security  solution.  It  enables enterprise to  define and  enforce a comprehensive
security  policy  that protects all network  resources.
MIND-IT SOLUTIONS
JUNE-2002 to JULY 2004
Worked as Hardware and network Engineer.
Configuring  Windows 2000  Server  & Professional with  ADS  .
Installation  & maintenance of  Windows '95  / 98  / 2000  / XP.
Systems Assembling  and  troubleshooting.
United Telecoms Ltd.,
AUG 2004  to  till date
Visit: http://www.utlindia.com
Working  as a NETWORK ENGINEER at UNITED TELECOMS LIMITED in  APSWAN (Andhra
Pradesh  State Wide Area Network  ) Project.  Visit: http://www.apts.gov.in/apswan.html
DISCRIPTION :  APSWAN is a WAN which  connects all DNCs (District Network  Centre ) located  in
District collectrates to  SNC (State Network  Centre)  located  at Secretariat in  HYD.  We can  communicate
DATA,  VOICE and  VIDEO through  this Network.
My  nature of  work  is Installation  and  Maintenance of  CISCO Routers (1751  and 3600 ,3700  Series),
RAD Modems (2  Mbps  Leased line and  other  HDSL modems),  Hubs,Switches,LAN Cabling  and
Installation and configuration of  LAN connections in  the collectorate,  TELLABS Multi Services
Switch  is to  Multiplexing  and  Demultiplexing  the data,  video  and  voice.
Video  Conference Equipment (Monitor,  Camera,  CODEC,  Remote Controller ),  Leased  line
connections from DNC to  other  Govt departments and  Dailup connections..
Modems: Installation and Configuration of  the following  Modems.
RAD HTU-E1  2MB  Leased  Modems.
RAD ASM-20  /31  64Kbps Leased  Modems.
D-LINK DLM-128  Leased  Modems.
Installation  & configuration  of  Leased line connections to  different Govt.Departments for
effective data transfer  through  64  KBPS and  2  MBPS Links.
Configuration  of Dialup connections to  various government departments for  data transfer
and  Internet access through  telephone line with  Modem.
Installation,  Configuration  & Maintenance of FTP server on Windows 2000.
With  the help  of this FTP Server,  remote user  can  send  files either  through  LAN
or  Dialup  connection.
Work  experience of  1+  Years  in  ASP.NET,  ADO.net, SQL Server 7.0,  Oracle 9i  and  PL/SQL functioning  as  a
Software Developer  in  a  CMMi  Level  5 company.  Currently  I  am working with CMC.  Posted in  Mumbai  which is  our
client  location.  I  am  in the  project  group  for  insurance  products.  Our  clients  includes  some prestigious  insurance
company  (Govt  & Private).  Like Reliance,  ICICI  etc.  As  CMC  is  the market  leader  for insurance product  (s/w)  in india
our  group is  being  considered as  main  technology  group in  our company.
1) DEVELOPMENT  AND TESTING OF DIFFERENT  UNDERWRITING MODULES USING GENERAL
INSURANCE CONFIGURATOR PRODUCT DEFINITION TOOL FOR ICICI LOMBARD INSURANCE
COMPANY.
(At  Present  Working on this  Project)
Company : CMC LIMITED, KOLKATA, MUMBAI (CMMi 5)
Project Basic
Functionalities
: General  Insurance  Configurator  is  a suite of  components  that  satisfies  the need of  a
comprehensive  insurance  system.  Configurator has  been developed as  a product,  with  its
entire  suite  of components  serving  the  comprehensive  needs  of  a typical  insurance
organization,  or  as  individual  components  catering  to specific  organizational  needs.  These
Configurator  components  can be easily  ported  to platforms  of  choice and /  or  customized to
suit  as  the specific  business  practices  and  rules  of  an  insurance organization.
Configurator  has  a product  definition engine component  that  allows  the  users  to rapidly  define
new  insurance  products,  make changes  to existing products,  and establish  rules  that  govern
these products' behavior.
Specific  responsibilities  comprised  the following:  -
Involved  In Analysis  of  Client's  Requirement.
Involved  In Developing And Modifying Various  Insurance Products
Involved  In Various  Report  Generation according to  Client's  requirements
-  Testing  of  Application Software.
Team  Size : Worked in  a group of  30  Persons.
Role  : Developer
Duration : Currently  working  over it.
Responsibilities : Working as  a Programmer.  Doing  Analysis  and  Coding of  the above mentioned  system.
Software's : Implemented by  taking  Front-end tool  as  ASP.net  and Back-end  tool as  ORACLE  9i
2) Online Shopping Cart(Total 3 sites)
Company : MassoftInd, KOLKATA
Project Basic
Functionalities
: www.furniturescope.com ,Oregon bookstore,  advanced color  lighting.  Those are  The  Sites  for
online  shopping which Displays  many  products  category  wise and user  can choose  and  buy
online.
Role  : Whole  responsibility  of  requirement  analysis,  designing,  developing,  testing,  modifying of  the
sites.
Responsibilities : Worked as  a Programmer
Software's : Implemented by  taking  Front-end tool  as  ASP.net,  Back-end tool  as  SQL Server  2000.
3) Attendance Monitoring System
Company : Globsyn Technology, KOLKATA
Project Basic
Functionalities
: Keeps  track  of  the employee's  attendance  and gives  day-to-day  weekly  and monthly  reports
for individual,  department  wise and all  employees.
Role  : Whole  responsibility  of  requirement  analysis,  designing,  developing,  testing,  modifying of  the
sites.
Responsibilities : Worked as  a Programmer.  Done  Analysis,  Designing,  and  Coding of  the above mentioned
system in a two  member  team.
Software's : Implemented by  taking  Front-end tool  as  ASP.net,  Back-end tool  as  SQL Server  2000.
Six weeks summer training in BSNL,  Kanpur
Working  as a Programmer in  Vallabh  Software Solutions Pvt.  Ltd.,  DVG  Rd,  Bangalore
since March  2006  to  till Date.
Worked  as a Programmer in  Genesis Technologies,  Kolhapur since January  2005  to  till
January  2006.
Worked  as a Programmer in  Innovative Technologies,  Kolhapur since June 2004  to
December 2004.
More than  two  and  Half year
1.working  for city  loans  for more than  one and  the half year.
2.working  under the guidance of Mr.  S.H.  Nizami  (advocate)who  has  an
experience of more than  than  30  years.
3.worked  with  Mr.Javed  Ali (advocate) Ghaziabad  court.
Preparing  cases  and  appearing  before courts  relating  to  matters,
1.Legal  Notice and  filing  complaint under sec.138  of negotiable Instrument
Act relating  to  dishonors  of cheque .
2.Relating  to  recovery  suits  under order 37  CPC .
3.Relating  to  Arbitration  proceeding.
4.Suits  relating  to  DRC Act  and  Slum Area Clearance Act.
5.suits relating  to  injunction  and  Stay  orders  order 39.
6.Suits  relating  to  maintenance and  Marriage and  Divorce.
7.  Suits  in  consumer Courts.
8.  Suits  relating  to  Motor Vehicle Act  1988.  etc.
Specialization in drafting,
1.Various  Legal Notices.
2.Contracts.
3.GPA ,SPA.
4.agreement  to  sale etc.
5.Partenership  Deed  and  Dissolution  Deeds.
6.Reelinquishment  Deed.
7.Licence Deed  and  Indemnity  Bond.
Etc.
CURRENT SALARY:
10000+ Incentives
Java Servlets to  read  data as  a Java objects from the UI to  load  in  to  database.
JSP,  and  Servlets  were used  for the front-end  design  and  backend  processing  respectively.
Design,  Development,  Customer Call management and  Contact Management module and  Involving  coding
in  enhancement of JSP.
Developed  JSP pages  for Contact Management and  Customer Call Management.
1
Project Title : Integrated Business Solutions
Client : Swaraj Group of Companies,  India.
Software : Java ,  Servlets,  JSP,  and  Oracle.
Team Size : 12
Description:
This system was executed  for Swaraj Group  of Companies,  India.  This system completely  automates the entire
business process of the Punjab  Tractors  Limited.  This is a huge project and  it consists of about 11  modules such  as
plant Maintenance,  Finance Accounts,  Sales,  Exports/Imports,  Stores,  Costing  and  Budgeting  etc.
As a Team Member...  .  .
Developed  the presentation  layer using  JSPs .
Involved  coding  of servlets  and  review of the system.
Involved  in  the preparation  of test scripts for the use cases.
Responsible for preparation  of user entry  screens.
Client side validations were done using  JavaScript.
Implementation  was at the client place.
Project  Title : Innovation Recognition System
Client : Dr.Reddy's  Lab,  Hyderabad.
Technologies  used : Java 2.0,  HTML,  Servlets and  SQL Server 7.0.
Environment : Windows NT
Team Size : 5
Description
To  protect an  organizations  internal technology,  there should  be a structured  portfolio  process that manages
Intellectual Property.  The Innovation  Recognition  System called  Afflatus allows the germinal idea,  with  recognition
for a lateral thinker,  to  evolve incrementally,  with  inputs  from others  within  the organization.  Afflatus aids any
Knowledge Worker in  an  organization  to  post his ideas in  a central place for purposes  of secure internal patents.
Security,  which  in  effect,  eliminates  the risk  of anybody  else taking  credit for their ideas within  the organization  and
also  paves the way  for the internal patent desk  to  recognize,  appreciate,  archive and  act on  new ideas  that come
internally.  Afflatus  empowers organizations to  patent new ideas in  a much  more authentic and  precise manner.
Role:
Involved  in  Analysis,  Coding,  Testing  and  debugging
Sincerely  Yours
Y.Eswara  Prasad.
IT experience
Fresher
Bachelor of Engineering in Civil Engineering (with distinction  67.4%) discipline from Sardar
Vallabhbhai National Institute of Technology  Surat (formerly  known as  R E C  Surat) in
2004.
6 Weeks  Summer  Training at B. Tech. Net Ltd.(New Delhi).
8 Weeks  Summer  Training at Reckers  & Au tomation LTD (New Delhi)
Presently working as a Pundit  Systems  Programmer.
I  am involving  in coding  and  unit  testing  for small enhancements.
Skills Used:  RPG/400, CL/400, DB2/400, OS/400.
PROJECT #1:
As  Programmer at Pundit  Systems from October  2004 -  May 2005
Project  Name:  Merchandise Information  Processing System (MIPS)
Team Size:  8
Location:  Chennai, INDIA
Profile:  Maintenance and  enhancements of the  existing  Merchandise  Information
Processing  System (MIPS). MIPS  has various retailing subsystems viz. Order Entry,
Reservations, Transfers, Returns and  interfaces with other applications.
Prepare  Program Specifications and  Unit  Test  Plans.
I  involved in coding and unit  testing.
Skills Used:  RPG/400, CL/400, DB2/400, OS/400
PROJECT #2:
As  Programmer at Pundit Systems from February 2004 -  September  2004
Project  Name:  Sales Order  System
Team Size:  6
Location:  Chennai, INDIA
I  involved in the coding and unit testing for the  reports module.
Skills Used:  RPG/400, CL/400, DB2/400, OS/400.
PROJECT #3:
As  Programmer at Pundit Systems from September  2003 -  January 2004
Project  Name:  Time Management System
Team Size:  6
Location:  Chennai, INDIA
I  involved in the coding and unit testing in various module.
Embedded  Mixed  Hardware design,  testing  algorithm  development,  software
development,  debugging,  system  integration  and  ISO  document preparation.
F  0
B  7
2
September 2004- October 2004:
Software Trainee Engineer SUNTEC INFO  SYSTEMS,  Thiruvananthapuram.
Telecom  Domain  Training,  Billing  Software development & conf iguration
for BSNL (C-TRA package)
F  0
B  7
3
March  2004- September 2004:
Graduate Engineering  trainee in  Hindustan Newsprint Limited,  Kottayam  an  ISO 9001  &
14001  Company  that  is a subsidiary  of Hindustan  Paper Corporation.
Tuning  &Calibration of SMART transmitters,  actuators&Sensors from
Yokogawa,  ABB,  &Rosemount, us ing  HART Communicator and  field  calibrator.
Configuration& impl ementation  of single loop  PID  controller for process Control applications.
Controller  tuning  & optimization  for  closed  loop  systems in  DCS system from
Yokogawa (CENTUM XL&CS3000)  & PLC  based  controlling  in  plant applications.
1. Electronic Paralleling  Of UPS Systems (on going  project)
Activities involved:
F  0
B  7
1 TMS320LF2407A DSP based
mixed  voltage  system design  for embedded  control.
F  0
B  7
2
Development,  debugging  and  testing  of DSP based  Real  time control  software.
F  0
B  7
3
Visual Basic based  socket  Programming  (Mscomm  Control) development for data
acquisition  and  master control
F  0
B  7
4
SPI,  SCI,  communication  protocols development.
F  0
B  7
5
CAN  Open Stack  implementation (CAN 2.0A)
F  0
B  7
6 Software for  a custom-built LCD Keyboard  Display  Unit,  providing  the user
interface.
2. Single Phase 1KVA UPS Systems (on going  project)
Activities involved:
F  0
B  7
7 TMS320LF2407A DSP based
mixed  voltage  system design  for embedded  control.
F  0
B  7
8
Development,  debugging  and  testing  of DSP based  Real  time control  software
F  0
B  7
9
Static Switch  Gate Driver Card  Design,  Thermal Design  for Heat Sink.
3.  Implementation of
Dynamic `C' TCP/IP stack.
This project aimed  at developing  RS 232  to  TCP/IP converter module using  Rabbit  core RCM
Activities involved:
F  0
B  7
10
Codin
g,  debugging  and  testing  of Rabbit core RCM2200  Module.
4.  PIC  Based Data  Acquisition system for Power Quality  Systems
The assignment  involves development  of a high  performance,  low  cost  supervisory,  networking
hardware interface with  PIC micro  controller (CAN protocol for Hybrid  Electric Vehicles).
5.  DSP Based Embedded Solution for Real Time Data  Communication
The assignment  involves project guidance for B.Tech  Students in  Hardware & Soft ware development
for the Academic Project.  (Networking  of Dynamic Power Manager System).
Father's Name -  N.Krishnan  Potty
Nationality  -  Indian
Date of  birth -  04  -01-1981
Sex  -  Male
Marital status -  Single.
Languages known -  Malayalam,  English,  Hindi
Personal Interests -  Reading,  Listening  to  music,  Table Tennis.
Passport  Number -  E6177605  (Date Of  Expiry: 26-08-2013)
Official Address - C-DAC (T),  Vellayambalam,
Trivandrum-695  033,
Project Expert Hiring System 5/2005-till date
Client Employ Systems, USA.
Role Developer
Team Size Six
The main objective of this project is providing an environment for the
HR
consultancy people to make easier the process of recruiting appropriate people for the
vacant job
positions. In this project, there are different roles like Client Manager, Facility Manager, HR
Manager, HR Clerk, and Interviewer. This project contains full of customization like Client
Manager  can specify that what are the changes the Facility Manager can do and the
Facility
Manager  can specify that what are the changes a HR Manager can do and  HR Manager can
specify that what are the changes the HR Clerk can do. At First Client Manager  specifies
that
type of applications accepted, type of interviews need to be attended like that, and
specifies that can the Facility Manager modify these configurations. If the Facility Manager
has the permission
to change the configurations then he can modify as well as he can specify that the HR
Clerk can
modify any of this configuration while job posting. When the HR Clerk finds that any
vacancies to
fill up ,he will post a job with the details and now the job will be in the status to  approve, it
is only
visible to him  and HR Manager, then HR Manager verifies the job Details and  if he find
appropriate he will Activate the job. The candidate who visits the site can search and apply
for the
vacant positions and HR Manager  verifies the applications hires the appropriate people for
that
position.
Developing the Concrete Command Classes
Prepared user requirements  and developed business  and technical
specifications  accordance to business  rules.
Actively  attended meetings  with fellow developers  and other groups  to
evaluate the progress  and Performance of the application.
Creating jsp pages
Environment JAVA, Servlet, JSP, Struts, Oracle, windows  XP
Project Online Tendering Systems
Duration 2 months
My Role Designing,Coding and testing
Team Size Five
This  project deals  with the automation of conventional tender system. In conventional tender
system the tender provider should consult any  media to advertise his  tenders. But using this
online system tender provider can upload his  tender's  notifications  and advertisements  by  just
logging on to the portal with proper uername, and password, which could be, get at the time of
registration. And the tender applicant can also apply  to his  desired tenders  by  just watching the
portal. The Applicants  can apply  for the tenders  by  just filling the Online Application Form of their
desired tenders. All cash transfers  can be done through online using Credit card or Net Banking
facilities. Thus  this  system can become a common platform to whole the process  of tender
system. The manual labor can be reduced which will be very  high in conventional system like
notifying through media, filling and posting the tender application by  post and gathering at a
particular location to quote the tenders. Using this  system time and money  can also be saved
which will be consumed heavily  in traditional system.
Environment JAVA, JSP, JDBC, JAVA SCRIPT,Oracle, windows XP
Capable of  adapting  quickly  any  technologies & working  environments.
Good  at problem-solving  skills,  can  perform independently  as well as proactive team
member.
Working as a Software Test Engineer for eQ  Technologic (India) Pvt Ltd,  Pune
from Nov 2003 to till date.
Preparation Test cases specifying  the description, input data and  expected  value.
Reviewing  the Test cases &   Enhancing  of test cases according  to the  change
requirements.
Execution of test cases on different test environments.
Involved in Functional, Regression, Compatibility and  smoke  Testing.
Weekly report generation for bugs.
Bug  tracking  and  Reporting.
PROJECT # 2:  Visual Asset Manager (June 2004 -  Jan 2005)
Client
Team Size
Environment
Platform
Testing  Tool
Bug  Tracking  Tool
Infoland  Technologies, India
2
Vb.Net, Sql Server
Windows 2000
WinRunner
Rational Clear Quest
Participated  in functional/design document review meetings to ensure  complete
coverage  of test cases.
Involved in writing  and  execution of Test Cases and  creating Test reports.
Performed  Functional and Regression Testing.
Developed  Automatic  Test Scripts using  WinRunner. Performed  Data driven test
to handle  the  scenario requiring  multiple  sets of data. Parameterized  test scripts
in WinRunner  with necessary values
Tracked  and Monitored  bugs and  reported defect list to development team.
Weekly report generation for bug  trends.
PROJECT # 3:  Intranet Mailing System (Nov 2003-May 2004)
Client
Team Size
Environment
Platform
eQ Technologic.
2
ASP.Net, Sql Server
Windows 2000.
Assistance
in
writing test cases.
Assistance
in
functional testing, regression testing.
Assistance
in
bug  report preparation.
Maral Overseas Limited (A flagship of LNJB Group)....................APR 2005 to Till Date
Maral Overseas  Limited is  the integrated Textile Unit of the LNJ  Bhilwara Group Situated at
Khargone (M.P.). An ISO 9002 Company. A 100% Export Oriented Unit (HO: NOIDA) for cotton
yarn, fabric, Garment and knitwear with the turnover of Rs.1630 million. They  manufacture T-
shirts  for Globally  renowned brands  such as  Boss, Muji, Nike (USA), San Remo, Splash,
BentWood NTS MARUBENI, M&S, REEBOK, LENDS-END Etc. Maral Overseas  Limited is  fully
computerized with ERP based unit working on AS/400.
PRESENT WORKING ENVIRONMENT
Databases - DB/400
Languages - RPG ILE ,
Operating System - OS/400, WINDOWS 9X
AS/400 Tools  - Sub Files, ADT/400 (SDA, RLU, SEU), Query/400,CL/400.
ACADAMIC DETAILS:
# Completed Post Graduate Diploma in Advanced Digital System Design from Department of
Electronic  Science, University  of Pune in 2004.
# B.E in Electronics  & Communication Engineering from Sri Satya Sai Institute Of Science &
Technology, Sehore [M.P] under Rajiv  Gandhi Proudyogiki Vishwavidyalaya, Bhopal [M.P] in 2003
with an aggregate of 69.42%
# HSSC from St.Xaviers  H.S School, Bhopal [M.P] under Madhya Pradesh Board Of Secondary
Education, Bhopal in 1999 with 70%
# HSC from St.Xaviers  H.S School, Bhopal [M.P] under Madhya Pradesh Board Of Secondary
Education, Bhopal in 1997 with 79%
Languages  : C, C++ , RPG ILE
Assembly  Language: 8085, 8051, ARM7TDMI, ADSP
HDL : VHDL, Verilog
Page 1  of  3
Programmer: Both  the technical and  functional responsibilities of  maintaining  and  securing  the Database
were handled  successfully.
Software quality  assurance(SQA): Responsible for  maintaining  the Database secure and  reliable.
Project  2: \u0022VAS -  Vendor Access System\u0022
Development  Platform: PHP,  Frontpage
Backend: MySQL/Apache Server.
Security: Four  layered  Access Control.
Data  Refreshing: On  Daily  Basis (Automated  Possible).
Benefits of  VAS Impl7-665ementation:
1.  Reduced  cost  of communication
2.  Minimization  of communication  delays
3.  Since deliveries and  intimations are received  instantly,  the information  can  be used  by  planning
department  for production  plan
4.  Purchase department  gets relieved  of attending  and  answering  to  vendor calls for the want of
information
5.  Instant intimating  to  the vendors regarding  their status helps them in  taking  corrective action.
6.  Better Vendor Relationship
Limitations of  VAS:
1.  Range and coverage:
Though  this project was developed  for the vendors it was assumed  that  vendors also
are a computer literate then
2.  Alignment:
This is another major disadvantage of this project.  This will  not  be a problem where the setup
remains as it is.  But if connections are to  be made and  then  broken  at different  places then  alignment  of both
transmitter and  receiver becomes tiresome.  Even  if the setup  is disturbed  during  transmission  then  aligning  it
becomes tedious.
BE Seminar
On  Topic Entitled  as
\u0022Recent  Advancess  In Wireless Networking  \u0022
Name :  OHAL NAGESH MACHINDRA
Father's Name : Mr.  Ohal Machindra G.
Date of  Birth : Jully  01  ,  1984
Permanent  Address : Teacher's
Colony  Paranda ,
Ta.
Paranda Dist   Osmanabad
Maharashtra PIN- 413502
Phone :
02477-232268
09423717914
Branch of  B.E : Computer
science & engg.
Nationality  : Indian
Marital Status / Sex  : Single / Male
Email Id :  nagesh1784@yahoo.co.in
nagesh_ohal@yahoo.com.au
Language Known : English,  Hindi,  Marathi .
Personal Skills : Great sense of responsibility,  Hardworking,  Good  in  management,
Able  to  learn  quickly  .
Hobbies :  Reading  Books,  Listening  Music,  Net Surfing  .
I  hereby  declare that the above mentioned  details are correct and  complete to  the best of my
1
NTPC-PMI(Power Management Institute) :-(June
2005-July 2005).
File Management System in  c++ : Managing employee records, files, e diting, making index for
quick reference as pmi deals with managing files.
2.  INTERNAL  TRINING:(June 2004-July 2004)
4  Weeks Industrial  Training  at the IET
Bhaddal  (Ropar,  Pb) campus in  C++,  Networking,  Computer Assembling  and H/w
concepts.
Having  around Two Years  of experience  in Core  Java, JDBC, Servlets, JSP,
Weblogic  server and  Beans
Good experience in developing  Web and  Client/Server Applications.
Sound  knowledge  with C, C++.
Good Exposure  to Latest Technologies like  J2EE.
Worked  extensively on Java Platform
CCNA  Course  (skills known is : To Install, configure a nd  operate  Simple LAN routed
WAN , Switched  LAN and  LAN networks.Understand  and be  able  to configure   IP. ,
IGRP, serial interface, frame  relay, IP RIP,VLAN'S, Ethernet and access list)
Strong  sense  of Organization, Effective   Communication and Self-motivation,
Systematic  and Objective  problem analysis skills, excellent team  player.
Working as a JAVA-J2EE Developer  in  UPSTART  Technologies Chennai  since Dec 2003
Presently  working  for  Vajra Solutions
1)  SQL Reporting  Services (VAJRA SOLUTIONS)
S/W: VB.NET,  SQL Server 2000  and  SQL Server  Reporting  services.
Designed  a reporting  solution  by  importing  data from third  party  ISP web  host/Database
host into  the in-house SQL Server database,  Wrote SQL Stored  procedures that generates
and  summarizes data,  used  SQL Reporting  services and  created  reports that are scheduled
to  be delivered  weekly.  Managed  SQL reporting  services administration  via Reporting
services web  interface.
2)  RZIM Zacharias International Ministries (Olive
Technology
S/W: VB.NET
1of 3
This project is done on  VB.net ,  using  back  end  Access database and  it is totally
windows based  application  .It contains two  types of  databased  connection  ,  one with
Access Database located  on  the same system which  updates every  week  the main  server
located  in  Chennai (SQL server database is used).
The project contained  accounts,  members ,  library  ,  issue register  ,  return  register
goals ,  assets ,  stocks and  stock  maintenance.
3)  Inventory  Control System (CMC)
S/W:  C#  .NET
Designed  and  developed  an  automated  inventory  system that can  be used  to  store
the transaction,  product details,  and  issue purchase orders.  Various reports have been
generated  to  help  the users allowing  the restaurant customers to  use the information
online.  The process involves,  two  parts.
4)  E-Restaurant (CMC)
S/W:  Java,  Webserver2.0.servlets,  JDBC,  and Oracle 8 .  Designed  and  coded
the entire system that deals with  not only  automating  the restaurants information  but also
Restaurant owner has to  register with  e-restaurant.com in  order to  provide his facilities to
the registered  users.  This facility  includes Menu  maintenance,  Catering,  Room booking,
Profile Updating.
Customer  has to  register  with  e-restaurant.com.  Each  registered  user can  access
the facilities provided  by  the registered  Restaurants such  as,  selecting  the Menu  item,
ordering.  Users can  search  for  the restaurant information  through  SEARCH
RESTAURANT or  by  FAVOURITE SEARCH
Working as a Junior Software Engineer at  Newton MP Technologies Pvt. Ltd.,
Bangalore with  1+Year of experience.
Experience in  JAVA Programming and J2EE Technologies.
More than 6  Month experience in  JSP  and  Servlet.
Experience in  web development  tool like Dream Weaver.
Experience in  WebLogic  Server and Apache Tomcat  Application Server.
Participated in  Requirement analysis.
Knowledge on Software Development  Life Cycle (SDLC) Concepts,
Strong analytical and problem solving skills  with  well developed initiative.
Effective communication skills, good analytical abilities, and zeal in
learning new tools.
Technical Skills Set
Programming  Languages:  C, C++, Core JAVA, J2EE (JSP, Servlet, JDBC), SQL.
DBMS\u005CRDBMS: MS Access, MySQL.
Packages: MS Office
Operating Systems: UNIX, DOS 6.22, WINDOWS 9x/XP.
Other Technical Concepts:  OOPS, Data  structure, Operating Systems.
Pursuing a Proficiency Course at  IISC, Bangalore on `Design of Embedded
Systems using 80C51  Microcontroller'.
Intensive Training on  JAVA, J2EE technologies.
Training at  Akebono  Soft Technology  Pvt. Ltd., Hyderabad to work  on  real life
Worked  as Project Trainee (on .net Technologies)  in SatNav Technologies  Pvt  Ltd.
located  in Somajiguda, Hyderabad  from 17th August 2005 To 25th January 20006.
Education Summary
MCA(Master Of  Computer Application)(2002-2005)
Wesley PG College
(Affiliated to  Osmania University) Secunderabad, With
71.42%(With Distinction)aggregate.
BCA(Bachelor Of  Computer Application)(1999-2002) Fergusson College
(Affiliated  to Osmania University)Secunderabad  .With 65.67% aggregate.
Intermediate Board Of  Examination(1997-1999) Siddhartha junior College,Vikarabad,
With 66% aggregate.
SSC(Secondary School Of  Certificate)(1996-1997).Sri Saraswathi Shishu Mandhir,
Vikarabad, With 74% aggregate.
B.TECH
1st Sem.
2nd Sem.
3rd Sem.
4th Sem.
5th Sem.
6th Sem.
7th Sem.
8th Sem.
U.P
Maintain  the Generators,  transformers,  rectifying  the Kitchen  equipments
problems and  maintain  the total shift in  the work.
Operation,
Maintenance & Tr ouble Shooting  of:
Transformers up  to  500kva.
Diesel Generators up  to  725kva.
UPS up  to  120kva.
Spilt A/C (3-Phase,  Single phase),  AHU'S,  FCU'S and  A/C  Plant up  to  120TR.
Fire Hydrant Systems,  Fire Extinguishers,  Smoke Detectors,  Fire Fighting,  Fire
Alarms Systems.
OTIS Lifts.
Lighting  Fixtures,  Telephone lines,  Electrical Wiring  & analyzing  of  all electrical
wiring  Drawings.
Assembling  and  trouble shooting  of  computers.
Operation  & Maintenance of Utilities Like DG Sets,  Substations,  HVAC,
UPS,  Fire Safety  System,  Elevators,  Lighting,
Documentation  of  PM check  lists,  Log  sheets
Planning  Preventive Maintenance Schedule & Implementation  of the
same.
Schedule & delegate work  to  staff to  ensure timely/efficient completion
with  quality.
Generating  Daily/weekly/Monthly  reports for the Client requirements
3
Coordinating  with  vendors for  timely  Completion  of AMC  service and  any
other break  down  calls.
Coordinating  with  Vendors for quotations/offers/bills and  follow up  for  the
further  work
Follow up  for  statutory  bodies compliance and  Laisoning  with  Electrical
inspectorate,  KSPCB & BESCOM.
Coordinating  with  Client for  Project related  works.
Monitoring  the tradesman/technician  and  make changes if  required  to
improve the efficiency  of  the Personnel/system.
Participate in  monthly  staff  meetings.
Page 4  of  3
Previous Work: M/S  Bhoruka Gases Ltd ., Whitefield road, Bangalore, An
ISO 9001/2000  company, is a Continuous Process industry manufacturing Liquid
gases such as Nitrogen, Oxygen and Argon.
Period of work: From April 2002  to Feb 2005.
Designation: Executive Engineer   Engineering Services.
Nature of work: Planning Installations, Preventive/Breakdown
maintenance of entire machineries, Trouble shooting and coordinating with
Service Engineers.
Machines handled:
Transformer  substations ranging  from 630  KVA / 11KV to  5  MVA / 66KV.
HT Generator  of  4600KVA / 11KV provided  with  synchronizing
arrangement with  EB  system.
HT motors used  in  process plant.
LT motors,  squirrel cage and  slip  ring,  up  to  400HP.
LT Diesel Generator of  500KVA equipped  with  AMF panel.
UPS of  rating  5KVA to  17KVA.
Electrically  operated  Trolley.
HT and  LT switch  gears.
Previous work: M/S  Sasken Communication Technologies (India) Ltd . is a
software industry situated in Domlur ring road, Bangalore.
Period of  work: 1  year  and  9  months that is from July  2000  to  March  2002.
Designation:  Technician    Facilities Management.
Nature of  work: Maintenance of  Electrical Machines that is carrying  preventive/
breakdown  maintenance and  liaising  with  Service Engineers.
Machines handled:
4
Transformer  substation  of  2000  KVA.
Diesel Generators equipped  with  AMF and  synchronizing  arrangement.
UPS ranging  from 20  KVA to  200  KVA.
Chillers (190TR),  AHUs and  Air  conditioners.
SCADA System used  to  control and  monitor  above machines.
Utilities such  as photocopiers,  water  cooler/ purifier  etc.
Previous work:  M/S Bripranil Industries Ltd.,  Sunkadakatte,  Bangalore,  is a Process
industry  manufacturing  Nylon  Tyrecord,  which  is used  in  Tyre
manufacturing.
Period of  work: From Dec 1996  to  June-2000.
Designation: Supervisor    Maintenance Dept.
Page 2  of  3
Nature of  work: Installation,  preventive/ breakdown  maintenance,  trouble shooting  and
operation/ controlling  process.
Machines handled:
Transformer  substation
Diesel Generators with  AMF
DC Drives and  AC  drives
Oil fired  boiler  and  LPG burners
Material handling  equipments such  as Fork  lift and  Crane.
Refrigeration  unit
LT switchgears etc.
Member of the Web site design team.
Designed attractive and flexible user interface using Dream weaver with JavaScript validations.
Testing and implementation.
2. Quantum Web site
Quantum International Pvt. Ltd   Delhi.
Software
Front end - JSP
Middle tier  :  Java  Bean,  Java Mail
Back end - Mysql
Platform - Linux (7) Server   Apache and Tomcat,  sendmail-8.12.5-7
Role Database  design, Coding, Developing, Testing and implementation.
Team Size 3
This project aims to  develop the network marketing business of the company and increase number of
distributors. Site has been divided into  three parts. Normal visitors, Members (distributor of the company)
and Administration part. Member section (http://www.quantumindia.net) has new products list, product
price list, member's rank, genealogy report, order form, Circular, Archives and more information. Entire site
can be controlled through administration section (http://www.quantumindia.net/quantumadmin). Public
web site's color, font style and size can be easily changed through admin section. Company Internal
employees can be chatted using chat module with out Internet connection. Private Chat, Public  Chat,
Permanent Login, Guest Login and Font and the Color made effective on one side of a  client will be
reflected on the other users linked with him.
Member of the design team.
Member of database design team.
Designed attractive and flexible user interface using Dreamweaver with JavaScript validations.
Testing and implementation.
Quantum International Pvt.  Ltd. is a  Multi Level Marketing Company. The company is having its software
Integrated Management Information  System (IMIS). Which is totally an ERP based application
software in Oracle 8i and Developer. The company is having different branches and consignee agents in
all over India  and they are having different Software. Providing technical support to branches and
consignees and sending them the scripts to  implement the required changes in the databases as well as
reports.
3. Luis Delivery System Software
Front end - JSP
Middle tier  :  Java  Bean
Back end - Mysql
Role Database  design, Coding, Developing, Testing and implementation.
Team Size 2
This project aims the day-to-day Cargo business of the company and increase number of customers. Site
has been divided into two parts. Members (Driver/employee working for the company) and Administration
part owner of the company. Two types of order can be there FCL (Full Container) and LCL (Low container
i.e. Half container).  Before beginning of trip or completion of the trip based on delivery (FCL/LCL) form are
made in which all the details has to be filled regarding pickup point & time, date and destination point
(date, time) and the items (taken in cargo) and its quantity taken in the cargo then accordingly bill with
charges of the driver is displayed. Order can be in either Open or closed state.
Member of the design team.
Member of database design team.
Designed attractive and flexible user interface using Dream weaver with JavaScript validations.
Testing and implementation.
4. Online Shopping
Software
Front end - Servlets
Middle tier  :  Java  Bean
Back end   MS Access
Role Coding, Testing and implementation.
Team Size 5
Member of the design team.
Testing and implementation.
Professional
Bachelor of Software System Course from G.G.S.I.P University (Four Year Degree Course) with 73%
marks,  passed out in 2004
Completed Oracle9i-Database Administration Fundamentals (Production-as a  part of Oracle Workforce
Development Program at NIIT Delhi).
Pursuing  B.  Tech.  (4  yrs-8  sems.) Degree course in  Computer Science from Meerut Institute of Engineering
and  Technology,  Meerut,  (U.  P.  Technical University,  Lucknow),  India.
Semester Month  & Year Percentage
Seventh Janaury  2006 73%
Sixth May  2005 67.1%
Fifth January,  2005 63.1%
Fourth May,  2004 64.3%
Third January,  2004 70.5%
Second May,  2003 66.9%
First January,  2003 69.8%
Educational  Qualifications:
Examination School Board Year Percentage
Senior Secondary B.S.M.  INTER COLLEGE
ROORKEE
U.P.  Board 2001 63%
High  School B.S.M.  INTER COLLEGE
ROORKEE
U.P.  Board 1999 67%
Fields  of Interests:
Java Programming,,  Dot-Net Framework,  Web  Projects,  Microsoft Technologies.
Personal Profile:
Name: Anuj Jain
Father's name: Sh.  Narendra Kumar Jain
Sex: Male
Marital Status: Single
Date of Birth: 21st Jan  1985
Nationality: Indian
Languages  Known: Hindi,  English
Interests  and Activities: Reading,  music,  badminton,  caram,chess,net-surfing.
Permanent Address: D-40,SHASTRI NAGAR,MEERUT
Pin: 250004
Mobile: 09897888170
I hereby  declare that the information  furnished  above is true to  the best of my  knowledge.
4  months of experience as an  \u0022On-Job  Trainee Engineer\u0022 from Hi-Tech-End,  Mumbai.
TECHINICAL Skills:
Embedded
8051  micro  controller (8-bit),  ARM7  (32-bit),  Thumb  (16-bit),  Keil micro  vision  2  & 3  IDE,  Simulink,
DSP,  Real  Time Workshop  (RTW),  RTOS (RT-Linux),  Embedded  C,  C/C++,  Linux,  Unix,  Shell programming.
RDBMS
MS-Access
App/Web  Servers
PWS,  IIS
Operating  Systems
MS-Windows 98/2000/XP,  Linux,  Unix
Certification:
Advanced  Certificate Course in  Embedded  Technology
EDUCATION:
Education School/ College Year Board/ University %  of Marks
B.E.
(Information  Technology)
S.  S.  Jondhale College of
Engg,  Dombivli
2004-2005 Mumbai University 65.50
Diploma in  Computer
Technology
S.  S.  Jondhale
Polytechnic,  Ambernath
2001-2002 Maharashtra State
Board  of Technical
Education
71.22
SSC Quaderia Burhani
English  School
1998-1999 Bhopal,  M.P. 77
Projects:
EOIC (Embedded Operator Interface Circuit):
Project emphasizes controlling  two  Stepper Motors & automated  temperature control,  an  alarm  system is
activated  to  make the Operator alert  about  rise/  fall  in  temperature.  This Project was implemented  using  8051
microcontroller & Keil IDE.
8051:
80C51  core,  Instruction  set,  Interrupts programming; Interfacing  of ADC,  DAC,  Stepper Motor,  LCD,
Keyboard,  7-segment,  Buzzer,  Sensors; Serial comm.  (UART),  RTC,  Timer/  Counter.
Developed  Projects such  as Keyboard  Security System,  Multiple Key Keyboard  (num,  char,  etc),  Calculator,
7-segment  real-time clock,  Rolling  display (infinite characters) using  LCD,  software real-time watch  using  LCD.
ARM:
Philips LPC 21xx  ARM 7  core,  Instruction  set,  ADC,  PWM,  UART,  I2C,  SPI,  Timers,  VIC,  GPIO,  Project
creation  & modular programming.
DSP:
FFT,  DCT,  DFT,  Filters (FIR,  IIR),  Image processing,  Compression  algorithm,  Z transform,  Simulink,  Real
Time Workshop,  DSPs,  Advance Matlab  programming.
RTOS:
RT-Linux  C programming,  Thread  programming,  RT Kernel programming,  POSIX.1b,  RT scheduling  &
algorithms,  RT Linux  APIs.
Acedemics:
Projects
\u0022WAP Application\u0022 allowing  Mobile device user to  make purchases online.  Provision  for maintaining
their previous Session with  the Website is done which  makes the Project much  complex.  The Website is
built using  HTML & ASP without using  WML/  WML Script,  so  various factors were taken  into  considered
such  as limited  display,  less memory,  etc.  for making  the Website visible to  mobile device.  The Project  was
done for fulfillment  of B.E.
Mini Project on  \u0022Online Shopping\u0022.
\u0022Admission Process Control\u0022 with  sophisticated  GUI using  `C' language for fulfillment  of Diploma.
Electives
Embedded  System
Information  Security
Recognition
WAP Application & Admission Process Control were considered  the best Project in  the College.
PERSONAL DETAILS:
Name : Saurabh  Vijay  Lad
Sex : Male
Marital  status : Single
Date of Birth : 24th June 1983
Passport : Applied
Hobbies : Reading,  Sports,  Yoga,  learn  new technologies
Perform troubleshooting for  the technical  problems faced by the customers in different states of USA for
the DSL connections provided by SBC (Southwestern Bell  Corporation) -  one of the largest
telecommunication companies of USA.
2005 MCA (%  till  last sem: 63%) IGNOU
2001 B.Com  (63%) CCS University, Meerut
1998 12th (64%) Delhi  Public  School, Ghaziabad
1996 10th (73%) Zakir  Hussain Sr. Sec. School, Aligarh
3+ years  of IT experience in SQL, PL/SQL.
Extensively  worked with SQL, PL/SQL, SQL* Plus.
Completed the first level of Oracle Certification (OCA)  for  Developers
Ease at writing SQL queries, Stored Procedures, Functions, Packages  and
Triggers.
Very  good Team  Player with excellent communication and Interpersonal skills.
Working as  a Software Engineer in Sawaf Software Pvt Ltd, Hyderabad from  Jan
2003 to till date.
-Computer  faculty  in  Aptech  Computer  Education  (1  Year).
-  Work  experience in  JSP,  DTML,  at Tata
Technologies Ltd.  Pune.
4  months.
A Qualified   Management Graduate  with 2 years of experience  in Corporate  Sales &
Marketing, Business Development, Product Management and  Sales Promotion.
Demonstrated  ability of spearheading  a team of distributors, dealers and  sub  dealers and
increasing business growth. Possess excellent communication, interpersonal, team
management, analytical and  organisational skills. Proven track  record  of successfully
completing various academic  projects in co-ordination with major clients.
Areas  of Expertise & Exposure
Sales  & Marketing
Managing  the sales and  marketing operations and accountable  for increasing sales
growth.
Implementing  sales promotional activities as a part of brand  building  and  market
development effort.
Conducting  detailed  market study to analyze the latest market trends and tracking
competitor activities and  providing  valuable  inputs for fine-tuning the selling  and the
marketing  strategies.
Enhancing Brand  Equity through Brand  Name  awareness, Increasing  Brand  Loyalty,
Increasing  the perceived  quality.
Business  Development
Identifying prospective  clients and generating  business from the  existing, thereby
achieving  set business targets.
Identifying business opportunities in new areas and Tapping  revenue-enhancing
opportunities through proper business planning.
Value  Creation through Price Leadership, better services and personal touch.
Distribution /Channel Management
Interacting  and  assisting  new channel partners for enhancing  sales growth, market
coverage  and promoting  the  brand.
Controlling  stock level by maintaining  the supply of all products to the channel
partners.
Maintaining  the stock of material without any variance  by conducting  stock
verification, documentation and  Managing  the  C&F agen ts
Implementing  Standard  Operating  Procedures within the  warehouse  and  training
team members in maintaining  compliance with these  procedures.
Product/  Brand Management
Provide  direction to execute promotions/launches as a part of brand building  and
market development effort.
Ensure  maximum brand  visibility and  capture  optimum market shares.
Design &   manage  corporate  communication, brand  image building  and  product
awareness campaigns.
Educating  the  channel partners (Dealers and sub-dealers)  about the  differentiating
factor of brand  and  the  importance  of service.
Client Relationship Management
Interfacing  with clients and cultivating  relations with them for securing  repeat
business.
Ensuring  maximum customer satisfaction by providing  them pre-post technical
service  assistance.
Developing and  maintaining  healthy relations with new &   existing  clients by
improving  delivery service  quality norms based on their feedbacks.
Since Aug'05 The Associated Cement Co. Ltd.  (ACC
Ltd.) Assistant Manager
Marketing (Warehouse
Incharge)
ACC (The Associated  Cement Companies Limited) is India's foremost manufacturer of
cement and  concrete. ACC's operations are  spread throughout the country with 15
modern cement factories, 11 regional marketing  offices, and several zonal offices.
Distinction of achieving  all time  high Sales record  in Dec'05, at Deoria warehouse.
Accountable  for supervising  Cost Control (wholesale and  Retail rate) and  warehouse.
Resourceful in achieving sales volume  by approx. 14,000 Metric Tonnes and  sales
growth by 17%  with a turnover of 40 crores rupees per annum.
Involved  in streamlining  business activity and  managing  intra Dealers conflict
ensuring  that they do make profit out of the  business and  are  pro to company's
policies.
Feb'04-Jul'05 Surya  Vinayak  Ind.  Ltd.  (SVIL Group),  New
Delhi  Assistant Manager
Surya Vinayak Industries Limited  is an IS0 9001:2000 company, with pure  Sandal wood
oil manufacturing as the  core  business and  grossing  an annual turnover of INR  500
crores. The  company's ancillary business includes manufacturing  and  marketing  of
perfumery compounds and  essences.
Played  a key role  in increasing  the  business of Katni marble  in Delhi and  NCR  region
by achieving  customer satisfaction (builders, contractors, architects).
Shifted  to site  for planning  and  implementing  integrated  marble mining  and
processing  plant in technical collaboration with GEO SPA, Italy, at Katni, Madhya
Pradesh, (Oct'04 to May'05)  due  to exceptional performance  in Delhi where  Project
cost Rs. 293.7 Crores.
Pivotal in achieving  sales volume  of 50 Crore  per annum  & sa les growth by 100%.
Certified M icrosoft  Office.
(May  2002)
Boston Computers. (Ahmedabad)
Diploma in French Language.
(June 2005)
H.K.Patel Institute  (A division of Gujarat  University) Ahmedabad.
Computer Skills   Software
Proficiency in M S  Office
Hands on Experience on  Win 98, Win  2000 & Win  XP.
Computer Skills   Hardware
Hands on Experience in Assembly & Installation of Desktop  PC.
*Period: July 2005 to  Present
Company: Denave  Software  India Pvt. Ltd  (Div:
Channel
Strategies
A) Title: S.B.C. (Small Business Counselors)
(Jul-05 to  Dec-05)
Responsibilities: Managing team of Marketing  Executives as
well as Survey  Executives for the  INTEL  1  on  1  SMB Program in
Surat.
PRAMOTION :
B)  Title: B.D.M. (Business Development
Manager) (Jan-06 to  Present)
Responsibilities: Managing  the  team of Field  executive  for
demand  generation  activity for  INTEL 1 on  1 SMB Programe in
Surat as well as Vapi.
*Period: May 2004 to  June  2005
Company: Precious Solutions Pvt. Ltd.
(Business Executive)
Title: Business Development  Executive
Responsibilities: Managing Sales in Gujarat  for  Taxation as well
as Data Safety  & Recovery Software  for  Channel Sales in Gujarat
Dealer network, Overall Create  Marketing  Engine  of Taxation
Software  Business , Managing  Channel Sales for  indiataxes.com as
well as Stellar Informatics Technology. (Data Safety  & Recovery
Software)
Achievements: Tab  top  Industries like
INTAS  PHARMA, NABARD, RAAJRATNA  GROUP, AKHIL BHARAT TOURS
& TRAVELS, SWILL  LTD., STEARLING HOSPITAL, LAMDA THERAPIC,
SUZLONE GROUP, VADILAL  GROUP, & Many  MNC.
*Period: July 2003 to  May 2005
Company: Tata Indicom
(Business Executive)
Title: Business Executive
Responsibilities: Development of New Business in Corporate
and (Government) Institutional clients for  Tata Indicom.
*Preferred Location : Any
Worked with DOEACC Society (An
Autonomous  Body of  Department
of  Information Technology, Ministry of  Communications  & IT,  engaged in
carrying out HR  Development Activities  in the area  of  Information,
Electronics  & Communication Technology (IECT)
) as Data Entry
Operator on Contract Basis for a period  of 6 months i.e. from
March 2004 to  September 17, 2004.
Besides Data Entry  job, following  responsibilities were also
assigned:
Record  Keeping
To coordinate  Viva arrangements for  A Level  students
Arrangements regarding  students' Certificates despatch
Presently  working with M/s Solar Print Process  Pvt. Ltd., Okhla,
New Delhi, as  Data  Entry Operator since October 2004.
Besides Data Entry job, following  responsibilities have been
assigned:
To take  data backup from PCs
To meet/interact  with clients for  various activities
To draft  day to  day correspondence  relating  to various
activities of
the  Organisation
July  '05  - Present
Web Based I-Loan Application For CITI-Financial
This System enables CITI-Financial user to  Apply  for  the Loan.  Its a very  large
Web  based  Application  running  on  3  countries Web  Servers (Indonesia,Thailand
and  India)  and  it consist of  various sub  applications like I-Sell which  helps Sales
Representative to  schedule their  plan.  I-Catch  which  helps to  follow up
Delinquents customers.  I-Loan  which  helps to  Apply new Loans.  I-Batch  which
helps to  process scheduled  Post Dated  Cheques for  Pre Bank  Presentation  and
Post Bank  Processing.  I-Analyze which  is actually  OLAP(Online Analytical
Application)  based  Application  and  generates various reports which  helps in
Management Decisions and  many  more.
Responsibilities are:
Acting  as the first point of  contact for the CA(Charges Automation)  Module,
If any  change required  in  this module I will do  the analysis part with  team
mates of  this Change Request and  also  I will do  feasibility.
As part of  Development Team,  Taking  full responsibility  of designing  and
developing  UI(User  Interface)  Screens.
Writing  ASP .NET code to  build  UI  Screens.
Writing  complex  SQL query  as per  user requirement also  optimizing  the
query  to  improve the performance of  the system.
Expert in  a Module called  CA(Charges Automation),  which  is the nucleus of
Conduct Maintenance Functions  & Spare Parts  Management under
SAP / MMS  environment
Conduct Engineering Analysis  for Repair / Trouble Shoots, Rectify  & submit Technical Report.
Supervise Maintenance Activities  on Daily  Defects, Breakdown, Routine, Predictive, Major Shut Downs  &
commissioning assisted with team of Engineers, Foreman & Technicians.
Plan, Prepare Work  Scope, Activities  required for Major & Minor Overhauling, Preventive Maintenance
Tasks  & arrange Man Power. Review Technical Packages, Quotations  & finalize Contract Award.
Do engineering on Plant / Equipment Break  down & Inefficiency  Problems  & prepare documentation.
Prepare Technical Specification / Data Sheets  for modification of Plant Equipments.
Prepare Specifications, Data Sheets  for  ordering new equipments, Spares, Engineering Packages  Review,
Approve Quotations. Accept / Reject Ordered Equipments  & Spares  at Plant Stores.
Supervise & Evaluate sub ordinate Engineers, Foreman, Technicians  Efficiency  & skills.
Implement Plant Management Programmes  & Targets  with Other Department Engineers.
Identify  Equipment Spares  for ordering & Send Purchase Request with Specification & Data Sheets.
Conduct Safety  Walk  through Inspection, implement Safety  requirements  & convene Safety  meeting.
Initiate plans  & proposals  for Staff training needs  on Technical, Management & Safety  disciplines.
Project Experience Highlights:
Project Name :
Test Execution Framework
Duration :  6  Months(Aug 2005  Till date)
Environment :  Windows  Xp, Symbian OS
Skill/Tools  : Symbian C++ ,Perls
Role : Analysis, and Coding
Page 1  of 6
Description :
The TEF framework is  a test  tool that is developed to  check
for the regression testing , unit  testing and component  testing for the test
cases  at the kernel level
The framework requires  some additional support for the test cases to get
executed
The framework was  developed by watching the weekness of the RTest
framework
As  such Rtest didn't support  the integration testing which is  the major
advantage for the TEF framework,
The new version of the TEF framework is  shown below
Integ_tst_dev
+ Benchmark
Documentation
Group
+ Kernel
+ Peripherals
testdriver
+utils
Rombuild
This  new framework supports  the dependency capabilities  for the test
cases  which was  not  present  in the older framework
Project Name :  Base Porting
Duration :  3  months(June 2005- Aug 2005)
Environment :  Windows  Xp, Symbian OS
Skill/Tools  : Symbian C++ , H2, Perls
Role : Analysis, and Coding
Description :
The project deals  with porting of the test cases  from RTest
framework to  TEF framework
The ported tests  are the tested for emulator and the hardware.The TEF
framework structure is  given below
Cinidata
Basetest
Group
Logger
Scriptengine
Test
Utils
The test cases  are kept in the source folder of the basetest and after the
execution the ouput is  stored in the epoc/ winscw /logs......where the test
cases  are shown with the output
Page 2  of 6
Project Name :  Profile Construction
Duration :  4  months
Environment :  WindowsXp
Skill/Tools  : C++ , Powerbuilder and Oracle
Role :  Analysis, and Coder
Description : The Profile System is  a client server system specifically
designed to solve the buisnessproblems of
a  financial institutions.  Three logical client/server layers
describe the model
ENTERPRISE SERVER
The enterprise server controls real time access and updates
to institution wide data.  This  server
holds  the system repository and server as  an institution
wide database for profile data.It also
stores(and provides  access  to) the core programs of  the
Key Result Areas;
3D Animation
Creating, maintaining and providing professional  3D animation packages used in CG and games
studios throughout the world.
Able to do any kind of low and high poly modelling, texturing, rigging, skinning.
Using points, creating surfaces to crate an  object; breaking out of the 2D existence and work
and thinking in  another  dimension.
Graphic  Designing
Defining the layout and design of the advertisements, graphics and other  material  for  the print
media; designing visual  aids, logos, brochures, catalogues, product posters, etc.
Reviewing the layout at various stages to  ensure all  quality standards are being met and
rectifying technical  errors if any, in the layout.
Preparing draft for reviews with the client and taking feedback.
Incorporating client suggestions and feedback in the draft and finalising the artwork.
Customer  Relationship Management
Client interaction  for  requirement gathering, finalisation o f product/technical  specifications and
quality parameters, and apprising them with project progress.
Ensuring prompt resolution of customer  complaints & achieve high customer  satisfaction  levels.
Adhering to and implementing high customer  service guidelines, as laid down by the company.
Significant A ccomplishments;
Can  perform well  in  activities like animation, rigging, skinning, texturing & some special  effects
Expert in any kind of low & high poly modelling
Making of advertisements in  Maya 6.0
Presentation  designing
Title designing
3+ years of experience
At STMicroelectronics Sophia Antipolis, France, I Worked on ST100 DMA and ARM's
AMBA-AHB using Esterel.
At TTM India, Hyderabad, I worked on UTMI and memory  controller.
At Strategic-IT, I worked on VB and SQL.
In MS I was  more involved in FPGA's, all the projects  that I worked during my  MS are on
FPGA's.
Career Profile
Date Organization Role & Responsibilities
2004 jan  2004
dec
STMicroelectronics, WID, Sophia-
Antipolis, France
Programmer
2001 - 2003 TTM India, Hyderabad Front end designing
2000 - 2001 Strategic-IT Software Programmer
Synthesised the RTL design (VHDL) using Xilinx  ISE, targeting Xilinx  Virtex2Vpro, for 100
MHz.
The design is  simulated using ModelSim.
Team member for Developed the document.
Languages/Tools  Used:: VHDL, Virtex  2 VPro, Xilinx  ISE, Matlab 6.0,C.
JPEG Compression
This  project aims  at design a DCT filter for JPEG image. The HW part comprises  these items.
Filtering and quantization and the rest in SW part. We used Visual Elite to implement it both in system
level and transaction level.
Description
These are the blocks  and steps  involved in JPEG Compression
The formatting of an image into 8x8 blocks  of pixels.
The filtering of these pixels  using the DCT algorithm.
Rsum
LOKESH  BODDU
Page  2  of  4
The quantization of these filtered data.
The compression of these data using the zigzag and the RLE coding.
Quantization:
The root block  is  divided into 2 processes, each process  manages  one 8x8 RAM.
The first works  with DCT1 then with DCT2 and with the SW module for the acquisition of the block
8x8. The algorithm is  as  in the following From a given image we read the pixels  values. For every
pixel, it is  a 12-bit signed bits  array. In the software part (8*8 block  formatting) we extend them to 16-
bit signed bits  array. Then it sorts  those 16-bits  signed input pixels  as  blocks  of 8*8 stored in the
global RAM. After that the formatting SW signal the IP block  that a block  is  ready. The receiver
process  in the IP reads  a line of 8 pixels  and signals  the DCT when the data is  ready. The DCT filtered
the data and signals  the quantizer that data is  filtered.
The second root process  work  with the quantizer and with the SW module to send back  the
processed data to the global RAM. The algorithm is  as  in the following. The quantizer performs  the
division and signals  the transmitter part of the IP interface that data are ready  at its  output register.
The transmitter writes  back  the data into the 8x8 block  matrix  in the RAM. The DCT function is
separated into 2 HW block  named DCT1 and DCT2 to perform the filtering algorithm.
I was  part of a three member team, I was  alone handling the coding of Quantisation at
behavioural level.
The design is  simulated using ModelSim.
Developed the design document for quantisation.
Languages/Tools  Used: VHDL, Synplify  Pro7.1
UTMI
The main goal of the project is  to program the Transmit and receive protocol
Description:
This  block  handles  the low level protocol and signalling. This  includes  features  such as  data
serialization and de-serialization, bit stuffing and clock  recovery  and synchronization. The primary
focus  of this  block  is  to shift the clock  domain of the data, rate to one that is  compatible with the
general logic  in the ASIC.
Transceiver algorithm  Developed RTL model for the Serial Transmission Protocol (STP)
and Serial Receiver Protocol (SRP) using VHDL.
Solely  responsible for coding
Languages/Tools  Used: VHDL
Company: TTMIndia
Memory controller
Description:
This  block  is  responsible for the data bus  connection between the memory  bus  and the WISHBONE
bus. Data that goes  out to the Memory  bus  is  simply  latched at appropriate times. Data Read from the
memory  bus  is  either passed through a latch to the WISEBONE bus, or goes  through a data packet
first. The data packet assembles  a 32-bit word from 8 or 16 wide device on the memory  bus.
Rsum
LOKESH  BODDU
Page  3  of  4
I was  alone handling the coding part of Latch, Packer & parity  Programming in VHDL
Languages/Tools  Used: VHDL
Company: TTMIndia
Training
COURSE DETAILS DURATION
Clean  Room training in ESIEE, PARIS.
2 weeks
Esterel Technologies, Sophia Antipolis, France 1 Month
References : Available on request
Rsum
LOKESH  BODDU
ORGANISATIONAL STRUCTURE
FABRIC DEPARTMENT
CUTTING DEPARTMENT
SAMPLING DEPARTMENT
ACESSORIES STORE
SEWING DEPARTMENT
WASHING  DEPARTMENT
FINISHING DEPARTMENT
PACKING DEPARTMENT
MERCHANDISING  DEPARTMENT
DOCUMENTATION
PROJECT REPORT
ACKNOWLEDGEMENT
FABRITEX EXPORTS is not only  a name for me this is the 1st step  for my
destination.  It was really  great pleasure for me to  do  my  training  in  fabritex
exports.
I am grateful to  MR.V.RAGHUPATHY (GM),  MR.NARAYAN POOJARY
(DGM) & MR.VITTAL (MANAGER).  They  gave me golden  chance to  do  my
training  in  fabritex  exports.
It was impossible to  understand  the garment industry  if the employees  would  have
not helped  me to  sole the problems and  doubts at every  step  during  my  training.
I would  like to  say  thanks  to  MR.BASKER (PM) and  floor in  charge
MR.ANAND,  all  supervisors and  all merchandisers MR.RAJAN,  MRS.JAYA,
MR.LOKESH,  miss  CETNA,  MR.PANDEY (cutting  in  charge),  MR.RAHUL,
MR.MURALI,  MR.MANJUNATH,  MR.SHASHI,  MR.CHANDRAN,  miss.
CHANDNA & all fabritex  peoples.
Now its time to  say  some thing  about my  collage where I learnt 1st word  of
garments.  I acquired  everything  in  ALT COLLAGE whatever a student needs for
a good  education.
First  of all I would  like thanking  to  MR.  (principle) of my
collage who  provided  me training  in  fabritex  exports pvt ltd.
MRS.ANJALI CHANNA
Last but  not least MR.MADHU KAPOOR (MD).  The person  who  always tried  to
provide us best things  in  the collage.  I am thankful to  him.
Muthukrishnan.r
Bsc  (final year)
NAME OF THE COMPANY FABRITEX EXPORTS PVT LTD.
FACTORY AND ADMINISTRATION KRISHNA REDDY INDUSTRIAL AREA
OFFICE (7TH MILE),  HOSUR ROAD,
BANGALORE-560068.
TELEPHONE NO 91-80-5730107
/ 5730361
E-MAIL ADDRESS FTEXINT@FABITE-EXPORTS.COM
YEAR OF ESTABLISHMENT 1994
CONSTITUTION  PRIVATE LIMITED COMPANY
NAME OF DIRCTORS MR.  SUDHIR SEKHRI
MR.  MORDECHAI KAFRI
MS.  PINKY SEKHRI
MR.  RAJESHKUMERSRIVASTAV
BUSINESS ACTIVITES MANUFACTURER,  EXPORTER
NAME OF PRODUCTS LADIES WEAR (BLOUSES/SKIRTS/)
MENS WEAR (SHIRT,  T-SHIRTS)
BOTTOMS (SHORTS,  PANTS,  JEANS)
CHILDERNS WEAR
NIGHT WEAR (LINGERIE)
MAJOR BUYERS WALL MART,  POLO,  GAP
ARROW,  FADED GLORY,  DKNY
JONES APPAREL,  ESPIRIT,  AMC
BANANA REPUBLIC,  LANE BRYANT
URBAN OUTFITTERS,  JC.  PENNY
NAME OF THE COUNTRIES THEY USA,  GERMANY,  CANADA,  MEXICO
ARE EXPORTING
INSTALLED CAPACITY 1,20,000  PCS PERMONTH
ACTUAL PRODUCTION PER YEAR 1,40  MILLION PCS
FINANCIAL STATUS OWN CAPITAL & RE SERVES
US$  1.8  MILLION
NO OF MACHINES 546
NO.OF EMPLOYES 1100
NAME & ADDRESS OF BANKERS STATE BANK OF INDIA
OVERSEAS BRANCH
87,  ALMAS CENTER,  MG  ROAD,
BANGALORE-560001
BANKING  FACILITES U.S$  940,000
ORGANISATIONAL STRUCTURE OF FABRITEX EXPORTS PVT  LTD
MANAGER (PERSONNEL)
PERSONNEL DEPTT
Personnel officer  ---------- (2)
Personnel asst -------------  (3)
MANAGER (ADMINISTERATION)
GENERAL ADMIN
Admin  officer --------- (1)
Receptionist ----------- (1)
Drivers -----------------  (2)
Office boy  -------------  (1)
Office asst ------------ (1)
Sweepers -------------  (14)
Crche helpers -------  (2)
Electricians -----------  (3)
Boiler operator  ------- (1)
SECURITY AGENCY
Security  officer  --------  (1)
Security  -----------------  (3)
Security  guards --------  (12)
(From agency)
WASHING & FINISHING SECTION
Manager  (finishing  & washing)  ----------- (1)
Press supervisor  ----------------------------- (2)
Pressmen  ------------------------------------ (24)
Helpers ---------------------------------------  (4)
Washer  man  ---------------------------------  (8)
Alternation  tailors ---------------------------  (4)
Final checkers --------------------------------  (36)
PACKING DIVISION
Packing  supervisor -----------  (1)
Asst packing  supervisor  ----- (1)
Packers ------------------------  (6)
Helpers -----------------------  (10)
PURCHASE  DIVISION (DOMESTIC TRIMS)
Purchase manager  -------- (1)
Purchase asst --------------  (2)
FABRIC  DEPARMENT
Senior fabric manager  --------------------  (1)
Asst manager  ------------------------------ (1)
Fabric executive --------------------------- (2)
Warehouse in  charge ----------------------  (1)
Lab  in  charge -------------------------------  (1)
Fabric QC  ------------------------------------ (2)
Fabric checkers ----------------------------  (2)
Helpers -------------------------------------- (2)
Fabric co-ordinates ------------------------ (1)
Fabric records keepers --------------------  (3)
MANAGING  DIRECTOR - PRODUCTION UNIT
CUTTING DIVISION
Cutting  supervisor  -------------------  (1)
Cutting  master ------------------------ (2)
Cutting  coordinator -------------------(1)
Sorting  coordinator  -------------------  (1)
Re-cutters ------------------------------  (2)
Layers ----------------------------------  (10)
Sorters (nub  & bun)  -------------------  (18)
Markers ---------------------------------  (4)
SEWING DIVISION
Production  manager  ------------------- (1)
Floor in  charge --------------------------  (2)
Online supervisors -------------------  (10)
Tailors --------------------------------- (360)
Helpers --------------------------------  (100)
K/B  supervisors -----------------------  (1)
K/B  operators -------------------------  (14)
Markers -------------------------------- (10)
Trimming  supervisors ---------------- (1)
Thread  trimmer ------------------------  (26)
Production  coordinator  -------------  (1)
Asst prod  coordinator  ---------------  (1)
Data entry  operators ------------------  (1)
Mechanics ------------------------------  (5)
Online checkers -----------------------  (30)
MANAGING  DIRECTOR - GENERAL MERCHANDISING MANAGER
SAMPLING DIVISION
Sample in  charge -------------------  (1)
Sample supervisor  -----------------  (1)
Senior pattern  master --------------  (1)
Asst pattern  master  ---------------- (2)
Sample cutter  ----------------------- (1)
Sample tailors -----------------------  (12)
Sample checkers --------------------  (1)
MERCHANDISING DEPARTMENT
Senior merchandiser  -------------------  (4)
Junior  merchandiser  -------------------- (4)
MANAGING  DIRECTOR - P.A
AUDIT
Senior audit manager ------------------- (1)
Audit officer -----------------------------  (7)
Q.A DEPARTMENT
Q.a manager  -------------------  (1)
Q.a assistant -------------------  (16)
INDUSTRIAL ENGINEERING
Industrial engineering  ------------------- (1)
Asst Industrial engg  ---------------------  (4)
ACCOUNTS  DEPARTMENT
Manager  accounts -------------------  (1)
Cost accounts ------------------------ (1)
Accounts officer ---------------------  (3)
Accountants --------------------------  (1)
Accounts assistants -------------------  (1)
Cashier  ---------------------------------  (1)
WAREHOUSE  DIVISION (TRIMS)
Stores in  charge -------------------  (1)
Asst stores ------------------------  (4)
Helpers ---------------------------- (2)
Stores accountants ---------------  (1)
SHIPPING DEPARTMENT
Export executive -------------------  (1)
Import executive -------------------  (1)
Document asst --------------------- (3)
E.D.P DEPARTMENT
E.D.P manager  -------------------  (1)
Programmers --------------------- (3)
MAIN  DEPARTMENTS  OF FABRITEX  EXPORTS
In  FABRITEX EXPORTS they  are having  eight main  departments every  one are playing
very  important role in  making  or producing  a complete garment or  outfits.
FABRIC  DEPARTMENT
WORK FLOW
Get swatch  from the buyer
Testing  the swatch  in  lab  for  count & construction
Then  it will sent to  the supplier  with  pantone shade for  table loom
Table loom swatch  is taken  and  checked  (count,  construction,  pattern)
Sent to  the buyer  for approval by  merchandiser
Purchase indent is sent by  merchandiser
Actual quantity  is rechecked
Sent to  purchase manager (supplier  rate is fixed  and  it is approved  by  M.D)
Purchase order  is raised  (delivery  date is fixed)
First lot comes
Goods receipt note (G.R.N)  is made (3  copies,  1  for checking  department,  1  for
bill,  and  another  1  is for file for  further  requirement)
20  meters of  fabric is cutted  and  it sent to  lab  for testing  (S.G.S,  I.T.S,  etc.)
Testing  lab  report or  consolidated  report is sent to  merchandiser  for approval
The swatch  is sent to  buyer  for  approval
When  buyer  approves the swatch.  The first lot will come to  industry
The fabric inspector who's at textile mill checks the fabric before sending  to
industry
After that lot is sent for fabric inspection  or  lab  (4  point system,  10%  of  fabric is
checked  in  case of  mill and  100%  of  fabric is checked  in  case of  power  loom
fabric)
Average time for  the fabric stays in  fabric department is 21  days.
Fabric department is divided  into  two  sections one is fabric checking section  and
another one is lab section.  After  making  a fabric in  a textiles mills it will come to  a
industry  for producing  garments,  the fabric was come by  bale and  or  roller  form,  a newly
maked  fabric has some defects that we want to  analyze.  So  first we want to  check  the
fabric,  two  methods i.e.  manual checking  and  automatic roller checking  do  the checking
FABRIC CHECKING
4-POINT QUALITY SYSTEM FOR FABRIC INSPECTION
J.C PENNY SYSTEM
DEFECT
LENGTH
(INCHES)
PENALTY
POINTS
PENALTY
POINTS/100  SQM
GRADES
Up  to  \u00223\u0022 1 Below 42
A
Above \u00223\u0022 & up  to
\u00226\u0022
2
Above \u00226\u0022 & up  to
\u00229\u0022
3 Above 42
B
Above 9 4
Penalty  points per 100  sqm = no.  Of point *  3937
Length  in  meter  *  width  in  inches
NOTE:
1,  max  4  point per  meter
2,  4  point for  hole
3,  rejects the piece if  number of  points per  100  square meters is more than  42
4,  rejects the piece if  there is continuous defects
INSTRUCTION TO USE  STICKER WHILE  CHECKING
= NON REMOVABLE DEFECTS
RED
= REMOVABLE DEFECTS
BLUE
= REMOVABLE STAINS
GREEN
LAB SECTION
This is department of  fabric checking  in  which  the fabric is check  by  many  ways.  Some
time buyer  may  be demand  for  some standard  laboratory.  In  that case exporter has to
check  that fabric by  that laboratory  which  buyer recommended  other  wise buyers wont
accept the shipment.  In  fabritex  exports they  are having  some important parameters to
check  the fabric.  They  are
CROCK METER (COLOUR FASTNESS  TEST & RUBBING TEST)
BEESLEY BALANCE (COUNT & CONSTRUCTION)
COLOUR MATCHING CABINET
CROCK METER
In  this system we can  check  the color  fastness of  fabric,  that's we check  by  rubbing
method.  In  this apparatus we hold  the fabric by  some kind  of clamp,  which  hold  the
fabric piece surface of the system and  one white piece of  fabric topside of machine,
which  moves on  the fabric,  which  are holded  by  the clamp.  Through  this process we can
get the fastness of the fabric whether  fabric is ok  or not.  There are 2  methods to  check  the
color fastness of  the fabric.  They  are
Dry  method
Wet method
BEESLEY BALANCE
In  this parameter  we want to  take the yarn  of the fabric and  measure it in  beesley  balance
according  to  the yarn  type (cotton  or wool).  After  that weight the yarn  in  weighing
machine there is a kind  of hanger  in  that apparatus in  one side where we hang  the yarns.
We have to  make it equal to  the other  side of  the apparatus,  when  it get equal to  the other
side then  take it back  and  count the yarn  (how much  we hanged  for  equality).  Like this
counting  is done.
COTTON
METRIC SCALE
WOOL SKEIN
HALF COTTON
WORSTED
LINEN
COLOR MATCHING CABINET
This is the system is used  to  check  the shade of  fabric.  The checking  is also  depend  on
buyer  if  he asks then  exporter  check  the shade of fabric in  this color  cabinet.  They  are
many  kinds of  lights in  this cabinet they  are.
ARTIFICIAL DELIGHT
TUNGTEN FLOURSCENT LIGHT
COOL WATER FLOURSCENT
TL84
ULTRA VILOET
GSM CUTTER
This is used  to  measure or  check  the weight of  the fabric.  (Grams square per meter)
If we get the weight of  the fabric = 1.8  weight
Weight x  100  = true weight
Some of the laboratory  were fabritex  checks the fabric on buyer demand
S.G.S  LABORATORY (bangalore,  delhi)
I.T.S    INTER TEC  TESTING LABORATORY
M.T.L   MERCHANDISING TESTING LABORATORY (mumbai)
C.T.L   CONSUMER TESTING LABORATORY (Singapore)
TESTING PARAMETER OF F.P.T & G.P.T
F.P.T   FABRIC  PRIMARY TESTING
G.P.T-  GARMENT PRIMARY TESTING
F.P.T: this test is done when  the order  is confirmed.  The main  objective of  F.P.T is to
ensure the quality  as per  buyers standard.  Following  test is required  to  check  the quality
of  the fabric.
Count (it is checked  on  the machine)
Construction  (checked  by  the counting  glass or  pick  glass)
Color  fastness to  crocking  (checked  on  the crocking  m/c)
G.S.M (grams per  square meter)
Dimensional stability  to  washing
Contents of  the fabric.
G.P.T: this test is done at sampling  stage.  It is done on  the approved  PER PRODUCTION
SAMPLE.  Following  tests are mainly  conducted  for G.P.T
Dimensional stability  to  washing
Appearance after wash
Color  fastness to  washing
Color  fastness to  crocking
Color  fastness to  non-chlorine bleach
CUTTING  DEPARTMENT
CUTTING PLAN:
The cutting  plan  is filled  by  the cutting  in  charge.  It shows various details such  as order
quantity,  marker  length,  per piece consumption,  required  yards and  whether there is a
shortage or  excess in  the fabric.
Different marker  plans are made twice or thrice in  order  to  obtain  a marker that has
maximum wastage.  If there is any  shortage or  excess of fabric it is mentioned  to  the
merchandiser.
The final cutting  plan  can  be put to  use only  after  the approval by  the merchandiser.  If
any  rectification  has to  be done,  the merchandiser  will specify  and  inform the cutting  in
charge.
SPEARDING:
After the marker plan  and  cutting  plan  are made and  shown  to  the merchandiser for
approval,  then  spreading  commences.  Each  roll of the fabric is hoisted  on  a slightly
raised  metal rod  from which,  fabric is drawn  across the spreading  table by  two  assistants.
The number  of  lays differs with  the thickness and  nature of  the fabric.
CUTTING:
The cutting  slip  is issued  by  the cutting  in  charge and  cutting  is carried  out per the ratio
specified  in  job  card.  The skilled  operators who  are trained  and  confident in  using  the
cutting  machine used,  which  is straight knife,  perform the cutting.  The cutting  is done
systematically  and  the cut pieces are immediately  tied  up  in  bundles and  sent for sorting.
MARKING:
It is process of  get the all component of  a garment in  right shape and  fabric shouldn't
waste at any  cost.  For  that purpose we do  the marking  on  pattern  paper,  which  has same
width  as fabric,  which  we are going  to  use for  cutting.  But length  we decide on  marker,
on  we try  to  save the fabric and  for that we need  good-minded  person  who  can  save the
fabric.
METHOD OF MARKING:
First set all component of  garment on  pattern  paper.
Check  how much  fabric is going  to  use in  component.
How much  meter  fabric we have to  have to  use in  this garment.
Can  we save fabric & how.
Final mark  all components on  marker  and  set in  the fabric lays.
SORTING DEPARTMENT:
The sorting  department works as a mediator  between  the cutting  department and  the
production  department.  It keeps a check  on  quality  in  the cutting  department checking  the
sizes of all parts of the garment through  hard  patterns.  Its primary  function  is to  simplify
production  process,  which  it does by  bundling  together the parts of  garments and  by
numbering  them so  that all parts of  the same garments are attached  together.
MACHINE  LIST IN SORTING DEPARTMENT
1)  Numbering  machine
2)  Fusing  machine
ABOUT SORTING:
Cut pieces are received  from the cutting  department purchase order wise,  style wise,  cut
number,  part wise in  bundles.  Then  checking  the top  bottom and  middle ply  by  placing
the hard  pattern  checks the size of the pieces.
The following  aspects are taken  of:
Whether cutting  has to  be rejected  or  not
Whether cutting  is one across the grain  line or  not
Check  the notches
After this,  pieces are segregated  size wise and  are numbered  from one onwards
depending  on  the cut number  of  the P.O.  the numbering  is done so  that all parts of  the
same garment are attached  from the same ply,  so  that problems variations can  be avoided.
FUSING:
Fusing  is soul of  garment,  without fusing  or  lining  material cant get the right shape of
garments parts like collar,  cuff,  placket,  waist band,  etc.  so  that's why  we should  take
care of the fusing  at the time of  passing  it to  garment.
TYPE  OF FUSING
Non  woven
Woven  fusing
Knitted  fusing
INSTRUCTION OF FUSING
Supplier  recommended  all the instruction  about fusing  like temp.  Well time of
pasting.
The operator  should  careful about fabric type it is heavy  or light.
Experience is really  very  necessary  about fusing  through  experience a person  can
judge which  kind  of fusing  the fabric needs and  how much  temp.  Time & pressure
fusing  need.
LABEL INSTRUCTION
Label instruction  help  us at the time of washing.  Otherwise fusing  will be damaged  after
washing.  Which  wont be good  for  the new garment.  Not only  washing  instruction  are
there even  ironing  instruction  are also  there on  label.
SAMPLING  DEPARTMENT
RESPONSIBILITES OF SAMPLING
The sampling  in  charge (technical manager)  is primary  responsible for  pattern  and
sample development in  co-ordination  with  the pattern  master,  sample master and
merchandiser.
The sampling  in  charge receives the sampling  indent along  with  garment spec
sheet,  fabric and  shrinkage detail,  type of  sample,  trims and  accessories from the
concerned  merchandiser.
The sampling  in  charge arranges for  the preparation  required  no.  Of  sample
garments in  the sample development section.
The samples are checked  after  preparation,  handed  over  to  merchandiser  and
same is recorded  in  the sample issue register.
The purpose of  this is to  manufacture patterns and  samples as per  specifications
for inquiry,  confirmation  and  bulk  production  approvals.  This procedure is
applicable to  pattern  and  sampling  department,  interfaces with  merchandising  and
production  department.
The main  functional areas of  the sampling  department can  be segregated  as
1)  Planning
2)  Quality  control
3)  Cutting
4)  Production
PLANNING FUNCTIONS
Planning  sample production  according  to  delivery  dates
Day  to  day  planning  to  achieve targeted  output
Getting  clarification  about style details from merchandisers,  head  office
Arranging  accessories and  fabrics of  respective styles
Achieving  synchronization  between  production,  cutting  and  quality  check  and
quality  check  and  finishing.
CUTTING FUNCTIONS
Following  proper  cutting  rooms
Checking  pattern  cutting  norms
Eliminating  defective fabric before start of  cutting
Check  with  embroidery  placement if  any
PRODUCTION FUNCTION
Assigning  cut pieces to  tailors
Following  stitching  details to  style analysis report
Information  quality  related  problem to  lie quality  controllers
Minimizing  tailoring  time.
STAGES OF SAMPLING
These are various types of samples that are prepared.  Generally  the sequence of sample
and  types of  samples to  be presented  for  getting  production  approval various from buyer
to  buyer.  Basically  the sequence depends on  whether the export house is getting  repeated
orders of  a particular  style or  the export house is developing  some range for  the next
season  either  from his or  from the buyer side.
The following  sequence is followed  for  most of  the buyers.
FIT SAMPLE
Mostly  in  substitute fabric.  Prepared  for  approval of  style,  spec sheet.
PROTO SAMPLE
Mostly  in  ordered  fabric for approval of  style,  fit and  spec.
PRE  PRODUCTION APPROVAL (P.P.A)
It is done before starting  the production  and  everything  used  is in  original form.  It
represents the true quality  the buyer is going  to  get.  It has to  be approved  by  the buyer.
SIZE  SET
Given  in  all sizes and  colors with  proper  grading  according  to  actual spec sheet.  (Do  the
grading  if  buyer  required  in  sample)
PILOT RUN
First samples which  is made in  batches i.e.  in  main  production  line and  not in  sampling
room
SHIPMENT SAMPLE
After finishing  production,  some pieces are required  by  buyers are sent to  them as
representation  of  goods that as being  shipped.
ACCESORY STORE
Accessory  indent is issued  by  merchandiser.
Sent to  purchase dependent.
Issues a purchase order  copy  to  store.
Material flow starts to  stores (qlty  & qty  of  material checked  on  the basis of  P.O)
Swatch  card  is made for production
Goes for approval by  the merchandiser
Material inward  register  is maintained
G.R.N is written  (if  rejected,  then  returned  back  to  the supplier)
Accepted  material is taken  by  store
Stock  ledger is maintained  after  G.R.N.
Requisition  slip  received  on  the basis of  which  materials are issued.
Materials are issued  and  store transfer  note is prepared.
Entered  into  stock  ledger  on  the basis of  issued.
DOCUMENTS USED IN PROCESS ARE
Purchase indent,  accessory  indent.
Purchase order.
Swatch  card.
Material inwards register.
G.R.N.
Stock  register.
Requisition  register.
Store transfer  note.
STORES (trims & ac cessories)
Inspection of  materials
Once goods are released,  the store helpers inspect the quality  of  accessories are arranged
according  to  style.  Buttons,  snaps,  elastic,  zippers labels,  hangtags,  spools of thread
Velcro  etc.  are arranged  in  cartons.  Are labeled  according  to  the style no.  Zippers
accessories.
DIGITAL WEIGHING SCALE  (Orion engineering  weight)
It can  count the no.  Of  buttons,  tags,  etc
It can  weight the material.
HOW WE  GET THE  ACCESSORIES
We can't get all trims or  accessories in  count & weight.
Eg
Labels   1  no.
Buttons   in  gross
Velcro    one packet 25  mtrs
Eyelet   4  parts 1  set in  gross
Hooks bar    2  part 1  set in  gross
Beeds   in  grams
Zippers   in  no.
Lace   in  meter
Stopper   in  no.
Elastics   in  meter.
SEWING  DEPARTMENT
The production  floor  at fabritex  has 8  batches.  All the lines follow a multi point feeding
progressive bundling  system.  Operation  break  down  for  a part,  style is determined  in
advance so  that no  time is wasted  in  deciding  which  operation  is to  be performed  first and
which  operation  is make succeed  to  other  operation.  This increases efficiency.  It is
recommendable that such  a huge department functions rather  smoothly  and  so  the export
house is able to  meet the buyers needs.
PRODUCTION DEPARTMENT
Fabritex  comprises of  one production  unit,  the main  unit having  60  operators per  line and
5  batches A,  B,  C,  and  D&E.
PRODUCTION PLAN
This is issued  to  the sewing  department by  the merchandising  department.  It shows the
starting  and  finishing  dates of production  for  each  style,  number  of  lines and  targets for
each  day.
PREPARATION OF LAYOUT
The numbers of  operation  in  the construction  of  a garment are divided  and  the types of
machine required  are listed  out to  form the layout.  The total number  of  machine required
will be equal to  the operators.  Machines are re-arranged  and  necessary  are made before
starting  a new style.  The machines are re-arranged  according  to  the sequence of
operations.
START OF PRODUCTION
The stored  out bundles form the cutting  department are fed  to  each  line by  the helpers
along  with  the accessories.  A daily  inspection  card  is provided  to  every  operator.
WORK FLOW
Before starting  day's work,  the workers are briefed  about the desirable quality  standards
required  and  how to  achieve them.  The input in  the production  department comes from
the sorting  department.  The feeding  helpers follow a multi point feeding  system.  In  this
system,  during  batch  setting,  it is decided  which  worker will perform which  operation.  So
accordingly  parts of  garment are fed.
PRODUCTION PERSONNELS IN A SINGLE  BATCH OF 60  M/C
CATEGORY NUMBERS
1)  Production  supervisor 01
2)  Batch  supervisor 02
3)  Batch  online checkers 04
4)  Final checkers 01
5)
Batch  feeding  helpers 01
6)  Cutting,  matching  and  part dividing
helpers
02
7)  Sorting  helpers 04
8)  Marking  helpers 02
9)  Trimming  helpers 02
10)  Turning  helpers 02
11)
Ironers 02
12)  Tailors 59
TOTAL 85
Garment are 3  shaped  and  formed  in  three ways:
Materials molded  to  a form
Fabric pieces cut to  shape
Assembled  by  bounding  and  pieces cut to  shape and  sewn
The first two  methods are used  to  a limited  degree.  Sewing  department pieces together
with  thread  formed  into  stitches and  seams to  the most used  method  at this time.  In  future
more garments may  be assembled  with  seam alternatives,  such  as adhesives fusing  spot
welding  or molding  but for  the present time thread  and  stitches are the primary  means of
garment assembly.
The dominant process in  garment manufacture is sewing.  The objectives of sewing  are
the construction  of seam,  which  combine the required  standard  of appearance and
performance,  with  an  appropriate level of  economy  in  construction.  Performance of
seams means the achievement of  strength,  elasticity,  durability,  security  of  comfort and
the maintenance of any  specialized  fabric.  Properties such  as water  proofing  or  flame
proofing  etc.  a balance must be achieved  hen  planning  garment production  between  the
demands of the end  use of the garment,  its piece and  the machinery  available for its
construction.
In  production  as a manager  person  have to  remember some main  point for get the
efficiency  and  productivity  in  industry  like...
LABOR ALLOTMENT
Labor  allotment depends upon  number  of  operations,  machines to  be used; materials flow
between  the machines,  line balancing  and  capabilities of the labors.
LINE BALANCING
Line balancing  is a process exercise by  which  a production  supervisor  can  balance output
and  input.  The success and  failure of  supervisor  and  manager  depends on  his/her
knowledge about production  line balancing.  A good  supervisor  who  have knowledge
about line balancing  can  enjoy  shop  floor,  in  other  hand  a supervisor who  does not only
know about line balancing  cannot sit for 1  minute in  the shop  floor.  The excess
manpower  is headache for  shop  floor.  So  to  balance the line the following  effective
planning  should  be clear in  mind  of production  supervisor.
A knowledge of garment manufacturing
Write down  sequence operation  of  particular style
Grading  or operation
Requirement of  labor
Grading  of labor  according  to  operation  grading
Machines requirement according  to  style
Sequence of  m/c on  shop  floor,  according  to  sequence operation  of  garment.
Trail production/pilot study  available fabric
Identification  of  bottle neck  operation
Present initial balance
Initial balance/balance control
Work
ABOUT GARMENT MANUFACTURING
Before starting  lines balancing  collect the original sample from production  manage and
study  all the operation  of  styles.  Not only  this,  if  possible study  inner  operations of
garment.  For  inner  operation  customer  will provide cut sample.  A good  supervisor  will
also  study  wrong  side of  the garment.  After  studying  sample confirm all machines all-
available in  your  layout or  not.
SEQUENCE OF OPERATIONS
After studying  the style write down  S.Q upon  paper  so  that you  can  grade the
operation  on  basis of  operation  on  basis of  skill ness of  operation.  If  possible put the
grading  in  front of  operation.
WASHING  DEPARTMENT
RUBBER  BALL WASH
FABRITEX has a good  washing  plant.  In  which  they  are having  all kind  of wash.  All of
we know that after  washing  which  water  goes out to  the industry  it is completely  dirty
because it is full of chemicals that we used  for  washing  and  that water  is very  dirty.  For
this problem fabritex  has solution.
E.T.P   EQUALIZER TREATMENTMENT PLANT
In  this plant we use lime,  alum chemicals.  Which  helps to  make water pure and  chemical
less.
Washing  of garments is depends upon  buyer's instruction  only.
TYPES OF WASHING IN FABRITEX:
SODIUM HYPOCHLORIDE
ENZYME (ACID ENZYME)
DESIZE
HYDROGEN PEROXIDE
SODA ASH
BINDER
DYE FIX
ANTI  BACK STAIN
CATIONIC  SOFTNER
SILICON SOFTNER
WETTING AGENT
ACETIC  ACID
SAMPLE
.)1
CATIONIC & SILICON SOFTNER-  for  get the smoothness in  fabric
we use these chemicals (10  min)
.)2  DESIZE  &   WETTING AGENT- these chemicals remove the starch
from fabric (20  min)
.)3  ENZYME-  it brings whiteness & softness change the color  of  fabric dark
to  light & hard  to  soft.  (20-30  min)
.)4  SODIUM HYPOCHLORIDE- through  this chemical we can  remove the
color of  fabric .it changes the fabric to  griege fabric.
.)5  HYDROGEN PEROXIDE-after HYPOCHLORIDE dip  into  hydrogen
peroxide soln  for extra whiteness.
.)6  SAMPLE-to  fill the chemicals in  little boxes.
.)7  SODA ASH-  it also  makes the fabric white by  dying.  But it takes extra
time.
.)8
BINDER-before wash  in  soda ash  or  hypo  chloride wash  garment in
binder.  Through  this process stitching  thread  wont take the color  of the
garment.
.)9  DYE  FIX-  at the time of washing  we use this chemical,  it fixes the color
of  garment and  that garments color  doesn't come out.
.)10 ANTI BACK STAIN-  same process like dye fixes just the name is
changed.
.)11
ACETIC ACID-  in  this process we take the help  of indicator
paper.  The paper changes the color & through  Laval of  color  we can  wash
the garment as pH required.
Indicator  paper-  we use this paper  for  get the correct pH.
PH-  0-4  more acetic acids.
5-6  little bit acetic
7  normal water  8,9,10  min  chemicals for  water.
Sample wash  m/c   15  kg  (all kind  of  wash)
Hydro  extractor  -  size 28\u0022
Model   M-77
Motor-  5  hp
Dryer  35  each  (temp  75-80)
Bulk  wash  m/c- 100  kg  capacity  any  kind  of wash
Model-m-009
Power-10hp
Capacity-220  LBS
Electronic details-  30,  50  HZ star  delta
FINISHING  DEPARTMENT
A customer  interest in  a garment is evoked  by  the final presentation  of  it any  store.  The
final finishing  department does adjust that,  in  the sense that it ships neatly  packed  goods.
After passing  through  batch  audit,  garments comes to  the finishing  department.  If  a
particular  job  order requires wash  program,  then  the garment are washed  and  then  comes
to  the finishing  department.  Marking  for the button  holing  (kaja) for  different sizes are
done.  A template having  the gap  between  two  buttonholes is marked  and  supplied  to
workers.
Once marking  is done,  the garment are segregated  according  to  the color of thread  used
for button  holing  and  size of button  holing  required  and  given  for kaja.
Typical kaja (button  hole)  defects
Broken  kaja
Double stitch  at kaja
Excess stitch  at kaja
Less stitch  at kaja
Excess desity
Typical button  faults
Improper  stitch  at kaja
Break  button
Excess stitch  at button
Loose button
Shade variation
Missing  stitch  at button
The thread  are trimmed  and  sent to  the threadsucking  m/c.  after  threadsucking,  it is
sent for  flat ironing  stage,  the bottom hem,  the front placket and  pocket are ironed  and
then  sent to  group  checking.  At group  checking,  inside stitch  of  a garment is inspected,
any  defects are found  are sent for alternation.
Then  the garments are sent for ironing.  Here whole of the garment is steam pressed,  put
in  hangers and  sent for checking.  In  checking,  the checkers inspect the facing  side of  the
alternation.  Stains are removed  using  white petrol or  acetone.
On  approval at the presentation  checking  stage,  it is sent to  ironing  for placements of
accessories like collar  runner,  butterfly  slips,  paper  etc.  folding  of  garments is done by
the buyer  requirements.  (Like flat pack  or stand  up  pack).  It is sent again  for presentation
checking.  In  presentation  checking  the checkers inspect the quality  of ironing  and  the
folding  presentation.  It is sent back  to  ironing,  if  the garment is not approved.  Otherwise
it passes directly  for  tagging.
FINISHING DEPARTMENT OF FABRITEX
ONE THREAD SUCKING M/C  (ramsons)- 1  operator
24  IRONING M/C  (ramsons)-24  operators & 2  helpers
TWO STAIN BUSTER M/C  (ramsons)-2  operator & 2  helpers
PACKING DEPARTMENT
After the finishing  department pieces go  to  packing  dept.  where the worker  of  dept.  pack
the garments as per  buyer  demand.  Buyer  gives all specification  about the packing.  How
he wants his shipment in  cartons.  Buyer  will send  the packing  ratio
At the time of  packing  packer should  careful about buyer instruction:
Packing  has to  be done as per  buyer  requirement.
Buyer  can  ask  Packing  by  fold  or  on  hanger.
Before tagging,  the trim card  is seen  to  check  what all tags and  labels go  into  the
garment.
After tagging,  packed  in  poly  bags and  bar code stickers placed  according  to
specifications.
The garments are packed  according  to  packing  instructions given  by  the buyer.
A packing  list prepared  specifying  the quality  of  the number  of  cartons and  the
quantity  of garments in  the cartons is also  specified  and  sent to  documentation  for
invoice preparation.
NEEDLE  DETECTOR (HASHIMA NEEDLE DETECTOR)
Fabritex  has the full quality  inspected  things,  some time at needles breakage in  the
production,  we try  to  search  it but we cant and  it could  be dangerous for  the costumers &
exporters both.
Needle detector  is only  the way  to  save to  the problem.  We can  easily  catch  the part of
needle by  the needle detector.  Normally  they  don't use the m/c for  each  and  every  buyer
there are some buyer  who  demands the needle detector  checking.  Then  they  use the
machine for  each  and  every  garment.
MERCHANDISING  DEPARTMENT
Fashion Merchandisers work  hand-in-glove with  Fashion  Designers,  Retailers and
Manufacturers to  procure and  distribute the clothes and  accessories that the public will
wear  and  use.  They  must combine the eye of  the artist with  the dollars-and-cents
practicality  of  the businessperson  to  develop  products that will fill shop  windows,  shelves
and  clothing  racks for  sale.  In  order  to  accomplish  this task  Fashion  Merchandisers must
be able to  work  in  many  different types of situations.
When  dealing  directly  with  designers,  they  must be able to  recognize not only  which
ideas will be appealing,  but which  ideas can  be translated  into  marketable products.  They
may  attend  fashion  shows or  visit designers at their  own  studios.  They  must be able to
communicate intelligently  with  fashion  creators about the needs and  requirements of
those they  represent.  Continual research  about social,  economic,  as well as fashion  trends
must be coupled  with  an  instinct for  their  customers' tastes in  order to  make the right
choices.
Sometimes,  as part of the merchandising  process,  Fashion  Merchandisers will work
together  with  designers and  manufacturers to  produce clothing  and  accessories.  Other
times the Merchandisers' only  connection  to  the design  process may  be through  the
catalogs that manufacturers supply.  In  either  case,  Fashion  Merchandisers must be
knowledgeable about the materials that products are constructed  out of.  They  must be
particularly  familiar with  textiles and  fabrics,  how different materials look  and  work
together,  and  how they  wear.
They  must be familiar with  the reputations and  capabilities of  the manufacturers they
purchase from.  Can  the manufacturers supply  what they  say  they  can? Can  they  meet
deadlines? Will the products be of  the expected  quality  and  workmanship? Since fashion
is such  a volatile industry,  the timeliness and  condition  of a product can  mean  the
difference between  its selling  out or  lingering  on  a close out rack.
Some Fashion  Merchandisers are exclusively  responsible for  the inventory  of one store,
while others may  determine what will appear across the country  in  a nationwide chain.
No  matter  which  is the case,  they  must still know what their final customers are going  to
want,  when  they  will want it and  how much  of  it they  will want.  To  do  this
Merchandisers should  be ready  to  work  closely  with  business people and  marketers to
best predict a timetable and  strategy  for  acquiring  and  distributing  inventory.
The outlook  for  Fashion  Merchandisers is predicted  to  remain  steady  throughout the first
decade of  the new century.  But the work  of Fashion  Merchandisers is slowly  changing
with  the advent of  computer  technology.  More and  more communication  can  be done
between  designers,  manufacturers,  and  merchandisers through  email and  the Internet.
Photographs,  designs and  other  information  can  now be sent instantly.  The new
generation  of  merchandisers will need  to  be comfortable using  these types of  electronic
media.  Overnight delivery  services will also  have an  impact on  the amount of  travel
necessary.  Fabric samples,  for example,  can  now be mailed  around  the world  in  just a day
or  two.
Travel,  however,  will by  no  means disappear.  There will be no  substitute for the first hand
impressions that can  be collected  by  attending  a fashion  show,  walking  through  a factory
or  talking  with  a customer.  For  this reason  Fashion  Merchandisers,  even  if  only  as a
peripheral to  their  work,  must be comfortable with  traveling  and  moving  around  in
different cultures.  Additionally,  Merchandisers must expect to  work  under seasonal time
pressures and  deadlines.  They  must possess a sense of aesthetics but be able to  balance it
out with  the practical needs of  business.  Above all they  must enjoy  working  in  a field  that
is constantly  changing  and  evolving.
Educational requirements will vary  from position  to  position.  Many  schools offer  fashion
degrees that can  be earned  in  two  years or less.  Some programs can  even  be take online.
Fashion  Merchandising  can  be studied  as a specialization  within  a business,  retailing,  or
marketing  degree or  coupled  as a minor  with  a curriculum in  design.  Salaries for  Fashion
Merchandisers vary  tremendously  depending  on  their  specific jobs,  who  they  work  for
and  in  what part of the country.  But the Fashion  Merchandiser's ability  to  consistently
produce tangible results in  an  ever-changing  industry  will be his or her single most
important determiner  of  professional success.
THE  WORK OF MERCHNADISER
Studying  the fashion  forecast along  with  the designer
Getting  information  about customer  profile,  whether is he a distributor,  retailer or
exporter,  domestic or  international.  And  product profile specification  of the
product,  categories.  For  eg: men's shirt,  100%  cotton,  mercerized,  etc along  with
the measurement chart and  size chart and  size details   S,  M,  L,  XL in  ratio  such
as 1:2:2:1  from the buyer.
Sourcing  of  fabrics,  whether mill made,  power loom,  handloom,  woven,  knitted
etc and  trims such  as interlining,  buttons,  labels etc.
Placing  indent for fabric,  trims and  packing  materials and  regular follow up.
Getting  the pattern  made.
Calculate the fabric consumption  and  cost.
Sample preparation  and  estimate the cost.
Getting  the approval of the sample from the buyer
Pricing  the sampled  garment
Getting  the correction  done by  the buyer
Getting  the final approval with  the corrected  sample
Calculating  the lead  time (the time taken  from sample approval to  the dispatch  of
the merchandiser).
Scheduling  production  with  the final approval approved  sample.
Send  the production  sample to  the buyer.
Quality  inspection  of  the merchandise
Co-ordination  of  the packing  with  the packing  instruction    type of  fold  required,
marking  cartoons etc.
Arrange for  dispatch  (shipping).
Intimate the buyer  about the shipment of his merchandise and  follow up  with  the
payment.
Apart from these physical entities we have the consummations of the materials,  used  to
be kept mind,  which  shall gives us the total expenditure on  the raw materials used.  This
would  include the excess 3-5%  allowance,  whish  compensates for  the shrinkage and
wastages.  A merchandiser who  plays a key  role in  any  export units has the
responsibilities of  giving  in  an  estimate of costing  as soon  as the sample is made.  It is his
duty  to  keep  in  mind  the above details and  calculate the calculate the cost according  to
the consumptions and  other  external factors such  as.
Cost of manufacture lab  ours
Over  heads
Laundry  and  finishes
Commission  for  agents buying  house
Insurance charges
Freight charges
Quota %
Mark-up  %
How merchandiser works on the costing?
When  merchandiser  gets an  order  he immediately  takes tentative consumption,  find  out
the fabric from the supplier  and  cost of  the trims & accessories etc.
Style detail,  sketch  and  a sample come to  the merchandiser from the buying  house.
A Merchandiser  comes to  know type of  fabric (imported  or local)  through  style detail.
After that he takes the consumption
Body  consumption
Pocketing  consumption
After taking  consumption  he always takes extra % age for  the fabric.
Costing  methodology:
Cost,  the basic value of commodity: the concept of ascertaining  the value of  the
commodity,  keeping  in  mind  the cost of each  individual material used  in  the making  of
that particular  commodity  as a whole.  Costing  is necessarily  the most important function
of  the merchandiser,  who  is the head  in-charge of  that particular  or  buyer.
The order followed  in  any  kind  of  production  has a similar  structure for costing,  but for  a
minor  variant details for  the stock.  The costing  structure of  an  export-oriented  unit in  the
garment industry  is based  on  the following  factors:
The fabric cost:
..1  Shell fabric
..2
Lining  fabric
Trim  cost:
..1  Threads
..2  Labels
.i  Main  Labels
.ii Size Labels
.iii Wash  care Labels
Accessories:
..3  Buttons
..4  Zippers
..5  Rivets
..6  Cords
..7
Velcro
..8  Etc.
Packing  material cost:
..3  Poly  bags
..4  Cartons
..5  Hangers
..6  Etc.
Extra %age are taken  as follows:
+5%  for shrinkage
1%  for  cutting  stage
1%  for  garment stage
5%  for  buffer
1%  for  washing
After that he goes through  the sample that is sent by  the buying  house to  know the type of
trims and  accessories of  the garment.  After  finding  out the fabric cost,  fabric
consumption,  and  types of  trims & accessories detail he starts making  costing  report.
THERAD CONSUMPTION
TYPE  OF THE  STITCH  SEAM LENGTH IN
CM
FACTOR TOTAL THREAD
LENGTH IN CM
SNLS 1 2.5 2.5
DNLS 1 5 5
SNCS 1 5.5 5.5
DNCS 1 11 11
3TO/L 1 14 14
FLAT LOCK (3TO/L) 1 14 14
5TO/L 1 18 18
FOA 1 11 11
BAR  TACK 1 50 50
BUTTON HOLE 12 100 1200
BUTTON HOLE
(CONSTRAST)
1 100 100
BUTTON STITCH 15 50 750
DOCUMENTATION
All paper works that has to  be done comes under  the documentation  department.  This
department acts as a hub  where all the postproduction  activities are done.  The garments
for shipping  are first counter  checked  with  the specification  in  letter  of credit and  order
confirmation  report.  Then  the packing  list is prepared  and  transportation  to  the port is
arranged.  The help  of  shipping  agents also  arranges arranging  of  apace in  feeder and
mother  vessel.  Quota applications are made to  AEPC  (APPAREL EXPORT
PROMOTION COUNCIL)  or  bought from the open  market.  Documentation  department
makes duty  drawbacks application  and  drawbacks received  are credited  documents are
prepared  on  the basis of  the letter  of credit and  sent to  the buyer for  payment.
REQUIRED DOCUMENTS FOR  SHIPPING
Purchase order  (PO)
Letter of  credit
Invoice
Shipping  or  airways bill
INVOICE CONTAINS
Name of  the buyer
Port of  loading
Destination
Country  of origin
Quantity
Quota category
FOB/C&FCIF price
Mode of shipment
ORDER COPY CONTAINS
Description  of  items
Unit price
Shipping  instruction
There are 2  types of  documentation  are there
1)  Documents for  the customs or per-shipment document
2)  Documents for  the buyer or  post-shipment document.
PRE-SHIPMENT DOCUMENTS ARE CLASSFIED AS:
a.  Documents required  for  quota countries
b.
Documents required  for  non-quota countries.
a)  For QUOTA countries :
The exporters are required  to  obtained  a quota from apparel export
promotion  council (AEPC)  as per  policy  announced  form time to  time and  submit the
following  documents for  the certification.
Shipping  bill
Export entitlement certificate
Copies of invoice
After getting  the certification  from the AEPC  ,the exporter  should  submit the following
documents to  customs :-
1)  INVOICE:
Exporter name
Consignee name (buyer)
Terms of  shipment
Description  of  goods
Freight chargers & FOB  value (transport)
Exchange rate
2)  SALES CONTRACT :
Contract number
Date
Shippers & buyer  name
Contract amount
Quality  & description  about the goods
Terms of  payment
Delivery  date & shipping  date
3)  EXCHANGE CONTROL DECLERATION FORM:
This form gives the details about the bank  through  which  payment is to  be
received.  Also  it mentioned  about the duration  of payment.
4)  SHIPPING BILL:
Exporter name & consignee name
Import export code number
RBI code number
Port of  loading  & country  of destination
Exchange rate
Description  of  goods
Net wt,  gross wt and  dimension  of  the cartoon
GRI number  & bank  a/c no
Total FOB  value
5)  PACKING LIST
6)  EXPORTERS declaration  is required  for exports of  knitting
garments,  for availing  higher  all industry  rates draw backs
7)  MANUFACTURES declaration  is required
b)  for NON-QUOTA countries :
no  need  of  AEPC  certification  is to  submit .following  certification  is to  be submit
1)  INVOICE
2)  PACKING LIST
3)  SALES CONTRACT
4)  EXCHANGE CONTROL DECLARATION FORM
5)  EXPORTERS DECLARATION
6)  MANUFACTURES DECLARATION
7)  SHIPPING BILL
DOCUMENTS FOR BUYER OR POST-SHIPMENT DOCUMENTS:
1)  CONSIGNING NUMBER
This gives details about enclosed  documents
2)  INVOICE
3)  EXPORT CERTIFICATION
Exporters name & consignee name
Place and  date of shipment
Country  of origin  & destination
Description  about goods
AEPC  stamp
FABRIC  DEFECTS
TYPES OF WARP DEFECTS
Missing  end
Double end
Color  end
Floats
Read  mark
TYPES OF WEFT DEFECTS
Double pick
Miss pick
Loops
Pattas
Slub
TYPES OF DYEING DEFECTS
CSV (center  of selvage variation)
Uneven  dyeing
Dyeing  sticks
Color  blade
Shade variation
TYPES OF VISIBLE DEFECTS
Stains
Holes
Out setting
Temple mark  (needle also)
Color  blade
TYPES OF PRINTING DEFECTS
Print out
Design  mistake
Color  dots
Out setting
Patches
PACKING
DEPARTMENT
FINISHING
DEPARTMENT
WASHING
DEPARTMENT
SEWING
DEPARTMENT
ACCESSORIES
STORE
SAMPLING DEPARTMENT
CUTTING DEPARTMENT
FABRIC DEPARTMENT
FABRITEX
EXPORTS
LAB
SECTION
FABRIC
CHEKING
FABRIC
DEPARTMENT
ROLLER
(AUTOMATIC)
BALLE
(MANUAL)
FABRIC
CHEKING
COLOUR MATCHING CABINET
GSM
COUNT & CONSTRUCTION
RUBBING TEST
COLOUR FASTNESS TEST
LAB
SECTION
WET METHOD
DRY METHOD
RUBBING TEST
UV
(ULTRA VILOET)
TL84
COOL WATER
FLOURSCENT
TUNGTEN  FLOURSCENT LIGHT
ARTIFICIAL
DELIGHT
COLOUR MATCHING CABINET
Quality  auditor
Quality  auditor
Quality  auditor
Quality  auditor
Quality  auditor
Quality  auditor
RELAYING
BUNDLING
NUMBERING
FUSING
CUTTING
MARKING
LAYING
FABRIC COLLECTION
CUTTING
DEPARTMENT
CAD
MARKING
MANUAL
MARKING
MARKING
AUTOMATIC CUTTING
(BAND KNIFE)
MANUAL CUTTING
(STRAIGHT KNIFE)
CUTTING
Mass production
Approval by  the buyer
Pre-production sample
Road sample sent to  buyer
Sending  corrected sample for approval
Making  necessary  correction as per buyer specification
Sending  sample to  buyer for approval
Inspection of  sample
Sample production
Grading  the pattern
Preparing  basic pattern (usually  medium  size)
Studying  sketch & me asurement pattern
Receiving  the purchase order
Production plans & job card issuing
Target  & no.  Of  line
Fabric obtained form  stores
Acc.  Obtained from  stores
Pattern & or iginal sample from  sample room
Sample stitched by  supervisor in each line
Marker for cutting
Sample approved
Cutting  plan
Lay  out  prepared
Feeding  plan line wise
Machine arranged as per lay  out
Production starts
Final inspection in process
Get pieces from  prod
Count  the pieces
Parts wise checking  (inside)
Top side checking
Thread sucking
1  st ironing
Final checking
Measurement
Final iron
Packing
COOLING
DRY
HALF HYDRO
55'C
60'C
60  MIN
RINSE
ELECSTROMIC  SIL (10  MIN)
+
SOFTNER  (30  MIN)
ENZYME
+
RUBBER  BALLS
RINSE
DESIZE (40MIN
PRINTING DEFECT
DYEING DEFECT
VISIBLE DEFECT
WEFT DEFECT
WARP DEFECT
TYPES OF FABRIC DEFECTS
Cut  pieces received from cutting  section for sorting
Cut  component  for quality  check
Issuing  to  production department
Sorting
Bundling
Over 6 Months of experience in Networking & implementation of Client/Server and
Internet/Intranet applications  using technologies  that include Visual Basic  6, COM,
Crystal Reports, Delphi 6, ASP, Oracle, SQL Server 2000, MS Access.
Currently  working with Better inc. as  a Research Analyst.
Functional Areas : Web-based Market Research.
Software/Languages/Databases
Web Skills ASP.NET, ASP 3.0, HTML 4.0, CSS, VBScript, JavaScript
Programming  languages C#, Visual Basic  6, Visual Studio.Net 2003
Application/Web  Servers IIS
Operating system Windows  98, ME, 2000, XP
Database SQL Server 2000, Oracle, MS Access
Reporting Tools Crystal Report 6
Configuration Tools Star Team, Visual SourceSafe 6.0
Analyzing Customer Requirements  through Interaction and Functional
Specification Document.
Coding
Writing Stored Procedures
Project TxManagement Suite
Client CMHC Systems
Duration 15 months
Software OS - Windows  2000 Server
Front End  Delphi 6, VB 6
Database - SQL Server 2000
Report - Rave Report 5
Milan Patel
Project Synopsis CMHC Systems  is  a behavioral health application software company. This  is  a
Client Server Application for clinics  providing clinical facility  of any  kind. The
software tracks  the entire treatment process  of a patient from intake to the
discharge. The software provides  facility  to enter the data relating to patient
information, treatment provided, Calendar to enter the daily  data for billing
information, various  management, and clinical reports  related to patients.
Analyzing Customer Requirements  through Interaction and Functional
Specification Document for TxPlan and Form Designer modules
Planning and Distribution of work  to the Team.
Monitoring and Tracking of all project related activities  (clarifications,
Coding, testing etc.)
Coding
Writing Stored Procedures
Providing Technical Support to the Team
Code review of junior programmers
Project Court Case Tracking System
Client Reserve Bank  of India (RBI)
Duration 3 months
Software OS  Windows  2000 Server
Web  Asp 3.0
Database  MS Access
Report  HTML Report
Web Server  IIS
Project Synopsis  This  is  a Web Based Intranet Application specially  developed for Reserve Bank
of India to track  the Court Cases  filed by  RBI or against RBI by  various  parties.
The software tracks  the entire case from case filing date to case closure. This
includes  information collected on various  dates, various  acts  referred,
advocates  handling cases, advocate's  fees, landmark  decisions  etc. The
software also provides  number of reports  giving information about various
Aspects  of the court cases.
Analyzing Customer Requirements  through Interaction and Functional
Specification Document
Designing ASP Pages
Coding
Unit Testing
End User Training
Project Scrubbix and Deduplix
Client Iflex  (HDFC, ICICI, Kotak  Mahindra)
Duration 15 Months
Software OS  Windows  2000 Server
Front End  VB 6
Database - SQL Server 2000, MS Access
Project Synopsis  Scrubbix:
Intelligent Customer Information Cleansing System to format, cleanse and
enhance the quality  of customer data. The software helps  the Company  in
parsing the data in different fields  and format the data in a standard way. This
formatted data is  then send to DEDUPLIX for identifying similar records.
Deduplix:
Automated process  of identifying similar or near similar records  of Individuals
and Households. The software helps  in finding out the duplicate records  and
gives  unique ID to every  customer. It also recognizes  company  address  and
households, thus  helps  in cutting huge stationary  costs  by  giving same Ids  to
all the duplicates  and reducing number of correspondence letters  and emails
Screen Design
Coding
Coding of Active X Controls, Active X DLL's
Dictionary  Building Programs
Integration Testing of the application
Performance Improvement
Milan Patel
EDP In charge,
Jeevandas  Laljee & sons,
Mylapore, Chennai.
Jul 2003 to Till date
Service Engineer,
SECO Controls  Pvt Ltd.,
Kottivakkam
Chennai.
July 2001  to May 2003
Areas of Operation
Involved  in Customization and  Implementation of an ERP Package named
Solomon, which has resulted in replacement of manual books of the  Company.
1. Preparation of Design Document for Customization of ERP package,
which has acted  as basis for creation of ERP package.
2.
Preparation of Designing  of Screens for such ERP Package  for input
of data.
3. Preparation of Designing  of Reports to suit the  Company's
Requirements.
4.
Coordinated  with the Software  Development persons in
implementing  the  ERP package.
Taken care  of Accounts Payable Module  in such ERP package, which has facilitated
in prompting  correct payment of dues to the  Creditors/Principals reconciliation.
Taken care  of Cash Manager Module in such ERP package, which has facilitated  in
monitoring the cash held  in various Banks.
Taking care  of Branch Accounts and  Debtors reconciliation & Ba nk reconciliation.
McFills Enterprises Pvt,  Ltd:-
Administrator  (I.T) 2005  June Present 3  Years
Handling  the LAN,  WAN,  ERP System and  100  computer in  networking  side and  other
all India CFA to  install our  software and  maintained  online analyzing.
all  type of hardware work
Since
September 05
BAJAJ Allianz
life Insurance company Ltd.
The  Career Path
Since  Sep  05 Sales Manager
Till date Senior Sales Manager
Notable  Accomplishments
Mentoring  and  motivating a dynamic  team  to explore all factors to escalate  sales and  develop
existent sales network of customers.
Recruitment of Team of Insurance agents/Advisors.
Support and  motivate  agents to Achieve  Business targets.
Development of insurance care  consultants.
Since july 04 to sep 05
Birla Sunlife Insurance Co. Ltd.
The  Career Path
Since July 04 Insurance  Officer
Sep  05 Unit Manager
Notable  Accomplishments
Played  a pivotal role  in initiating the business from  the different points of sales like Bank  of Punjab,
HDFC and  city Bank Etc.
Handling different point of sales ie Bank of Punjab, HDFC Bank, Citi Bank etc.
Developing relationship with different point of sales in order to generate business out of
them.
After sales services to the clients
July 2003to July 2004
Rai University Mathura  Road New Delhi
I  started working  right from the  final year of my MBA as college  allowed us to go for the  job in final
Year.
The  Career Path
July 2003 Business Development Executive
July 2004 Deputy Manager Franchise selling
Notable  Accomplishments
Development of New franchises in different states of North India.
Developing  and  improving  relationship with new and  existing  franchises.
Conducting  seminars and  different marketing  promotions in North India in order to improve
my work efficiency.
PROFESSIOANAL CREDENTIALS
M.B.A (Mktg.)  1st Division Gaziabad  2004
B.B.A 1st Division Gaziabad 2002
LARSEN & TOUBRO  LIMITED (TISCO CELL)    Calcutta, India December 2005   Till  Date
(Under Facility Services Pvt. Ltd.)
Personal Secretary - Dy. General  Manager Projects
Key interface  between corporate functional  areas:  Total  Office  Management
The present job responsibilities are as follows :
Customer Care;
Using LAPTOP to  keep information;
Diary Management;
Answering Telephone  Calls  STD / ISD;
Fax;
Scanning Document;
Emails;
Internet ;
Long Hand Dictations;
Arranging Hotel Bookings, Seminars, Railway Tickets, Air Tickets etc.;
Data Entry;
Liaison with  different  Officials ;
Working in  MS Office  Environment, LAN, Intranet  etc.;
Filing;
Independent  Correspondence  and  Communication on behalf  of  DGM;
Dispatch  important letters, sending greetings to the  probable  customers etc.;
PowerPoint  Presentations;
SEARCH SERVICES PVT. LTD. Calcutta  Management & Project Consultants Aug 1994   Nov. 2005
In-Charge Administration (1994-2005)
1)  Working  as a Software Design  Engineer  in  Microsoft,  Hyderabad  since October  2006
2)  Worked  as a Project Engineer  in  Wipro  Technologies,  Bangalore from July  2004-September  2006
3)  Worked  in  manual and  automated  testing  and  sustenance activities
Microsoft   Hyderabad
A)
Software design  engineer for  Live Meeting  Application
Description: Designing  code for  the live meeting  application,  especially  the file transfer  feature of  it,  testing
and  releasing  the new version.  This makes the trainings and  conferences conducted  more user-friendly  and
efficient.
Role: Development and  testing  Skills: C++,  Clearcase
Operating  System: Windows Team size: 6  members
Environment: Windows XP,  Windows 2003
Contribution: Analyzing  already  developed  code for fixing  existing  bugs,  patch  fixing,  developing  new
features required,  testing  using  automated  and  manual testing  methods.
Wipro  Technologies  - Bangalore
Overall Responsibilities  in  projects:
1.  Project Requirement Analysis.
Detailed  Study  of the Client's request on  the logged  issues & understand  the criticality  of  the issues.
2.  Project Plan
Preparing  the development strategy  and  plan  for proper  designing  and  tracking  of  problems
3.  Execution
Developing  code for fixing,  execution  of  developed  code and  testing.
4.  Reporting  and  Tracking  Defects
Reporting  the Defects in  the Test execution  cycle and  tracking  the bugs.
5.  Project Management Activities
Detailed  analyses of  the Client's request and  preparation  of status reports,  analyzing,  fixing  & testing.
Trained  the new joiners on  the various methodologies,  working  of  the applications in  the project.
B)
Testing  and  development engineer for NOKIA from May  '06    Sep  '06  (5  months)
B.1) Supporting  2G  and  3G networks  using  AXC  units  for routing  of  calls    CHORUS OS
Description: To  maintain  call flow and  congestion  control,  AXC  units are used  here with  Chorus operating
systems as a base.  This project involved  enhancement,  bug  fixes,  testing,  building  and  release activities.
Role: Development and  testing  Skills: C,  Clearcase
Operating  System: Chorus Team size: 3  members
Environment:  Chorus.
Contribution: Analyzed  code for defects for  logged  cases,  tracked  bugs,  fixed  them,  testing  and  release of
new version  of code.  Worked  closely  with  the onsite team locates at Germany  for  efficient fixing  of  bugs
and  release activities.
C)
As  a Testing  and  Sustenance Engineer for  HP Nonstop  Kernel
C.1) Testing  and  Sustenance of  the Server Network  on  HP Nonstop  Enterprise Servers
(24  months)
Description: This project involves all the communication  activities between  processors and  peripherals.
Also  it takes care of the barriers,  interrupt processing  etc.  It serves as the network  between  the entire
systems.  The hardware comprises transmit and  receive logic,  that follows the server  net protocols.  This
project involves the maintenance of  the code structure designed  for networking  and  fixing  the defects if
found  if  any.
Role: Tester,  Maintenance Engineer Skills: C,  Assembly  coding,  Garth,  Inspect
Operating  Systems: UNIX,  NSK and  Windows-XP Team Size: 10  members
Environment: NSK,  UNIX on  Non  Stop  Server  machines.
Contribution: Worked  with  the sustenance and  testing  activities conducted  for 2  years.  Tracked  and  fixed
bugs if  any,  and  testing.
C.2) Testing  and  development of data type for unsigned  long-long  integers
(8  months)
Description:  The ULL data type development was aimed  towards developing  a new data type that supports
64  bit arithmetic operations.  It involved  an  entire span  of  6  months for completion  of  the data type
enhancement.  This enhancement supports a wide range of  numbers and  the performance of  operations was
basically  designed  from few of the previously  existed  codes.  Several test suites were developed  to  test the
performance and  verified.
Role: Developer,  tester Skills: C,  Assembly  coding,  Garth,  Inspect
Operating  System: NON-STOP OS,  UNIX Team size: 2  members
Environment: NSK,  UNIX on  Non  Stop  Server  machines.
Contribution: Developed  and  tested  new code for  supporting  unsigned  long  long  integers.  Designed  a lot of
new test suites for  the same.
C.3)  Standard  millicode and  Boot millicode (8  months)
Description: Standard  millicode is a set of millicode data available for interrupt servicing  and  processing.
Several exceptions are handled  and  results are given  appropriately.  This is involved  for the functioning  of
the system properly.  Timers,  exception  frames,  exceptions,  interrupt,  instruction  failures are generally
handled  in  this project.  This project contains modules for  the basic system startup,  memory  checking,
barrier  checking  etc.  This is closely  related  to  the system hardware.
Role: Sustenance Skills: C,  Assembly  coding,  Garth,  Inspect
Operating  System: HP Nonstop  Kernel Team size: 3
Environment: NSK,  UNIX on  Non  Stop  Server  machines.
Contribution: Analyzed  code for defects for  logged  cases,  tracked  bugs,  fixed  them,  testing  and  release of
new version  of code.
Professional  Achievements:
Received the best project  award for working  in ULL integers data  type testing  and development
Topper of  the 5th,  6th,  7th,  8th Semesters in college
General proficiency  awards at the school level
Attended  training  on  UNIX,  NSK principles and  architecture
Completed  training  on  Software Engineering  Practices in  Wipro  Technologies.
Attended  Testing  and  Inspection  training  in  Wipro  Technologies.
Attended  Quality  training  in  Wipro  Technologies.
Personal  Strengths:
Can grasp concepts and work style quite easily
Adaptive in nature
Flexible to  necessities
SIVAKUMAR.TANGUDU
#345/2,7th main,
Krishna reddy  building,
Chowdeswari layout,
Marathali,
Bangalore-37
Email: siva_2197@yahoo.co.in Phone:
+919886  811226
We-Excel, is a leading  IT solution company involved  in development of Windows
Application and  Web  application using  .NET technologies. I  am working  as a Software
Developer and  my responsibilities are  requirement analysis, designing  and  coding.
Project Name Technovate Accounting Software
Client Name Technovate Incorporate Pvt.  Ltd,  Canada
Language VB.Net, Crystal Report.
Database SQL Server 2000
Role Team Leader (Total Team Members 8)
Responsibilities Screen Designing, Database Designing, Development and
Debugging.
Description The  application use for maintains dally accounting  &
account planning.
Project Name Insurance Software
Client Name Technovate Incorporate Pvt.  Ltd,  Canada
Language VB, Crystal Report etc.
Database SQL Server 2000
Role Team Member (Total Team Members 8)
Responsibilities Screen Designing, Database Designing, Development and
Debugging.
Description
The application manages  gets  information for every  section
(insurance) of the employee, employee easily  opening new policy,
maintains  & transaction process  for customer.
Project Name Site Maintain
Client Name Technovate Incorporate Pvt.  Ltd,  Canada
Language Vb.Net, Crystal Report etc.
Database SQL Server 2000
Role Team Member (Total Team Members 8)
Responsibilities Screen Designing, Database Designing, Development and
Debugging.
Description
To keep detail of all employees  (Both Web and Application
Programmers). Main purpose to know about links  i.e. how many
link  comes  of particular employee in day  and in week.
Project Name
Client Server Tool (local server)
Client Name Technovate Incorporate Pvt.  Ltd,  Canada
Language Vb.Net
Role Team Member (Total Team Members 8)
Responsibilities Screen Designing, Database Designing, Development and
Debugging.
Description
To Keep conference between employees  with in company  using ip
-address  (text chat, microphone). That application is  base on Tcp/
Ip socket.
Anglo-Eastern Ship Management (Hong  Kong) Dec 2000  till  present
Third  Engineer
www.angloeasterngroup.com
One of the largest  and  most  reputable ship  management  companies in  the world,  and  a  totally
independent  third  party ship  management concern.
As Engineer Officer (Senior),  full charge of keeping  watch  on  main  engines and  boilers.
Responsible for maintenance of Marine Diesel  Engines & associated  equipments on  board  a
Merchant  Vessel
Notable  Contributions
Actively participated in the crankshaft change of 1800KW  Generator.
Modified P.M.S (Preventive maintenance Schedule) of the E/R  with one new released
software by discarding the old one with the latest data.
Initiated cost saving measures across the floor in the Crosshead bearing, main  bearing and
crankcase explosion  of main propulsion plant by keeping an alert and good watch.
Nhava  Sheva  International Container Terminal  Ltd Dec 1999  to  Dec 2000
Mechanical Shift Engineer
age
2
of
3
www.nsict.co.in
Responsible for smooth  running  of port & ma intenance of port  equipments.
NOL-APL Group,  Singapore June 97  to  July  99
Fifth  Engineer
Merchant Navy
Marine Engineer
EDUCATION & CR EDENTIALS
B.Tech  Mechanical  Engineering,  1996
College of Engineering  & Technology  (O.U.A.T) Bhubaneswar
Matrix  Technology Pune
Public Work Division (PWD) Accounting System
Duration 1 Month
Team Size 3
Description
This is a  system  developed by Matrix Technology. This system atomizes all the accounting manual work of
PWD and maintains all the transactions occur.
Role
I was responsible for testing process of the application.  In which I have to  do UI testing, Functional Testing,
Integration Testing,  making Test Cases generating Test Data & Test Report of the particular module.  Also
tracking the defects
Sujata Computers Pvt. Ltd. Pune
Jr. Software Engineer from Mar-06 to Jul-06
Sujataindia.com
Duration 5 Months
Team Size 3
Description
This is a  shopping cart website developed for Sujata  Computers. Sujata Computers deals in computer
parts, so  this website is being developed for the sells and advertisement. This is a E-Marketing site and
they are the authorised deler of the products that are sold on this site.
Role
This site is being developed by third party vendor (Graphinet Media). I was responsile for testing the
weekly releases of that web site. Also  trcking the defects against each release. Apart from this I was
responsible for finding the enhancements needed in the site and then getting them  done.
Var IT Pune
Jr. Software Engineer from Jul-05 to Feb-06
(i) Var IT Message Service(VITMES)
Environment ASP, HTML, VB Script, JavaScript, SQL server 2000
Duration 3 Months
Team Size 2
Description
This is a web based system for passing the message. It is developed for Var IT Pune. The user can check
their pending messages with reception that are left by the person who  enquired about them. The
Receptionist post those messages via  this application to  the respective employee.
Role
I have been given the concept only so  after that I was responsible for designing, developing and testing
the application.
(ii) Knowledge Sharing System
Environment ASP, HTML, VB Script, JavaScript, SQL server 2000
Duration 4 Months
Team Size 7
Description
This is a  web based system. This provides facility to  organize the different documents prepared by the
employees for Knowledge Sharing. Users can upload the documents and put some keywords & description
for it, they can also  group the documents. Then a page displays all links for all the documents in a  well
arranged way according to  the group. Facility for searching the documents is also given.
Role
This was a inhouse development, I was responsible for testing of this application. Here I worked in close
coordination with development team.
Zain Information System Pune
Software Trainee Engineer from Jan-05 to Jun-05
Net Caf Monitoring System
Environment Core Java, Oracle 8i
Duration 6 Months
Team Size 3
Description
This is a Network based system it manages network connectivity.  This is basically made for the net cafes of
the city.This application supports browsing time management and it gives alert messages after every an
hour or thirty minutes and accordingly charges the customer.
Role
I was responsible for designing, developing , implementation of reusable codes and testing the application.
Organization Duration
Six  week  training in CMC(a TATA subsidiary) on Java
Developed a project on Payroll Management System
6 weeks  (June-July  '05)
Working as EAI  Developer.
Designing and developing EAI  solutions for  Healthcare Domain.
Devising solution  using Vitria Technology -  Businessware 4x, EDI, HIPAA, BME
Currently working on  re-engineering business scenarios and revamping system design.
Also  involved in the analysis of platform migration  issues from BW4.2.1 to BW  4.3
INTERRAIT (ISO  9001:2000 certified, SEI CMM Level 5) Jan 05   Aug  06
I worked as Member  of Technical  Staff; Level  4 for  Interra Info  Tech, Pvt. Ltd. InterraIT  is a technology
giant in Product engineering, Application Management Outsourcing, Enterprise integration, Business
Intelligence & Data warehousing solutions and Migration resolutions. InterraIT  believes in  delivering
tangible & measurable benefits through IT Solutions following global  delivery model.
Worked as a Solution  Developer.
Code remediation for  RA
Working on few modules of RA re-designing on  Galileo (Upcoming version  of Businessware)
Worked as a Solution  Developer.
Designing and developing EAI  solutions for  Healthcare Domain.
Devising solution  using Vitria Technology -  Businessware 4x, EDI, HIPAA, BME
Worked as a Team Lead.
Designing and developing solutions on  Open  Source technologies including   Apache Struts,
Tapestry, JSP/JSTL & maxDB.
Defining solution architecture to meet emerging business workflows.
Looked after the managerial  aspects of Tag team formulation and work assignment.
Also  took care off t he Quality processes being maintained in  the Project.
Worked as a Team Lead.
Played a key role in  Project Kick off.
Looked after the managerial  aspects of Team Management.
Worked on  the designing and development of the complete solution.
Solution was developed on  J2EE platform using Oracle 8.0 as its backend.
Was involved in the Tag team and also  lead several  application modules.
Another  project that I  was involved in  was the development of a solution  that could actually filter t he
urgent mails out of the clients email  box and send then  as SMS. Developed Solution  Classifier w orked
on  the principle of Text Classification using Support Vector  Machine. Project also  highlighted the
concept of Network load distribution.
Primarily involved in the development of an optimized solution  Classifier.
Mailing Classifier w as developed on Java.
Visual Basic6.0  Programming  and  MS Access7.0,CATS Dharmshala(H.P.)
Java,  CATS Dharmshala (H.P.)
Verchaska Infotech.
Projects handled at Verchaska Infotech, Mumbai :
1. Product Title :  WebCoMRP April 2005 - Dec 2005
Client : Envois, Texas, USA
Technologies  : Java, Servlets, EJB, JSP
Application server : Weblogic 8.1
Platform : Windows  2000
Short Description:
The application aims  to realize an integrated system that has  rapid
response to changing requirements  and capability  to integrate heterogeneous
manufacturing facilities. At first, the application accepts  the customer's  order and
performs  material requirement planning. Then MRP dispatches  daily  planned
order to job shop that carries  out real-time scheduling and production. At the
same time, MRP sends  order to supplier for purchasing raw materials. After
completing production task, the job shop returns  the relevant information about
finished parts. Once the customers  add or modify  orders, MRP system will update
data automatically  to respond to the changes  of customer requirements  rapidly.
The MRP subsystem uses  Enterprise Java Beans  (EJB) that are deployed in a
J2EE compliant application server, Weblogic to perform Business-to-Customer
transactions  and MRP logic.
This  project was  divided in 8 modules.
My Role:
I have been involved in understanding and anlysing the MRP process.Detailed
level design and implementation of MRP subsystem and monitoring inclusion in
each stage of development cycle.I was  involved in coding of Bill of Material
module and handling various  activities  in this  module.
Team size - 15
Campaignist Inc.
Projects handled at Campaignist, Mumbai :
2. Product Title:  Campaign  Calculator June 2003 - Dec.2004
Client : ICICI Bank, Mumbai.
Environment : Java, Servlets
Platform : Win NT 4.0
Short Description:
Campaign calculator is  a powerful Marketing Investment Management
solution that delivers  on the promise of real-time campaign control.
It provides  a single unified view of the results  of multi-stage multi-channel
integrated marketing campaigns. It tightly  integrates  forecasting,live tracking and
result archiving into a single collaborative environment,making it easy  for
marketing teams  to act on and profit from the knowledge being captured by
CRM,ERP and other enterprise systems. It includes  developing certain featured
modules  like Calculator,Vault,Cockpit. The project uses  java,Servlet as
development language. it extensively  uses  Applet-PHP Communication.
My Role:
I was  involved in requirement gathering and analysis,detail level design
GUI design,testing and database connectivity  part of calculator module.
Team size - 8
Larsen  & Toubro Infotech
Projects handled at L&T Infotech, Mumbai :
3. Product Title: Web based - CRM Jan 2003 - Apr 2003
Designation : Trainee Software Engineer
Languages : ASP, JavaScript, VBScript
Platform : Win NT 4.0, SQL Server 2000
Environment : IIS 5.0.
Short Description:
The project was  aimed at creating and maintainin a web application which could
carry  out the main tasks  of various  CRM activities  of the organization.Developing
an integrated approach to identify,develop,support & retain quality
customers.Organising company  resources  into satisfying the different needs  of
individual customers  one at a time.
It includes  developing certain modules  to meet the needs  well like Employee
information management,contact information management,Account information
management, Campaign information management,service request management
This  application is  designed for the in house use of L&T Infotech
My role :-
Understand & analyze the CRM process,requirement analysis,detail level
design,workflow design and development.
I have taken the complete ownership of the modules  like Employee
information Management,Activity  management,Account management .I have
done Coding, Impact analysis  on other subsystems, Testing, Integration,
Integration testing for these modules.
Team size - 5
4. Product Title:  Siebel Integration D Apr 2003 - May 2003
Designation : Software Engineer
Languages : Javabeans, COM
Platform : Win NT 4.0
Environment : PC Pentium.
Short Description:
The Project was  a Research & Development Project to explore the Integration
of Siebel with COM and Java technologies.
Team size - 4
Completed  4  weeks training  at \u0022Semiconductor Complex  Limited (SCL),
VEDANT (VLSI Design education and training)\u0022,  a government of India
enterprise,ministry  of I.T.,  Lucknow.  During  the training  period  I had  completed  the
project \u0022Designing  of 8  Bit Arithmetic and  Logic Unit (ALU)\u0022 using  VHDL.
COMPUTER PROFFICIENCY :
Operating  Environments : MS DOS ,  MS Windows
Microsoft  PC  SUITE : MS Office etc
Web  Page Designing  : HTML
Also  Familiar With :
VHDL
MAT LAB
PSPICE
Fresher
Education E
Duration  : 5  weeks
Company  :  Soft Polynomial India  Pvt  Limited.
Project  : Designing  of (USART 8251) Universal Synchronous and
Asynchronous Receiver Transmitter using  VHDL .
Discription  : *  VHDL is a hardware description  language.
*  USART (8251)  is a computer interfacing  device used  for  data
transmission
Seminar
Wavelet Transform
Final Year Project
Project  : Designing  of Programmable Interval Timer (8253) using
VHDL.
Discription  : *  VHDL is a hardware description  language.
*  Programmable Interval Timer  (8253) is a computer  interfacing
device used  for  providing  clock  and  delay.
Designing software
Computer language: Elementary  knowledge of  C  programming.
Hardware language: VHISC  Hardware Discription  Language (VHDL).
Subject  of Interest
Analog  and  Digital Integrated  Circuit.
Analog  Communication  & Wireless Communication.
Completed Sql & Pl-Sql Oracle(9i) Developer Training form Sql-Star International Mumbai.
Worked as a C faculty in Aptech Vijayawada  while I  am pursuing my
Present
India  Mart Intermesh Limited,  New  Delhi
IndiaMART.com is a B2B marketplace that  assists buyers and  sellers trade with  each  other at  a
reliable,  common  platform.  It  offers business enhancement  solutions that  can  be customized  to
serve the interests of the SME's segment  as well as large enterprises from  diverse industries.
Job responsibilities include:
Understanding  customer needs and  identifying  product's acceptability  in  its target segment.
Building  relationships with  key  customers and  ensuring  customer satisfaction.
Providing  customized  solution  to  clients in  terms of long  term  security
Managing  national  and  international  clients via E-mails and  telephonic calls.
Identifying  and  managing  new clients and  initiate new  business opportunity  for the
organization
Time spent in  my Internship  has been  instrumental in  developing  tremendous insights into  the
marketing  & sale s functions while helping  me in  assimilating  useful skills of  working  in  an
environment requiring  interactions with  people from diverse backgrounds
May'05    July'05 - Reliance Infocom (sales and marketing  division)
Project Guide: Mr.Sanjeev  Marwa,  Associate Marketing  Head
Project objective includes
Facilitated in creating  awareness for the newly  launch  product Prepaid Pco's in  the major
resorts markets Delhi and  NCR region  through  sales promotion  activities.
Assisted in devising  the churning  sales strategy  from competition  by  product and  sales
intervention.
Increased the customer base to  300  new  clients by  developing  a strong  rapport with
potential  customers,  finding  their needs and  matching  their needs with  specific products.
Studied and analyzed the competition- assisted  in  developing  retention  strategies and
improving  brand  recall  for the existing  customer base in  Delhi and  NCR region.
OTHER INDUSTRY PROJECTS
Steel  Authority  of India  -SAIL (Sales and Marketing  Division)
Project Title: Performed  comprehensive dealer analysis of Galvanized  Plain  sheets
(GP) and  Galvanized  Corrugated  sheets (GC) vis--vis its competitors in
Delhi.
Project Guide: Mr.Pankaj  Upadhyay,  Associate Marketing  Head
Objectives: To  understand  and  analyze the competitor's move and  recommend  new
growth  strategies to  bridge the existing  gaps.
Airtel,  New Delhi
To  identify  value added  services as a key  differentiator for the youth  segment.
Tracked  the customer expectations and  studied  the gap  analysis for the youth  segment.
Nerolac paints,  New Delhi
Analyzed  the Dealer Satisfaction  level and  trends in  retention  of Nerolac Colorscapes
Understanding  the competitor's move and  purchase trends for the end  consumers
Recommended  the growth  strategies which  leads to  the retention  of Colorscapes.
Bharat Petroleum Corporation Limited (BPCL),  New Delhi
Conceptualize and  executed  the sales promotion  activities for the target  segment conducted
by  the company  focusing  on  Dealer Programs at  national level.
Studied  & identified  the consumption  pattern  and  sold  petro  cards to  the potential customers.
Worked on Dotnet project in U D Software Solutions  Pvt Ltd, Noida as  a
Trainee from  July  2005-Dec  2005.
NTPC Engineering Office Complex, Noida (U.P)
Successfully  completed 6 Weeks  training in ;NETWORKING;.
SPECIAL ACHIEVEMENTS:
Junior  National Science Olympiad Contest (2 nd Div) .
Working as a Software  Engineer with I-Wings  Solutions Ltd,  Hyderabad,
March'04 To Present.
Skills  Summery
Having  2 Years of experience in ASP.NET, VB.NET, C#. Net, SQL Server
Worked  on Ado.net, Application Security, Xml, and Webservices, HTML.
Good communications, technical, co-ordination.
Involved in Forms Designing.
Responsible in writing code in C#.Net.
Integrating database using SqlServer2000.
Deployment of an Application.
Project#3
Title : OASIS
Client :  John Richards,NewZearsy,US
Environment :  Asp.Net,  C# ,ADO.Net, SqlServer2000.
Duration :  Dec-04 to Apr-05
Team Size :  8
Role :  Web  Developer
Description :  This Project belongs  to a  lawyer who stays  in
NewZearsy.
Based  on his  requiremet this  product is  developed.In
this  we are dealing with his client details  and the
Funding,Underwriting
Mailmerge,Brokers.In this  project I dealt with the
Underwriting module.  This module is  about all the new
cases  which are claimed  by his clients.In this  we find the
type of  case and description and what is  the date of
expectation to close and
Expected  amount of  fee,Advance amount,we calculate
the advance rate and the money transactions  are done
between the lawyer and his  client based on that.  By
using this  module he can compare with the previous
cases  or cases which are similar to the current one.  Also
I dealt with the funding module along with one of my
teammates.In this  we are dealing  with the Bank
transactions,Client payments  etc of  the lawyer. The
goal of  this  project is  to streamline and organise the
information and relative financial transactions  of  his
clients  and the cases.  There was  an option for an auto
reply pertaining to case queries  in the context of  the
information with the lawyer.
Involved in Forms Designing using HTML,server
controls.
Responsible in writing code in C#.Net .JavaScript.
Database integration with SqlServer2000.
Project#4
Title :
ASPECT INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Operating  System :  VB.Net, SQL Server, Crystal Reports .
Period : March'2004 to Oct'2004
Team Size : 4
The  project deals with various tasks involved  in maintenance of Assets. Classifying
assets on User requirements. A note of asset movement can be easily made  and  a
report can be  generated on that basis. Provision for noting  physical verification
details, addition and  removals of assets etc  is given.
Stored  Procedures are used  for database  activities and Crystal Reports are  used  for
the  generating  reports.
Roles and Responsibilities:
Involved in VB Screen design
Involved in creating  Database objects.
Designed  reports in Crystal reports.
Prepared  program specifications.
One month  training  at Ind-Swift  Chandigarh  in  Marketing  Department.
One year  experience in  COCO-COLA as a sales executive
Three month  experience in  Mahindra & Mahindra as a sales consultant
Monitoring & Maintain LAN connectivity
Provide network  connectivity  to workstations.
Install LAN and Server Connections.
Monitor and troubleshoot network  with tools  such as  ping.
Provide second level support for LAN, by  providing technical
assistance to End-users.
Responsible for all moves  adds  and changes  completed 40
desktop moves.
Upgraded all users  from windows  2000 to Windows  XP at
desktop,
Installed & configured, approximately  60 Windows  2k
professional PCs.
Coordinated all maintenance, including upgrades  of
workstations  and servers, provide 24 hour support and
monitoring of networks  for traffic  use and errors.
Experience in working with Cisco Products  like Cisco 2950
Switches  & 2503 Routers.
Additional Skill Set:
Have hands  on experience on configuring a wireless  setup on notebooks
which support wireless  network.
Networking Skills:
Having Experience in System Integration, Installing,
Maintaining and Troubleshooting Windows  2000 Server,
windows  2000 Professional
Exposure to Cisco Routers  and Switches.
Routing skills:
Configuring OSPF
Configuring EIGRP/RIP/IGRP.
Configuring Static/Dynamic/Default Routes
Subnet / VLSM / CIDR Calculation
Remote Access Skills:
Configuring PAP/CHAP Authentication
Configuring ISDN DDR for Point-2-Point and Multipoint
dialing
Network Security skills:
Configuring Access-lists  (Std./Ext.) for packet
filtering
I  am working  as a faculty  in  Jetking  for 4  months.  A Jetking  is a India's No.  1
Computer Hardware & Netwoking  Institute.
Presently  working  in  NIIT as a Faculty  for  C  ,  C++ since September  2006.
Final Year Internship (6  months)
Semiconductor Complex Limited
Mohali.
Multiple Device Switching
using  PC's  Parallel Port.
Study about Electronics
Energy Meter.
Study about Chip On  Board
Technology.
Third Year Project (6  weeks)
BSNL  Nabha.
Worked in Switching Room,
Main  Distribution Frame,
Transmission  Room  and
Operational and Maintenance
center of C-DOT Exchange .
Final  Year  Project
OFC Exchange and Home
Automation
Voice and Data
Communication.
Switching  of Electrical
Appliances
By use of OFC
Achivement:
Awarded by  Merit Certificate Under National  Scholarship Scheme in 10th Class.
Got 2nd Position in Rashtriya  Bhasha  Parisad Exam.
Subjects of Interest :
Wireless Communication.
Networking.
Optical Fiber Communication
Micro  Controller
Landmark:  Daffodil Software Pvt. Ltd. Worked as software Engineer
Trainee. Worked  on the  Vines as a Module  Developer using  Core Java, Advance
java (RMI, EJB)  for six months.
I  have teaching  experience  of 2 year at SRS  Computer & Mgt. Institute, Hisar
a study centre  of K.U.K.
I have currently  been working with Capital Power System Ltd. As  a Software
Developer in the R & D Department since 18th July  2005. Presently  I am working
in Visual Basic  6.0 On Windows  Platform.
Capital Power System  Ltd. (B-40, Sec-4) Noida is  an Electronics  company  which
deals  in Energy  Metering in India .
B.E.  (Information Technology)
Maharana  Pratap College of  Technology,  Gwalior,  (M.P)  with  a 65.25%.
[Approved  by  A.I.C.T.E.,  New Delhi & Affiliated  To  R.G.P.V.,  M.  P.  Bhopal.]
Coding of PMF  and  ASC interfaces.
Business To  Consumer E-commerce Transaction
Duration Sept'05 to May'06
Environment Jdbc, Servlets, Jsp, Javascript, Oracle  8i,Tomcat 5.0,Windows 2000
Team Size 3
Description
This is web  based  distributed  application.
It can be  used  for those  who want to make their products available
to a large number of customers all over the  world, also the client
should  be  able  to get all the  required  products or accessories under
a single roof without requiring  any physical movement.
It provides service  in 24X7 fashions (24 hours in a day and 7 days
in a week).
Role &
Coding, Enhancement and Unit testing.
Hunter University
Duration Jan'05 To Aug'05
Environment Jdbc, Servlets, Jsp, Javascript, Oracle  8i,Tomcat 5.0,Windows 2000
Team Size 3
Description
Students can apply online for the admission and  can pay online
through credit card.
Student can view the  application status at a given point of time.
Students can feel optional information tab  (survey tab)  that is
useful to the  Hunter University.
Administrator can create  an account to submit paper application in
to database as well he  can edit already submitted  application. He
can search the application by PIN, last name, and social security no
(SSN)  and email id  between two dates, month or year and  also he
can see  application submitted  by administrator or student or both.
He  can update  the  status of application depends on he  receive
required  documents of particular program. He  can keep  the  record
of all the candidates, who get admission as well as who do not get
admission with comments of admission committee.
He  can generate  report of particular application.
Role &
Coding and  Unit testing.
Advance Course in  ASP.NET from New Horizon Corporate Training  Center (NH) the Media
Partner Microsoft.
Presently  Working  with  Createch Software Pvt.  Ltd.,  New Delhi since Jan  2006  as Employee
cum Trainee.  The Technologies used  for  development are ASP/.net,  Visual Basic 6.0/.net,  SQL
Server, Java Script,  and  Crystal Report under Windows environment.
Understanding the Business  requirement and the external
systems
Responsible for Design and Coding of the requirements  for ASP
and database (SQL Sever 2000) part.
To write scripts  to fix any bug logged by  user from  database side.
TECHNOLOGIES  USED  IN THIS PROJECT:
T-SQL,Visual Basic, SQL Server 2000,ASP, HTML, VBScript  and JScript
EXPERIENCE IN THE TECHNOLOGIES  USED:
T-SQL ,Visual Basic, SQL Server 2000,ASP, HTML, VBScript  and Jscript
PROJECT PROFILE:
Project Title Sales Rating  and  Underwriting
Duration Feb- 2005 to Jan 2006
Location Chennai
Hardware
Intel Pentium
Operating Systems
Windows 2000 Professional
Programming Languages T-SQL,VB
Analysis  on the requirements.
Understanding the Business  requirement and the external
systems
Responsible for Design of the requirements  for Visual Basic  and
database part.
Responsible for Coding of the requirements  for Visual Basic  and
database part.
I singly  handled the database part  from writing simply  queries  to
SP.
Giving Knowledge Transfer for new joiners  of team.
TECHNOLOGIES  USED  IN THIS PROJECT:
SQL Server, Visual Basic, Crystal Reports, Mainframes, COBOL, UML
and UNIX shell scripting
EXPERIENCE IN THE TECHNOLOGIES  USED:
SQL Server, Visual Basic, Crystal Reports  and UML, UNIX shell scripting
DURATION OF THE PROJECT:  (Years  Or Months)
2 years
PROJECT PROFILE:
Project Title Aetna PMO
Duration July - 2004 to Jan- 2005
Location Chennai
Hardware
Intel Pentium
Operating Systems
Windows 2000 Professional
Programming Languages
T-SQL,
ASP, VbScript
Analysis  on the requirements.
Understanding the Business  requirement and the external
systems
Responsible for Design for database side.
Responsible for Coding of the requirements  for ASP and database
side.
TECHNOLOGIES  USED  IN THIS PROJECT:
T-SQL, SQL Server, ASP, HTML, VBScript, MS Access
EXPERIENCE IN THE TECHNOLOGIES  USED:
T-SQL, SQL Server, ASP, HTML, VBScript, MS Access
DURATION OF THE PROJECT:  (Years  Or Months)
6 Months
PG diploma in  Advertising,  PR & Event management from Apeejay
Institute of Mass  Communication,  Dwarka,  Delhi  .
Pursuing  M.B.A.  from Symbiosis  centre for Distance Learning.
2  months  internship  as  a copywriter in  EURO RSCG (Haus
Khas).Worked  for Red  FM,  Shagun  sugar & Lacoste.
Working  as  a copywriter in  Crab  and  Crow  Advertising  since Feb'06.
Presently  working  as Branch  Administrator and  Accounts Executive since last 1  year
in  M/s.
Micro  village Communications Pvt.,  Ltd.,  Chennai
A Bangalore based  Distribution  Company  for  Major IT & Networking  Brands.  India
Division  is Operational in  6  major states with  more than  10  branches.
Micro  Village
Communications Pvt Ltd., a 50  Crore turn  over company  with  widely  spread  branches across  India.
Micro  Village is an  authorized  SAARC Distributor and  System Integrator for US Robotics,  UTStarCom,
3Com,  Telular,  Quintum,  Trango  Systems,  and  Zultys in  India.  Micro  Village is the Leader in  Networking,
Data Communications and  Tele Communications.  Micro  Village
was incorporated  in  the year  1996
with  the aim of  distributing  IT products.
Job  Profile: Branch  Administrator  & Executive -  Accounts
Maintaining  books of  accounts.
Computerized  accounting  function  using  Profit package.
Reconciliation  of  debtors and  to  collect the outstanding  from customers. Preparation  of  monthly  bank  reconciliation  statement and  Inter-branch
Reconciliation  Statement.
Finalization  of Accounts for  the Branch.
Assisting  on  Filing  of Annual Sales Tax  Return,  including  monthly  Remittance &
submitting  of  VAT returns
Assisting  on  Filing  of Half Yearly  Service Return
Sending  daily  cash  and  bank  balance to  HQ and  Invoice Raising.  Proven  good  work
experience in  handling  financial statements in  Microsoft  Excel and  word.
Expertise includes complete in  and  outs of  TALLY 6.3
Having  good  exposure in  updating  and  reporting  of  TDS on Salaries,
Maintaining  daily  inflows and  outflows (Cash & Bank transactions) .
Maintaining  Post Dated  Cheques   instructing  to  collect & deposit the cheques
on  due dates and  taking  necessary  actions incase of  cheque bouncing.
Budget  Forecasting-  considering  all incomes and  expenses.
Collecting  Credit and  Debit advices from bank.
From  Aug  2005  to  till date : Micro  Village Communications Pvt.  Ltd.
Title :  Branch Administrator & Accounts Executive
ROLES AND RESPONSIBLITIES
General Accounts:
Maintaining  of  Books of  accounts related  to  Journal Entries,  Cash  and  Bank  Book,
Purchase and  Sales Register,  Stock  Register,  Day  Book
Receivables:
Age wise analysis of  the Receivable statement on  the basis of  the invoice raised.
P&L and Balance Sheet:
Statement of  Income and  Expenditure,  Trial Balance,  Trading  and  Profit & Loss Account
and  Balance Sheet is prepared  on  quarterly  basis.
Bank Reconciliation statements
Reconciliation  of  Bank  Accounts with  that of  Accounts maintained  in  the company.
Taxation:
Filing  Sales tax  returns like CST and  VAT & TNGST.
Trained in ASP.NET from IT Brain Shapers, New Delhi.
Working as  Software Developer in JLETS Software Systems, New Delhi since OCT. 2004-Till
date.
1. Working  as Accounts Asst.  M/S Ankit Forgings Bangalore  from Jan 2005 to Nov 2006
Working  as Trainee  Scientist (Bioinformatician)  in  Jubilant  Biosys Pvt Ltd,
Mysore from 24th October  2005    till date
Company :  Mahdi  Bagh Computers Pvt Ltd.   (www.mbcin.com)
Company Profile  :  VSAT  Authorized Service Provider  of BEL, TATA, Bharti, HUGHES and HCL.
Designation  : VSAT Field Engineer
Job Profile : Tracking the Geo Stationary Orbit Satellite (INSAT GE 1-A, INSAT  3B, INSAT 3C),
Installation  & Commissioning of VSAT  1.2m & 1.8m antenna, Configuration of Different
Wireless MODEMs and Networking of PCs.
SNAPSHOT
An  Engineer  with specialization  in  Electronics & Communication, posted about the latest developments in
the field.
Significant knowledge about Optical  & Satellite Communication, DSP (Digital  Signal  Processing) and VLSI
(Very Large Scale Integration).
Successfully completed projects on  Embedded Sun  Tracking System, Wireless PC-to-PC Communication,
Fighting Robotic  Car, Code Converter, Variable Voltage Regulator  & etc.
Visited several  industries like the Indian  Air  Force -Jamnagar, Reliance Group of Industries Jamnagar, All
India Radio -Rajkot, BAN Pharmaceuticals Pvt Ltd -Rajkot and Harmony Recording Studio   Rajkot; gained an
insight to the working environ.
A team player  with  exemplary communication  and analytical  skills.
Course
Master  of  Computer  Application  (MCA)
University :  Rajiv  Gandhi Proudyogiki Vishwavidyalaya,  Bhopal (M.P.)
TECHNICAL EXPOSURE
Languages :  C,  C++,  SQL.
Concepts : Operating  System,  Data Structure,  Database Management
System,  Networking.
This is a very  repudiated  & Rajiv  Gandhi Foundation  NGO.  This NGO is working  for
promoting  to  Disable People.
RESPOSBILITIES & TA SKS:
Prepare vouchers,  write & checks enter  data in  Quicken  Book  Pro  Accounting
Software Program,  produce and  submit accounting  reports to  client's HQ.
Scrutinized  and  consolidate Financial reports of  fund  disbursements and  monitor
fund  utilization,
Review of  Advance of  Staff & Consultants.
Verified  expenses,  Voucher  and  Bills of  Staff,  Contractors & Suppliers and
issuance of  payments.
Final Accounts of social programmed  & workshop.
Assisted  in  the financial accounting  and  legal matters,  e.g.  Income Tax,  etc.  and
specific issues pertaining  to  the education  and  rehabilitation  programmes and
Income Tax  (TDS Salaries,  Professionals & Contractors)  and  filling  of Returns.
Issue of TDS Certificates to  vendors,  consultants,  from whom TDS has been
deducted  during  financial year.
MAHESH KUMAR & CO MPANY,  NEW DELHI
B.Tech. in Electronics & Communication
Engg.
2003-2006, Ist Division
S.S.I.E.T, Dera-Bassi affiliated to
Punjab Technical University, Jallandhar
(Punjab)
3 Year Diploma  in Electronics & Communication
Engg.
2000-2003, Ist Division
L.L.R.M.Polytechnic,Ajitwal (Moga), Punjab
Presently  BUREAU VERITAS CONSUMER PRODUCT SERVICES LTD.
Bureau  Veritas is a USA based  company  with  head  office in  USA and  has operation  in
more than  90  countries in  the world.  It is basically  into  testing  of  all consumer  products.
The company  also  carries out factory  audit and  inspection  of  samples of exporters to
check  whether  they  meet the Buyer's specifications.
Designation : Asstt.  Manager  [Operation].
Reporting  to  : CHIEF LAB  MANAGER
Coordinating  with  the client and  lab.
New Business Development
Checking  the sample requirement and  select the test as per buyers requirement.
Update the buyer  with  the testing  status.
Monitoring  the testing.
Reporting  in  agreed  time to  the buyer.
August `2001    Feb  ` 2003  : INTERTEK LABTEST :  NEW DELHI.
Designation  : Customer Coordinator
Reporting  to  : Lab  Manager
Coordinating  with  the client and  lab.
New Business Development
Checking  the sample requirement and  select the test as per buyers requirement.
Update the buyer  with  the testing  status.
Monitoring  the testing.
Reporting  in  agreed  time to  the buyer.
June'1999-Sept `2000  : TAJ  HOTELS
Designation  : Sales Executive / Cashier
Reporting  to  : Taj Khazana Outlet Manager
Achieve Sales Target
Daily  Report preparation
Daily  Cash  Transaction.
EXPOSURE  TO SOFTWARE
COURSE DONE : HN8,  SWIFT INDIA,  SWIFT FOUNDATION FROM NIIT.
PACKAGE : WORDSTAR,  TALLY 4.5,  CORE,  FOX PRO.
MS OFFICE : WORD,  EXCEL,  MS ACCESS,  POWEPOINT.
COMPLETED CA FOUNDATION AND DONE 3  YEAR  ARTICLESHIP WITH
KIRON JOSHI AND ASSOCIATES,  CHARTERED ACCOUNT,  SHILLONG.
COMPLETED DIPLOMA IN MASS COMMUNICATION WITH IAAN SCHOOL
OF MASS COMMUNICATION,  DELHI.
COMPLETED DIPLOMA IN MASTER OF BUSINESS ADMINISTRATION.
Feb 2006  Till Date GWN Communications Pvt Ltd, Hyderabad.
Jan 2004  Jan 2006 Sunsilica Solutions Pvt Ltd, Hyderabad.
Working  with  Combine creative Designer  (GZB)
a)
Planning  & Layouts
b)  All type of Interior  work
c)  Development Activities
d)  Co-Ordination  with  other Department
PAST EXPERINCE:
d)..1
Worked with Aashiyan Consultant (one year)  (GZB)
d)..2  Worked with Nirman architect  &   Interiors (eight  months)
(GZB)
Enhanced  the application  according  to  the new  requirements.
Involved  in  creating  Knowledge Transfer documents and  System Appreciation  Document  for the
future support prospects.
Resolved  the critical  issues on  the client machine within  a time limit.
Ran  the batch  jobs /  Shell  scripts on  client  machines.
Monitored  all the database,  informatica,  UNIX and  application  servers.
Project: SimSE (Simulation of software engineering) Duration: Jan'2006-March'2006
Team Size: 5
Environment: Java-swing,  Servlet,  JSP,  WebLogic8.1
Platform: WindowsXp
Description:
SimSE
is an  intranet  based  application,  developed  to  learn  different models of software engineering.
SimSE is game software designed  to  simulate the management of a moderately  sized  software
development project.  You  as the project manager  must allocate your team of  seven  software
engineers to  develop  a web-based  grocery  ordering  system.  You  manage your  team of software
engineers by  giving  them tasks.  So  long  as the software engineer  isn't on  a break,  or  isn't sick,
he or  she will faithfully  execute the tasks.  Each  software engineer,  however,  has varying
proficiency  at each  task.  Furthermore,  when  too  many  team members are allocated  to  a task,  the
performance of  the team at the task  drops.
This software contains two  modules ModelBuilder and  CodeGenerator.
ModelBuilder  defines the model of  software engineering  which  you  want to  simulate.
CodeGenerator  generates the code for the game.
Involved  in  developing  Graphical  User Interface.
Involved  in  developing  JSP for User Interface.
Involved  in  developing  Model-Builder.
Involved  in  developing  .mdls for software engineering  Models.
Deployed  web  archive on  WebLogic8.1  server.
Project: OBSE (Open Business Service Engine) Duration:  May'2005-Nov'2005
Team Size: 6
Environment: JSP,  Servlets,  XML,  EJB,  Oracle and  IBM-Websphere
Platform: Windows2000
Description:
The manual  submission  of complaints and  customer servicing  has been  the most  tedious part  of the
business.  The time delay  for a response and  accuracy  of complaint solving  plays as vital  role for customer
servicing.  This system (OBSE) is being  carried  out  to  design  the software,  which  will assist  in  the
maintenance of these Customer Service Centers.
This OBSE includes the implementation  of all  the activities that are required  in  the Customer Service
Center,  which  will  constitute maintenance of all employees working  for that  Service Center,  finding  out
the solutions for the complaints claimed  by  customers and  preparing  solutions in  such  a format  that the
customers can  understand  and  be able to  solve their problem.
Involved  in  developing  JSP for User Interface.
Involved  in  developing  Servlets.
Involved  in  developing  EJB for data retrieval.
Used  JDBC to  access database.
Deployed  web  archive on  WebLogic8.1.
Involved  in  developing  JSP for User Interface.
Involved  in  developing  Servlets for data retrieval.
Used  JDBC to  access database.
Deployed  web  archive on  WebLogic8.1.
Duration: Nov'2004-Feb'2005
Project: Hilldale Resorts
Team Size: 4
Environment: JSP,  Servlets,  XML,  JDBC,  Oracle and  WebLogic8.1
Platform : WindowsXp
Description:
Hilldale Resorts is an  intranet application  developed  to  provide resort  services to  the customers of
Hilldale,  which  is a three star resort.  MVC Architecture is extensively  used  in  designing  the system
This Resort contains Multi-deluxe rooms,  Function  halls,  Bar and  Restaurant's.  The customer can
book  room/hall in  advance by  paying  amount  through  cash/credit  card.  This application  is a 3-tier
client-server model working  on  intranet,  handles all the departments related  to  Hilldale.  This
application  includes modules like Crystal Court-Rooms,  Crystal  Court-Restaurant,  Crystal Hall
activities,  Kitchen  item  processing,  Bar activities and  Finance.
Involved  in  developing  Court-Rooms and  Finance modules.
Involved  in  developing  JSP for Graphical User Interface.
Involved  in  developing  Servlets for data retrieve.
Used  JDBC to  access database.
Presently  Working  with  P&G as Sales Executives from April  2004.
Promoting  Companies' Products as per Company  Strategies with
innovative ideas.
Expending  Territorial  Sales and  Distribution  as large as possible.
Extensive  training  ability.
Build  strong  customer relationships to  ensure  repeat  and  referral  business.
Detail-oriented,  multi-tasker with  strong  organizational skills.
1-Organization
JAKSON & CO MPANY LlD.
C-266-267  Phase-2  Mayapuri Ind  Area
New Delhi-64
JAKSON & CO MPANY is one of the Jakson Group,  is one of the
leading  Manufacturer  of  Silent  D.G.Set
,  7.5  KVA to  1200  KVA.
Duration
:  JUNE 2006  Till  dated
Designation
:  Programmer and C.N.C.  Shop-In-charge
Development  & fabrication Design of  Canopy.
Responsible for  monitoring  of  production  quality  of  C.N.C.
Punching,  Bending  and  take Corrective action  and  coordination
with  Quality  Control and  Production  Engineers.
Responsible to  manage the production  in  shop  floor  CNC,
Fabrication,  Assembly,  Base Frame,  Paint shop  etc.and  to  provide
timely  feedback  and  production  reports to  the Management.
To  monitor  the daily  production  reports of  all departments.
.Responsible for  getting  design  change for  Betterment.
To  manage the production  related  job  on  priorities.
Upgrading  and  continuous improvement in  process,  planning  and
resources planning.
Identify  and  develop  the vendors to  source the material for  the
Manufacturing  of Silent DG sets.
To  prepare the Bill of  Material and  Costing  Sheets of all the
Pursuing
PGDBM (2nd year )  from  I M  S  Ghaziabad (  Last trimester)
Marketing
as  a major  and IT as  a minor
B-COM From  Hindu Degree College (Moradabad )
u
I did summer  internship training in a Hindustan pencils ltd.
My  project title was  \u0022Sales Promotion of Colorama \u0022My  job profile was  to visit the
wholesaler  and retailers  to collect the information regarding the Competitors  stock  and
Avg. Sales.
u
Project undertaken during PGDBM
New ways  of selection method.
Consumer  behavior  in Banking Sector.
Launching of catch soft drink.
u ACADEMIC QUALIFICATION
12th from  (U.P Board)  Moradabad Inter  College with 2nd div. (2000-2001)
10th from  (U.P Board)  Shay  am Lal Inter College with 2nd div. (1997-1998)
u COMPUTER SKILLS
Minor  Programming in Languages  (C, C++, HTML)
Windows  XP, 98, servers
M  S Office
1 year Computer  Diploma Course from  Falcon Infosys.
u STRENGTHS
Self Confidence
Attitude of  learning
Traveling
uAWARD RECEIVED
2nd prize in-group dance in annual IMS  function
2nd prize in laughter challenge in annual IMS function
uACHIEVEMENT
I was  captain Moradabad (U.P) cricket team.
I was  Mr. fresher  in IMS (  2005-2007) batch
u PERSONAL  INFORMATION
D.O.B.
21st July  1982
Father's Name:  Mr. Gopal  Mishra ( Businessman)
Mother's Name:
Mrs. Neera Mishra
Pursuing  PGDBM
from
(Last  trimester) I M  S Ghaziabad (CGPA 7)
Marketing as Major and IT as Minor
Bachelor of Information Science)  from  Dr Bim Rao Ambadkar
University, Agra (UP) in (2002-2005)  with
Percentage of marks 68.5%.
u
PROJECT WORK
Summer internship training in an ERP based company  namely  CLC
Technologies pvt. Ltd. It provides  software to apparel industries.
Objective of my  project was:-
\u0022To  Understand the APPAREL ERP MARKET into  domestic sector
with the presence of COMPETITORS,  PRICING policy  and
POSITIONING,  IRRESPECTIVE  of  PARIDHAN APPAREL ERP\u0022
u
ADDITIONAL COURSE
Functional Training in ERP, I successfully  completed the training
course to be recognized as  the PARIDHAN certified ERP Professional
holding the expertise In DOCUMENTATION Module.
u
Working as  Research Intern in Design Analysis  Group Mechanical,CMERI,  Durgapur
Presently  handling project  titled Estimate of Load on Ball  Mill  Machine and its  Structural
analysis  and Optimization using Finite element  analysis
Worked as  Graduate Trainee for a period of One year in Earth Storable Engines  Groups,
Liquid Propulsion Systems Center-ISRO, Valiamala, Thiruvanthapuram
Nature of Job:
Heat  transfer analysis  on injector disc  of Engine Gas  Generator.
Moment of Inertia of vikas  engine Turbo Pump assembly  was  computed.
Programs  were written using in MATLAB to generate Plots  for Vikas  engine Test data
Structural  analysis  of  Engine components  were carried out using Ansys  Software
Modeling of  Engine components  using Unigraphics  NX software
Assisted in Preparation of Presentation slides  and Technical documents  in Ms-Word ,
Ms-Excel, and Ms-Power point.
Worked as  ASST.  DESIGN  ENGINEER  in Tekcons  Design consultancy for a period of 6
months
Nature of job
Using Reverse engineering Technique prepared drawings  of Hydraulic  motors  for
D.M.D.E  organization using, Unigraphics  NX,Autocad R14
Design of shafts, selection of bearing and various  design calculations  were carried out.
Generated Assembly  drawings  of various  components  using AutoCAD R14
Generated drawings  of Adaptors, Gas  bottles, Machine vices  using Unigraphics  NX.
Calculation of Moment of Inertia, Density  for various  components.
Follow up the Production process  in the shop floor.
Preparing Bill of materials,
I am an associate with Axis  S/W services  pvt ltd. for the last 12 months  with a total of 1 yrs  of work
experience. I have worked on Web and windows  applications. I am proficient in ASP.NET, C# and MS
SQL 2000.
Presently  working  as an  \u0022Embedded  Board  Testing Engineer\u0022 at ISRO
Satellite Center in  Bangalore.  (Deputed  from New  Tech Solution).
From April 06  to  till date.
Worked  as a \u0022Testing  &  Debugging  Engineer\u0022 in  UNITED TELECOMS
LIMITED (UTL),  Bangalore.  FROM Jul 05 to  April  06.
PROJECTS: 64Kbps & 2Mbps MODEMS,  TDMA-PMP and  SMPS.
6.1 years of experience in the field of software testing, currently working as a  Test Engineer  with
WMS Gaming solutions India  pvt. Ltd., Pune.
Graduate in Electronics and communications engineering from ICFAI University in year of 2007.
Solid expertise in manual testing for projects during all phases, familiar with the life cycle and different
phases, requirements in a project and performing end to end Testing responsibility.
Working extensively on Functional, System, Integration and Regression Testing assignments.
Having 4.5 years of working experience with Healthcare Industry/US Healthcare industry.
Well versed with Healthcare Industry/EHR Standards such as HIPAA for data  security, HL7 for
interoperability and ICD10.
Having good knowledge of PBM  and Healthcare insurance Industry esp. claim processing and plan
creations in AS400 environment.
Currently working and having good knowledge of Casino Gaming Industry, spec. testing Slot machines/
EGM/VLT for Class II specific environment.
Skilled in good team work,  independent functioning, taking up new  challenges & profitable for the
company, planning and execution of ideas.
An excellent communicator with exceptional team building and interpersonal skills.
WORK  EXPERIENCE (73 Months)
Designation Organization Duration Work Field
Test Engineer WMS Gaming solutions 20th Jun'12   Till date IT-Software
Test Specialist IBM  India Pvt. Ltd. 3rd Dec'09   8th Jun'12 IT-Software
Software Engineer Satyam Computer
Services Pvt.  Ltd
29 Oct'07   2nd Dec'09 IT-Software
1) WMS Gaming solution  India  Pvt. Ltd.
Duration:  20th Jun'12   Till date
As a Team member,  Major responsibilities during this tenure are:
Understanding requirement, writing Test cases, review  and execution of Test cases.
To  test all major functionalities of game
Starting from loading it to  the EGM, running and
testing it using Slot Accounting System (SAS), OPTOS and GSL Monitor tool.
Verify accounting and game play features.
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
Project Summary
WMS Gaming is a manufacturer of slot machines,  video lottery terminals and software to  help
casinos manage their gaming operations. The company is based in Waukegan, Illinois.
Project's requirement is to test all the functionalities of Class II based themes.
1) IBM India  Pvt. Ltd.
Duration:  3rd Dec'09   8th Jun'12
RxClaim project had several modules, releases in every 2 months. Worked on more than 8 releases as a
Module Lead/Team  member, Major responsibilities during this tenure were:
Understanding requirement, estimation, task allocation,  status reporting.
Creating Test case scenarios, creating setups, writing Test cases, review and execution of
Test cases.
Responsible for the accurate processing and completion of medical claims,  includes
creating/processing claims and plan setups.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System Integration, smoke,
Regression Testing  and review  of deliverables
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
Project Summary
Healthcare industry products (drugs) are subsidized by insurance companies and services
companies like CVS CAREMARK, etc  through different schemes (plans) which provide benefits.
Health card is provided by the Health Insurance Company to  each member. A member goes to a
prescriber, to get prescription for drugs. Member then goes to a pharmacy and purchases the
drugs and then claims for the drugs purchased.  Pharmacy submits a claim to Caremark for the
member purchased drugs. The claim process begins when a  member goes to  a  pharmacy and
purchases the prescribed drugs. The pharmacy submits a  claim using the member's information
and BIN/Process or Control/Group Number (BPG) information. The claim is routed to  the switching
company or \u0022Switch\u0022 via  the BPG. The switch then determines which PROCESSOR should process
the claim. RxCLAIM  application uses the BPG  to  identify the claim  and begins eligibility validations
and the benefit plan for coverage. Once all the information has been verified, RxCLAIM
application will send a  message back to the pharmacy that communicates a paid or rejected
claim.
For its globalization, application was kept compliant with global health standards like HIPPA (for
data  security).
Project 2:  WGS Transition and Transformation    Process Renovation
Platform:  Windows XP
Technology:  Mainframes
Role:  Team Member
Front End:  Mainframes
Client:  Wellpoint, USA.
Duration:  3rd Mar'12   8th Jun'12
WGS- Process Renovation project had several modules, releases in every month. Worked on 2 releases as
a  Team member, Major responsibilities during this tenure were:
Understanding requirement, Creating Test case scenarios,  creating setups, writing Test
cases, review and execution of Test cases.
Responsible for the accurate processing and completion of medical claims,  includes
creating/processing claims and setups.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System Integration,
Regression Testing  and review  of deliverables
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
2) Satyam Computer Services Pvt. Ltd
Duration:  29 Oct'07   2nd Dec'09
Project 1:  Electronic Health  Record
Platform:  Windows XP
Language:  C#
Technology:  .NET
Role:  Tester
Front End:  ASP.NET
Back End:  SQL Server 2005
Client:  Emergency Management and Research  Institute, Hyderabad
Creating Test case scenarios, creating setups, writing Test cases, review and execution of
Test cases.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System, Integration, smoke
and Regression Testing and review  of deliverables
The project was verified by the quality analyst along with the modules.
Meeting with Clients
Project Summary
EHR is web portal that stores the each and every health information of a patient from cradle to
grave. Users of this portal are patient,  doctor, Insurance provider, pharmacies, and laboratories.
Through this portal, a  fresh patient signs up for his user id and password. With his user id and
password he logs in to the portal and enters his personal details, medical history, family history,
medication (current/past), therapies, etc. The same process follows for doctor for signing up.
When doctor logs in, he searches for a patient. After the completion of search the all the details
entered by patient are available to the doctor (if allowed by patient).  Doctor can create an
Episode for this patient, under that episode;  he has got a  provision of creating Visits and events.
This portal also gives facility of order management where in doctor can place order for patient
and laboratories after doing the order, enters result through the same portal.
For its globalization, application was kept compliant with global health standards like HL7
(for interoperability), HIPAA (for data  security).
Project 2:  DB Independent Framework
Platform:  Windows XP
Language:  C#
Technology:  .NET
Role:  Tester
Front End:  ASP.NET
Back End:  SQL Server 2005
Clients:  Emergency Management and Research Institute, Hyderabad.
Health Management and Research  Institute, Hyderabad.
Write and execute SQL queries.
Creating Test case scenarios, creating setups, writing Test cases, review and execution of
Test cases.
End to end Testing responsibility which includes Functional, System, Integration, smoke
and Regression Testing and review  of deliverables
Meeting with Clients
Project Summary
DB Independent Framework provides an abstraction to interact with databases without specifying
specific   Data  Source in application code. Data  Provider specific   methods are decoupled from
application code.
Responsibility  of  production  and  online Quality
Process Optimization  and  Trouble Shooting
Rejection  Analysis and  Corrective Action
Material handling  and  Man  power  utilization
Tryouts of new Moulds and  Materials
Mould  change Monitoring
To  improve production  efficiency  and  machine utilization
Lump  reduction  and  Rejection  analysis
Interaction  with  Maintenance and  Tooling  department to  solve the problems
Exposure
Machines : SPH   450,  POLO   350,  ENGEL   40,  SPH   300,
SM   450,  EPM   140,  HP   80,  ST   80.
Material Handled : PC/ABS/HIPS/PA/PP/LLDPE/LLDP/HDPE
2. Work  Experience:
Worked  as a Production  Engineer  in  MOTHERSON AUTOMOTIVE TECHNOLOGY &
ENGINEERING.,  (MATE) Chennai.
MATE is the leading  manufacturing  of automotive parts for  Hyundai,  Ford,  General Motors,
Toyota and  Borg    Warner  Colling  System.
My  Exposure
Machines Handled
Hands on  experience with  latest Injection  Molding  Machines ranging  from 60T to  775T
Battenfeld  Machines  : 60T,  160T & 200T
L & T Machines : 150T,  200T
Cincinnati Milacron  : 400T,  660T & 775T
FCS Machines : 60T,  150T & 260T
Windsor  Machines : 300T,  350T (POLOSMART)  & 450T
Material Handled
PA,  PC,  PBT,  PVC,  POM,  ABS,  (PC  + PBT)  Alloy,  (ABS + PA) Alloy,  PP,  HDPE,  LDPE.
Handling  Gas Assist Injection  Molding  Machine and  Knowledge of  Air  ejection  Mould
Knowledge of KAIZAN,  5S,  KANBAN etc.,
Blow plast industries is manufacturing  jerry  cans,  carboys,  drums for  chemical filling  and  food
items for airproof  containers manufacturing  of  Printer  accessories for  WIPRO,  Body  case for
BPL and  razor  for  WILKINSON,  AUG 1999  to  April 2004.
From April 9th  2005  to  April 30th  2006  have worked  in  M/s Sycamore (I) Consultancy  Services
as an  Office Assistant cum Secretary.
*  Fixing  appointment of  Candidates and  scheduling  interview with  the client.
*  Searching  suitable resumes from the search  Engines we have.
*  To  segregate the CV according  to  the skill required  by  the clients.
*  Maintaining  candidate and  employee records and  their  status in  the master report.
*  Keeping  records minutes of  the meeting.
*  Preparing  Salary  and  Vouchers.
*  Searching  new websites through  Internet.
From May  2nd  2006  to  Feb  28,  2007  have worked  in  R.B.  Mehta & Co.  as an  Assistant Officer
cum Secretary.
*  Preparing  Sales reports
*  Preparing  Sales Bill,  Purchase Bills
*  Keeping  records of  Generation  of weekly,  quarterly  and  yearly  reports etc.
*  Maintaining  Factory  Stock  records.
*  Preparing  D.O.  files.
*  Preparing  Daily  reports and  updating  in  filing
*  Filing,  Documentation,  Dispatching.
*  Travel Booking
From March  12th  2007  to  till date working  in  Donear Industries Ltd.,  as a Secretary  of Vice
President.
*  Fixing  appointment,  meeting
*  Keeping  records minutes of  the meeting
*  Domestic & International Travel booking.
*  Booking  of  Hotels,  Conference Rooms,  Executives Rooms,  Auditoriums etc.  for  Client
meeting.
*  Booking  Car  for a Client,  Visitors.
*  Booking  Car  for a trip  wherever my  Seniors are going.
*  Booking  Guest House wherever  my  seniors required  near to  Station  / Airport.
*  Maintaining  Daily  Dairy  records of  the Senior Person.
*  Organizing  Small Parties for  the Senior  Person
*  Sending  mails,  Letter  Drafting  .
*  Getting  Approval for  Travel Advance Request from Finance Dept.
*  Getting  Approval for  Travel Reimbursement,  Conveyance,  Leave.
*  Applying  for Leave on  behalf of  my  senior.
*  Scheduling  Business Meeting,  Client Meeting.
*  Attending  Phone Calls of  Incoming  & Outgoing.
*  Handling  other Official functions and  other  day  to  day  routine work.
*  Applying  Medical,  Domiciliary  Claim on  behalf  of my  Seniors.
Notice Period  : 15  Days
Lean  Principals
Presentation  Skills
E Mail Writing  Skills
Advance XL
Effective Time Management
Period Organization  / Location Designation/Responsibility Jan  2006  Onwards GENPACT,  Jaipur Team Leader  (Process Developer),  Global Mobility  Services.
Support the Payroll and  other  Payments for Expatriates,  both  for US and  Global locations.
Dec 2002-  Dec 2005 Bharati Infotel Limited,  Faridabad Sales Officer,  DSL Connections.
Responsibility  of  Customer  retention  and  Growth  for  Faridabad  Territory,  Delhi Circle.
Oct 2000    Dec 2002 Asian  lak  Health  Foods Limited  (Bisleri) Area Field  Manager,  Distribution  and  Consignee Agents
Manage Distribution  network,  Screen  Competitor  activities in  the region,  Device Schemes to
1. Qualified  Electrical engineer  with  over 5  years of experience in  Textile,  Petrochemical
Industry  in  India/Abroad.  Superb  management and  labor relations.  Great ability  to  plan  and
effectively  apply  cost-savings and  service developing  process.  Expert in  system planning,
precautionary  maintenance,  budget managing  and  designing  regular  procedures and  training
plans.Persuing  MBA from Sikkim Manipal University  through  correspondence.
Company: Pt Gajah  Tunggal Tbk,  SBR Division,  Indonesia.  (Nov'07  to  Mar  '09)
Role/ Designation: Technical Advisor  for Electrical & Instrument.
F  0
B  7
Support to  Plant Manager  in  the technical and  overall management system.
F  0
B  7
Report to  General Manager/Director
F  0
B  7
Organized  plan  that cut maintenance overtime,  improved  system consistency  during  main
system interruptions and  decreased  outage times for all 4  substations.
F  0
B  7
Advising  and  Coordinating  for  Ordering  Machine Parts,  Testing,  Calibrating  and
Installing  of  all types of Transmitter,  Control valve,  Pressure gauge,  Temperature gauge and
Flow meter.  PLC's,  A.C Drives,  and  Installing  Electrical Panels.
F  0
B  7
Handled  peak  calculating  equipment installation  and  set up,  which  resulted  in  yearly
savings of  almost $200,000.Planned  precautionary  maintenance programs.  Investigated
programs for  the future power  provisions.
Company: Pt Sai Apparel Industries,  Indonesia.  (April '05  -  Nov  '07)
Role/ Designation: Electrical Engineer/Management
F  0
B  7
Primary  duties include attending  meetings,  working  on  strategic planning,  and  tracking
projects.  operation  & testing  of sub-station  equipments.
F  0
B  7
Responsibilities include studying  technical manuals,  articles,  and  other  publications as
well as designing,  testing,  and  assembling  various devices.
F  0
B  7
Planned  and  executed  precautionary  maintenance plan  for  most important power
substations and  delivery  facilities.
F  0
B  7
Taking  care of Installation  and  assembling  various kinds of Machinery.  Discussing,
Negotiating,  Convincing,  managing  with  the Vendors,  Contractors,  Customers.
Company: Screenotex  Engineers Pvt.  Ltd,  India (From April -  2004- April '05)
Role/ Designation: Maintenance / Operation  Incharge
F  0
B  7
Making  and  install electrical panel.  Checking  and  maintenance Contactors,  Relays,
motors,  Electrical,  Mechanical as well as Electronic accessories and  fittings.  problem solving  &
trouble shooting.
F  0
B  7
Convene the meetings of  Engineers to  upgrade the system.
F  0
B  7
Prepared  the reports on  works done.Sought opinions of the customers to  upgradethe
quality.
PRESENT JOB:-
Employer:-N.T.P.C,Kaniha,(Odisha)
Post:-  Site-in-Charge,(Elect-Maint),Contractual basis
Date of  Joining:-1st.jan.2009  to  till date.
E.S.P Maintenance,
Operation  & Maintenance of LT(415  Volt)PMCC  Panel
Maintenance & Trouble Shooting  of  ABB  make microprocessor  based  thyrister  D.C
drive kin  main  drive D.C moter.
Predictive & preventive Maintenance of  6.6KV HT Panel & its associative switchger &
protection  system.
AC drive ABB  make (ACS 550).
EARLIER  JOB:-
Employer:-SHIV SHAKTI SPONGE IRON LIMITED,(JAMSHEDPUR)
Post:-  Asst.Engineer,(Elect-Maint)
Date of  Joining:-1st.May.2005  to  02.07.2006.
Fresher
CAREER  PROFILE: MULTIMEDIA SOFTWARES:
Illustration
: Adobe Illustrator,
CorelDraw.
Image Editing  Adobe Photoshop
Image Ready
Text Editing
: Adobe InDesign,
Adobe Pagemaker
Video  Editing :
Premier  Pro
Combustion
Adobe After Effect
Sound  Editing
: Sound  Forge  3D Software : Autodesk  3DS Max  9
Autodesk  Maya 9
PERSONAL DETAILS Date of  Birth : 08-  july  -1987 Marital Status : Single Father's Name : Omvir Singh  Fauzdar Nationality : Indian Hobbies : Watching  Movies
Listening  to  music,
Photography
Surfing. Communication  Address
:: 195/5  Ramesh  Market,
Street   1  Garhi,
East of  Kailash
New Delhi - 110065
Areas of  Interest : Graphic designing,
Layout Designing.
Visual Effects
Motion  Graphics
Fresher
CAREER  PROFILE: MULTIMEDIA SOFTWARES:
Illustration
: Adobe Illustrator,
CorelDraw.
Image Editing  Adobe Photoshop
Image Ready
Text Editing
: Adobe InDesign,
Adobe Pagemaker
Video  Editing :
Premier  Pro
Combustion
Adobe After Effect
Sound  Editing
: Sound  Forge  3D Software : Autodesk  3DS Max  9
Autodesk  Maya 9
PERSONAL DETAILS Date of  Birth : 08-  july  -1987 Marital Status : Single Father's Name : Omvir Singh  Fauzdar Nationality : Indian Hobbies : Watching  Movies
Listening  to  music,
Photography
Surfing.
Communication  Address : 195/5  Ramesh  Market,  Street   1
Garhi,  East of Kailash
New Delhi - 110065
Areas of  Interest : Graphic designing,
Visual Effects
Motion  Graphics
1.  Project name-  MFP-CPE-  Here worked  on  Clearcase tool on  UNIX environment and  on
C++.
Activities done here:
Worked  on  enhancing  the features of  printers by  porting(including  changes on  code of
parent printers etc).  This includes creating  a config  spec,  checking  out files ,porting  necessary
changes here ,building  the code and  checking  if  the necessary  requirement is been  implemented.
Worked  on  gdb  debugger  to  fix  a lot of  defect codes.  This allows to  trace the code in
stepwise ,insert breakpoints at the error  location  etc.
1. Project name-  RMS team
Activities done here:
Worked  on  a very  interesting  tool called  WJA (Web  Jet Admin)  which  is basically  used  to
remotely  access all the printers in  the network.
It is used  to  defect fix  any  errors by  making  changes in  the .dao  file associated  with  each
printer.  A lot of  defects like this have been  sorted  out.
Also  worked  on  a portal called  RMS portal where various testing  of  many  portlets had  to
be done like Event Flight Recorder,  Photocenter  Settings etc.
Also  lot of  technical seminars have been  given  by  me on  various tools like Clearcase ,
WJA etc.
Done coding  on  html ,  javascript etc
Also  worked  on  assembly  languages microcontrollers .
Ingersoll-Rand  India Limited  a multi product,  multinational company  is a part of  Ingersoll-Rand
Worldwide,  USA.  IR India manufactures large variety  of  compressors ranging  from small air
cooled  reciprocating  air  systems to  large centrifugal installations as well as comprehensive
service for  all makes of air  compressors.
Currently  working  in  their  service center as Apprentice Engineer  from 16th  July,2009
Decide daily  workload  with  my  team member.
s Supervising  assembly  & package area.
s Take daily  shortage & issue short material.
s Handling  whole department in  absence of My  team member.
Technical Training:-
s Undergone for Technical Training  at \u0022INGERSOLL RAND (INDIA) LTD.\u0022 at GIDC
Naroda\u0022 Ahmedabad  - for  the duration  of 10  days.
Industrial visit:-
s Industrial visit at 'Alang' Bhavnagar,  Gujarat.
s Industrial visit at 'G.E.B' at Gandhinagar,Gujarat.
Relevant Course Work:-
s Pro-engineering
s Autocad
I  have 2.3  years experience in  cad  projects.
Worked  as Software Developer  at Globelink  pvt ltd,  Chandigarh  for  6  months.
Worked  as a Project Trainee at Punjab  Communication  Limited,  Mohali for  six  months.
Worked  as an  assistant professor(MBA-IT)  in  CMTR  ,CAT affiliated  MBA college.(3.5
years)
Online Author  (www.oboulo.com)
0-1  Years Experience working  in  a Chartered  Accountant Firm.
3 Working  with  Kilmist InfoTech  Pvt Ltd,  Bangalore from March  2010    Till Date as a
SQA Test Engineer.
Technical Exposure
Operating  System Windows 2000/XP/Vista/7  and  UNIX Languages C,  C++,  Dot Net,  HTML. RDBMS SQL server 2008. Test Automation  Tools QTP 8.2  and  Load  Runner
Project #1 SpryBill (CASLiberty). Client Name Highland  Lake Software (HLS),  USA. Technologies NET,  SQL Server  2008,  IIS,  Test Track  Pro  7.5. Tools QTP 8.2  and  Load  Runner. Team Size 10 Role Test Engineer Duration March  2010    Till Date
Abstract
SpryBill supports the processing  and  billing  of  different sort of  usages like calls,  Messages,  Data
Transfer,  Connect Time,  Storage and  Internet,  etc.  Telecom industries can  use this software to
process the telephone usage,  rate those usages and  generate bill statements for  the
customers.CAS requires that user  should  provide enough  information  about the customer to
render a correct bill,  in  the format desired.  So  we should  be able to  setup  the customer  in  the
system.  User  should  get the data for  the customers and  feed  into  the system.  We should  be able to
group  the customers into  departments.  Once we setup  the customer  then  each  customer  can  have
one or  multiple phone numbers.  We talk  about phone usage,  eventually  usages will be associated
with  the phone numbers.  If  customers are having  multiple phone numbers then  it can  be grouped
into  departments.
Understanding  the client requirements.
Involved  in  preparation  & Execution  of test cases.
Involved  in  User  interface testing.
Involved  in  Smoke,  Functional,  Retesting  and  Regression  testing.
Involved  in  Defect Tracking.  Interacted  with  the client on  a daily  basis.
Project #2 SpryBill Customer Care Services. Client Name Highland  Lake Software (HLS) Technologies ASP.net,  SQL Server 2008,IIS,  IE 6&8, Mozi lla Fire Fox,  TTP 7.5 Tools Load  Runner Team Size 4Role Test Engineer Duration Jun  2010  Aug  2010  (Middle of  above project)
Abstract
SpryBill customer  care site provides the customer  to  pay  customer's bill online through
PayPal.  It has two  roles that are Admin  and  Customer
a. Admin: -  Admin  has all control on  entire application.  He creates customer  records and
provides user  id  and  password  credentials to  customers.  If  customer  sends bank  check  to  admin,
after  clearance of check  he can  make invoice status as paid.
b. Customer: -  Customer  can  see the invoice details and  it allows the customer to  pay  bill
through  PayPal.
Understanding  the Client Requirements with  the help  of the document.
Developing  and  Execution  of test cases as per  requirements.
Performing  Smoke Testing,  Regression  testing.
Involved  in  the Browser  Compatibility  testing.
Involved  in  PayPal sandbox  testing.
Reporting  Bugs.
Retesting  the cases where defect has been  resolved  by  the developers.
BBA Completed  From MDU Rothak(Harayana).
MBA Persuining  From Sikhim Manipal University.
BBA Completed  From CCS University  (Meerut).
High  voltage underground  cable laying
3).Larsen  & Toubro  Ltd(ECC Division) :-  As Site Engineer   Electrical
Worked  in  Delhi Metro  Rail Project at Central Secretriat Station  for  International
Metro  Civil Contractor(IMCC)  Delhi.
1  Overall responsibility  for  site work,  installation.
2  Installation  of  temporary  construction  power  and  lighting  network  in  consultation  with
the operation  group.
3. Installation  of  Earth  Mats for  Main  Earth  Grid  & Settelite Earthmate &
also  MET's(Through  50x6  Copper Flat).
4  Installation  of  Cable Trays inside Substations,  Station  Control Room(SCR).
5  Providing  primary  and  secondary  supports to  the routes of  cable tray.
6  Laying  of  underground  cables for  HV & LV power  distribution.
7  Installation  Transformers,  Switchgears,  Control Panels and  related  accessories in  the ASS.
8  Installation  & Testing  of Motors of  different capacity  and  rating.
9  Installation  and  making  operational different lighting  fixtures
F  0
B  7
On  building,
F  0
B  7
Platform Level,  Concourse Level & also  Undercraft Level.
F  0
B  7
On  street lighting  poles,
F  0
B  7
Inside Substation,  Control Room and  Office lighting  with  false ceiling.
10  Conduits & Cable Trays Installation  for CCTV,  P.A.  system.
11  Installation  of  HVAC units and  heavy  duty  blower  for  effective cooling  and  air flow.
12  Installation  of  Split AC & FCU.
13  Conducting  final inspection  after  installation  of  Electrical Equipments and  systems.
As a Supervisor--  Process Control Technology  PVT LTD
1. Installation  of  Cable Trays & Conduits.
2. HV & LV Cable laying  & also  glanding  + termination  for it.
3. Installation  & supporting  of  Power & Distribution  Transformer  & DG sets.
4. Installation,  Testing  & Commissioning  of  Area Light with  Photo  Cell.
5. Installation  of  HT/LT Switchgear  of different ratings.
6. Adapting  High  Standard  of  safety  & field  quality  assurance.
Computer Literacy:
Packages: MS Office 2007(MS Word,  MS Exel,  MS Power Point)
and  Internet etc.
Design  Tools: Auto  CAD 2007
Import-Export Policy  Procedural,  Duty  Drawback  & JDGFT Related  Matters,
Co-ordination  with  Customs Clearing  & Freight Forwarding  Agents
Bank  & Insurance Policy  Coverage related  Activities
General Office Administration
Worked  for M/s.  Hystandard  Hydroservices Pvt.,  Ltd.,  from Dec 1992  to  Feb  1997,
handling  Commercial and  General Administrative related  activities.
Worked  for M/s.  Kochi Logistics Services Pvt.,  Ltd.,  from Mar  1997  to  March  2000  as
Documentation  Executive handling  Import-Export Policy-Procedure related  matters for
M/s.  Motorola India Limited,  Bangalore
M/s.  Motorola India Electronics Limited,  Bangalore
M/s.  Philips India Limited
M/s Sanyo  LSI
M/s Sun  Micro  Systems
M/s.  Wipro  GE Medical Systems
Since April 2000  working  on  Periodic Contractual / Consultant /Assignment Basis
Worked  for Convergent Communications (India)  Pvt.,  Ltd.  (Dealers in  Networking
Equipments),  Bangalore,  from January  2001  to  September 2011  as support to  Materials,
Accounts and  Stores Department handling  Commercial Related  Activities,
n Preparation  Purchase Order
n Reconciliation  & Generating  of  Goods Inward  Note
n Stocking  Checking
n
General Commercial Support to  the requirement of  Seniors
n Re-Export of Repair and  Return  of  Goods under  general and  duty  drawback  scheme.
n Independently  Handling  Duty  Drawback  under Section  75
n Periodic Insurance Declaration  & Timely  Renewal of Policies
n Support to  Accounts Department
Handled  Import-Export Policy-Procedural Related  Activities for  100% Export Oriented  Units
under  STPI-Customs Private Bonded  Warehouse
Worked  for Consultant on  Sub-Contractual basis   Bond  Period  Extension  for Sasken,
Bangalore
1002,  II Stage I  Block  11th  Main  Basveswara Nagar  Bangalore   560  079
Telephone No.  2322  0473  e-Mail ID   sunil3md@gmail.com ; sunil3md@yahoo.co.in Mobile
#  9880785391
Page 1/3
Being  a Support to  Purchase and  Accounts Department for  ANZ Information  Technology  Pvt
Ltd,  Bangalore for the period  from May  2003  to  Dec 2003  have handled  independently  Import
Export Related  Assignments   (Details as per  Annexure Attached)
Represented  through  Supreme Freight Forwarders.,  Bangalore from Dec 2003  to  April 2003  as
support to  Accounts Department of  Hughes Software,  Bangalore,  have handled  independently
Import Export Assignments -  (Details as per Annexure Attached)
Represented  through  Professional Access,  Bangalore from Apr  2004  to  Sept 2004  as support to
Accounts Department of  Swiss Re Shared  Services Private Limited,  Bangalore have handled
independently  Import Export Assignments - (Details as per  Annexure Attached)
Represented  through  Bax  Global Pvt.,  Ltd.,  Bangalore from Sept 2004  to  Jan  2005  as support to
Accounts Department of  GE Capital,  Bangalore,  have handled  independently  Import Export
Assignments - (Details as per  Annexure Attached)
Represented  through  Bax  Global Pvt.,  Ltd.,  Bangalore from Mar 2005  to  May  2005  as support to
Logistics Department of  Honeywell Technologies,  Bangalore,  have handled
n Capital Goods Enhancement Project
n Export Invoicing
Worked  for Swiss Re Shared  Services India Pvt Ltd.,  Bangalore,  from July  2006  to  June 2007  as
support to  Accounts and  Purchase Department handling  independently  Import Export Related
Assignments   (Details as per  Annexure Attached)
Presently  involved  in  Part Time Online Jobs
Internet Marketing
Business & Commercial Adposting
HR Consultancy
Data Entry  Operations
Programmes Earn  per Click
Formfilling  Jobs
- Diploma in  Architecture
Institute: Girls Polytechnic Patiala (SST Nagar,  Rajpura Road)
Year:  2006-2009
- Diploma in  Archicad
Institute: Cadd  Center
Year  June 2010-  Dec 2010
Advance Diploma in  Graphics,  Multimedia & Web  Designing
Institute: ICAII
Year:  2010-Still.
7  months working  with  Ar.  Harpreet Kaur  Dhillon  Ludhiana as a Architect Assistant
7  months working  with  Akzonobel Dulux  Paint Studio  as a Color  Consultant
7.5  months working  with  Bull Doors India Limited  as a regional designer.
PRESENTLY WORKING
Part Time work  as a Instructor of  Auto  cad  and  3ds max  in  ICAII B.R.S.  Nagar  Ludhiana
SALARY STRUCTURE
At Present I  am earning  13000/-  + Expenses
Part Time Instructor earning  6000/-
Expected  20000/-
At present I  am working  in  Excel Crop  Care Limited,  Bhavnagar  as an  trainee
engineer  since 01/02/2011  to  till date
s Knowledge of Distributed  Control System,  Programmable Logic Controller.
s Working  on  Electrical,  instrumentation  field
6  month  Experience in  Power  Tech  Marine,  Bhavnagaras a Maintenance Department -
Electrical engineer
Computer knowledge:Proficient with
Microsoft Word,  Microsoft Excel,  Power point
C,  LAB  view,  Windows 98,  MS Office
Internet
Special achievements:
First Rank  Archived  In  Safety  Examination  4TH March  2011
Event: Safety  day  at Excel Crop  Care Limited,  Bhavnagar
Seminar On  Public Governance & Corporate Social Responsibility
2
Event: `Productivity  week  celebration' of  KSPC (Kutch  Saurashtra Productivity
Council)
Certificate \u0022A\u0022 Examination  Of 3  Gujarat NevalNCC  Unit
Event: under  the authority  of  Ministry  of  Defence,  Government of  India
As a Supervisor  in  Super Tech  Diamond  Tools Pvt.  Ltd.Plot no.  15,16,17  Sector
10,Behind  R.K.Hospital Kankroli ,Rajsamand  (Rajasthan)  India from 14.08.2005  to  02.08.2007.
As an  Accountant in  Super  Tool Industries Plot no.  7,Sector IIDC  SIDCUL BHEL,
Haridwar  (Uttarakhand)  India from 03.08.2007  to  30.08.2008.
As a Manager  in  Super  Tool Industries,  Plot no.  7,Sector  IIDC  SIDCUL BHEL,
Haridwar  (Uttarakhand)  India from 30.08.2008  to  continuous.
As a Supervisor- To  lead  the team,  manage the production,  Handling  the stone cutting
tools .and  report to  the owner.
As an  Accountant-watching  all type accounting  in  Tally  7.2  like (purchase ,sell,  PF,  ESI
payment ,receiving  ,,data mailing  to  the head  office ,all type form issue to  parties,  and  receiving
etc.),banking  ,pay  rolling  ,scrutinizes,  and  manage the accounts department ,and  report to  the
owner.
As a Manager-  Watching  the accounts department ,to  lead  the supervisors,  recruiting  the
manpower,  Income tax  department,  sale tax  department,  Excise department,  Auditing  works,
and  other government department works ,make summery  report of  production,  Income and
expense,  and  all management of company  works ,etc.
Strengths and  weakness
Work  in  challangious situation.
Listen  every  person's suggestion.
Strong  and  positive thinking.
Ability  to  lead  a team.
Faith  & confidence in  myself.
n Working  as Power System Engineer  in  Power Research  and  Development Consultants
Pvt.  Ltd,  Bangalore from May  2008  to  till date.
Role and  Responsibilities:
n Delivering  the project with  plan  and  efficiency
n Team Leadership
n
Management of  Complex  multidisciplinary  project
n Specialist expertise in  Power System Studies
n Technical expertise to  handle the complete project
n Regulatory  Compliance
n Assessment of Losses in  Power  System
Projects Executed:
33  kV & 11  kV Feeder  wise Analysis and  Energy  Audit for CESU(Central Electricity
Supply  Utility),  Orissa
Main  Project Features: Distribution  network  survey  & Consumer Indexing.
3
Asset Data Collection  of  existing  distribution  condition.
3 GPS survey  of  33  kV & 11  kV network  & DTCs.
3 Walk  over  survey  of  LT Network.
3 Creation  of  digitized  maps of 33  kV system -  Sub-Division  wise,  11  kV feeder  wise,  LT
System   DTC  wise & its Network  Analysis (i.e.  Load  flow analysis using  Mipower  Software.).
3 Consumer Indexing.
3 Study  performed  for  base case Condition  and  finding  out the system condition.
3
Providing  the suggestion  improvement proposal (i.e.  load  sharing  or express feeder  as for
the load  demand).
3 Collection  of  DT meter reading  and  load  survey  data using  MRI.
3 Taking  Dump  of  meter  data using  Smart2000  Software.
3 Calculation  of  technical and  commercial loss Distribution  network  using  Mipdap
Software.
Under  Ground  Cabling  System for CESU(Central Electricity  Supply  Utility),  Orissa
3 GPS survey  of  distribution  network.
3 Creation  of  digitized  maps using  Mipower Software.
3 Dismantling  of existing  over  head  line.
3
Load  flow analysis of  both  existing  and  proposed  system.
3 Planning  and  designing  of RMUs and  UG cable.
3 Cost Estimation.
Transmission  planning  and  Prioritization  study  for OPTCL (Orissa Power Transmission
Corporation  limited),  Orissa.
Main  Project Features: System study  of  transmission  network  by  the end  of  11th  & 12th  period.
3 Operational studies for  existing  transmission  condition.
3 Study  performed  up  to  2012-13  year  load  demand  with  considering  the different
generations,  to  finding  out the system condition  and  suggested  the new sub-stations of 400kV,
220kV,  132kV voltage levels.
3
Contingency  done for all the conditions to  find  line loading  and  transformer  loading  and
suggested  the transmission  line and  the transformer  capacity  of  the above mentioned  voltages.
3 Short Circuit Study  performed  to  obtain  the fault level
3 Transient study  performed  for obtain  the system behavior  when  there is an  outage of
major  tie lines and  the Generators.
Evacuation  Studies carried
3 Bhubaneswar Power Plant Ltd.  evacuation  study  for 2  x  67.5  MW Captive Thermal
Power  Station  at Anantapur,  Cuttack,  Orissa.
3 Indian  Metals & Ferro  Alloys Limited  evacuation  study  for  2  x  60  MW Captive Thermal
Power  Station  at Choudwar,  Cuttack,  Orissa.
Year  wise Geographical and  District wise single line diagrams of Orissa network  up  to
year  2016-17.
Power  system study  for  proposed  400  kV ring  system of  OPTCL (Orissa Power
Transmission  Corporation  limited),  Orissa.
3 Performed  system studies including  Load  flow,  Short circuit and  Transient stability.
3 Study  performed  for  base case,  low hydro  & high  hydro  condition  for  finding  out the
system condition.
3 Detailed  single line diagram as well as geographical map  for  Orissa grid  from 400  kV
network.
3 Contingency  done for all the conditions to  find  line loading  and  transformer  loading  and
suggested  the transmission  line and  the transformer  capacity  of  the above mentioned  voltages.
3 Short Circuit Study  performed  to  obtain  the fault level
3 Transient study  performed  for obtain  the system behavior  when  there is a outage of  major
tie lines and  the Generators.
Technical forte:
n Power  system engineering.
n MS-office for  relevant applications at work.
n
Hands on  experience on  software tool   Mi-power  for  power  system studies.
n Hands on  experience on  software tool   Auto  CAD.
Language Skill:
n C
n C++
6  Months as a trainee in  NIIT
7  months as a employee in  software testing  department.
Total experience:-1year  1  month
June 2010- Present date: Working  as the HR Executive for  Maple Careers,  Visakhapatnam with
the following  responsibilities as the post holder.
Sourcing  and  screening  profiles according  to  the client requirement.
Sending  resumes to  the Client.
Getting  Short listing  from the Client.
Scheduling  Interviews
Getting  the feedback  from the Client
Follow up  with  the candidate for the offer.
Preparing  Invoice for  the joining
Coordinating  the HR during  campus drives.
Aug  2008-Aug  2009: Worked  as the Telecaller  for Centum Learning  Centre,  Visakhapatnam with
the following  responsibilities
Collecting  data from marketing  department.
Preparing  daily  and  monthly  call execution  reports
Interacting  with  students and  parents on  telephone and  motivating  them
Project Scenario
Industrial project on  the topic \u0022Training  and  Development\u0022 from Vizag  Steel Plant in  the H.R.
Department for  a period  of  6  weeks (4  January-13  February)
Description:
Gaining  the knowledge of Training  and  Development.
Conducted  survey  among  the steel plant employees of  H.R.  Department by  distributing
questionnaire and  collected  their  feedbacks.
Prepared  a report on  our project.
Course University/Institute Year  Of Passing Marks Diploma in  Civil
s Working  as a Site Engineer  in  AASH ENTERPRISES in  lalitpur from 2nd  jul 2010  to
15th  march  2011,  and  23th  april 2011  to  till now.
s C&DS JAL NIGAM,  UNIT 50  ,  BARABANKI
Duration  :-  4  weeks
s Company  :-  \u0022DYNAMICA INDIA PVT.LTD\u0022,NOIDA,UP
s Designation:-  Software Testing  Engineer.
s TOTAL EXP :-  15TH DEC  2010  TILL DATE .
(APPROAX \u00221\u0022YEAR  EXPERIENCE)
s Did  In-College Training  in  HP for  Soft Skills,(Duration-50  hours)
s Did  In-C  and  C++ Training  in  APTECH-Salem.(Duration-3  months)
Highly  organized  and  detail-focused  Senior  Finance/Accounting  Professional with  an
exceptional track  record  of  accurately  analyzing  and  providing  financial decisions in
deadline-oriented  environments.
s Expertise in  preparing  & analyzing  Budgets/Forecasts,  developing  strategic MIS
reports for  the management.
s Proficiency  in  cash  flow management through  effective accounts receivable and
payable management.
s Keen  understanding  and  significant experience in  managing  the tax  procedures and
handling  audits for  various reputed  companies.
s Knowledge & skills in  ensuring  statutory  compliance with  various regulatory  bodies
& institutions.
s
Proficiency  in  developing  and  implementing  effective cost control/reduction  measures
with  positive results in  operational and  financial results.
s Ability  to  identify/implement Controls and  Procedures to  streamline operational
processes and  decrease risks without affecting  cost,  efficiency  or productivity.
s Excellent compatibility  with  various accounting  & application  software (Tally,SAP
R-3,  Oracle,  MS Office,  etc.) and  implement new systems/applications with  ease.
Critical Competencies
Attention  to  Detail Communication  Skills Managing  under Pressure
Planning  / Coordination
February'2011    Till Date with  MS Technologies Pvt.  Ltd.  as AVP   Finance and  Accounts.
Notable Contributions
An  integral member of  the leadership  group,  responsible for all financial and  fiscal
management aspects of company  operations.
Reporting  directly  to  the COO with  dotted  line reporting  to  the CEO and  have
significant contact with  Internal and  External Auditors.
Responsible for  leadership  of the finance operations and  administrative activities.
Responsible for  the financial control,  budgeting  and  forecasting,  financial strategy
and  planning  efforts while having  an  impact on  company-  wide policy  and  procedure
development.
Assess the working  capital requirements,  monitor  fund  positions and  indicate time
and  extent of funds needed  to  meet maturing  obligations.
Analyze and  monitor  sales,  revenue,  operating  expenses,  capital expenditures,
headcount and  other key  performance indicators to  ensure achievement of  annual budget and
optimization  of  financial results.
Responsible for  the preparation  of  all monthly,  quarterly  and  annual financial/
operating  reports,  budgets & forecasts and  provide comprehensive analysis &
implementation  strategies on  variances.
Provide direct oversight and  direction  for  the finance/accounting/administrative/
operation  functions of  the organization  and  building  the team to  support the businesses
Highly  organized  and  detail-focused  Senior  Finance/Accounting  Professional with  an
exceptional track  record  of  accurately  analyzing  and  providing  financial decisions in
deadline-oriented  environments.
s Expertise in  preparing  & analyzing  Budgets/Forecasts,  developing  strategic MIS
reports for  the management.
s Proficiency  in  cash  flow management through  effective accounts receivable and
payable management.
s Keen  understanding  and  significant experience in  managing  the tax  procedures and
handling  audits for  various reputed  companies.
s Knowledge & skills in  ensuring  statutory  compliance with  various regulatory  bodies
& institutions.
s
Proficiency  in  developing  and  implementing  effective cost control/reduction  measures
with  positive results in  operational and  financial results.
s Ability  to  identify/implement Controls and  Procedures to  streamline operational
processes and  decrease risks without affecting  cost,  efficiency  or productivity.
s Excellent compatibility  with  various accounting  & application  software (Tally,SAP
R-3,  Oracle,  MS Office,  etc.) and  implement new systems/applications with  ease.
Critical Competencies
Attention  to  Detail Communication  Skills Managing  under Pressure
Planning  / Coordination
February'2011    Till Date with  MS Technologies Pvt.  Ltd.  as AVP   Finance and  Accounts.
Notable Contributions
An  integral member of  the leadership  group,  responsible for all financial and  fiscal
management aspects of company  operations.
Reporting  directly  to  the COO with  dotted  line reporting  to  the CEO and  have
significant contact with  Internal and  External Auditors.
Responsible for  leadership  of the finance operations and  administrative activities.
Responsible for  the financial control,  budgeting  and  forecasting,  financial strategy
and  planning  efforts while having  an  impact on  company-  wide policy  and  procedure
development.
Assess the working  capital requirements,  monitor  fund  positions and  indicate time
and  extent of funds needed  to  meet maturing  obligations.
Analyze and  monitor  sales,  revenue,  operating  expenses,  capital expenditures,
headcount and  other key  performance indicators to  ensure achievement of  annual budget and
optimization  of  financial results.
Responsible for  the preparation  of  all monthly,  quarterly  and  annual financial/
operating  reports,  budgets & forecasts and  provide comprehensive analysis &
implementation  strategies on  variances.
Provide direct oversight and  direction  for  the finance/accounting/administrative/
operation  functions of  the organization  and  building  the team to  support the businesses
Possesses qualitative knowledge in  software quality  testing,  technical support & trouble
shooting
Exposure in  automated  & manual software testing,  writing,  & execution  of  test cases
Knowledge of SDLC  Methodologies & testing  using  automated  testing  tools
Acquired  knowledge in  White box  testing,  Black  box  testing,  Functional testing,  Performance
testing,  Load  & Stress testing
Adopt in  testing  software products & handling  projects efficiently  for delivering  the required
application  in  a very  systematic way
Excellent communication  & interpersonal skills with  abilities in  resolving  complex  software
issues
Educational Profile
UG   B.Tech  (Electronics & Communication)
72.5%,  Pondicherry  University,
Year  of  Passing: 2010
12th    63.58%
10th    70.72%
Company  Name: DSM Soft Private Limited
Designation: Junior  Engineer
Experience: 28th  January  2011  to  31st August 2011
Wind
ows as
Administrator
Have
done one
month
training  in
PATRATU
THERMAL
Assignment Vocational
Training
1 Jindal Stainless Ltd.  Maintenance Engineer Dec.2007  to  continue
Electrical Field  Knowledge:
All type electrical wiring  ,testing  ,repairing  and  winding  of  single phase and  three phase a.c.
motor,star  delta starter  ,m.c.b.  fuse,  testing  of  amp.volt.  resistence,insulator,  alternator r.p.m.,
single phase and  three phase transformer,generator,inverter,batteries,all type fan  repairing  and
winding,  repairing  of winding  machine,  find  fault in  cable and  wiring,  m.c.c.  ,p.c.c.  ,p.l.c.,  L.T.
and  H.T.  control pannal,electrical protecting  devices,  all type regulators,  power  supply  ,  u.p.s.
stabilizers etc.  Able to  handle a big  team of  electricians.  Testing  ,  input output meter  reading,
street lite metering  ,
Ensure proper functioning  of  generation  & distribution  system,  for  all the contractors,
and  sub  contractors for  work.
Management of  stores & their  inventory  updates for  all departmental works.
s Experience from 5th  October  2008  till to  date (3  years):
Working  as a Site Engineer(Electrical)  in  Real Estate in  Client SS group,
Sector-51,  Gurgaon.
Looking:
All internal and  External Electrical work  of  high  rise buildings(conduting  ,
wireing,testing  all electrical points) as per  drawings ,  reading  electrical drawings &
execution  part ,contractor  dealing  & quality  of  work  verifying  bills ,  and  electrical and
mechanical work  on  project site.
Verifying  all items in  the inventory  of  contractor  as per  BOQ and  rate as per  Tender.
Verification  of  contractor's bills .
Operation  & maintenance of Cummins D.G.  SETS,  (62  kva-160  kva)
Operation  and  Maintenance of  LT panel,  distribution  board,  MCCB.
Maintenance of  Large Building  electrical system for  project site.
Implementation  of  Report of  Daily,  Monthly,  Yearly  as Per Schedule & Responsible.
Certifying  bills & taking  care of Vendors.
Vendor interaction,  coordinating  with  employees etc.
Wind
ows as
Administrator
Have
done one
month
training  in
PATRATU
THERMAL
Assignment Vocational
Training
I  have the more than  three year  experience in  handling  the D.C.  Motor,  Electrical Installation,
Erection,  commissioning  and  Testing  of Transformers depends upon  client requirements.
WORK EXPERIENCE IN DETAIL
Company  : M/s POWER ELECTRIC CORPRATION,  Coimbatore
Designation  : Project Engineer
Duration  : Jan2011  to  Present
Client : M/s.  TNEB,  M/s.  KSEB,  M/s.  AP Transco,  M/s.  Robert Bosch,  M/s.
APCPDCL,  M/s.  Toyota Kirloskar India Ltd,  M/s.  Power Grid,  M/s.  AP Genco.  Annual
Maintenance of  MCC  and  PMCC panels at M/s.  Sterlite Industries India Ltd.,  etc.,  Preventive
Maintenance at M/s.  Nokia Ltd.,  etc.,  Servicing  of  APFC  panels at M/s.  Madras Cements Ltd.,
Retrofitting  works in  M/s.  HPCL,  M/s.  Vizag  Steel Plant,  M/s.  Madras Cements Ltd.,  Seismic
test at IIT Madras.
Nature of  Project : Electrical Installation,  Communication,  Tower  Installation,  Lighting
System Design
Annual Maintenance,  Safety  Approval,  Procurement and  Project
Designing  and  preparation  of  drawings.
Preparation  of  BOQ,  estimation  of  material,  issue of  purchase request and  arrangement of
material.
Material submittal.
RESUME JAYA KUMAR.R Email: specjayakumar@gmail.com
Mobile: 9444970627,  044-26345856
Coordination  with  consultant.
Supervision  of  the overall execution  of  the projects.
Approval of Inspection  Reports.
Making  daily,  weekly  and  monthly  reports on  project progress.
Company  : M/s.  OMEGA TECHNO INDUSTRIES,  Chennai
Designation  : ELECTRICAL SUPERVISOR
Duration  : Jan  2010  to  Jan  2011
Client : Wheel India (TVS group),  Private and  Public ITI and  Colleges.
Nature of  Project : Manufactures of D.C.  Motor,  Controls,  Trailers and  Acoustic Enclosure
Review of project requirements & specifications and  implementation  during  work
execution.
Planning  and  monitoring  of  site activities and  managing  site resources.
Preparing  & maintaining  of  records all related  activities.
Monitor  problem areas and  make recommendations to  Project Manger.
Preparation  of  technical & internal reporting  as required.
Attending  meetings with  clients and  arranging  meetings with  contractors.
Preparation  of  modification  proposal in  case of site contrains.Raise the deviations &
getting  approval from the client.
Company  : M/s SEC  Engineering,  Manali
Designation  : ELECTRICAL SUPERVISOR
Duration  : July  2009  to  Dec 2009
Client : M/s SIEMENS PVT LTD.
Nature of  Project : Erection,  commissioning  and  Testing  of  Siemens make circuit Breakers,
Relays,  Current Transformers,  Capacitor  Voltages Transformers and  Isolator.
Erection,  Testing,  Commissioning  and  Servicing  of  Circuit Breakers
Annual Maintenance of  MCC and  PMCC  panels.
Preventive Maintenance.
Servicing  of  APFC.
Retrofitting  works in  Steel and  cement Plant.
Seismic test at IIT Madras.
Interpersonal Skills
Adaptability  to  any  situation  & commitment.
Learned  discipline,  teamwork,  how to  follow instructions and  hard  work.  Ambitious,
outgoing,  reliable and  have solid  work  ethic.
Determined  & willing  to  put maximum effort to  achieve goals.
Concerned  with  quality.  Produce work  that is orderly  and  attractive.  Ensure tasks are
completed  correctly  and  on  time.
Willing  to  try  new things and  am interested  in  improving  efficiency  on  assigned  tasks.
n Pursuing  Bachelor  of  Journalism and  Mass Communication  from Jagannath  International
Management School (JIMS),  Vasant Kunj,  New Delhi.  The Institute is affiliated  to  I.P University,
Delhi.
Volunteered  the Indian  Idol 5th  Season    Delhi Audition.
Worked  as an  Asst.  Director  in  a recently  released  Bollywood  Movie named  \u0022WITH
LOVE,  DELHI!!\u0022 and  also  with  the Promo  Song  of the movie Aaja Aaja Janejah.
Worked  as a paid  trainee in  Basic 4  advertising  for  2  months in  Client servicing  and  copy.
Wind
ows Family
as
Administrator
Have
done one
month
training  in
PATRATU
THERMAL
Assignment Qualification
s
Operating
System
Application
Networking
One year experience in  Chang  Yun  India Ltd.  Gurgoan.  As a Line supervisor After
Diploma
Working  In  Ambition  polytechnic,sirsa.  As a Lecturer  since 1st Feb.2011  to  Till Date.
ACADAMIC QUALIFICATIONS:
10th  from Parvati Devi Memorial high  school,  Sirsa from BSEH.Bhiwani.
INDUSTRIAL TRAINING:
Six  weeks industrial training  in  Super Thermal power  plant Rajasthan.
Six  weeks industrial training  in  BHEL,  HARIDWAR.
Company:-Ericsson  India Limited.  (May  2011  to  march  2012)
Designation:-FM engineer
Company: - NuTek  India Ltd.  (October  2010  to  April 2011)
Designation: -  BSS engineer
Company:-Bright View Telecom India Pvt.  Ltd.  (June 2010  to  October  2010)
Designation:-GET
Responsible for  team coordination  and  their  movement for  the activity.
Daily  basis update of project and  material,  man  force needed  for  its proper execution.
Updating  of  database at sites as per requirement.
Quality  Audit & acceptance of  sites.
Maintenance & supervision  of Ericsson  Transmission  system (SDH).
Maintenance & supervision  of MINI  LINK Transmission  system of Ericsson  (PDH).
E1/ PCM routing  for  new sites from BSC to  the site.
Alarm monitoring  of  site using  WINFIOL AND CITRIX software.
Maintenance of  ERICSSON and  ZTE BTS.
Maintenance of  Microwave antennas,  alignment and  Rx  level.
Removing  Radio  Base Station  faults.
Regular  Software Upgrades of  ERICSSON Transmission  Equipment's.
Alarm configurations for  proper functioning  and  their troubleshooting.
Transmission  alarm troubleshooting  and  rectification.
TRAINING AND PROJECTS:
Six  week  training  in  AERF,  NOIDA in  MICRO-CONTROLLER.
Six  week  training  in  BSNL,  MAHENDERGARH in  GSM.
One week  Training  in  ZTE,  Kolkata in  3G on  TECHNOLOGIES.
COMPUTER  PROFECIENCIES:
Operating  Systems : MS WINDOWS (98,  2000,  XP,  VISTA,  Windows 7).
Application  Software : MS office 2010,  2007,  2003,  adobe flash
Responsible for  managing  backend  and  front end  tasks.
Involved  in  managing  walk-ins.
Handling  incoming  and  outgoing  calls.
Acting  as office coordinator
Handling  all documents related  to  employees
Operate EPBAX,  handle payments,
Handling  Admin  & back  office operations
Guest relationship.
Handling  guest complaints Etc.
Handling  house-keeping  Dept.
Auditing  room service bill day  wise
Maintained  daily  report(  occupancy  & maintenance )
2. HAD WORKED WITH ANGEL BROKING(FRANCHASEE )  AS ARM FOR 01  YEAR
IN ULHASNAGAR  BRANCH IN DEEMAT ACCOUNT.
3. HAD WORKED WITH INDIA BULLS DEEMAT DEPT AS BDM (BUSSINESS
DEVELOPMENT MANGER)  FOR 15  MONTHS
4. HAD WORKED WITH ROSE WOOD BOUTIQUE FOR  04  YEARS.  AS CASHIER
CUM ACCOUNTANT IN COLABA MUMBAI
**EDUCATION HISTORY--:
T.Y.BCOM PASSED IN THE YEAR  2000  FROM MUMBA UNIVERISTY.
H.S.C.  PASSED IN 1997  FROM MUMBAI UNIVERSITY
S.S.C.  PASSED IN YEAR  IN 1994  FROM PUNE BOARD
Presently  Working  with  Naresh  Agarwal Construction  Pvt.  Ltd.  as a Executive
Accountant since Oct-2011  to  till date.
s
Preparation  of  all purchase records,  Bank  records .
s Preparation  and  making  daily  all expenses.
s Preparation  weekly  expenses & monthly  payments record.
s Making  staff  salary.
s Handling  & preparation  all creditors records and  maintain  payment records.
s Maintain  day  to  day  bank  reconciliation  and  banking  work.
s Preparation  project bill record  on  excel sheet,  letter  drafting,  mail checking  & sending.
s
Maintain  stock  record  and  reconciliation  as a RMC,  Concrete,  and  Cement etc.
s Preparation  of  Store record  on  computer  bases & manually.
s Maintain  day  to  day  store stock  register  and  handling  store material.
s Making  store stock  reconciliation  report and  issue,  receive quantity  to  labour  & staff.
s Making  P.O letter,  approval letter & Agreement.
Worked  with  MVM Handicrafts Pvt.  Ltd.  in  Export Department from Dec2010  to  Sep2011.
s
Preparation  compliance & audit work.
s Making  & maintain  compliance & audit record  (social,  technical).
s Preparation  of  ECGC  report.
s Making  & maintaining  export documents as a (G-Form,  Export Challan).
s Making  export invoice bill as a
s Maintain  attendance register and  making  monthly  salary  and  weekly  Expenses records.
s Preparation  monthly  stock  statement & reconciliation.
s Preparation  export records on  master  sheets & formally  record.
s
Preparation  Performa invoice,  credit invoice export invoice.
s Making  barcode slip  and  scanning  barcode.
s Working  on  paper  work  in  officially.
Worked  with  Anraj Cables Industries Pvt.  Ltd.  as a executive accountant from Oct2009  to  Nov
2010.
s Making  & Maintain  day  to  day  all Voucher.
s
Maintain  & Posting  Entries day  by  day  in  sales,  purchase,  journal & expenses.
s Maintain  & handling  stock  entries and  reconciliation.
s Preparation  bank  reconciliation.
s Tax  calculates in  tds,  service tax,  sales tax,  purchase tax  & local tax  VAT.
s Making  vendor payment record  and  making  cheque records.
s Submit tds challans and  service tax  challans in  bank.
s Maintain  day  by  day  cash  book  and  cheque book  accounts.
s Making  sales invoices.
s Preparation  salary  sheet and  weekly  expenses records.
s Summer Training  in  HDFC Bank  in  Sales Department.
s Project Report for Marketing  Producer  In  working  Process
Worked  with  Fine-Art Jewelry  as an  accounts assistant.
Currently  working  with  Infosys BPO at Jaipur  as a contractual employee since Aug  2009.
Handling  Front office of  security.
Handing  Visitor  Management system
Maintain  Visitors Record  on  Daily,  Weekly  and  Monthly  Basis.
Maintain  Weekly  duty  Shift Roster  of  security  Team.
Maintain  Daily,  Weekly  and  Monthly  Task  Report.
Maintain  all Documents and  file works for Admin  security.
Computer data entry  work.
Handling  CCTV Camera Operation  and  prepare the violation  report on  daily,  weekly  and
monthly  basis.
Been  the SPOC  (Single point of  contact) for  all logistics requirements.
Designation  & Employer (Current )
Front Office Executive in  M/s Hindustan  Automotives (Delhi)
(1st June-2010  to  till date)
s Invoicing  in  Tecpro  Software & Tally  7.2
s
Handling  EPABX System
s Coordinate to  H.O.  ,  Branch  Office & Vendors
s Handling  Incoming  & Outgoing  phone calls
s Maintain  Fileing  record  & Taking  Care at all the correspondence
s Handling  Courier incoming  / outgoing  & Coordinate to  Courier  Agencies
s Handling  Kitchen  & House Keeping  Staff
s Keep  record  of  \u0022C\u0022 form and  form `38'
s Maintaining  Stationary  and  attendance Register
s Arrangement for  internal meetings / conference room
s Co-coordinating  with  various departments for  document tracking  and  keeping.
s
Managing  Office,  Factory  Premises and  all the aspects of  maintenance e.g.  electricity
distribution  panel,  electrical appliances,  machine,  furniture,  computer  systems,  printer,
projector,  sound  system.
Designation  & Employer
Front Office Executive in  M/s Premium Speciality  Paints P.Ltd.  (Delhi)
(1st May  2009  to  31  May  2010)
s Invoicing  in  ACE (Coral Software)
s Handling  EPABX System
s
Handling  incoming  & outgoing  phone calls records
s Maintain  Fileing  record  & Taking  Care at all the correspondence
s Handling  Courier incoming  / outgoing  & coordinate courier  agencies
s Maintaining  Office Exp.
s Maintaining  Stationary  and  attendance Register
s Arrangement for  internal meetings / conference room
Designation  & Employer
Store Keeper  in  M/s U.S.  Foods P.Ltd.  (Delhi)
(1st February  2008  to  31  April 2009  )
s
Handling  Dispatch  & Purchase Material
s Taking  Care at all Store Correspondence
s Attend  The Customer Query
s Maintaining  proper  stock  Materials Computerized
s To  manage all the sale Computerized  of  individual sales executive with  payment
pending  and  received  information.
s Making  Challan
s Co-coordinating  with  Vendors
Good  Interpersonal Relationships,  Communication  Skills,  Leadership  Skills,  Analytical Skills &
learning  Capacity  is very  Quick.
Master  of  Business Administration  (M.B.A)  from AIIMT
Specialization  Marketing
BASIC QUALIFICATION
Bachelor  of  Commarce (B.Com)  from V.B.S.  Purvanchal University
ADITIONAL KNOWLEDGE
Dipploma In  Computer  Application  (D.C.A)  & Internet
1. Company  Name : Den  infra structure India pvt ltd  (Wind  Energy).
Thirumalai nagar,  4road,  Gudimangalam,  Udumalaipet.
Position : Safety  Supervisor
Dated  From : Dec 2011-Mar 2011
2. Company  Name : Coromandel engineering  company  limited,
MURUGAPPA GROUPS
Parry  House,  3rd  floor,  43  Moore Street,  Chenna600001.
Projects : TNPL Cement plant,  TG house projects (On  duty)-Karur  &
Sinter  plant project-Kalahasthi-A.P
Position : Senior  Safety  Supervisor
Dated  From : April 2011- December  2011
3. Company  Name : ATC Tires India limited,
ALLAINCE GROUP,  Gangaikondan,  Tirunelveli-627302.
Position : Junior  engineer  trainee (Safety)
Projects : Client safety  (ATC)  in  industrial safety
Dated  From : Jan  2012-  Till date
Duties are,
Assigned  the tasks of  preparing  reports as well as marketing  fire & site safety
inspections
Handled  the responsibilities of  reviewing  engineering  drawings and  specifications
like-  Electrical drawings for  Excavation
Designed  as well as prepared  specifications for  induction  trainings
Participated  in  formal audits and  conducted  research  on  major  issues related  with
construction  hazards
Assigned  the tasks of  conducting  test of Ground  leakage and  ELCB
Handled  various projects as assigned
Analyze accident and  incident reports for trends.
Make recommendations for  correcting  unsafe conditions and  actions.
Respond  to  emergency  situations involving  hazardous materials,  radiation,  or  fire and
smoke incidents.
Lead  and  guide the work  of  lower  level safety  technicians and  student employees.
Madison  Media,  new Delhi,
Management Trainee (Strategic Planning)  Duration    feb  2012    April 2012
Roles & Responsibilities
n Making  Strategy  plans for Airtel.
n Handling  of  airtel's Global Best Practices.
n Analysis for  airtel Studio  Survey.
n Looking  after all research  aspects of  media.
n
Making  strategic plans for  existing  clients and  for  new pitches,  using  TAM,  MAP,  IRS.
R  j corp  cryobanks international
Relationship  executive Duration    may  2011    dec 2011
Roles & Responsibilities
n Popularize a new concept of Stem Cell banking  among  the target Audience.
n Seek  target groups and  build  database of  Potential clients and  Lead  sources.
n Build  relationship  with  key  Stakeholders like Gynecologists,  Hospitals,  Pathology's and
centers.
n Conduct presentation  to  prospective clients.
n Enroll targeted  number  of potential clients every  month.
Company  name:- Cryobanks international Stem cells department 06  MAY 2010  -30  JUNE 2010  & 05  Description n Study  and  analyzed  the market potential of  stem cell banking  awareness level about
stem cell banking
n Generated  potential leads for  the company
n Sold  the product to  customers
n Forecast the future trends in  the industry  and  designed  a marketing  communication  mix
for the company.
Learning n Learnt about the scope of  stem cells banking  and  about the various techniques used.
Understanding  of  customer  and  market dynamics and  requirements.
LIVE PROJECT
Aaj Tak  (Client)  AC Nielsen,  Delhi
20thJuly'10-25thAug'10
Project Coordinator of  Net link  Software Solution  private ltd,  Bhopal,  M.P (December
2011    May  2012)
INDUSTRIAL VISITS
Hindustan  Photo  Films,  Ooty
B.H.E.L,  Bangalore
N.T.P.C,  Ramgrah,  Ranchi
S.A.I.L.  Bokaro
MEMBERSHIP
Student member of  Indian  Society  for Technical Education,  New Delhi.
Active member  of Science Club,  VMKV,  Salem.
Executive member- \u0022EEE ASSOCIATION\u0022 (2007-08,  2008-09)
Member- \u0022IE\u0022 (2009-20; 3rd  year)
Member- \u0022ROBO CLUB\u0022 (2009-10; 3rd  year)
Member  of  \u0022ANTI RAGGING COMMITTEE\u0022 (2009-10)
PERSONAL IDENTITY
Father's Name -  Mr.  RABINDRA KUMAR  SINGH
Mother's Name -  Smt.  MINOO SINGH
Date of  Birth  -  12  Feb,  1987
Gender - Male
Height -  5'7''
Weight -  65  KG
Marital Status -  Single
Page 2  of  3
Nationality - Indian
Religion  -  Hindu
Language Known -  Hindi / English  / Tamil
Hobbies - Listening  Music,  Playing  Chess & badminton
Blood  Group  -  O +
Passport Number -  J4283982
I  hereby  acknowledge & authenticate,  every  bit of information  mentioned  in  this document is
correct by  all means.
Date: -
Place: - Nikhil
As Sub-Engineer  in  Kerala State Electricity  Board  on  contract May  2012-
onwards
Operation  and  Maintenance of  110/11  kV Substation  Edarikkode and  33kV s/s
Kooriyadu.
Main  activities and  Responsibilities:
3 Operation  and  maintenance of  Power  Transformers.
3 Operation  and  maintenance of  H.T and  L.T Switch  Gears,  Panel Boards,  Circuit
Breakers,  Current Transformers,  Potential Transformers,  Isolators.
3 Preparation  and  maintenance of  substation  log  sheet,  log  records for  Load  and  Energy
Consumption  under  different lines and  feeders,  and  Monthly  Operating  Review (MOR)
reports.
3 Meggering  of  power  equipments.
3 Maintenance of  Battery  and  battery  charger.
As Electrical Engineer  in  Qatar  General Electricity&Water Corporation-KahraMaa on
contract.  Aug2009-Apr  2012
Operation  ,  Maintenance & Control of  Substations.
Main  activities and  Responsibilities:
3 Handling  operation  and  maintenance activities.
3 Inspection  & monitoring  of  relays and  other protection  systems,  Power  transformers,
CTs,  PTs,  Earthing  Transformers,  Circuit Breakers,  Gas Insulated  Switch-gear(GIS) systems,
Substation  Control Systems (SCS),  Supervisory  Control & Data Acquisition  (SCADA)
Systems.
3 Experienced  with  Protection  panels of  AREVA,  ABB  & Siemens.
3 Inspection  for alarms & faults like over  current,  earth  fault,  standby  earth  fault,  and
mechanical faults.
3 Experienced  with  switchgears of voltage rating; 11kV,66kV,132kV and  220kV
manufactured  by  Hyundai,  ABB,  Siemens,  AREVA etc.
3 Inspection  and  monitoring  of  transformer  protection  systems like SERGI  and
DELUGE systems...
3 Experienced  with  Low Voltage ac & dc distribution  panels (LV AC  & DC)  and
Battery  charger  systems.(110  volt & 48  volt)
3 Maintaining  proper  communication  with  Control centers on  different activities taking
place in  the substation,  preparation  of load  and  power consumption  reports.
3 Assist the Senior  engineers.
3 Experienced  the trench  excavation,  cable laying  ,termination(11kV,66kV &220kV),
gasing  and  de-gasing  of GIS ,  bay  extension  of GIS,  Stability  test,Meggering,BDV etc.
As Sub-Engineer  in  Kerala State Electricity  Board  on  contract June 2007-
July2009
Operation  and  Maintenance of  110/11  kV SubStation  Edarikkode & 33kV s/s
Thirunnavaya on  contract.
Main  activities and  Responsibilities: same as no.(1)
Driving  License
3 Holding  Qatar  and  Indian  driving  license.
Company  Name: -  SHREE CEMENT LTD.  BEAWAR,
RAJASTHAN
Period  of  Training: -  13/06/2011  to  13/07/2011.
project Detail: -  Study  of  steam power  plant and  FGDP
Position:- As a trainee
Extra Activity:-
I  have done diploma in  Product Design.
Intrest:-
Appreciate Music
Watching  Movies and  Cricket
s
I  am working  as a service enginner  in  SCANTECH SERVICES from January2012  to
till date.
s I  worked  as a jr.site engineer  in  VIVEKA ELECTRICALS from August2011  to
December2011.  (A.P.C.P.D.C.L private contract works)
s I  worked  as a site supervisor in  HYCON pvt.ltd  for 8  months from November 2010  to
june 2011.
Base Station  Subsystem (BSS).
n Study  of Base Station  Subsystem(BSS) at IDEA Cellular Ltd.,  Dehradun; for 6  weeks in
B.Tech.
6th  semester.
E-10  B  Signal Transmission  Control System
n Call Connection  training  at BSNL,  Aligarh; for  4  weeks in  B.Tech.  4th  semester.
Graduation  Project/Case Study  :
Project -1
Title : RF control wireless Chopper
Description  : This project is useful for  security  purpose,there largest uses in  Military
application.It is defined  as a
reusable,  uncrewed  vehicle capable of  controlled,  sustained  and  level
flight.This is itself a weapon,
even  though  it is also  unmanned  and  in  some cases remotely  guided.
Team Size : 6
Role : Assembler
Project -2
Title : Mini Electronic Voting  Machine (mini EVM)
Description  : This project is to  count the voted  that are polled  through  the counter.  It avoids
multiple voting  at a
time.It also  shows the individual votes of each  constituent and  the total votes.
Team Size : 5
Role : Design  & Assembling
1. REC  Power  Distribution  Company  Limited
At present I  am working  as a \u0022SITE ENGINEER\u0022 from 23rd  April 2012  to  Till Date.
2. M/s.  Krishna Agencies-Surat
I  have worked  under  SMC contract of  street light maintenance as a \u0022SUPERVISOR\u0022
from 23rd  June 2011  to  22nd  April 2012.
Prepare a detailed  month  wise work  plan  with  clear  deliverables and  milestones to
ensure the achievements of  the deliverables in  the project.
To  lead  the district in  execution  of  the project as per Annual Action  Plan
To  prepare the Annual Action  Plan  & budget of  all the Blocks
Formation  of  Women  farmer  producer company
To  Manage 150  Human  resources (professionals) of  the district
Rigorously  implement activities outlined  in  the project proposal to  promote social
mobilization  in  the selected  districts,  which  include SHG Formation,  federating  SHGs at
block  and  district level,  organizing  SHGs into  producer  groups and  their capacity
development,  Financial Literacy,  hand-holding  services etc)
Nurturing  of  more than  8000  SHGs & 450  Federation  in  Madhubani district
Bank  Linkage & disbursement of Cash  credit Limit to  more than  5500  SHGs
Adherence to  financial rules & System
Adherence to  administrative & office Management system.
Livelihood  promotion  of  the groups through  Agri,  Agri Allied  (Farm & Non  Farm).
Regular  update of MIS
Grievances of staff/community  redressed.
Liaise with  government departments,  technical and  research  institutions,  and
stakeholders for  convergence of livelihood  and  financial deepening  programs at district level
Carryout regular  visit to  project locations in  the district to  ensure the quality  of
deliverables and  suggested  mid  course strategy  change (if  needed)  based  on  field  evidence
Beneficiaries under scheduled,  Social action,  health,  education  intervention.
Preparing  of  annual action  Plan  & budget of  district.
Since Dec'08  with  BASIX,  Patna as Unit Head  Khagaria,  Purniea & Munger
In  charge of  three districts of  Bihar  namely  Khagaria,  Purniea,  Munger  (6  Blocks)
Nurturing  of  more than  1200  SHGs in  Three Districts (6  Blocks)
Formation  of  farmer company
Bank  Linkage of more than  500  SHGs
Disbursement of 20  Lakh  in  ICF.
Successfully  operation  of  CBRE in  Gogri & Baisi Blocks of  Khagaria & Purniea.
Livelihood  promotion  of  the groups through  Agri,  Agri Allied  (Farm & Non  Farm).
Intervention  of new technique of  Farming  i.e.  SRI,  WIS,  MIS,  TPS.
Providing  Credit to  SHGs,  CAGs,  JLGs for  Livelihood  activities live agrabatti
making,  Papad  making,  Livestock,  Retail store,  Patta Plate making  & others livelihood
In  charge of  two  Blocks (12  Villages)
Promotion  of Livelihood  through  Agriculture to  poor  & marginal farmers
Purchase of Staples (wheat,  Rice,  Maize,  Pulses,  etc),  Fruits & Vegetables with  given
Quality  specification.
Formation  of  Joint Livelihood  Group  of  Men  & Women  in  terms of Agriculture.
Looking  after 180  JLGs
Purchase of Fruits & Vegetables,  Staples directly  from Farmers (Contract farming)
Farmers Development/
Inventory  Control
Introducing  new products as per  seasonal changes.
Follow up  with  growers ,pre-timely  delivery  and  dispatch  of orders
Make timely  payment to  growers
Interacting  with  end  users for  better  understanding  of  their  needs and  suggesting
technical specification  and  changes as appropriate
Training  to  growers on  Crop  production
Coordinating,  directing  store staffs to  ensure proper  merchandising.
Providing  training  for innovative product handling  methods,  controlling  losses (dump
shrinkage and  other  losses etc).
Since Mar 07  to  Mar 08  with  Reliance Retail Ltd.  Ranchi/Jamshedpur,  as Sr Associate
Corporate Social Responsibilities (CSR)
In  charge of  Three Blocks .(18  Villages)  in  Ranchi & two  Blocks in  Jamshedpur
Formation  of  Farmers producer  groups & Common  Activities Group  for  women
Promotion  of Livelihood  through  Agriculture to  poor  & marginal farmers
Formation  & Nurturing  of more than  140  Farmers Group  & 200  CAGs
Farmers Development through  contact farming
Inventory  Control
Sorting  & Grading  of Material according  to  Quality  SOP
Introducing  new products as per  seasonal changes.
Follow up  with  growers ,pre-timely  delivery  and  dispatch  of orders
Make timely  payment to  farmers
Interacting  with  end  users for  better  understanding  of  their  needs and  suggesting
technical specification  and  changes as appropriate
Training  to  farmers/Women  on  Crop  production
Coordinating,  directing  store staffs to  ensure proper  merchandising.
Providing  training  for innovative product handling  methods,  controlling  losses (dump
shrinkage and  other  losses etc).
Conducting  team meetings and  brainstorming  sessions etc.  for  improvements.
Since Sept 03  to  Feb  07  with  Sungro  Seeds Ltd,  Patna as Officer-Research  & Development
of  Agricultural Inputs
Successfully  managing  the research  & development operations for attaining  increased
growth  & profitability  of  Agricultural seeds,  pesticides,  fertilizers.
Actively  assisting  the top  management in  planning/ Budgeting  for  achieving  the
corporate goals
Effectively  executing  marketing  strategies for  augmenting  the business volume by
enhancing  brand  visibility  & recall.
Upholding  cordial associations with  customers to  maintain  the profitability  of the
business.
Commencing  market research  devices to  feel the pulse of  the market & accordingly
implementing  the course of action.
Successfully  dealing  with  Dealers & Distributors\u005C
Sales promotion  and  advertising  of  Seeds,  Pesticides,  Fertilizers
Planning  to  identify  reliable and  cost efficient channel partners (Retailers)  for
enhancing  market reach  and  penetration.
Training  to  farmers on  Crop  management
Since Sept 02  to  Aug  03  with  TATA Steel Rural Development Society,  Jamshedpur  as
Specialist WATERSHED & NRM Development
Project in  charge of One Block  in  Ghatsila in  Musabani district
Looking  of  overall project of  watershed  & NRM
Plantation  of  horticulture & timber  sapling  with  Specification.
Training  to  farmers on  agronomy,  crop  management.
Training  on  farmers on  SRI,  TPS,  WIS System of  cultivation.
Soil testing  & recommendation
Formation  of  User  group  & Self Help  Group  (SHGs),  Common  activity  Group
(CAGs).
Promotion  of Livelihood  to  SHGs through  various activities
Promotion  of  Livelihood  to  CAGs & SHGs through  different Activities
marketing  of  finished  products (Wheat,  Rice,  Maize,  Spices)
Promotion  of Livelihood  through  Agriculture
DSC Ltd. asst.manager    projects Jul '10    Till date (24
Months)
CURRENT ORGANIZATION: DSC  Ltd.  (gurgaon)  formerly  known  as DS Construction  is the
Indian  infrastructure investment company  of  $4.5  bn  DS group.  Owning  and  managing  BOT
road  projects,  urban  infrastructure,  hydro  power  plants,  metro  and  real estate.
Currently  Organization: Sanjay  Maken  & Associates
Designation: Accountant & Audit Assistant
Work  Experience: 2  years
INTERNAL AUDITS of  FDDI,  a Government organization  (Ministry  of  commerce)
1.
Functions: Perform Vouching,  Reviewing  the works of  various departments like
Administration-Personnel-IT and  also  review and  cross verify  the records/registers
maintained  by  the respective dep't.  With  actual situation.  Collecting  Cash  Certificates,  bank
statements fixed  asset details etc.
STOCK AUDIT of  FDDI,  a Government organization  (Ministry  of  commerce)
1. Functions: Cross verify  the stock  details with  registers and  physical verification  and
Reporting  in  case of  any  discrepancy  if any  found.
ACCOUNTING: Maintaining  accounts/ledger  posting  of  various types of
organizations'.
BIJAN ADS & FILMS PVT.  LTD.
2006  to  Present Date
Designation: Sr.  Graphic/Web  Designer (Creative Department)
Website Layout Designing
Heading  the designing  team on  projects involving  deciding  the layout of  the entire site.
Newsletter & Emailer Designing
Logo  Designing
Print Media (Brochures,  Press Ads,  Magazines,  Posters,  Calendars,  Banners,  and  all
Stationary  Work)
Print Production
Product Packaging
Handled  Outdoor  Campaigns
TV Commercial Story  Board
Flash  Presentations
Apply  usability  heuristics to  design  problems.
Website Layout Designing
Newsletter & Emailer Designing
Logo  Designing
Print Media (Brochures,  Press Ads,  Magazines,  Posters,  Banners,  and  all Stationary  Work)
One year Certificated  \u0022Industrial Accountant\u0022 Course from `The Institute of
Computer Accountant' at Muzaffarnagar (U.P).
Three Month  Certificated  ;Basic Course (M.S.  Office & etc.); & ;Tally 9.0 & 7.2;
from ;CAD Computer  Centre; at Muzaffarnagar (U.P).
Graduation  (B.Com) from S.D.  Degree College,  Muzaffarnagar  (C.C.S.  University,
MEERUT) in  2008.
Post Graduation  (M.Com)  from S.D.  Degree College,  Muzaffarnagar  (C.C.S.
University,  MEERUT)  in  2010.
Work  Experience Profile
Total Apprehension: -  4.3  + year's
May  2010  - Present
s Sun  Nirman  Infrastructure Pvt.  Ltd.  at New Delhi
Branch-  Gurgaon  (Haryana)
Jr.Accountant & Computer  Opt. = 2.4  + years Continue....
Filing  and  documentation  of  all the office documentation
All Data daily  process to  H.O.
Maintain  Account in  Tally  9.0  & Manual also
Working  on  M.S.  office (M.S.  Word,  M.S.  Excel etc.)
To  maintain  all the database of  the company  of  paper
Prepare Purchase Order  and  to  check  & maintain  the Purchase invoices before
sending  them to  the higher  management for the approval
To  keep  records of  mailing  list and  client database
Drafting  letter
Daily  checking  Stock  Material and  update Material & Stock  Register
Networking,  (check  mail and  reply  to  them)
Handling  Imprest.
Preparing  Monthly  Balance Sheet
Maintain  Staff  Salary  and  Vendors Payment.
NIKHIL
MITTAL
Temp.  Add.
H.  No.  1150
Sec 15  Part II
Gurgaon
September 2008  to  May  2009  = 1.9  years
s Swastik  Engineer's Pvt.  Ltd.  at Muzaffarnagar  (U.P.)
Computer Operator
Filing  and  documentation  of  all the office documentation
Working  on  M.S.  office (M.S.  Word,  M.S.  Excel etc.)
To  maintain  all the database of  the company  of  paper
To  check  & maintain  the Purchase invoices before sending  them to  the higher
management for  the approval
Drafting  letter
Filing  and  documentation  of  all the office documentation
Data entry  and  record  keeping
1. Presently  Working  as Senior Process-Executive in  manufacturing  vertical.(May,  2010
till date).
Company: Infosys Ltd
Client: CISCO SYSTEMS INC.
Responsibilities: Involved  in  resolving  customer problems regarding  the products and  internal
issues in  shipping  the Cisco  products to  the customer  and  after  shipment issues.
s
Contacting  Manufacturing  team,  logistics team and  customs team depending  on  the
customer  issue.
s Helping  customer  in  checking  the shipment status of  the products and  providing  the
tracking  details.
s Helping  customer  to  clear  the customs by  providing  the shipping  documents (such  as
commercial invoice,  packing  slips).
s Assisting  customer  with  replacements for the damaged  or  for  the products which  are not
delivered.
s Assisting  customer  in  returning  of  the faulty  or damaged  goods back  to  the Cisco.
s
Customer  comes with  the request to  return  and  replacement of  the goods.  The reason
would  be any  one of  the below:-
Damaged  Goods -  In  this situation  if  customer  wants replacement we will proceed  with
replacement and  RMA (Return  Material Authorization).  If  customer  requests for  credit then  we
will proceed  with  RMA with  Credit where customer  will be credited  once the goods are returned
to  Cisco.
Faulty  Goods - In  this situation  we will check  if  the goods are under  warranty,  if  so  we
will book  replacement and  RMA (Return  Material Authorization)  for the faulty  goods.  If it is not
under  warranty  we will update the customer  with  the same and  ask  them to  place a Fresh  order
with  Cisco.
CIP process [carriage Insurance Prepaid]-  Working  with  Insurance Company  (`Chartis',
Nederlands) for  claims on  damaged/lost shipment during  transport for EU countries and
providing  customer  with  the customer credit once claim is settled.  This only  for  the shipments
shipped  with  Insurance.
s Acknowledging  customer with  the order details (such  as sales order  number,  purchase
order number  etc.) once the replacement or  RMA is booked.
s Contacting  customers for  contact details and  address information,  if  logistics is unable to
deliver  the product to  customer.
Additional Responsibilities:
s Taking  training  sessions for  new joiners and  refreshing  sessions for  the team members.
s Auditing  the work  done by  the team and  check  for the errors if  any  to  improve the
quality.
s
Conducting  team huddles to  improvise the quality  and  efficiency.
s Assigning  the work  to  the team members.
Trainings Attended:
Corporate Personality
Active Listening
Client interfacing  skills
Written  communication
Risk  awareness Session
Excel At Work
Personal Strengths:
Good  communication  skills
Good  analytical skills
Quick  Learner  of  new things and  can  implement in  efficient way  for  better  results.
Dynamic team player
Sense of  responsibility
Able to  work  under  pressure independently
Handled  entire gamut of HR  Functions encompassing  full employee life cycle
Company Start Date End  Date Designation Duration Trilasoft
Solutions
Pvt.  Ltd
Jan'2011 July'2012 Assistant
Manager  HR
1  Yr  7
month
Genie
Events &
PR  Pvt.  Ltd.
Jan'2010 Jan'2011 Asst.
Manager  HR
1  Yr  ICS
Manpower
Services
July'2008 Aug'2009 HR
Executive
1  Yr  1
month
Training  History
Company Start Date End  Date Designation Duration BHEL,  Jhansi,  U.P May'2007 Sep'2007 Trainee 05  months Cadbury  India Ltd. Dec'2007 Jan' 2007 Trainee 02  months
Organization  : Trilasoft Solutions Pvt.  Ltd(  Domain    Logistics Software)
Industry : TrilaSoft is a software development company  specializing  in  building
systems for  mobility  solutions used  in  the transport,  warehousing  and  relocation  service
industries.  When  I  left,  the company  serviced  more than  15  clients in  12  countries.
Designation : Assistant Manager  HR  & Admin
Roles and  Responsibilities:
Talent Acquisition,  On-boarding  and  Induction
Managing  recruitment for  sourcing  the best talent from diverse sources after
identification  of  manpower  requirements for  new / existing  branches'
Preparing  the JDs (Job  Descriptions) for  all positions
Planning  human  resource requirements in  consultation  with  heads of different
functional & operational areas
Posting  the Jobs on  Job  portals,  Recruiting  through  Job  portals as well as through
social networking  sites (i.e LinkedIn,  Facebook),  Head  Hunting,  coordinating  with  the
Consultancies/ Vendors related  to  all open  positions
Full fledged  joining  formalities and  boarding,  induction  of  new joinees,  giving  them
an  insight about the HR  Policy  and  Procedures
Ensure infrastructural setup  for  new joinee in  coordination  with  admin  team
Weekly  engagement and  feedback  meetings with  the new joiners for  smooth  transition
in  the organization.
Employee Engagement & Team Building
Conducting  process and  policy  orientation  session  for all employees and  receive their
feedback
Coordinating  and  arranging  for  both  internal and  external trainings
Responsible for  arranging  HR  engagement events such  as monthly  and  annual award
celebrations,  foundation  day  etc.
Ensuring  employee motivation  and  recognition  with  the help  of both  monetary  and
non  monetary  rewards.Roll out Awards-  Monthly/ Annual and  / or any  special award  in  order
to  Recognize and  motivate employees for their  good  efforts/ work  in  the organization.
HR Processes and  Policies
Implementing  and  developing  HR policies for  effective engagement of  available
human  resources and  developing  them across locations.
Manpower  Planning  -Strategizing  the long  / short term directions by  forecasting  the
future manpower  requirement and  designing  plans for  acquiring  requisite skills and
Company  name :- Kalyani Carpenter  Special Steel Ltd,  Pune
Duration  :-  From dated  5  October  2011  to  dated  30  September  2012  (1  Year)
Designation  :-  Electrical Maintenance Engineer  (GAT)
Job  Summary  :- Utility  Maintenance
Maintenance Transformers,  Maintenance of  Electrical Motors,
Maintenance of  Electrical Panel,  Maintenance of  Siemens Circuit Breaker,
Knowledge of star-delta starter  & d.o.l.  starter.
ITI  (fitter)  from J.P.T.C.  Samirpur in  2009  with  70%  marks (NCVT)
Working  as a Jr.  fitter for  one year  in  JP Cement
Good  knowledge of cement mill and  bag  house and  their  operation  and  maintains,
assembly  of  bearing  and  working  knowledge of  pipe fitting.
s 3  months experience in  switchgear
s 3  months experience in  switchgear
In  ADP India Ltd:
Ensure all the valid  interfaces that come in  for all the clients are allocated  to  team are completed.
Perform Peer-Audits on  all the interfaces processed  within  the team.
Try  and  resolve Failure/ errors interfaces due to  various problem (SQR,  File Transmission
Problem)by  Working  with  onshore team,  Database team if  not resolve escalating  them properly.
Ensuring  Ad-Hoc requests of  the clients are completed  in  a timely  manner
WFM by  assigning  the interfaces within  the team.  Record  the assigned  interfaces on  the
validation  log,  update the log  upon  completion  of those interfaces.  Record  issues with  the
interfaces on  to  the log  and  share the log  with  the Clients at regular intervals and  get them
resolved.
Help  the colleagues for  the processing  of  difficult interfaces.
Maintaining  the MIS software for the process by  Taking  backup,  Adding  changes to  improvise
performance
Acheivements:
Achieved  the Quality  of  the month  Award  for  the month  of  July  2012
Achieved  the Spot award  for designing  the Password  word  expiry  tracking  sheet.
Achieved  the Spot award  for timely  processing  the Pay  data file for  the BU.
Achieved  the Spot award  for taking  ownership  of  the New Client.
In  Infosys BPO LTD.
Worked  for an  UK Registrar  company  in  Infosys BPO Ltd.
Skilled  in  managing  the Electronic Share Dealing  Accounts of  the clients.
Responsible for  Opening  a new Account,  Anti-Money  Laundering  Check,  Managing  the account,
Broker  Transfers,  Stock  Deposits and  solving  various issues of  the Clients.  Taking  calls of  the
clients and  the Stock  brokers regarding  the transfer  of  shares and  Trading  accounts.
Equiniti (Transfer-IN Team):
Equiniti is the leading  share Registrar  in  United  Kingdom of  Investment Services.
Equiniti is maintaining  all the share holder or  client register  for  their  different investment
objective.  It is providing  custodian  services to  their  clients.
Responsible for  achieving  the team target as per  SLA and  threshold  quality  requirement.
Analyze each  error to  fix  the discrepancy  issue and  prevent them to  reoccur  in  future for
same transaction.
Contd....
(Page-3)
Providing  training  for new Associates in  the team and  the team ,  banking  the cheques
received  from the customers relating  to  the purchase of shares,  and  also  for timely  investments as
per  direction  of the customers and  Stock  Deposit.
Motivating  the team towards their work  and  in  the absence of  team leader  managing  the
transfer  team.
Responsible for  providing  update and  query  resolution  to  the team with  the help  from
onshore team.
Worked  for Verizon  Billing  (Voice).
Skilled  in  taking  calls of the US clients and  solving  their  billing  queries over the phone.  Skilled
in  Applications   Remedy.  Achieved  many  Promoters and  appreciation  from the clients and
customers.  Happened  to  win  the highest number of  promoters in  Verizon  Billing-  Pune .
In  Don  Bosco  High  School
Served  as an  ASSTT.  Subject Teacher(Computer Science)  .
Responsible for  teaching  and  grooming  the students in  the subject of  Computer  Science
Preparing  the students for  HSLCE.
Introduced  the subject -  Computer Science for the first time in  the Hojai Sub-division  in  DBHS
with  co-ordination  with  Fr.  Principal Alex.  (Assam)  in  the year 2008  and  was successful in
helping  the batch  in  passing  with  100  pc result consecutively  for  2years during  my  tenure.
s Having  a total experience of  9+ years.
T E C H N I C A L S K I L L S
Acquired  basic knowledge in  handling  software like MS Office,  Visual basic,  C++,  C,  HTML,
TALLY,  DOS,  Java,  and  Windows & Oracle.
K E Y S T R  E N G T H S
Ambitious,  enthusiastic and  a very  good  team player.
P E R  S O N A L D E T A I  L S
Sex  Male.
Marital Status Single
Linguistic ability  English,  Hindi,  Bengali,  Nagamies and  Assamese.
Permanent Address \u0022MAZUMDAR  ENCLAVE\u0022,  2No.  Janata Path,  Gobindapalli,  Hojai
Assam- 782435.  Phone +91-9864284672  (Assam)
JAYASHREE
Tel: +91  9611361512/ E-Mail: jayashreeshetty86@rediffmail.com
Intend  to  build  a career  with  leading  corporate of hi-tech  environment with  committed  &
dedicated  people,  which  will help  me to  explore myself fully  and  realize my  potential.
Having  2.5  years of teaching  experience on  different computer  subjects
Experience in  handling  projects of  final year  BCA students as internal guide
Extensive hands-on  project development experience on  Java,  VB  and  Scripting  languages
Efficient and  Effective knowledge of OOPS Concepts
Experience in  software Implementation,  Analysis and  Deployment of  client/server  and
object oriented  systems
Got internship  of six  months in  NITIN SPINNERS LTD.  (BHILWARA)
Qualified  Chartered  Accountant (November 2009)
More than  2  years of working  experience as a Senior  in  Assurance department of  BSR
and  Company  (a member  firm of KPMG international).
Dynamic professional having  rich  and  extensive experience in  statutory,  internal and
tax  audit with  a thorough  grasp  of various corporate and  taxation  laws and  statutory
enactments with  the ability  to  relate theory  with  practical application.
A team leader/player  with  exceptional interpersonal skills and  analytical bent of  mind
thus being  able to  comprehend  and  explain  complex  financial data easily.
Ability  to  work  under  high  pressure situations and  meeting  deadlines.
Position  : Graduate Electrical Engineer Trainee (July  2012  to  January  2013)
Company  : 400kV Madakkathara Substation  under  KSEB  (Kerala State Electricity
Board)
Operation  and  Maintenance works of 400/220kV,  220/110kV,  110/11kV Power
transformers,Circuit breakers,  Instrument transformers,  Isolators and  Earthing  Switches.
Testing  of  power  equipments using  DOBLE kit.
Testing  BDV of  transformer  oil.
DGA of  transformer  oil.
Routine test of  various power  equipments.
Handling  thermal image camera.
Position  : Electrical Engineer (January  2012  to  July  2012)
Company  : Maxwell Electric Corporation  Electrical Contractors & Engineers,  Thrissur,
Kerala
According  to  the load  details given  by  the client,  calculate Maximum Demand  and
specify  the transformer  required  and  its protection
Calculate fault level from the data get from client and  substation,  design  the earthing
requirement and  HT cable size.
Organize the loads into  MSB,  SSB s & DB s as per  IE rules and  provisions required
for the client.
Calculate the Power factor  to  be improved  and  design  the APFC panel.
Provide protection  for  Cables,  motors,  starters as per  standards.
Draw the schematic and  physical diagrams in  AutoCAD
Take approval from Electrical Inspectorate.
Site supervision  during  execution  of  work.
Testing  and  Commissioning  of the electrics.
Projects Involved
Electrification  of  MuraleeravamApartment,Guruvayoor,  having  200KVA Unitized
Sub  Station  and  40KVA Generator.
Electrification  of  ShivamApartment,Thrissur,  having  160  KVA Unitized  Sub  Station
and  62.5KVA Generator.
Electrification  of  M.R.G Sreekrishna,Thrissur,  having  250  KVA Unitized  Sub  Station
and  62.5KVA Generator.
Training  & Certifications
Certified  in  Autocad& Electrical cad  through  autodeskauthorised  training  centre
Two  week  training  in  Kerala Electrical & Allied  Engineering  Co.Ltd  [A
transformer  manufacturing  company  under  kerala government]
Computer Skills 1. AutoCAD -  2011  (Autodesk  Certified  )
2. Electrical CAD -  2010  (Autodesk  Certified  )
3. Basics of C   Programming
4. Matlab  ,P-Spice ,Mi-  Power
5.  MS Office 2007
Functional Areas Years MFG Industry 3  years I.T Software 7  years 9  months Total years 10  year  9  Months
Company  Name/Address. Duration Total Years Department M/S.  S.R.P.Tools Pvt Ltd.  (MHI)
Sipcot complex,  post bag  no:1
Ranipet,  Vellore-Dist,  Pin-632403.
2002  to  2005 3  Years Quality  dept/
Electrical Maintenance
Years Designation From 2002  to  2004 Quality  Department Assistant From 2004  to  2005 Government Apprentichip  (Electrical Dept) Company  Name/ Address. Duration Total Years Department M/S.  Samsung  India software Operations Pvt Ltd.
#66/1  Bagmani Techpark,  lake view B  block.
C.V.Ramannagar.Bangalore-93.
2005  to  2013 7  Years
9  Months
Admin/Facility  Maintenance
Years Designation From 2005  to  2006 Senior Technician From 2006  to  2007 Site supervisor From 2007  to  2013 Electrical Executive Engineer
SRP Tools Pvt Ltd.  (Now M.H.I)
11KV/440  V 1000  kva Transformer operation  maintenance.
600  A Vacuum circuit breaker operation  & maintenance.
1000  A Air  circuit Breaker operation  & maintenance.
500  KVA *  2  No's D.G Operation  & maintenance.
Gear  cutting  tools breakdown  & Rectification.
CNC  Machine breakdown  attend  and  rectification.
Up  to  1000kva transformer  heat treatment plant operation  & maintenance.
Various energy  meter  reading  taken,  calculation  and  entry  activities.
Company  Tele phone system maintenance.
In  Samsung  India Software Operation  Pvt Ltd.  (Under PWS out sourcing)
Buildings: Bagmani Tech  Park,  Lake views \u0022B\u0022Block,  Tridib,  and  Laure.
C.V.Ramannagar.Bangalore-93
Building: J.P Techno  Park.  Millers' road.bangalore-01.
11KV/400  V 3000  kva Transformer operation  & Maintenance.
11KV/600A Vacuum circuit breaker  operation  & Maintenance.
3000  A Air  circuit Breaker operation  & Maintenance.
3000A ATS operation  & Maintenance.
1010  kav  *3  Nos,  D.G operation  & maintenance.
300  KVA *6  No's UPS operation  & Maintenance.
400  Ton  Chiller  plant Observation  with  AMC  Vendor.
22000  cfm AHU'S *  16  Nos operation  & Maintenance.
10  Floor BMS system operation,  Maintenance & service.
15  Technician,  100  office boys & Housekeeping  boys maintenance.
All type of document creation  and  modification  activities.
MY SKILLS IN SAMSUNG
FACILITY/ADMINISTRATION RELATED
7+ years of  Experience in  Office Administration  /Office facility  Management/Facility
Executive engineer.
E.B BILL preparation  activities for  all sites in  Bangalore.
Multi Clint power sharing  calculation  activities.
Site KWH reading  verification  activities.
Arranging  Business Card  Requisitions.
Manage and  handling  of  the all vendors.
Technician  and  office boy  interview activities.
Maintained  Expense Reports every  month.
Management of  Stores and  issue of  Stationary  and  other items.
Technician  shift scheduled  preparation  activities.
Regularization  of  AMC  with  outside service vendors.  like Maintenance,  Cab  hires
services,  Cafeteria,  Housekeeping,  Security,  printing  & stationary,  courier,  travel,
All type of check  list preparation  and  utilization  activities.
BMS AHU Running  hrs changing  activities.
Daily  follow up  of  the meals requirement as per  employee attendants.  Quality  & variety
of  food  served  with  nutrition.
Monthly  Power saving  and  safety  meeting  with  technicians activities.
Vendor  complaint report preparation.
Manage outsourced  contracts and  Manpower.
To  check  & process monthly  bills of  all contractors for  electricians,  housekeeping  &
pantry  staff,  office subordinates staff,  and  telephone services.
To  Facility  General Manager  reporting  work  activities.
Maintenance and  housekeeping  documentary  preparation  activities.
Annual P.M.work  scheduled  preparation  activities.
Month  load  chart preparations and  submit to  management.
Materials requirement report preparation  activities.
Materials stock  list maintenance activities.
AHU history  card  maintenance activities.
Hub  room /Server  room activities.
CCTV Operation  and  maintenance.
ELECTRICAL RELATED
Transformer  Operation  and  Maintenance.
VCB,  ACB  Operation  and  Maintenance.
ATS,  BUS Coupler  Operation  and  Maintenance.
Capacitor  panel Operation  and  Maintenance.
Distribution  panel Operation  and  Maintenance.
Working  knowledge of till 600sqmm cabling  and  gland  work.
D.G Operation  and  Maintenance up  to  1500  kva.
UPS Operation  and  Maintenance up  to  300  kva.
BBT Rising  main  Operation  and  Maintenance.
SCHINDLER  Elevator  related  control Operation  and  Maintenance.
Floor SMSB Operation  and  Maintenance.
MCCB,  RCCB,  ELCB,  MCB,  Operation  and  Maintenance.
DOL and  STAR  DELTA starter Operation  and  Maintenance.
3  phase induction  motor  Operation  and  Maintenance (up  to  50  HP).
LAB  power design  and  wiring  activities.
Cubical wiring  work  supervise and  faulty  find  out activities
A/C  RELATED
FCU Operation  and  Maintenance activities.
PAC  Operation  and  Maintenance activities.
CSU Operation  and  Maintenance activities.
VFD Operation  and  Maintenance activities.
VAV Operation  and  Maintenance activities.
AHU Operation  and  Maintenance activities.
VCD Operation  and  Maintenance activities.
CHILLER  Plant Operation  and  Maintenance activities.
Split /window A/C  Units Operation  and  Maintenance activities.
Air  CFM Balancing  activities.
BMS Software installation  and  execute activities.
BMS DDC  Panel activities.
Actuators Operation  and  Maintenance.
Thermo  start control activities.
AHU Motor shaft bearing  replacement activities
n Project : UAIP-SET.
n
Job  Title : Sr.  Engineer.
n Company  Name : AFTL,  Bangalore.
n Client : CESC.
n Duration  in  this Job  : Oct 2012  to  Present
Description: Planning,  Monitoring  & Execution  of  Trunkey  contract project,  i.e.  design,
testing,  transport,  construction,  erection,  testing  and  commissioning  of  distribution  HT/LT
lines,  distribution  transformers of varying  capacities and  other allied  Works.
Role &Responsibilities:
n Studying  of  DPR  and  clearly  understanding  the scope of work  to  be carried  out.
n Carrying  out Survey  at site and  understanding  the actual work  to  be carried  out.
n Preparation  of  drawings or  pole schedules as per the survey  carried  out.
n Getting  approval for surveyed  drawings from the client.
n Calculation  of  materials required  for  the complete execution  of  work.
n Preparation  of  Estimations for the work  for which  approval is given  by  client
n Getting  the work  order  for  the Estimation  prepared
n Training  the Contractors and  labors about the work  to  be carried  out.
n Planning  and  Execution  of  work  at site within  the given  time.
n
Tracking  of  correspondence to  and  from Clients / PMC  / Subcontractors /Suppliers /
Other  agencies involved  in  execution  and  coordinating  with  HO for  draft replies.
n Maintaining  of all documentation  required  contractually  which  includes
Drawings receipt registers Materials Indent Status daily  and  Monthly  Progress Reports
Presently  working  as Electrical Maintenance engineer for  \u0022M/S Manaksia Limited\u0022 from
22  April 2011  To  Till Date.
Maintenance of  GE FANUC,  Siemens,  Messung  PLC  etc.
Controllers Tuning  of Athena .Eurotherm,  Masibus,  Pioneer.
Drive commissioning  of ABB,  SIEMENS,  MITSUBUSHI,YASKAWA
DELTA,  HITACHI  Drives.
Maintenance of  PMC  250  Sacmi lining,  zapata lining,  PTC  027  Sacmi Punching  M/C.
Maintenance and  servicing  of  Atlas copco  Air  compressors,  Air  Driers.
Maintenance and  Trouble shooting  of  Plastic closures CCM32,  FSM12,  PMV24  Sacmi
Lining  m/c.
Maintenance and  operation  of 380  KVA,  320  KVA,  125  KVA Diesel Generator sets.
In  house Calibration  of  all Equipments.
Documentation  and  facing  of  ISO Audits
Worked  for \u0022Abhedya Industries Ltd.Kothur\u0022 in  Metallizer  department as electrical
maintainance engineer.  From 21  Feb  2010  to  14  April 2011.
s Power complaints,  maintenance & attend  breakdown  of 33KV HTOH,  11KV HTOH,
LTOH,  LT & HT UG Network  &, im provement of  old  LT Network,  replacement of
transformers and  old  LT line by  new UG line,11  KV feeder  separation  work,  Underground  of
Cabling  by  using  Trenchless Technology.
s Handling  subcontractor  Team for  metering  replacement of  consumer,  No  power
complaints team,  new connection  trace and  activate,  Street light undergrounding  cabling  and
maintenance.
s Managing  Project activities & and  executes project work  plans,  monitoring,  &
implementing  measures to  meet changing  needs and  requirements
2.   Six  month  worked  in  BSES Rajdhani Power  Ltd  (Reliance Energy  Ltd),  New Delhi
as an  O&M Engineer.
s
Maintenance & breakdown  team management consumer  complaints rectification
s Billing  of  area wise part by  using  SAP and  SMART2K software
KEY FUNCTIONAL AREAS
s Schedule & resource finalization  with  project team
s Monitoring  the requirements of the project site & keeping  coordination  with  site
management team for  information  exchange & required  action.
s Participating  in  project review meetings for tracking  project progress
s Overall planning,  scheduling,  monitoring  and  management of  project including  works
scheduling,  monitoring  progress of  work  to  ensure timely  completion  without any  cost and
time overrun.
PROJECT EXECUTED
s Over 250  Distribution  transformers LT network  up  to  consumer  energy  meter is
undergrounded  within  one year in  Agra city  (Uttar  Pradesh).
s Many  11  KV Feeder  separation  work  is executed  O/H and  Undergrounded.
s Large no  transformer  old  LT network  is changed  with  new ABC/Dog/Weasel
conductor as per  load
s 33KV network  is routed  over  10000  meter  O/h  or  underground  or  changed  conductor
ACADEMIC & TECHNICAL QUALIFICATION
Degree in  Electrical & Electronics Engineering
s Anand  Engineering  College,  Agra (UPTU,Lucknow)    69.06% in  2010
s 12th  (PCM) Obtained  79.2%  marks in  2005
s 10th  (Science)  Obtained  70.5%  marks in  2003
1. Presently  working  with  Helplab  Healthcare (P) Ltd.,  in  Delhi as a administrator and
marketing  Head  with  \u0022Abacalife Healthcare\u0022,  at New Delhi,  Since July  \u002220012.\u0022
1.A. Handling  all the documentation  work,  like letter drafting  emailing  etc.
1.B. Handling  payment follows up  to  all over India customer.  Even  it is consignee or it is a
distributor.
1.C. Take a follow up  through  all over the field  force what a sale is coming  from market.
1.D. Handing  the enquiry  which  is comes through  the customer of  all over India Like
Making  party  for the company  and  all over  the correspondence work.
Over  one years working  with  Marketing  Division  of  Sarabhai Chemicals generic division,  in
Delhi as Administrator  and  marketing  with  \u0022Vinayak  Remedies Limited\u0022,  at New Delhi,  Since
'2010
1.E. Handling  all the documentation  work,  like letter  drafting  emailing  etc.
1.F. Handling  payment follows up  to  all over India customer.  Even  it is consignee or it is a
distributor.
1.G. Take a follow up  through  all over the field  force what a sale is coming  from market.
D. Handling  statuary  Forms from Sales Tax  Department,  like `C',  `F' form on  quarterly  /
monthly  basis.
2. Over  one years working  with  Cipla Ltd.,  in  Delhi as C&F Manager  handling  \u0022Cipla
Generics Division\u0022,  at New Delhi,  Since '2009
1.H. Handling  the warehouse at Delhi,  my  work  is Stock  arrange,  all the computer  work,  like
letter  drafting  emailing,  Offline Invoicing,  stock  entry  etc.
1.I. Handing  Cash  all other  managerial decision  behalf  of Company.
C.  Handling  transportation  for goods sent Delhi to  our  other depot in  all over  India.
D.  Handling  all A/c work  like Vat Return,  maintain  company  a/c books ledger,  entry  of
daily  expense voucher.
E. Issuing  statuary  Forms from Sales Tax  Department,  like `C',  `F' form on  quarterly  /
monthly  basis.
2. Over  five Years working  with  Intervet India Pvt.  Ltd.,  in  Delhi as C& F Manager
handling  with  \u0022Animal Health  and  FMCG Division\u0022 Since '2005
A. Online Invoicing  and  Handing  Stock  management and  MIS Report.
B. Emailing  and  Drafting  of  customers related  correspondence work  as per  company
requirement.
C. Handing  Cash  all other  managerial decision  behalf  of Company.
D. Handling  all voucher writing,  preparation  of  Vat Return,  and  daily  expense voucher.
E. Handling  Inventory  of goods in  all over  India.
F. Issuing  statuary  Forms Sales Tax  Department,  like `F' form on  quarterly  / monthly  basis.
OTHER  QUALIFICATION:
Expert in  Basic Computer  operation  skill including  MS Word,  Excel,  Outlook,  Tally.
s Responsible for  overseeing  and  guiding  technician  & labor  in  producing  concrete
mixture in  compliance with  safety  standards and  technical applications.
s Handle the tasks of  reviewing  and  providing  input and  guidance related  activities
deliverables and  inspection.
s Perform responsibilities like data gathering  and  analysis including  input in  the project
scope and  design.
s Assigned  the tasks of ensuring  that the requirements of  the project are met by
consulting  with  the subject matter expert.
s Responsible for  assisting  in  design  and  equipment selection  based  on  availability  and
cost effectiveness.
s Play  active role in  project reviews,  project meetings,  hazard  identification,
maintainability,  hazard  analysis,  operability,  model reviews,  and  commissioning.
\u0022Project coordinator\u0022,  NETLINK SOFTWARE SOLUTION PRIVATE LTD,  Bhopal,
M.P (Jan2011    July  2012).
s Attend  clients meetings and  assist with  determination  of  project requirements.
s Prepare project organization  and  communication  harts.  Assist the PM in  the drafting
and  issuance of  project proposals,  tenders,  budgets and  expenditures.
s
Track  the progress and  quality  of  work  being  performed  by  design  discipline.
s Ensue clients needs are met in  a timely  and  cost effective manner.
s Effectively  and  accurately  communicate relevant project information  to  the client and
project team.
s Communicate ideas for improving  company  processes with  positive and  constructive
attitude,  keep  PM and  others informed  about project status and  issues.
Page 1  of  3
\u0022O.M.C.R Executive\u0022,  BHARTI INFRATEL LTD,  (Partner  Bharti Airtel) Patna,  Bihar
(October  2012    Present).
s Monitoring  various alarms of sites in  Bihar  circle thru  citrix  and  escalate the same to
technicians,  cluster  in  charge,  zonal manager,  infra managers and  O&M heads.
s Maintaining  excel sheet of  sites along  with  base station  controller,  base controller
frequency,  site id,  down  time and  restored  time.
s Review issue related  to  power  and  follows the escalation  table within  40  minutes.
INDUSTRIAL VISITS
Hindustan  Photo  Films,  Ooty.
Bharat Heavy  Engineering  Limited,  Bangalore.
National Thermal Power  Corporation,  Ranchi.
Steel Authority  of  India Limited,  Bokaro.
CURRENT ENGAGEMENT (From Aug  1999)
Joining  Time : Asst.  Engineer (Projects)
Current Position  : Manager  (Project)
Organisation : PSL Group  -  Leading  Industrial house in  infrastructure sector
of  Oil,  Gas and  Water,  Flagship  Company  namely  PSL Limited  Involved  in  manufacture of
SAW (Spiral)  steel pipes & anti corrosive coating  thereof  for OIL,  GAS & WATER Sectors.
Vendor  development & Material / Spares Procurement as per  site & project
requirement.
Managing  the outdoor  activity  schedules with  constant tie-ups with  vendor  and
implementing  product quality  promotional strategies.
Coordination  with  Fabrication  erection  and  commissioning  of  new equipments /parts
related  to  pipe mill and  anti corrosion  coating  plant time to  time as per  project requirement.
Planning  of  Man  Power  and  Equipments as per  project site requirements,  with
constant tie-ups.
Look  after  Technical responsibilities related  to  Project Sites assigned  by  Top
Management,  time to  time.
PREVIOUS EXPERIENCE (Sep.  1996  TO July  1999)
Designation : Jr.  Engineer  (Insp.)
Organisation  : Belliss India Ltd.,  A well known  Pioneer  Company  engage in  the field  of
steam turbine,  manufacturing,  Having  technical collaboration  with  Rolls Royce Power
Engineering  Ltd.,  England,  Company  has major  share in  the field  of manufacturing  & supply
of  steam turbine in  process industries,  Up  to  10MW.
I  was responsible for  different type of quality  checks at various stage of
manufacturing  & production  work  of  steam turbine.
Visited  many  different industries to  finalize the space and  location  required  for
turbine and  accessories installation  before shifting  from work  place to  client place.
I  was associated  in  fabrication,  erection  and  commissioning  of  turbine as per  design
and  drawing  requirement.
Responsible for  test running,  and  commissioning  of  turbines before handing  over  to
clients.
Notice period
30  days,  Ready  for  relocation,
Curently  working  as a IT Recruiter  on  Sanguine Technologies from june 2012  to  Till date
Involved  in  Permanent & Contractual staffing.
Identifying  the potential candidates through  sources like Database,  Job  portals,
Reference,  etc.
Initial screening  of the resumes as per  the requirements / telephonic screening,  briefing
the candidates about the job  profile,  salary  package,  organization,  etc
Short-listing,  scheduling  the short listed  candidates and  interview co-ordinations.
Interview follow-ups with  the Clients and  follow-ups with  the candidates.
Developing  and  maintaining  of database on  the basis of immediate and  future
requirement.
Follow up  with  candidate till joining  & after.
Maintaining  resume database,  trackers and  reports.
Skills Sourced:
Microsoft Technologies: ASP,  ASP.NET,  VB,  VB.NET,  C#,  SharePoint.
E-commerce/Internet: Java,  J2ee,  Webservices,  Weblogic,  Websphere,  Struts,  Hibernate,
Swing,  Servlets,  Oracle,  ATG
Posting  on  different sites
Currently  working  with  HCL Infosystem Ltd.  Noida as a Desktop  support Engineer since
30/May-2010  to  till date.
Working  with  as a Desktop  support Engineer  in  highly  professional environment at a
client site HCL Technologies BPO services Ltd.  Responsible to  rectify  the problems related  to
Hardware,  System and  Network,  which  include the network  more than  3000  systems.
Configuring  and  troubleshooting  the Microsoft outlook.
Troubleshooting  Hardware & Software rerated  problems.
Call escalations through  HP OPENVIEW.
System ghosting  though  LAN & HDD by  using  Norton  Ghost Software.
OS installations (win  XP,  win  vista & 7,W8).
Ghosting  by  using  Norton  Ghost application.
Setup  and  configuration  of  Software & Hardware in  BPO industries.
Performance monitoring  and  troubleshooting  include network  connectivity  problems.
Installation  of  Print devices (Network  & local)  on  Desktop.
Co-ordination  with  venders for support.
Completed  BSC  IT from PTU Janaldhar2009  with  first Division.
Fertilizers Experience
Experienced  in  terms of  monitoring  the safety  policies and  procedures at all levels of
construction  of DAP Building  and  Bagging  Plant.
Construction  Experience
Screen  House,  Railway  Siding,  PMC,  RMC,  New Substation  and  also  roads and
drainages.
Vessel Experience
PA-DAY TANK,  SCRUBBER,  GRANULATOR DRYER,  COOLER  DRUM and
STAG.
Road  Safety
NH-59  ROAD BETWEEN GUNTUR  AND VISAKHAPATNAM.
PREVIOUS ORGANIZATION:
Worked  as Safety  Officer  in  HARI  HARA CONSTRUCTIONS PVT LTD,
VISAKHAPATNAM.
Work  site: Ramky  Infrastructures Ltd,  Hyderabad.
Location: Kothaguda.
Project: Ramky  Infrastructure.
Duration: September 2008  to  May  2010.
Client: RAMKY INFRASTUCTURE LTD.
Construction  Experience
Experienced  in  safety  in  terms of  high  raised  buildings (Both  Commercial &
Domestic).
s 4  Years and  6  Months of experience in  different sectors in  Safety  Department.
s Worked  as Safety  Officer in  HARI  HARA CONSTRUCTIONS PVT LTD,
VISAKHAPATNAM from September 2008  to  May  2010.
s Employed  as Safety  Officer  since June 2010  to  November  2012  with  VIJAY
NIRMAN COMPANY PVT LTD,  VISAKHAPATNAM,  C/o  CIL,  Kakinada.
CONSTRUCTION EXPERIENCE:
Well experienced  in  looking  after  the site affairs like camp  installation,  making
arrangements to  the employees in  terms of  accommodation  and  food.
Inspection  of  site equipment including  machineries,  tools,  first aid  kit etc.,
Well experienced  and  confident in  maintaining  discipline among  the employees at
camps and  site.
In  charge and  responsible for  placing  barricades and  suitable sign  boards and  warning
boards at all required  sites.
Well experienced  in  terms of giving  induction  training  to  all new employees at site.
EXPERIENCED AS A SAFETY OFFICER IN TERMS OF:
1. Site safety  induction.
2. Implementation  of  safety  policies and  procedures at all levels of  construction.
3. Conducting  safety  inspections and  meetings at regular intervals.
4. Documented  training  in  Fire and  Industrial safety.
5. Trained  in  First Aid.
s Adhering  to  the work  permit systems and  monitoring  the working  conditions
providing  safe access / egress to  the employees at all work  sites,  maintaining  good
housekeeping,  first aid  procedures wherever  required,  developing  good  attitude and
accountability  for  each  and  every  employee etc.
s Familiarized  with  electrical safety,  safety  related  to  handling  and  using  of  compressed
gas cylinders,  maintenance of  absolute safety  at hot works.  Assigning  suitable personal
protective equipment to  all the employees respectively.
DETAILS OF EXPERIENCE:
1. In  this tenure of  4  years & 6  months I  was assigned  responsibility  as a safety  officer in
the above mentioned  company.  We as a safety  team inducted  safety  for  the first time at our
work  sites.
s I  individually  maintained  absolute safety  in  my  particular  construction  areas,  where
hazardous work  like excavations,  scaffolds,  load  lifting  works etc.,  were involved.
s I  was appreciated  several times for  performing  safety  programs like training  to  the
employees in  regard  to
Usage of  personal protective equipment.
Proper record  keeping.
2. I  have good  experience in  special safety  program like job  hazard  analysis,  hazard
communications,  risk  assessments,  safety  inspections,  safety  audits and  also  accident
investigation  reports etc.,
3. Familiarized  with  First Aid,  electrical safety,  road  safety,  work  permits advanced  fire
fighting  systems,  safe handling  of  compressed  gas cylinders etc.,
Obtaining  ZERO ACCIDENT PERFORMANCE is my  goal.
s Knowledge of Basic Computer  Microsoft Office & Internet.
s Knowledge of Manual Accounting  (Billing,  Cash  Book,  Day  Book,  Journal Books,
Voucher Pads,  Stock  Register  etc.)  In  Hindi & English.
s Knowledge of Accounting  Software (Compaq,  Busy  & Tally).
s Knowledge of Computer  Accounting  (Tally  4.5,  5.4,  6.3,  7.2,  8.2  ERP 9  Release 3.319
with  VAT,  TDS,  Excise & Service Tax) from Tally  Academy.
s One year Diploma in  Financial Accounting  from Agarwal Institute of Professional
Accounting  (Certificate from Tally  Academy  in  Bangalore).
s TCP test passed  from Tally  Academy.
s Presently  working  with  M/s Rayban  Foods Private Limited,  HAPUR as an  Assistant
Manager  - Accounts since 1st April,  2012  to  till date.
s 3  Years 6  Months experience with  M/s Gunjan  Garg  & Company,  HAPUR  as an
Assistant Manager -  Accounts from 1st Sept,  2008  to  31st March,  2012.
s
Preparation  & Finalization  of  Accounts.
s Balance Sheet Final.
s Arrange Audit of  Accounts.
s Bank  Reconciliation.
s Preparation  of  TDS.
s Monthly  VAT Return  & online e-filling
s Annual Return  & Sales Tax  Cases Final
s Maintain  of  Excise Register.
s Voucher Entry  & Stock  Maintain  with  Manufacturing.
s Accounts Maintain  with  (6R,  9R  & Commission  Base).
s
Accounts Maintain  of Trust.
Individual Traits:
s Self-motivated,  thrive in  high-energy  environment.
s Education  and  work  experience to  have knowledge and  value.
s Independent self-starter,  able to  priorities and  resolve problem.
s Adaptability  and  flexibility.
B.E.  (Bachelor  of  Engineering)  in  Electrical & Electronics from Vinayaka Mission's
Research  Foundation,  Salem Tamilnadu,  with  an  aggregate of  61%,  Year 2007-  2011.
s Completed  training  in  P.T.P.S (PATRATU THERMAL POWER  STATION) Patratu,
for 30  days.
s Completed  training  at J.S.E.B (JHARKHAND STATE ELECTRICITY BOARD)
33/11  KV P/S/S Ormanjhi,  Ranchi,  Jharkhand  for 15  days.
Enjoy  working  under  pressure
Organization: TAG Corporation,  Chennai
Duration: 8  months
Designation: Electrical maintenance
Organization: INDIC  EMS ELECTRONICS PVT LTD,  BENGALURU
Designation: Quality  engineer
Duration: November  2011  September  2012
Job  Responsibilities as Electrical maintenance:
S Maintenance and  operation  in  high  voltage installation.
S
To  handle the machinery  motors,  welding  machine compressor,  bending  machine,
cutting  machine,  drilling  machine,  grinding  machine,  punching  machine press.
S To  maintenance the AC  generator.
S EB-Power  reading  for everyday.
S To  follow-up  the everyday  complaints and  priority  basis.
S To  maintain  daily  reports and  report to  my  supervisor.
Job  Responsibilities as Incoming  Quality  Engineer:
S Ensuring  that processes needed  for the quality  management system are established,
implemented,  controlled  and  maintained.
S To  develop  the workforce on  Product specifications and  practices so  that effectiveness
and  efficiency  can  be enhanced  for handling  existing  and  new products.
S To  prepare Quality  System Procedures and  all the other relevant quality  documents as per
Product and  Process specifications.
S To  ensure all the ISO documents are properly  revised  and  initiated  before issuing  to  the
concern  stages.
S
Achieving  organizational goals - Brainstorming  with  management to  determine future
direction  and  growth.
Developed  Web  Pages
Implement the designing
Connectivity  to  the data base
Conducted  the Unit Tests
Coding
Extra-Curriculum Activities:
QUALIFICATION INSTITUTE/COLLEGE UNIVERSITY MONTH & YEAR PERCENTAGE Microsoft Certified  System Administrator (MCSA) -- -- Feb,  Aug
2011
-- JCHNPP Jetking,  Nashik Jetking,  Nashik Jan  2008 76.40% Cert.  Course In  Computer  Hardware Infocomm Computers,  Nashik Maharashtra Business Training  Board Feb
2007
`A' Grade Cert.  For Core Competence In  Computing NIIT,  Deolali NIIT June 2003 84.00%
PROJECT WORK
s MCM PROJECT WORK: - Blood  Bank  Management System
[Application  Software] (Jankalyan  Blood  Bank,  Nashik).
s JETKING PROJECT WORK :-
SEM I: -  Flashing  running  lights
Duration: -  2  weeks
Conclusion:-  To  provide flashing  running  lights on  the highways in  order  to  give a signal for
sharp  curve and  avoid  the accident at night time.
SEM II: -  Wireless Networking
Duration:-  2  weeks
Conclusion: -  To  know about different wireless technologies that is IR,  Bluetooth,  RF,  Laser
available for  transferring  data,  devices used  for  Wireless Networking,  advantages over  wired
network,  standards used  for  Wireless Networking.
1. Organization  : - Netconnect India Pvt.  Ltd  - April 2012  to  till date
Designation  :-  System Administrator
Project :-  RFID based  cylinder  tracking  system
Client :-  IBM - HPCL
Installation  and  administration  of Windows 2003  Server.
Installation,  configuration  and  administration  of  VMware Server.
Installation  and  configuration  of third  party  middleware software on  VMware Server.
Installation  and  configuration  of IBM WebSphere Application  Server  v6.1.
Installation  and  configuration  of IBM HTTP Server.
Installation  and  configuration  of IBM's DB2  database.
Installation  and  configuration  of Trend  Micro  Antivirus on  server  and  regularly  updating
the client machines in  order to  create virus free environment.
Taking  backup  of  data on  Tape Library.
Trouble shooting  software,  hardware and  network  related  issues.
2.
Organization  : - IMSI India Pvt.  Ltd  - May  2011  to  April 2012.
Designation  :-  Data Center  Operator
Project :-  RFID based  cylinder  tracking  system
Client :-  IBM - HPCL
Taking  backup  of  data on  Tape Library.
Installation  of  RFID reader  and  antenna and  tuning  it for  optimum readability  of  RFID
tags.
Trouble shooting  LF card  controller  related  issues.
Trouble shooting  software,  hardware and  network  related  issues.
3. IIPS (EBEL),  Nashik  -  1  May  2010  to  April 2011.
Designation  :-  System Administrator
Handle and  administer VSAT based  technology.
Installation  and  configuration  of Windows 2003  Server.
Configuring  and  maintaining  Active Directory.
Creating  and  managing  users,  groups,  computer  accounts and  their policies,  manage file
and  share permissions.
Trouble shooting  software and  hardware related  issues of  desktop  and  laptop  systems.
Maintaining  computer  peripheral audit.
4. ICFAI  National College,  Nashik  -  18  April 2008  to  30  April 2010.
Designation  :-  System Administrator
Installation  and  configuration  of Windows 2003  Server,  Active Directory.
Creating  and  managing  a network  of  50  PC's and  other  network  resources like printers,
scanner,  switches,  routers.
Installation  and  configuration  of Anti virus and  updating  it on  regular intervals,  in  order
to  provide virus free environment.
Creating  and  managing  users,  groups,  computer  accounts and  their policies,  manage file
and  share permissions.
Trouble-shooting  software,  hardware and  network  related  issues of  270  student's laptop.
Installation,  configuration  and  administration  of  Wi-Fi modem and  provide web  access to
students on  time.
Developed  new machines and  participated  in  designing  process of mechanical
Device (CAD,CAM,UNI  GRAPHICS)
Supervised  the installation  maintains of newly  installed  equipment proper  function  of
Machines and  mechanical equipment
Expertise in  computer  designed  soft wear  for preparing  draft and  concept of  new product
Developed  testing  procedures to  verify  functionally  of machine product to  meet the client
Requirement
Technical Quality  Exposure
Mechanical Softwear  Package   Uni-Graphices (CRISP BHOPAL) ,  MS Office
Mechanical seminar
Attending  Vibration  Analysis in  (CRISP BHOPAL)
Attending  Pneumatic Conversation  System in  (CRISP BHOPAL)
1.  Name of  Employer : Net Ambit,  T.  Nagar
Designation  : Telecaller
Experience : 6  months
2.  Name of  Employer : Wheels India (Travels),  Guindy.
Designation  : Admin  assistant
Experience : 12  months
3.  Name of  Employer : Anand  & Madhan  Chartered  Accountants,  Adyar
Page 2  of  2
Designation : Auditor  Trainee
Experience : 8  months
Process : Accounts and  Maintenance
s Entering  data in  Tally.
s Payroll processing
F  0
B  7
Six  week  Training  in  BHEL Haridwar On  CNC Machine.
F  0
B  7
2  Weeks Training  on  Professional Behaviour Development from MIET,  Meerut.
F  0
B  7
One Week  Training  on  ISO TS: 16946: 2002  Standards.
F  0
B  7
45  days training  on  Industrial Automation  from Soltech  New Delhi.
Educational Qualification Professional:
B.Tech  in  Electronics and  Communication  Engineering  with  First Division  from MIT MEERUT
Approved  by  AICTE,  Delhi and  Affiliated  to  GBTU,  Lucknow in  July  2011.
Teaching: In  school and  personal coaching  center
Presently  Working  as Trainee engg.  In  Mayur  Global Private Ltd  jaipur
North  East Frontier Indian  Railways (4th  June`12-23rd  June'12  (20  Days))
Project Name: Acquire the knowledge of  manufacturing,
Maintenance and  repairing  of  carriage,  bogie & wagon
Examination University Month/Year Percentage Honor  Received B.E. Pune University Jun-2013 62.9 First Class T.E. Pune University Nov-  2012 53.26 Second  Class S.E. Pune University Nov-2011 55.00 Higher  Second  Class F.E. Pune University Nov-2010 58.84 Higher  Second  Class

Total Experience: 1  Year  3  month
Company  Name: GKB  HITECH LENSE (P) LTD
Location: Chennai
DESIGNATION: HR  EXECUTIVE (CHENNAI  REGION)
Duration: 1  Year  3  month(May  2012    Till Now)
Recruitment
n Collecting  the requirements from each  department regarding  their  HR  requirement and
updating  them with  the manpower status report at regular  scheduled  intervals.
n Screening  and  short-listing  resumes and  forwarding  the same to  the concerned
department/departments followed  by  scheduling  interviews for the prospective candidates as per
the convenience of the Management.
n Once the selection  process is over,  segregating  the resumes and  filing  them in  the
respective folders if  they  are under hold  or  not considered.
Offer  Letter
n Preparation  of  Offer  Letters depending  on  the CTC agreed  to  by  the management and  the
prospective employee.
n The Offer  Letter  to  be given  to  the selected  candidate.
n
Once the candidate confirms his joining,  an  Appointment Letter  shall be issued  which  is
duly  signed  by  the HR Department.
Orientation  for New Employees
n The newly-joined  employee shall be given  orientation  training  regarding  the company
and  the departments,  and  the employee will be accompanied  by  an  HR Team member for  a
formal introduction  to  all the departments.
Salary  Statements
n Collecting  the Attendance Sheets
n Preparing  a consolidation  of working  hours
n
Collecting  applicable deductions of employees from the Accounts Department
n Collecting  mobile deductions from the Accounts Department
n Preparing  Salary  Statements
n Submit the Salary  Statements to  the Accounts Department for payment in  cash  or  through
bank.
ID Cards/Bank  Application/Visiting  Cards
n Collecting  three photographs from the newly-joined  employee; one for the ID card/ one
for Bank  Application/one photo  for  his/her  personal file.
n After getting  the ID card,  the bank  application  with  a copy  of ID card  will be submitted
to  the Accounts Department for  opening  Bank  Accounts.
Monitoring  Attendance
n Attendance of  the employees will be taken  from the Access Machine and  monitored  on  a
twice-a-week  basis,  Late arrivals monitoring
n Overtime monitoring  and  taking  necessary  approval from the department head.
n Monitoring  the Staff  Movement register
Security
n Monitoring  the Security  Guards
n
Maintaining  the attendance and  issues dealing  with  the security  outsourcing  company.
Manpower  Update
n Maintain  and  update the manpower requirement of  the construction  team and  other
related  departments and  send  the necessary  update schedules on  a weekly  basis to  the concerned
heads.
Pantry  /Housekeeping  Materials Control
n Maintain  and  monitor  coffee/tea refreshments and  ordering  the requirements of pantry
and  housekeeping  material as and  when  required.
n Addressing  and  attending  to  complaints regarding  office equipments including  A/C
maintenance etc.
Asset Logging
n Maintain  & monitor the resources and  assets and  of  the company  and  logging  the same as
well as maintaining  a register.
n Issuing  the resources/assets when  a new employee joins the company
n
Recovering  the resources/assets when  employees are leaving  the company
Scheduling  Office Boys
Preparing  the office boys' schedule and  sort out the problems in  Housekeeping
n Monitoring  the daily  schedule for  office boys
Employees Database
n Prepare individual database for the employees
n Prepare individual files for  all the employees at Hyderabad/Bangalore locations
n Update all individual files as and  when  required
n
Coding  the employees as per their  entity  and  department-wise.
Filing  System
n Individual filing  index  for  all the departments
n Maintenance of  files for all the external correspondence
n Maintenance of  files for all inter-office memorandums
Internal Memoranda
n Preparing  and  maintaining  internal memoranda as and  when  required  by  the
Management.
Working  as a Project-  Engineer  in  Rajdeep  Electrical Pvt Ltd  from dated  15
November  2011  to  till dated  in  Indian  Oil co-operation  ltd  ( Jammu  depot)  Jammu.
Company  Profile: REPL provide a complete spectrum of Electrical contracting  service
including  Lump-sum Turnkey  Project work,  Electrical Engineering  Design,  Design-assist,
Value Engineering,  etc.,
Operation  and  Maintenance Annual Contracts in  Electricals,  Instrumentations,  Air
conditioners,  Fire,  etc.,  field,
Energy  Audits in  Electricals,  Thermal,  Cogeneration,  etc.,  field,
Authorised  Service Center  of \u0022Larsen  & Toubro  Limited\u0022 for  entire product of Switchgear  of
L&T.
Project on  Lux  Level Improvement include installation  of High  Mast,  Flood  Light,  Well-
Glass Light & Lighting  Pole).
Objective : Project from inception  through  to  project completion  and  client handover.
1.  Handle the task  of  inspecting  and  troubleshooting  electrical systems and  apparatus
2  Co-ordination  with  M/s IOCL & other  sub  vendor  responsible for Target date work.
3  Receipt of  material at the site.
4.  Preparation  measurement sheet / certificate of  material received  at site.
5.intire execution.
6.Hand  over  to  clint after  submitting  Final Bill.
2.  Worked  as a Project Junior  Engineer  in  Laxmi Engineering  Pvt.  Ltd.(Ahemdabad)  from
15  July  2010  to  November  2011  .
A.GAIL (  Chhainsa compressor  station  ) chainsa ,Faridabad  ,  Haryana   June 2010  to
march  2011.
s 4  Week  Training  at FRICK INDIA ltd  15th  june
31th  july
s 4  Week  Training  at MITSU CAD 15th  june
31  th  july
B.E.(Bachelor  of  Engineering)  in  Electrical & Electronics from Vinayaka Mission's
Research  Foundation,  Salem Tamilnadu,  with  an  aggregate of  61%,  Year 2007-  2011.
s Completed  training  in  P.T.P.S(PATRATU THERMAL POWER  STATION) Patratu,  for
30  days.
s Completed  training  at J.S.E.B(JHARKHAND STATE ELECTRICITY BOARD)
33/11  KV P/S/S Ormanjhi,  Ranchi,  Jharkhand  for 15  days.

TCS E-serve Ltd  (formerly  known  as Citigroup  Global Services Ltd)
March    2011  to  Till date
Designation  Team member
Joined  on  09th  March  2011,  in  the Process carrying  out Accounts Maintenance for
U.K based  Clients of Citigroup  Global Market Ltd  (CGML),  London.
Later  carried  out Accounts Maintenance for U.S based  Clients of  Citigroup  Global
Market Inc (CGMI),  NY.
Account Maintenance function  involved  carrying  out the following  activities:-
s Maintenance of  Trade & Settlement related  information  in  the CGML's Database.
s Carrying  out amendments pertaining  to  the Contact details,  Custodian  changes,
Account changes & other  changes on  daily  basis as specified  by  the Client.
s Carrying  out Bulk  Request sent by  the Client to  ensure that the relevant funds are
being  affected  by  the changes specified  by  the Client.
s Liaising  with  the various Relationship  Managers at the Citibank  London  & at the
client's end  via E-mail.
Later  carried  out processing  of the Confirmation  Process a part of  Citigroup  Global
Market Ltd  (CGML) Operation.
Processing  in  the Confirmation  Process involved  carrying  out the following  activities:-
s Liaising  with  the various Relationship  Managers at the Citibank  London  & at the
client's end  via E-mail.
Actively  involved  in  UAT activities.
s Active participation  in  various UAT testing  for  different migration.
s Active participation  in  Check  out release.
Notable Achievements
s Successfully  completed  the site COB  testing  for August 2012.
s Served  as a Team member  of the CGML team which  was awarded  \u0022Champions
League Award\u0022 for the month  of  June 2012.
s Actively  involved  in  Fun  at Work  Committee
Participated  in  Drawing  Competition
Participated  in  Rangoli Competition
Past Experience
CMC  Ltd.
From -  13thJanuary  2010  to  12th  January  2011
Designation  -  Data Analyst (Accounts dept.)
Joined  on  August 2010,  in  the project Earning  Estimate for  Bloomberg.
Earning  Estimate project involved  following  activities.
s Worked  on  the financial statement and  analyzing  Income Statements received  from
the client.
s Tally  the balance sheet received  from the client.
s Analyse the cash  flow statement and  on  Financial ration  for  the furcating  year.
Later  carried  out to  Supply  Chain  Management project.
Supply  Chain  Management involved  following  activities.
s Worked  on  the annual reports received  from the clients.
s Analyze the Analyzing  supply  chain  relationships for  the historic data.
s Analyze time tickers for  the appropriate companies,  which  help  the company  for
managing  and  forecasting  future.
Working  in  M & M Ltd,Nashik  as a Graduate Apprentice Trainee(GAT)  in  Manufacturing
& Quality  Assurance (MQA)  since Last 1  Year.
Animator of  Plant Quality  related  daily  programme Quick  Response Resolution  Team
(QCRT).
Ability  to  do  various concerns analysis of  Vehicle.
Various types of  daily  Quality  Audits on  shop  floor  such  as Process audit,IQ
Audit,Pokayoke audit,Z-Stage audit.
Maintaining  and  updating  the quality  related  documents such  as Control Plan,  PFMEA,
and  Check  sheets.
Maintain  the Process & Product audit observations.
Perused  B.Tech  in  Mechanical Engineering  from Narayanadri institute of science and
technology,Rajampet
s Completed  22  days Vocational Training  at \u0022100%  E.  O.  U.  Plant of Micro  Inks Ltd.,
Vapi\u0022.
s Accounting  Knowledge: Worked  at \u0022R.  R.  Pitalia & Company  (chartered
accountants),  Vapi\u0022,  as an  accountant for  five months.
B.Ed.  from Lingaya's University  Faridabad  in  2010  with  first division.
Basic Knowledge Of Computer  (MS Office,Internet,C+ Etc).
Expert in  Teaching  :
Total five year  teaching  experience from in  following  subjects-
Engineering  Mathematics.
Academic Mathematics.
B.tech,(Electrical & Electronics Engineering)
Bharath  University,  Selaiyur  Chennai-73
(Established  U/S 3  0f UGC Act,1956)
Session-  2009-2013
Company Duration Post CHOICE ELECTRONICE PVT LTD 6  MONTH PRODUCTION ENGINNER
Proficiency  in  Computing  Too1
1.C&C++
2.  JAVA
3.  Plc&Automation in H ydraulic & Pneumatic
4  MS-Office
Personal Strength
s Hard  Working
s Leadership  quality
s Situation  handling  responsibility,
Interested  of area
s
Transmission  Line
s Electrical Machine
s Protection  & Switchgear
Decisive,  Result oriented  Procurement Executive offering  an  experience of  2  years in  IT-Sector
and  1year  in  Manufacturing  Processing  excellent skills summed  up  with  strong  knowledge in
procurement Process,  Costing  supplier Improvement,  Problem solving,  People Soft / ERP
(Purchase Module) and  ingenious problem finder  with  capacities to  lucratively  point out issues
in  early  to  avoid  time/cost expenditures.  Excellent team oriented  individual with  success in
coordinating  efforts within  the internal & external terms to  reach  surpass expectations.
CARRER  OBJECTIVE
To  work  in  a position  of greater  responsibility  and  growth  potential that my  knowledge be best
utilized,  gain  experience and  eventually  assume higher  position.
Corporate : KRIZZ Jewellery  Manufacturer Company
Role : Senior  Executive (Nov  2012  to  till Date)
Work  experience In  Procurement:
s Presently  End  to  end  to  contact details for  all import process
s
Purchase process in  buying  designing  machineries   Accessories and  other  related
products directly  from OEM Vendor's
s Send  the RFQ to  the vendor's for our  requirements,  Once the RFQ received  from our  end
we compare with  our Previous purchase cost for  further  process
s Key  decision  maker in  RFQ process & RFQ is finalized  it goes for  first level approval
s I  release the purchase order  to  the vendor  after  internal approval,  Follow up  with  the
vendors Performa invoice for  payment process.
s All the vendor payment which  happens through  bank  transfer  process
s Importing  goods from European  region  through  EPCG license.
s After  which  my  responsibility  is to  clear  the goods received  and  submit required
documents to  customs or whichever department in-charge
s Also  I  interact with  our  freight forwarders for  clearing  the goods in  time without any
penalties
s Reporting  to  MD once the importing  process is over.
s Monthly  once will visit our factory  for  smooth  operation
Corporate : Cognizant Technology  Solutions India Pvt Ltd
Role : Procurement Coordinator  (Feb  2010  to  Mar 2012)
Work  experience In  Procurement:
s Handled  the Procurement Function  with  respect to  creating  Non  IT related  Purchase/
Work  Orders,  Logistics Coordination  & processing  payments across India.
s Driving  cost saving  procurement initiatives and  working  on  effective cost cutting  areas
on  quality  products,  this benefits our  organization.
s Negotiate the prices with  the preferred  vendor  on  basis of  quality,  pricing  & Warranty  etc
and  submit necessary  recommendation.
s Empanelling  New Vendors to  the Organization.
s
Co-ordinate meetings with  various Supplier  groups to  ensure a smooth  relationship  with
them.
s Releasing  Purchase Orders (PAN India)  for the best quoted  vendors in  People Soft / ERP
(Purchase Module)
s Closely  follow-up  with  Vendors for  delivery  status updating  to  concern  Project Teams.
s Addressing  ADMIN related  queries coming  to  CAR Procurement and  Procurement
ADMIN DLs.
s To  focus and  consistently  report on  Open  Pos.
Invoice Process:
s Handling  Supplier  Queries related  to  payments,  POs.
s To  do  the necessary  follow-ups with  the Finance Team & Tax  Team to  ensure that the
payments are released  on  time.
s Also  working  on  an  Internal Financial tool called  \u0022Vault\u0022 for  processing  payments to  the
Vendor  within  a short span  & thereby  avoiding  paper work  & making  the payments process
effortless
Vendor  Management:
s
Reconciliation  payment related  with  vendors & internal stakeholders.
s Service Delivery,  Supplier  Governance and  Relationship  Management including
Performance Management,  Contract Management,  Matrices and  Dashboard  review for
effectiveness and  documenting  the interactions for  Operational Risk.
s Maintaining  the monthly  MIS for the various Vendors.
Corporate : ITI  Financial Services Limited
Role : Junior Officer   Back  office (Feb  2007    Nov  2008)
Junior  Officer    Back  office Operations
s MCX & NCDEX trade file downloading  process
s Sending  the mail to  Risk  Dept & all branches.
s Securities transfer to  F&O collateral A/C  adjustments for  shortfall clients.
s Collateral Shares transfer  to  Ben  A/c,  & client account (  DP )
s BSE auction  file downloading  from BOLT system & process to  class software
s BSE trade files downloading  from BOLT system & update to  class software.
s
Issue the MCX & NCDEX clients payout (payments)
s Daily  sending  margin  reports (NSE,  BSE,  MCX,  and  NCDEX) to  HO.
s Checking  with  CDSL & NSDL daily  transaction  for client.
s Checking  client shares with  iti DP.
Corporate : Cairn  Energy  India Pty  Limited
Role : Admin  Assistant (Sep  2004    Jan  2007)
Invoice processing
s Supporting  with  finance team for our  vendor  payments credit on  before due dates
s Hotel bills for  the employee.
s Employee Travel bills for  international and  domestic
s Telephone reimbursement bills for office and  staff  residence
s Office canteen  and  snack  bills.
s Office maintaining  electricity  bills and  staff  club  bills.
s
Faxing  reports,  correspondences for  and  on  behalf of  the organization  on  the whole
s Receiving  and  circulating  all the faxes to  various departments in  Cairn
Done internship  at T&AS Engineering,  Hyderabad  on  FPS(Fall Protection  System)
Paper  presentation/Work  Shops
Presented  a paper  on  ;6-Stroke Engine; at MEDHAMILAN 2011  in  Shri Vishnu
Engineering  College for  Women.
Attended  the \u0022Basic Robotics\u0022 workshop  at Andhra University  (Vizag).
Attended  for the AUTO CAD CERTIFICATION PROGRAM by  AUTODESK
Leadership  positions
Member of  the executive body  of  ISTE(Indian  Society  for Technical Education)
student forum.
Conducted  many  events under  ISTE
s Living  Design  Private Ltd,Chennai
May  -2011  to  June 2012
Role-  Sales Executive
s Eco  Dream Properties,  Bangalore
Aug  2012  till present
Role-Marketing  Executive
s Build  the company  profile and  brand  image in  the market
s Continuously  monitor  client satisfaction
s Provide strategic inputs through  proposals based  on  what market demands
s Cold  calling,  Fixing  an  Appointment ,  Second  Level call,  Follow up  with  the clients and
giving  the presentation
Understand  the requirements which  vary  from IT to  non-IT(electronic/mechanical
domain)
Responsible for  sourcing  the correct candidate profile from the portal
Contact the candidate through  telephone and  through  email
Make understand  the client's requirement and  help  the candidates to  apply  for  the job
Negotiate for  a pay  rate source their  resume and  submit to  the client side
Done coordinative talking  and  contacts for  helping  the candidates to  the interview
place
Done coordinative talking  and  contacts to  the candidates and  with  the operation  team
once got hired
Sutherland  Global Services  Dec 10  -  Jul 11
Technical Support Executive:
Was responsible for  supporting  McAfee's Home product of  anti-virus
Responsible for  first level of troubleshooting  the issues ranging  from installation  to
virus updating  to  non  technical issues (payment related)
Method  of  communication  non-voice chat support
CADmarC  Software Pvt.  Ltd.,  Trivandrum Mar 10    Aug  10
CAD Engineer:
Was Responsible for  converting  mechanical engineering  drawings to  3d-model using
Inventor  software and  Vice-versa.
Was Responsible for  composing  some sheet metal drawing  which  was part of  the same
Was Responsible for  modelling  PSLV component from the engineering  drawings
using  CATIA for the client ISRO
A Bottom Up  approach  was used  to  successfully  model the assembly.
Presently  working  as E & I  engineer  in  Jindal steel and  power  limited,  Angul,  Odisha
in  DRI  under  Forays Services and  Construction  Pvt.  Ltd.
Project : DRI  (E&I)
Role : Engineer
Period : April 2012  to  till date.
s Electrical equipments installation  & Erection,  testing,  commissioning  of  electrical
Equipments like MCC,  PCC,  PDB,  MLDB,  VFD panel.
s Having  knowledge of  electrical testing  like Primary  injection  test of  BREAKER,CT
ratio,polarity  test,PT test,Measurement of  bus-bars contact resistance ,TRAFO ratio  test etc.
s
Transformer  Erection,  testing  & commissioning.
s Bus duct erection  testing  & commissioning.
s Handling  of  single line Diagram power  control centres,  Motor control centres and
power  distribution  board.
s Preparation  of  cable schedules,  cables selection  and  cable length  calculation,  glanding
& termination  and  also  installation  of  tray,  earthing  pit & strip  of  both  in  Electrical &
Instrument.
s Loop  checking  of  all field  instruments connected  in  DCS from control room.
s Pre-checking  of  all field  instruments,  package skids & panels in  field.
s Loop  checking  of  all Caution  monitoring  system (CMS)  instruments such  as Vibration
sensors,  Temperature sensors.
s Handled  all documentation  for  pre-commissioning  as preparing  of  markup  loop
drawings,  Termination  drawing  & P&ID's.
s Installations,  Commissioning,  Maintenance of  the following  Field  Instruments
Systems:-
Differential pressure type flow transmitters,  Pressure and  differential pressure transmitters,
Differential and  float type intermediate level transmitters,  Level gauges,  Temperature
transmitters,  Temperature elements like thermocouples and  RTDs,  Vibration  transmitters,
Flow Transmitters,  Cold  Junction  Compensation  Junction  Boxes,  Pressure,  level,  flow and
temperature switches and  valve positioners,  Pneumatic control valves,  ON /OFF valves and
MOVs.
s Handling  Single Line drawings,  Equipment lay  out drawings,  P&ID's, Preparing
testing  reports,  commissioning  reports,  Hook-up  reports at ongoing  Platform
s Also  includes Tubing  work  for  Instruments of all above Systems
Worked  as Supervisor  in  electrical Projects & maintenance at Bhushan  Steel Limited
in  RMHS-II,  Angul,  Odisha under  M/S Shambhu  Singh.
Project : RMHS
Role : Electrical supervisor
Period : December 2007  to  December  2011
s
Electrical equipments installation  like MCC,  PCC,  PDB,  MLDB,  LDB,  PLC.
s Sound  knowledge of  power  & control circuits of MCC,  PCC,  PDB  & PLC  panel.
s Handling  of  single line Diagram power  control centres,  Motor control centres and
power  distribution  board.
s Installation  and  maintenance of conveyer  safety  switches like pull cord,  belt sway,
zero  speed.
s Preparation  of  cable schedules,  cables selection  and  cable length  calculation,  glanding
& termination  and  also  installation  of  tray,  earthing  pit & strip  of  both  in  Electrical &
Instrument.
s Also  maintenance of  electrical equipment motor  both  L.T and  H.T,  transformer.
Certifications & Achievements
s Diploma in  Electrical Engineering  from S.C.T.E & V.T,  Odisha in  2007.
s 10th  in  B.S.E Odisha in  2004.
s Electrical S.C.C  (M.V) Licenses in  Odisha state.
s Working  In  Royal Bank  of  Scotland  (Business Services Private Limited) as a Officer
From July  2011  Till date
s Department: Account Facilitation.
Co    Curricular  Activities
s Worked  with  the Service Quality  Control Group  of  corporate clients as a senior  case
handler.
s Help  Global Corporate Clients maintain  their  accounts held  with  RBS.
s As a member of  the Account Opening  and  Maintenance team,  handling  Current
Account Opening  requests,  handling  signature addition/ deletion/ modification  requests for
RBS Wholesale Corporate clients.
s
Also  handling  services requests to  closure of  corporate accounts,  issuing  credit cards,
removing  credit cards,  Name change and  Address Change.
s Handling  Quality  check  for  the team and  training  the new joiners to  get familiarized
with  the work.
s Frequent contact is also  required  with  the colleagues working  at the Head  Office
(NL)  to  get the work  authorized  / checked.
s Handling  urgent issues and  seeking  an  immediate solution  for the same   Contact
person  for  the counterparts at the Head  Office (The Netherlands) in  case of  any  urgent
issues.
(1)STERLING INFLOW TECHNOLOGY PVT.  Ltd.
VASAI,MUMBAI  (  August 2013  to  30th  November)
Designation  : PRODUCTION SUPERVISOR
Work  details : MANUFACTURING OF HYDRAULIC  DOOR CLOSER OF VARIOUS
LOADS,HYDRAULIC  FLOOR SPRINGS OF VARIOUS LOAD ETC.
(2)SAI-WELD-INDIA (October  2012  to  April 2013)
Boriwali,  Mumbai.
Designation  : DESIGN ENGINEER
Work  details : MANUFACTURING OF PLASMA CNC CUTTING MACHINE.
Currently  working  with  M/s Bharat Energy  Systems,  Visakhapatnam as a Shift Engineer-
Substation  Operations & Maintenance in  HPCL VISAKH REFINERY (1st August 2013  to  Till
date)
Worked  with  M/s Power  Tech  Engineering  Services,  Visakhapatnam as a Shift Engineer-
Substation  O &M in  HPCL VISAKH REFINERY (28th  July  2012  to  31st July  2013)
Worked  with  M/s Sri Kalyani Agro  Products and  Industries Ltd,  TP guddam ,  West
Godavari,  A.P as a junior  Engineer  operations and  Maintenance (7th  june 2008  to  24th  August
2009  )
From Sep'08  to  Date
Non  Ferrous Materials Technology  Development Centre (NFTDC),  Hyderabad,  India.
Project Engineer
Projects & Jobs Handled
Apr'12  to  Date: Reengineering  for  High  Critical Temp  Superconducting  Leads for
IPR.
Generate fabrication  drawings for components.
Handle of  high  vacuum furnaces.
Development of cooling  system for  high  current carriers.
Copper  electroplating  on  SS Pipe.
Vacuum brazing  of  SS Pipes with  OFE copper.
Vacuum soldering  of  Cu  with  braided  copper wires in  High  Vacuum Furnace.
Design  of  the Jigs and  Fixtures for  Vacuum soldering  of high  heat transfer elements
(silver  strips)  inside grooves on  SS 304L Pipe.
Jul'12  to  Date: Development of  Hot Rolling  Mill Isothermal Split Furnace for
NFTDC.
CAD modeling  for  all the interior and  exterior  components.
Feasibility  for  kinetic motion  of  Test sample inside furnace used  as a reference data
for assembly  of  furnace.
Formulation  of the Bills of  Material (BOM)  and  enquiry  with  vendors for quotation/
procurement of  raw material and  Quality  checking  of raw material.
Scheduling  for  machining  of  the components.
Design  for dimensional inspection  gauge of component.
Design  changes in  each  development.
Jul'12  to  Present: Development of  Heat Transfer Elements (Diverter  Target) for  IPR.
Modeling  of  each  component of  assembly  (these are first wall components for  Plasma
by  high  strength  and  high  heat transfer  coefficient).
Design  system for  handling  high  pressure and  high  temperature bonding  of  Tungsten
with  CuCrZr.
Inspection  of  the components in  each  stage.
Development & design  of testing  setup  for  High  Heat Flux.
Aug'10  to  Date: Fuel Injection  & Lubrication  System for  GTRE.
Reverse engineering  and  fabrication  of the Fuel Injection  System.
Disassembly  of existing  system.
Dimensional inspection,  CAD modeling  and  drafting  of  components
Handle 150  of  a total of  460  componenents.
Re-engineering  of  all the components.
Generation  3D Modeling  and  2D drawings for manufacturing
Geometric inspection  with  CMM FARO ARM.
Material characterization  by  using  SEM.
Sep'08  to  Feb'10: Mapping  of  the primitive shapes of Model Building  of  Ship  for
INS
(Description: The main  objective of  this project was to  provide CAD background  models for
all the interior  and  exterior  components of Pipe lines,  equipment for  design  and  planning.
These data was used  as a reference data for  assembling  and  disassembling  of components in
the ship)
Scanning  of  Ship  for  point cloud  data.
Compiling  and  processing  of  the data.
Page 1  of  2
Registration  of point cloud  and  Building  the inner  and  outer  shapes of  ship  in  3D
Model.
Nov'08  to  Dec'09: Molybdenum based  alloys plant for  NFTDC.
Scale-up  of the molybdenum based  alloys plant.
PFD and  P&ID drawings for  Electrolysis process plant.
Calculation  of  the settling  time for  product separation  in  conical bottom separator.
Trouble shooting  in  batch  process of  molybdenum silicate product.
Shift maintenance and  coordination.
Sep'08  to  Feb'09: Regeneration  DM water plant for NFTDC.
2D fabrication  drawing  and  flow diagram for  lines.
Neutralization  of the plant with  caustic and  hydrochloric acid.
Dealing  with  vendors for getting  cat-ions and  anions resins.
Replacement of the process valves.
From Oct'06  to  Aug'08
Sweetech  Engineers,  Hyderabad,  India.
Design  Engineer
Designed  and  developed  venture scrubber for  dust and  fumes collection  in  boilers.
Designed  and  developed  filters for process water recycling.
Prepared  fabrication  drawings of the components.
Prepared  BOM and  handled  material procurement.
Prepared  foundation  drawings,  PFD and  P&ID.
Prepared  operation  manual for  the fumes collection  system.
Commissioned  and  managed  final trials of  fumes collection  system at client site.
From Jun'05  to  Sep'06
Vasant Chemicals Ltd.,  Hyderabad,  India.
Graduate Engineer  Trainee
Involved  in  production  report preparation,  improvement projects,  quality  control and
batch  scheduling  activities.
M/s.  INDIA METER  LIMITED,  CHENNAI.
Designation  : Jr.  Engineer
Nature of  Work  : Testing  Energy  Meter  in  Testing  Department working
assemble section  also.
SREE SAI RAM WIND TECH.PVT.  LTD.,  CHENNAI
Designation : Engineer
Nature of  Work : superviser  in  electrical department,  work  also  wiring
section  in  panel and  Room Wiring.
CURRENT EMPLOYMENT
KOTEC  AUTOMOTIVES SERVICES INDIA PVT.  LTD.
Designation  : Jr.  Engineer
Nature of  Work  : Superviser in  Electrical Department
Profile Institute Description AutoCAD CADD Centre Training  Services,Allahabad Foundation  In  Mechanical CADD C  Language Realtec Computer Eduaction  ,Naini ,  Allahabad C  Programming
DURATION : 4  week
NAME OF THE STREAM COMPANY: Summer  training  in  \u0022BPCL\u0022 (naini ,  Allahabad):
PROJECT TITLE: \u0022Pump  & compressor\u0022
DESCRIPTION: Completed  the summer  internship  at BPCL,naini,allahabad  from 2.07.2012
t0  1.08.2012.  BPCL naini unit deals with  manufacturing  of  Pumps and  Compressors.  My  area
of  training  was manufacturing  of  pumps & compressors part.
FINAL YEAR  PROJECT
PROJECT TITLE : M  ulti Operation  Machine
DESCRIPTION : A machine which  perform three operation  at a time shaping,cutting  and
drilling.
Fresher
s Programming  & Operating  Knowledge of  CNC  m/c :
HMC  8  Axis Bed  and  Floor type m/c MP7,  MP5,  TS5
VTL & VMC  type m/c.
Special purpose m/c (RACK MILLING).
CNC  Programming  in  SIEMENS,  FANUC  and  MAZAK operating  system.
s Calibration  of  CNC machine,  Micrometer,  Vernier  Caliper,  Height Gauge,  In-side
micrometer.
s CNC  Machine Programming& operating,  Drawing  study,  measurement,  Inspection,
Set-up  knowledge,  shop  supervision.
s 5S Activity,  TPM Activity  Membership.
COMPUTING: -
s Working  knowledge of  CAD Software's like AutoCAD 2011  2d  & 3d  Modeling  at
Khodiyar  Cad  Center  V.V.Nagar.
s Working  knowledge of  Microsoft Word,  Excel,  and  the Internet.
AREA OF INTEREST: - Mechanical Engineering,  Production,  Design,  Maintenance.
LANGUAGES: - I  am able to  Read,  Write and  Speak  Gujarati,  Hindi and  English.
Yours Sincerely
Two  years experience in  design  and  development in  VLSI  Programming.
Company  Name: Currently  Working  as Spiro  Solutions Pvt.  Ltd  Chennai.
Duration: Jan  2012  till date
Designation: VLSI  Programmer
Working  as a Verilog  and  VHDL developer.
Prepared  design  documents and  solution  document.
Direct interaction  with  clients.
B.TECH COMPLETED FROM QUANTUM SCHOOL OF TECNOLOGY,  ROORKEE
Knowledge and  understanding  like Welding,  Catia
Exposure of understanding  the functionality  of  the machines like Milling,  Lathe.
Proficient in  self adaptation  within  a dynamic environment.
An  effective communication  with  strong  interpersonal and  analytical skills.
Self starter  and  able to  share my  strengths and  knowledge.
Working  as Junior Data Base Administrator  at DIHM&CT, La jpat Nagar New Delhi since 6th
August 2012  to  till date
Maintenance different diversified  field  like Software Development,  Web  Development and
Software Management and  related  to  Student Records.
Worked  as an  Assistant Programmer  at Genetics and  Pediatrics Department at LNH,  New Delhi
from 1st July  -2011  to  31st July- 2012.
Worked  as a Assistant Programmer  at DOEACC  Center  Chandigarh,  Branch  Office,  New Delhi
(Posted  at MAMC,  Delhi)  9th  June 2009  to  08th  June 2011.
January  2006 MWH Global,  Pune,  India
to  present Senior  Environmental Engineer
I  have been  involved  in  the following  programs whilst working  with  MWH Global Pune office,
Optimise   Thames water Programme   Team Lead
Prepare WBS for  wastewater  network  and  storm water network  model build  from GIS data and
solution  modelling  and  design  of  flooding  schemes,  CSO and  dual manholes.
Involved  in  the project scope review and  technical reviews at each  stage till the design  goes to
construction.  Provide solution  for flooding  schemes and  UID schemes.
4D Programme   Team Lead
Modeling  and  design  of a sewer network  to  estimate flows arriving  at wastewater  treatment
works.  Preparation  of WBS for  the jobs and  responsible for  delivery  of  the projects.
San  Diego  Data Conversion    Client MWH USA -QA/QC  Manager    Co-ordinator
QA/QC  of  the GIS Data conversion  from As-builts of  storm water  drainage system.  There were
more than  7000  drawings which  were needed  to  be digitized  and  attributed  in  GIS software
ArcGIS.  I  was responsible for  the overall quality  of  the deliverables.
Hydraulic Modeling  Projects   Client MWH USA -  Team Leader-  Co-ordinator
Model build  and  verification  of  Collection  system for city  of Atlanta   Client City  of  Atlanta
Building  of  model from GIS data for  the city  of  Atlanta.  Verify  the model from the meter data
and  provide solution  for  sewer incapacity.
United  Utilities (UK) Model Maintenance study-  Project Team Leader-  Client MWH UK
This study  involve preparation  of performance data tables for 200  drainages areas from verified
and  solutions hydraulic models.
Computational Fluid  Dynamics (CFD)  Projects: Client MWH USA
Almeda west Portal Pipe blending-  Client SFPUC,  USA
The study  involve determining  length  of  blending  pipeline to  meet water  quality  objectives for
TDS and  residual chlorine under  different flow and  chemical feed  scenarios
OnSlow Pump  Station    Client MWH UK
The study  involve determining  the best possible location  of  the screen  return  pipe,  which  will
minimize recirculation  of  the particles through  the storm pump
Software used  for  CFD
Gambit and  Fluent
Flow 3D
Hydraulic Modeling  Projects   Client MWH UK
Preparing  hydraulic models of  complex  Sewerage Networks for UK.  Verifying  the sewerage
network  models against measured  storms using  software such  as Infoworks/Hydroworks,  data
manager  and  MapInfo.
September 2004  MEA Group  Inc,  Lakewood  Ranch,  FL USA
to  May  2005 Project Engineer
Evaluate water  quality  and  develop  a Best Management Practices Manual for  airside water
management in  Florida
June 2004  RHT Engineering  Inc.,  Lehigh  Acres,  FL,  USA
to  August 2004 Project Engineer
Design  of  Storm water Management System
Preparation  of  Storm water  Management Permit
Preparation  of  Environmental Resource and  Water  use Permit
Review City  of  Cape Coral SWM plans
Site design,  utility  design,  site layout,  groundwater  modeling  and  soil analysis
August 2003  New Mexico  Institute of Mining  and  Technology,  Socorro,
to  May  2004  New Mexico,  USA
Environmental Engineering  Department
Research  Assistant
Introduction  to  CFD by  Fluent India Pvt Ltd
Attended  Dale Carnegie's \u0022Confidence and  Communication\u0022 two  day  workshop
Attended  Dale Carnagie's \u0022Building  High  Performance Teams\u0022 two  days workshop
Interpersonal skills from Smart Art Chrysalis
Technical writing  workshop  by  Technowrites Inc.
Time Management program from Smart Art Chrysalis